Not much to write about here, but it does exactly what it's supposed to. filters out the pop sounds. now my recordings are much more crisp. it is one of the lowest prices pop filters on amazon so might as well buy it, they honestly work the same despite their pricing,, "musical_instruments"
The product does exactly as it should and is quite affordable.I did not realized it was double screened until it arrived, so it was even better than I had expected.As an added bonus, one of the screens carries a small hint of the smell of an old grape candy I used to buy, so for reminiscent's sake, I cannot stop putting the pop filter next to my nose and smelling it after recording. :DIf you needed a pop filter, this will work just as well as the expensive ones, and it may even come with a pleasing aroma like mine did!Buy this product! :], "musical_instruments"
The primary job of this device is to block the breath that would otherwise produce a popping sound, while allowing your voice to pass through with no noticeable reduction of volume or high frequencies. The double cloth filter blocks the pops and lets the voice through with no coloration. The metal clamp mount attaches to the mike stand secure enough to keep it attached. The goose neck needs a little coaxing to stay where you put it., "musical_instruments"
Nice windscreen protects my MXL mic and prevents pops. Only thing is that the gooseneck is only marginally able to hold the screen in position and requires careful positioning of the clamp to avoid sagging., "musical_instruments"
This pop filter is great. It looks and performs like a studio filter. If you're recording vocals this will eliminate the pops that gets recorded when you sing., "musical_instruments"
So good that I bought another one.  Love the heavy cord and gold connectors.  Bass sounds great.  I just learned last night how to coil them up.  I guess I should read instructions more carefully.  But no harm done, still works great!, "musical_instruments"
I have used monster cables for years, and with good reason. The lifetime warranty is worth the price alone. Simple fact: cables break, but getting to replace them at no cost is where it's at., "musical_instruments"
I now use this cable to run from the output of my pedal chain to the input of my Fender Amp. After I bought Monster Cable to hook up my pedal board I thought I would try another one and update my guitar. I had been using a high end Planet Waves cable that I bought in the 1980's... Once I found out the input jacks on the new Monster cable didn't fit into the Fender Strat jack I was a little disappointed... I didn't return it and as stated I use it for the output on the pedal board. Save your money... I went back to my Planet Waves Cable...I payed $30.00 back in the eighties for the Planet Waves which now comes in at around $50.00. What I'm getting at is you get what you pay for. I thought Waves was a lot of money back in the day...but I haven't bought a guitar cable since this one...20 plus years and still working...Planet Waves wins., "musical_instruments"
Perfect for my Epiphone Sheraton II.  Monster cables are well constructed.  I have several and never had any problems with any of them over the years.  Got this one because I wanted the 90 degree plug., "musical_instruments"
Monster makes the best cables and a lifetime warranty doesnt hurt either. This isnt their top of the line series but it works great with my bass guitar rig and has for some time. You cant go wrong with Monster Cables., "musical_instruments"
Monster makes a wide array of cables, including some that are very high end. I initially purchased a pair ofMonster Rock Instrument Cable - 21 Feet - Angled to Straight 1/4-Inch plugto use with my keyboards, but when it came time to purchase cables for my bass and guitar I thought I'd pinch a few pennies.  I am so glad I did.I compared this cable model to the more expensive models I previously purchased and, aside from looks, could not detect any difference in sound. I Swapped back and forth between my guitars and keyboards, ensuring that each model was used on each instrument - still no difference.What the more expensive model has going for it is looks. I am not sure it (the higher priced model) is even more sturdy because the molded stress relief ends on this model seem to make it more reliable than its pricier sibling.Bottom line: carefully compare both cables using your own instrument and amp - if possible - before making a purchase decision. You may find, as I did, that higher price does not necessarily equal higher value, even from the same manufacturer., "musical_instruments"
I got it to have it if I needed it. I have found that i don't really need it that often and rarely use it. If I was really good I can see the need. But this is a keyboard not an organ., "musical_instruments"
If you are not use to using a large sustaining pedal while playing the piano, it may appear little awkward., "musical_instruments"
I love it, I used this for my Yamaha ypt-230 and it works great, I would recommend it to anyone, "musical_instruments"
I bought this to use in my home studio to control my midi keyboard. It does just what I wanted it to do., "musical_instruments"
I bought this to use with my keyboard. I wasn't really aware that there were other options for keyboard pedals. It doesn't work as smoothly as the pedals do on an acoustic piano, which is what I'd always used. Doesn't have the same feel either. Nowhere close.In my opinion, a sustain pedal like the M-Audio SP-2 Sustain Pedal with Piano Style Action or other similar pedal is a much better choice. The price difference is only a few dollars and the feel and action are so much better. The only thing I've found the Yamaha FC-5 Sustain Pedal is good for is taking up space in a drawer where I keep my electric guitar pedals., "musical_instruments"
This Fender cable is the perfect length for me! Sometimes I find it a bit too long but I don't mind. The build quality is great and I know that it will last. The only gripe I have with this cable is that the metal sleeve gets unscrewed way too easily, requiring me to tighten it often.Sound quality is not affected, and the color is cool, definitely try this cable out., "musical_instruments"
wanted it just on looks alone...It is a nice looking cord... I know it will perform...as for Sam Ash ...this cord was packed in a mailer inside another box with my Roc n Soc... his shipping team do great work..never any complaints from me... I love Sam Ash.. thanks Amazon, "musical_instruments"
I've been using these cables for more than 4 months and they are holding up pretty well.  For years I used seemingly indestructable guitar cables that were made for me by an electrician friend.  When they finally gave out, I got in the habit of using the no-name cables that are always on display near the register at Guitar Center- really more of an impulse buy than something I put any thought into.  After the third or fourth Guitar Center cable failed from light use I decided to try these cables.  Not only are they cheaper but they seem to be holding up better.  I am not terribly hard on my gear but my cables tend to get twisted as I move around and the cheaper ones  eventually fail mid-cable.  I don't mind spending a few extra dollars if the cable is a little more durable.  This cable is actually cheaper- $12 or so shipped- and it's holding up pretty well.  These are actually very reasonably priced for 18' cables.  There is some kind of limited life warantee on this product but I haven't needed it.  Five stars for a nicely made 18 foot guitar cable that costs $12 shipped!Incidentally- these cables are shielded and are meant to connect your instrument to your amp's input.  Do not use these to connect an amplifier to a speaker cab.  You want to use unshielded cables for that purpose.Edit-  More than 6 months has passed and this cable is functioning without any issues.  The price on these things has gone up significantly and although the cable is highly recommended, there are probably better values from Hosa, Monster or Planet Waves-, "musical_instruments"
Fender cords look great and work just as well. By adding the word California to the description I'm sure to sound like the Beach Boys..., "musical_instruments"
This is a cool looking cheap cable which works well. I bent one of the connectors pretty badly but that was my fault. One thing to consider with the cable is to tighten the connectors once in awhile. You'll be able to hear them rattle. It seems that the 'retro' look is screw on connectors over some black rubber, but other than that, the cable looks cool and works well.I also have the shorter red cable which goes with one of my guitars perfectly. I bought theses to use while practicing with others who use black cables. It's easier to plug into different amps without cutting someone out by accident. The green cable is good for that., "musical_instruments"
The Fender 18 Feet California Clear Instrument Cable - Lake Placid Blue  is a very good extra cord for a good price., "musical_instruments"
Very good cable. Well made and it looks great with my Candy Apple Red Tele. The reason I gave it only 4 stars is because it tends not to lay flat on the floor., "musical_instruments"
Got this cable to run a rockband keyboard controller to my M-audio profire 2626 to control midi in Pro Tools. Works great! Firm fit, solidly molded ends, reputable branded cable.(a bit on the thin side, but i haven't seen to have any issue due to this or anything. Couldn't go wrong for $5 at the time of my purchase and prime eligibility., "musical_instruments"
When I was searching for MIDI cables for my ART X-15 foot controller, I came across these Hosa ones, and they were $2 dollars each! As they are now $6, I realize I would still be happy with that price as well, as they are high quality plastic and metal connectors, and work flawlessly. You must realize that they are only 5 feet, as I overestimated it and now wish they were longer. For any connection from racked sound modules, this will be perfect., "musical_instruments"
Cant go wrong. Great quality on a budget price  - Hosa is the go to when you need to hook things up, "musical_instruments"
The ends of the midi cable look and feel like quality. Connection is secure, no worries about uneven connections, it also detaches without a hitch. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
Just trying to find a midi to midi was a task, and you have to make sure the pin config is correct.  This one is a good product and works just fine, "musical_instruments"
The Hosa XLR cables are affordable and very heavily made.I have a large mixer and rack and cables everywhere.I decided to purchase shorter cables and the Hosa cables 5ft measurement worked perfectly.You really will not be disappointed with these., "musical_instruments"
I bought these to go from my board to the amp. We use them for a mobile church so they take a beating. They are still going strong., "musical_instruments"
Sturdy cord and plugs, inexpensive, good value. I don't require professional-level equipment, so this cord serves my purposes well. Satisfied with purchase., "musical_instruments"
Use it every week at gigs.  Solid, no problems with the solder joints.  A good quality cable at a very good price., "musical_instruments"
Hosa products are a good bang for the buck. I haven't looked up the specifications, but I'm guessing the wire is 22 to 24 AWG, but since it's only 10' long, it's good enough., "musical_instruments"
This was exactly what I was after. I have a voice touch and needed a small cord to connect the mic to the voice touch and this was perfect. Before I used a 20 foot cord to go about 12 inches. I highly recommend this for those who keep the mic on a stand and have a voice touch or other stand connected device for vocals., "musical_instruments"
I bought these because I really had too long of mike cords for my solo live show. And these are really nice cords if you have a home portastudio recording studio like myself. Who needs all the spaghetti to trip on all over the place? I bought two because I use a Digitech Live 2 Harmony processor and two XLR mike cords are required to make it operational. Good price here too. Hard to find just 10' mike cords. Usually longer ones are only obtainable., "musical_instruments"
This cable seems like it will last me for a while. As it is only being used to connect a DI box it will not get abused as much as the vocal mics always do., "musical_instruments"
These are not the greatest but they're cheap and they get to you fast when you need them. I've only had one fail and I've bought many of them to use in our broadcast studio.Amazon is the first place I go when I need cables for audio, video, computers or concert lighting.Good music to all!, "musical_instruments"
This is a fine cable at a decent price point, nothing exceptional mind, but it gets the job done well enough., "musical_instruments"
I've used a lot of cables and I always come back to HOSA, they are indeed some of the best audio cables in their price range on the market., "musical_instruments"
I bought this cord after returning a cheap one that I should've known better than to buy. My son, who has some experience as a musician recommended the Hosa brand when I was seeking a proper replacement.I bought it for a small home recording setup which includes a Behringer C-1 Condenser Microphone and a Behringer Xenyx 302 Mixer, and both ends make a reliable connection to both the board and the mic; the sound quality is excellent.An excellent value for the money., "musical_instruments"
Nice solid cables, with excellent support at the ends.  Should last a lifetime of usage no problem and just what I needed to connect my tube preamp., "musical_instruments"
Good quality cable and sounds very good, "musical_instruments"
Zero issues with this cable so far.  It feels fairly cheap and light weight but it has survived for months of plugging in, unplugging, and packing between practice spaces.I'll update this review if/when it breaks., "musical_instruments"
Realtively inexpensive patch cable for electric guitar.I have had it for a few months and so far it has held up pretty well, "musical_instruments"
I bought this because I wanted a cheap replacement cable for one that had a short. I'm pleasantly surprised with this cable. It's decent sound and decent build quality, for a good price., "musical_instruments"
This is a very nice cable for the price. I already bent one end of it though, fortunately it still works fine. Inside the phono connector the wires are covered by white shrink plastic. Haven't noticed any hum or crackles. For sure a good buy., "musical_instruments"
Cheap and good texture rubber that does not get stiff.  Only time will tell how well the soldering is.  Sounds fine to me., "musical_instruments"
Seems sturdy enough, and no noise issues, so I'm pretty much satified with it; it doesn't leave the house so I'm not asking it to handle a lot, but with reasonable care it should last a while., "musical_instruments"
I'm not a professional, but have been playing for many, many years.  This is the best cord I've ever had, though I'm sure Eric Clapton has something better., "musical_instruments"
This Hosa Cable is very well made, with good quality connectors and a nice long length. My son is expanding his collection of amps and effects pedals so needed additional cables to get everything connected. This 25' cable gives him flexibility to move around and it is sturdy enough that it can take being stepped on and pulled around.The cable works well and is a good value for a decent quality cable.Highly Recommended!CFH, "musical_instruments"
I didn't expect this cable to be so thin. It's easily 1/2 the thickness of any guitar cable I've used. Not sure about long-term durability or signal loss/interference. If I had the foresight I'd spend a couple extra bucks on a thicker cable.  Still, it works and was inexpensive.EDIT: 6 months later and it's dead already.  Wire frayed at the right angle jack.  You get what you pay for., "musical_instruments"
Bought this for my daughter along with her new guitar. It seems to work well, no issues in the first couple of weeks., "musical_instruments"
It hums, crackles, and I think I'm having problems with my equipment.  As soon as I use any of my other cords then the problem is gone.  Hosa makes some other products that have good value.  But based on my experience I don't recommend this one., "musical_instruments"
I am not hard on cables.  I typically just plug them in to my guitar, dont move around much, and play for an hour or two a day.  this one seem to perform just fine.  no buzz, and/or other noises noted.  I have several of them and they have all performed well., "musical_instruments"
I have found Hosa cables to be an excellent value. More expensive cables may be more rugged, but for the price, I'm very happy with the Hosa's I have purchased., "musical_instruments"
This is good cable. Excellent 1/4&#34; plugs. The lugs and solder joints are covered with heat shrink material, which will hold everything in place for years. Grade A+ cable at a very affordable price. Definitely  going back for more. The 25 ft. cable was only a couple dollars more than 10 ft., "musical_instruments"
Pretty crappy cable. It works and gets the job done, but after purchasing this product and using it, I will shell out the extra bucks for better quality., "musical_instruments"
I use this cord in my church to run from my pedalboard to my amp (which is in a soundproof box). The cord is reliable and clean sounding. I like it and have used HOSA products in the past with confidence. Excellent cord. Hopefully this review will be usefull to you., "musical_instruments"
This my second Hosa guitar cable.  (The other one is shorter.)  Like my first Hosa cable, this is a high quality item.  I'd definitely buy more cables of this brand., "musical_instruments"
Works for practice ... it's a guitar instrument cable, what can I say ... maybe not the best but it serves it's purpose., "musical_instruments"
These cables have taken a beating the last few months, and have served me well with no problems..Real metal ends, not molded on, with high quality silicone jackets and strain reliefs at the connectors.., "musical_instruments"
In my opinion it does not hurt to have extra guitar cables around. From experience they tend to just die without notice. I have a feeling this one will last a long time. It is built sturdy and sounds really good.I recommend this product., "musical_instruments"
Hosa guitar cables work great. Never had any problems with them. I own several of different lengths and they all sound perfect., "musical_instruments"
This product does exactly what it is supposed to do at a decent price.  I have absolutely no complaints.  This is my first experience with the brand and I am not disappointed., "musical_instruments"
Good quality guitar cord.Very low noise, repairable, effective strain releaf,thick rubber cover!! This is a great buy, under 10 bucks for a quality cord.Of course I just got it..it might not be durable but it looks durable.If I change my mind about anything I will update my review.For now, I would say, buy one!!Joe, "musical_instruments"
This is a good solid cable with no problems. When I'm on stage, I like a longer cable but at practice I don't need all the extra length tangleing up on everything..., "musical_instruments"
This guitar cable is very nice.  It looks high quality and has the white ends.  Fantastic deal for this cable., "musical_instruments"
Good product at a good price. Have used it multiple times and works well with my guitar and speaker. Great to have when friends come over to jam., "musical_instruments"
This item is well built and I like the terminal ends and how they have the spring built in. These aren't going to be the most durable road cables but for home and light road use they will work well., "musical_instruments"
This amp plug is great for the price its 10 ft long the perfect size for jammin at home and it has a quality look to it aesthetically totally worth the price, "musical_instruments"
Hosa Cable GTR210 Guitar Instrument Cable - 10ft. is a High quality Instrument Cable, but low cost, won't break the bank. I'm very satisfied with my purchase., "musical_instruments"
...unbalanced guitar cable is notoriously noisy especially around florescent lights. These are no different. I would prefer to use cables with better shielding but cannot justify the expense considering how rarely these things get used., "musical_instruments"
This is your basic, black electric guitar cable but it works great.  So far the connections at both ends are solid and the sound from the amp is great!  Nice and rubbery and 10 feet is long enough.  If problems arise later with this cable, I will update this review, but as of now there has been no problems whatsoever with this cable., "musical_instruments"
Hosa cable quality can be all over the place, some of their products are good (sound good, reliable, long lasting) and some of their products are not good (affect sound negatively, break prematurely, short useful life span).These guitar cords are actually quite nice, they feel good (gooey soft rubber jacket like Mogami), they sound good and so far they are working reliably, the rubber jacket is about .25&#34; in diameter (by eye) and there is a short heat shrink overwrap to add strength where the wire enters the plug.I bought these when I needed cables fast for an internet concert, we had lots of pedals and signal splits to connect up. These cables arrived in good working condition and we've been using them continuously since.We have over a dozen tube amps and are very particular about sound degradation but so far these cables have not disappointed anyone.I would buy more if I needed them., "musical_instruments"
It's a cable, no frills, tangles pretty easy and due to it's design it might rattle a little when you move around but it works like it should, "musical_instruments"
I never really considered a cheaper cable, I was always taught to get the best I could afford. When this showed up in a cable search on amazon, I jumped on it. I figured I had nothing to lose.To my surprise, this is an excellent cable, with good build quality and a strong, thick jacket that inspires confidence. The sound through it is identical to my Monster cables, and it cost one quarter the price....hmmmm, guess I should have tried to figure this out myself instead of listening to &#34;snobs&#34; for so many years. I will never do that again.This is worth the money twice over, try it out for yourself and kiss overpriced cables goodbye!, "musical_instruments"
One end was loose, so I tightened it, it keeps coming loose so I had to put a dab of crazy glue on the threads, hope I don't ever have to open the end for repair., "musical_instruments"
For the price, fantastic.They do feel light and I don't trust the build quality at the key stress points (where cable meets connector), but then again I am not going to push it.Set your guitar down on it by accident when it's plugged in and...who knows.But for seven bucks it gets the job done. Recommended if you are doing the \"beginner\" thing and testing the waters.Otherwise, spend a few more bucks for something with higher chances of lasting., "musical_instruments"
Hosa makes good stuff, this is no exception. I've trusted them for years, I can't think if a single Hosa cable I've owned that's failed., "musical_instruments"
Only complaint is the size which is my fault. If you can buy at least a 15 foot if you plan to use it on stage., "musical_instruments"
Hard to day too much, but it works great. No issues to speak of. It does the job perfectly well, "musical_instruments"
For the price, this works really well. I see no faults. It can unscrew pretty easily, but this is hardly a problem right now., "musical_instruments"
This cable disproves the notion that you get what you pay for. It's quality outweighs its price. Let's face it, a cable is a cable is a cable. But the quality of these cables can vary greatly. I replaced a lighter cable with this one and I was surprised at the difference in the quality of the sound from my amp. I have an Ibanez ART series guitar into an Ibanez 15 watt amp set up in my home. With nothing changed but the cable, there was a significant difference in quality and volume. So much so that I checked with my guitar teacher who said he was not surprised. The quality appears good. The ends are heavy duty and the little bit of hum I had due to the proximity of everything was attenuated to the point where it was inconsequential. I've seen more expensive cables and this one is (so far) great.Hosa GTR210 Guitar Cable 10 Ft, "musical_instruments"
I was looking for a long cable to perform live with my band and i'm glad with HOSA quality. It feels reliable and without adding noise., "musical_instruments"
These are Good cables at a good price!! Not sure they would hold up to heavy use, but for practicing at home they are really great!, "musical_instruments"
very sturdy, high quality with little to no feedback, i use it for performing for my friends and they all love it, "musical_instruments"
Unless you're going to go for the very top of the line most expensive professional chords, these will do for any medium sized venue., "musical_instruments"
I have many lengths of these Hosa cables and have neverhad a problem with them.I am not an active musician, so have not put any of them throughthe riggers of what happens on stage; so I cannot comment on thistype of usage.In my over 40 years (10 of them on stage) I have come to realize, thatyou should ALWAYS have extra cables (just like strings) with you, aseven the most expensive cables will sometimes let you down., "musical_instruments"
I've been using these for about 3 weeks now - they are strong but flexible and don't seem to develop kinks or bending \"habits\" if you roll them up the proper way.I've seen and used some better cables but not at this price point.  And I've certainly seen quite a few worse!  This is a pretty good sweet spot, in my opinion., "musical_instruments"
I'm a pro-cheapo and I hated this thing. They're noisy, and the cables feel really cheap, gummy-like. Drop few more bucks and get something else!, "musical_instruments"
Works great on my 100 watt Amp. Almost compares to a monster cable. And with Its length Its plenty of Room from your Guitar to amp. GOOD PRODUCT!, "musical_instruments"
Good cable, as good as any expensive brand. Thick, a bit stiff and seems to be shielded. No complaints at all., "musical_instruments"
I own lots of hosa cables they are cheap and quality is there. I've only recieved one bad cable out of around 50 or so. I use a lot of these guys and if they work when you get them, they havn't failed yet., "musical_instruments"
It is a decent cable. It does its job, but it leaves much to be desired as far as structural integrity is concerned. The mating part of the connector jiggles back and forth. The switch is also loose. The connector will move around 2mm out of the microphone without the switch being pressed.'I would not recommend using this cable for critical applications. It would be more suited to home or hobby use., "musical_instruments"
the cable is great for connecting directly to the computer microphone to record live without a console or mixer...... its great  i recomended, "musical_instruments"
Bought this to hook up a Beta 58 to a Panasonic G2 DSLR and a Kodak Zi8 for interviews. Works the way it's supposed to. 90 degree TRS is a nice touch. Good price., "musical_instruments"
Just received this cord and it seems to work as expected. What can you say about an adapter cord?  It is well made, good construction and sound from my DSLR with my mic is superb., "musical_instruments"
If you're like me, you probably bought this to hook up an XLR microphone to a digital recorder or a PC.It works fine for the handy type recorders.But forget hooking this directly to a PC.  Way too much noise., "musical_instruments"
I bought this for my Canon Vixia HF G10 Video Camera and a Shotgun Mic that I recently purchased for it. I needed a 12&#34; wire for it to be a perfect fit from my mic (which is mounted on the Mini Advanced Shoe) to the microphone plug on the Video Camera...The wire on this thing is *not* 1 foot long. the actual wire is under 8&#34; long itself. I would have returned this thing but it was cheap enough that it wasn't worth the hassle... I'd have rated it 1 star, but I tried it on my Nikon D3200 (Shoe mounted Shotgun Mike) and it worked out ok. Still a tight fit though (since there's only 8&#34; of wire)...I'd recommend anyone looking for a short cable go with a 2' adapter; worst case scenario, you can zip-tie a loop instead of getting angry that it doesn't fit.Also, not sure if it's the wire (so this didn't affect stars) but I hear a hiss when recording. Again; unsure if it's the way the wires are stretched out to the max on the DSLR or not (or my shotgun mic)., "musical_instruments"
Well made, XLR 3 pin adaptor to mini.  Needed to get a real XLR mic into the computer and this did the job., "musical_instruments"
The listing for this item can be confusing if you are not sure what stereo XLR is.  Stereo XLR is meant to be similar to your stereo headphones, where left and right are separate unbalanced wires.  This cable is configured to be a stereo unbalanced XLR to a stereo unbalanced TRS cable.  This item is not a mono balanced XLR to a stereo unbalanced mic cable.A little bit a soldering can fix this connector by moving the red wire from ping #3 to pin #2 with the white wire.  Pin #3 then ties to pin #1 with the ground wire., "musical_instruments"
First, the reasons why I awarded this five stars: the construction is uniformly excellent. Both ends have strain reliefs, the 1/8\" connecter perfectly mates with the plug into which I insert it, and the XLR end is a quality component.I purchased this specifically to transform the third channels in myPowerwerks 50 Watt Personal P.A. Systeminto something more useable. This greatly expands the functionality and versatility of the portable PA by allowing me to plug in another mic. Since I have three of those units daisychained I was able to significantly enhance the entire system with this simple adapter.Another reason why I love this is it's noise free. In some environments in which I play there are sources of electromagnetic interference that cheap cables will pick up and transmit. I have not had that problem with this one, so it's another plus.Overall I am very pleased with this adapter and actually purchased a spare in case I damage or lose my primary one. It's a bit pricier than others I considered, but I feel that the quality and peace of mind are worth the premium., "musical_instruments"
I use this cable to run a extra line from microphone podiums to a zoom H1. This adapter has never failed me and has been instrumental in capturing quality audio at live events. I own several of these and love them.I highly recommend this adapter to any visual or audio professional. Also check out Hosa's sinlge XLR to double XLR splitter., "musical_instruments"
This adapter cable for stereo mics to work with small DV cameras will function but with caveats.First, it's construction is pretty light weight. That means you will have to be \"gentle\" with it when using it. That's something none of us in the broadcast production field want to worry about since our gear gets pretty beat up.Second, the adapter only has a one foot in length cable on it. This is pretty short and may not reach to wherever the mic input jack is on your camera. That means you would need another short XLR mic cable to extend from the mic to this adapter.So just be aware that this may work fine for some and not work at all for others. I went to Sam Ash music and found a similar adapter cable, heavy duty, and with a longer cable for the same price. It pays to shop around!, "musical_instruments"
Well made. Works as it should. However, seem to be getting a little bit of noise from a shotgun mic straight into a D800. (more than the usual expected)To see if it was the Mic, cable, or adapter; Tested it going straight into a Zoom H4 recorder.Seems to be a little but more noise going through this adapter cable than straight into the XLR input.No big surprises. Minor clean up in post., "musical_instruments"
Haven't used it yet but if it's like the other cables I have from the same company, it should work fine., "musical_instruments"
Great stereo sound out of the keyboards.My keys had a single 1/4&#34; stereo out so this cable was needed to get it to convert to a true 2 channel stereo so we could EQ it properly and it worked like a charm. I highly recommend this cable., "musical_instruments"
Another quality product from Hosa.  Just what I needed for an insert patch from my mixer to EQ.  I always like slightly longer length as I can always zip tie back but hard to stretch!  No noise from this cable!, "musical_instruments"
When I ordered these I wasn't expecting a whole lot since the price was under two dollars for a nearly 10-foot cable.  It turns out the quality is quite excellent and these cables are not flimsy at all.  I plugged them into the mixer and waited to hear some static, interference or buzz to explain the low price and all I got was a nice, clean signal.  Highly recommend these to anyone with a mixer that needs an insert cable., "musical_instruments"
These are solid cables -- tight fit in receptacles, no introduction of noise, and no discernible loss of signal. Especially considering the price, these are brilliant. I was like some of the reviewers wondering if such an economical cable could be any good, but I trusted their judgment and gave these a try and so count me in among those who weren't sure but have become convinced that Hosa knows how to make a great cable, and to do so without the need to charge Monster Prices., "musical_instruments"
On my mixer, I have send/returns on the same plug using a 3 wire TRS with send on the tip, return on the ring, and a common ground.  But my effects boxes like to have separate 1/4\" TR ins and outs.This is the perfect cable for just such a hookup of things like the behringer sharkBehringer Shark FBQ100 Automatic Feedback Destroyerto the 1202-vlZ3's send/returnsMackie 1202-VLZ3 12-Ch. Compact Recording/SR MixerI probably will order a second cable having seen how well the first one worked out on a send/return., "musical_instruments"
I still operate in an analog environment quite often, so I end up using lots of inserts. I have 8 channels of compression, limiter, gate and expander, plus various EQs and effects processors that need to be routed and applied to specific channels. I have an insert snake that I use as well, but the individual insert cables (of differing lengths) that I carry are lifesavers that make me a more efficient soundman during setup and a more flexible soundman during the show!, "musical_instruments"
I use these in my home studio as INSERTS and they work great. No complaints.On a side note, I always clean all my cables with CAIG DeoxIT Gold G5 Spray Contact Conditioner 5 oz.and hightly recommend it to all musicians, you will hear the differnce. I also spray a q-tip and and clean all the jacks on my guitars and instruments., "musical_instruments"
When you need an audio insert cable, you need an audio insert cable.We custom manufacture insert cables for custom sound-reinforcement fixed installations.  For  mobile rigs, such as mixer cases with processing gear, it's simply not cost effective, and Hosa is our go-to brand for reliability and durability.  There are other brands, but our reputation is at stake.Hosa allows us to maintain our good reputation, while lowering our labor costs. Thanks for such a dependable product, Hosa!  Thanks for such a great price, Amazon!, "musical_instruments"
I play my I-pod through a small guitar Amp.  Great way to wake up the kids.  Works perfectly for the purpose.  Keep in mind small end for I-Pod is stereo and large end that goes into amp in mono.  If needing a stereo jack at both ends get something else., "musical_instruments"
plugged it in and it works to connect a mono line out to the stereo input on a Lepai amp. not much else I can tell you, "musical_instruments"
I bought a few of these to hook iPods/iPhones to live stage sound systems, most of which are not in stereo anyway, so why use stereo-to-mono adapters or 2 separate channels when it's not needed? Perfect solution, seems durable., "musical_instruments"
I carry this in my bass gig bag so I can plug my phone into the mono aux-input on the back of my Genz Benz bass head. Handy for rehearsals when the band needs to listen to a track while working out an arrangement (my bass cab is full range fEARful 15/6/1). Before picking this up, I used a couple of cables / adapters to go from stereo 1/8&#34;  to mono 1/4&#34; and it often seemed I never had quite what I needed on hand., "musical_instruments"
This is what it is... A super cheap mono cable. It should be sufficient for many needs and is cheap enough that thin wire gauge and such can be forgiven. Just be aware that it is cheap and unshielded, etc.For the price and intent, I almost gave it 5 stars. But it's not a 5-star cable... It's a fair quality ultra cheap cable. 4 stars seems about right. (Yes, this is almost exactly what I wrote about the other Hosa cable I reviewed.), "musical_instruments"
It's hard not to love a cord that carries electrons all the way to the end. Not sure what, other than complete failure would take stars away., "musical_instruments"
Cables are cables. They usually all work. And with Amazon, you will always find the best deals for the same quality., "musical_instruments"
Picked up a cable to test on my new pedalboard, and I couldn't be happier. Doesn't suck tone, cables are sturdy, and they sound great. This replaced a normal straight 1/4 inch cable and saves so much space on my board., "musical_instruments"
This L Jack is good enough to make connections between my guitar pedals and it works fine. Flexible enough. I don't like only the fact that it's made out of plastic and it looks cheap, but for the price i paid for it i don't really care., "musical_instruments"
These little patch cables work nicely, there's no change to your tone or sound and they connect one pedal to another just fine..I'm only going to make one small complaint and explain why it got 4 stars instead of 5. The product description says 6 inches, right? If you jump over to these (http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B001PGXKC8/ref=oh_details_o04_s00_i02?ie=UTF8&psc;=1) planet waves patch cables they're listed at .5 feet (same as 6 inches, right?) The Hosa cables seem more like maybe 4 inches, whereas the planet waves cables gave me plenty of room from one pedal to another. I only used the Hosa cable as an emergency back up.To conclude, would I recommend these? Yes, if you have one or two pedals and need an affordable small and effective patch cable, go for these. But my first recommendation will always be planet waves cables over anything else., "musical_instruments"
If you need some 6\" cables to connect your pedals, look no farther. These cables are perfect. They deliver good sound, are very small, and very cheap. What more could you ask for?!, "musical_instruments"
Bought this Hosa Pedal Cable for our son to interconnect his guitar pedal. It works well and seems to be durable. It hasn't given him any problems so far. It doesn't appear to change the sound quality or tone. Great product., "musical_instruments"
Good little connector cable.  Well constructed, durable, built to last.  I would recommend this cable to connect stomp boxes. Worth it., "musical_instruments"
These are great cables. The only con I could give is if they go bad...no opening up the ends to fix them, but in my experience they are durable. Most people are using these on a pedal board so there's not a lot of movement to wear them down., "musical_instruments"
Works just fine, great for little spaces between one pedal to another, if there's more distance, better use another type, bue generally works fine and it's a good quality product, clean signal no problems, "musical_instruments"
exactly what I needed to connect 2 distortion paddles to my amp...do yourself a favor, always order threw Amazon dealers! I placed an order threw onlinecarstereo.com and had to report a scam operation to my credit card co....their customer reviews were terrible, yet I made the mistake of placing n order...right before my eyes they changed their BAD reviews to add good ones...., "musical_instruments"
These are great patch cables especially for the price. They don't suck any tone they are reliable(I've had mine for 2 years)and are really great for players on a budget., "musical_instruments"
these cable came super fast in the mail, They deliver the level of performance you would expect form low cost cables. they work, "musical_instruments"
This is a very good cable. I don't forsee having any problems with it. It's just right for hooking my pedals together eithout the mesws of long cables. If you need this get it. The price is right and shipping was right on time., "musical_instruments"
This is not the fanciest cable you can buy, but it fits my low budget.  It works perfectly, it doesn't feel like its going to break anytime soon, and my pedals are perfectly connected., "musical_instruments"
I typically use planet waves cables but tried these and there just as great. Never an issue. No loss of tone. Never breaks or fails. Quality product for a good price., "musical_instruments"
Really just some inexpensive and yet durable cables to link your stompboxes together. As of yet, i havent had one go all crackly, which, considering they get frequent use, is pretty good. Often, cheap cords die within a year or so. Every electric guitarist keeps a stock of these things, and this one in particular is cheap and accessible. I probably have around twelve of them.Enjoy!, "musical_instruments"
Hosa patch cables are the best for the buck. Great sound and flexible. I'm a firm Hosa cable fan. Love these little guys., "musical_instruments"
These have a lower profile and can fit and bend into the places the ones with thick metal ends can't., "musical_instruments"
I bought 6 of these XLR to 1/4&#34; adapters hoping to connect my microphones to an old funky mixer I owned with 1/4&#34; inputs.  It didn't end up working because I discovered I needed to convert the microphone level to line level (which these don't do), however they do convert XLR to 1/4&#34; balanced quite well.  Just not what I needed in my particular situation., "musical_instruments"
I use this adapter on the interface/mix board end of 1 channel of my XLR cable snake, to change 1 channel into my monitor return. I plug an XLR to Female 1/4\" stereo adapter to the other end to create a headphone jack at the musician end of my setup. Now I can record with 6 channels, and monitor with 2. (It's an 8 channel XLR snake). Why do I go through all that you ask? because I have an 8 channel XLR snake, and instead of buying another snake, why not ADAPT the snake I have? hence the word adapter... :-P I love it. It's a great tool to add versatility to your setup, no matter what you're doing. Definately recommend this product to anyone that would happen to need to change an XLR to balanced 1/4\" stereo... It's high quality, and very solid, I definately expect this to last me a long time., "musical_instruments"
I purchased this to work with my ION system and my shure mic. Arrived as expected, very solid great fit. It works!!!!, "musical_instruments"
This has come in handy many times in my studio Z108.net. We love having it around. Good quality affordable price., "musical_instruments"
As the title says, it works.  The only reason I took off a star is sometimes it gets a little stuck and I have to use some force to get it off the XLR.  But, no issues besides that., "musical_instruments"
This converts an xlr signal (for me, a Shure SM57 mic) into a 1/4 male (I run it into a guitar pedalboard and then an amp).  Have no issues with performance but the converter is a little bulky especially once you clip a mic onto that.  Could be tight fitting into certain places on a pedalboard but works gr, "musical_instruments"
I got 3 of these to plug XLR cables into the 1/4&#34; jacks on my board. I got it because my board only has 6 channels with XLR inputs. None of them work. Perhaps I got the wrong thing?, "musical_instruments"
Its affordable and it works.  Its a nice little adapter for your low impedance cable to your high impedance input., "musical_instruments"
For the price, can't beat it.  Works as well as any $15 - $20 one I would have bought at local guitar stores., "musical_instruments"
Just a basic female XLR to 1/4 inch male adapter. I use these so I can plug my regular mic cables into my keyboard/practice all in one PA., "musical_instruments"
I bought this XLR splitter to split the lead vocal from FOH to my monitor rack.  Used this way it worked great and I never had any problems with signal loss or power issues.  I began using a transformer isolated XLR splitter after we started playing bigger venues and no longer use this splitter.  My only issue with the Hosa Y splitter is that the cable length from the female connector to the male connectors is very short, so short that it would cause the microphone cables to stick out from the mic stand when I plugged it into our lead singer's microphone.  It would be great on a guitar mic or something that's close to the ground, or horizontally placed, but it looks a little funny coming off of a vertical microphone stand., "musical_instruments"
As expected from Hosa another great product.  Solid construction and great sound reproduced.  i would recomed this product to everyone., "musical_instruments"
I use this to run a single, mono XLR shotgun mic line to two audio channels on my Tascam DR-40, which saves me a step in post-production.  The quality is fine and it does what it's supposed to do.  Good price for a good product., "musical_instruments"
If I didn't think that purchasing these items from Amazon I wouldn't do it, plus and more important I have worked as a Purchasing Coordinator for over 25 years now I know how to save money and if purchasing that are great and believe me or not I can find even cables that I can't find in RadioShack, Best Buys no where else, I have done a lot of Purchasing not just for myself, but for business. These Ladies and Gentlemen know what they are doing and they know how to take care of business in the right way, I would like to apply for a position with them.Regards,ffsalsa, "musical_instruments"
This is a solid product. I ended up not needing it so... I returned it. However, it worked fine and gets the job done., "musical_instruments"
This Dual splitter works perfect. I own a live event video company and I shoot a lot of weddings. The most important part of video is the audio. you can make anything look good as long as you can get a good clean audio signal. I always say, half of video is audio. For years I used to run a line directly out of the DJ's mixer to get my audio. The issue with doing it that way is during introdustions you will get the music the dj is playing and the words they are speaking. Often though, the signal is to hot, the music is crap, or the dj says something stupid. With just the DJ's voice I can edit the way I want and compress time. This product has improved my productions beyond it's price sold. I use them to run a separate clean audio line from a DJ's wireless systems to my own audio recorder. They work perfectly and haven't failed me once., "musical_instruments"
This was recommended to me by the top engineer at Genz-Benz bass amplification company.  Andy said that this product is far superior to any other.  He was right.  Fixed the scratchy potentiometer on my Shuttle 6.0 amp.  Also fixed the effects loop jacks, which had become oxidized and were causing my amp to intermittently lose 90% of its power on gigs.  Not good!  After several gigs worth of testing, both problems are resolved!  Andy said that this product actually works better over time once it has been applied since it has a lubricating, cleaning and coating effect on the components.  Wow!  And no, Andy does not own stock in, have affiliation with, or represent in any way the manufacturers of De-Oxit.  Nor do I., "musical_instruments"
This thing is like a magic Spray! Hah!Seriously... I used this on noisy hinges, car doors, etc.I really bought it to clean the POTs (volume controls and knobs) on my Guitars, pedals and equipment. It really does work and gets rid of the static noise you get when you turn your volume control on your radio or guitar for example., "musical_instruments"
I bought this product to use on my amp pots. It restored the sound,power and clearity of my amps.It doesn't evaporate right away, but after a couple of minutes your good to go!, "musical_instruments"
Back in the 1980's I bought a can of deoxit(not the right name but can't remember it) which worked much better and cost much less. It was made for the military. The spray has 3 levels but the low is still way to high. It does work but the stuff I used to have was much better. I don't see much else out there so I may have to stick with it.It is just very wasteful for the cost. I have had good luck with wd40 too, but it is very flammable. I would call it average., "musical_instruments"
Before you pay some tech to fix the knobs and switches on your guitar, stomp box or amp, try this.  95% of the time, this will take care of the problem.  If your amp cuts in and out, also try spraying the effects loop and pushing a 1/4&#34; jack in and out of the socket a dozen times.  The very first can I bought probably paid for itself a hundred times over.  Good stuff !, "musical_instruments"
I deal with quite a bit of electronic musical instrument gear from guitars, basses, amps, FX, MIDI gear, etc.  Over time most of it starts suffering from scratchy / noisy pots (knobs), input and output jacks that are crackly, etc.In the past I've tried some Locktite electronics cleaner, which is provided in a similar can. It would rarely work.In contrast this has cleaned every piece of gear I've used it on saving me from having to physically replace the pots and jacks. It's really like magic in a can., "musical_instruments"
I was getting errors that my printer cartridge wasn't recognized and I sprayed some on the contacts and wiped off the excess with a paper towel.  Now it's working!, "musical_instruments"
This stuff works great and is well worth the price, I used it to clean the pots on several guitars and a bass amp along with various effect pedals, no more scratchiness, no more jarring volume spikes, all my knobs glide now better than the day they were new, I'll always keep a can of this around, nothing more to say, great stuff., "musical_instruments"
Fantastic stuff....I sprayed it in my bass guitar's pot and now its like new. Wish I had found this stuff sooner., "musical_instruments"
What was it, brillcream? a dab will do ya?Something like that -This is all you need for contact cleaning. Worth the coin., "musical_instruments"
I've got an old mesa boogie that has developed scratchy controls over the years.This stuff cleaned most of them out pretty well but my midrange pot is starting to crackle again.I hate to tear the chassis out again but it'd gotta happen, "musical_instruments"
I used this on my guitar Tone and Volume pots and it clears up the crackle.Feels a little oily, but gets the job done and you don't have to replacethe potentiometers., "musical_instruments"
Use this alot on all kinds of electronics. It gets crackling knobs going again. I've use it for years. recommend, "musical_instruments"
The pots on my bass has become &#34;scratchy&#34; so I sprayed a bit into them, turn the pots back and forth a few times and no more noise. Great for what I needed., "musical_instruments"
For the money, this karaoke mic does a decent job for any vocal use. Good to keep as a spare in the gig box., "musical_instruments"
i was truly surprised when i saw how nice it was, has weight to it ,and has good sound , looks nicely made,very good deal for the money,,can't go wrong,, (not a very cheep made microphone ,, MUCH BETTER THEN I THOUGHT IT WOULD BE ! ) its nice,, "musical_instruments"
The only reason I give 4 stars is because I ordered 2 of these and 1 had the chord with it and one was missing the chord... I ordered both at the same time, other than that they are good hot mics..., "musical_instruments"
We bought this Mic and a spare for our son's guitar amp set-up for his mixer. It seems to work fine, and comes with the Mic cord, We decided to go for the model with the on=off switch based on other reviews, and haven't yet been disappointed., "musical_instruments"
As a freelancer, I occasionally work with a band that plays the Midwest, performing on a near-weekly basis.  These are seasoned veterans who have no interest in gear per se and even less interest in brand cachet.  It's all about money to them.  I couldn't believe it when I first saw the group using these Nady mics (even lower-priced several years ago) and insisting they were as good as Shure SM-57's and 58's.  I still don't believe the quality of workmanship compares (any casual empirical test of build quality will prove as much).  But these Nady's handle the announcing, the vocals, and, when needed, the softer sounding instruments (flute, harmonica), and none has broken or quit on my watch.I'm a keyboardist, so mic power and fidelity don't affect me.  I'm only a trifle mortified when there are musicians in the audience who catch on to how cheap we are when it comes to the all-important \"gear component.\"  At the same time, my embarrassment, I confess, is not unmixed with a bit of demonic glee.  After all, who's playing--and getting paid for it?, "musical_instruments"
We bought this mic after seeing how our grandson was handling the mic that came with the karaoke machine thinking that mic would not last very long.  I hope it does because this nady sp-4c is a very impressive mic for the price.  We our using it with our Roland cm30 cube and plan to use it with a Roland micro cube also.  I would have given it 5 stars if the cord connection to the mic was not a little loose., "musical_instruments"
I bought this cable for my band's live show setup.  I bought it almost a year ago and still currently use it for the same application.  While not the best quality cable, the length and price make it a good value for the money, especially if you're buying several at a time.  I don't use these cables in the studio but for live, they're fine.  I'd recommend this cable if you're on a budget and looking to buy several at a time.  If you're only going to buy one, I'd look into Canare or Mogami, they're a little bit more expensive but easy to get and worth the price., "musical_instruments"
If they're used for live performances they will not last very long! Good for the price. I need to resolder the ends after a concert though., "musical_instruments"
There's nothing complicated about this purchase. It's a cable. It works. It doesn't cost a lot. It's a great deal. Get it.I use it every week, and it still sounds perfect. Then, again, I never mistreat my equipment., "musical_instruments"
I bought this cable in order to be able to run longer cable runs on stage. It works for that. It's a narrower gauge of wire than some of my other cables, and that makes me a little cagy about its durability. I tend to use it for cable runs where I don't expect a lot of movement (e.g., running a cable to a mic stand) and save my better cables for the belt pack mics.The jacket on the cable has a very pronounced butyl rubber smell, and it really activated my allergies at first. I stored the mic cables in an open cardboard box for a few months before using them, and that seemed to help a lot with the rubber smell. Not everyone has allergies, so this might not be an issue for all folks--but I couldn't use these cables for anything near my face for the first few months.They're cheap and they work fine. I haven't noticed any sound issues at all., "musical_instruments"
I've had this cable for awhile and I'm not too impressed with the quality. The plug and jack look cheap and the cable is thin. I use it at home on a practice mic and it hasn't had much of a workout. I don't think it would hold up long on stage at a venue., "musical_instruments"
These cables are a little thin compared to hosa and GLS. They picked up a little interference from other equipment as well. Guessing they are lacking some shielding., "musical_instruments"
The Gain on this mic isn't the greatest, but for speeches and soft recordings: this guy can handle it all very well!, "musical_instruments"
I have a few Shure SM58s which cost more.  I like the open sound of the PG48 but vocals seem to break up more at higher volumes than they do with the SM58s.  I like this mic ok but the SM58 is worth the extra money I think, especially if you expect to push its capability., "musical_instruments"
I only do test recording with this digitally to get a better Idea of my learning process from the other side. It gives a clean crisp reproduction of every flaw I have., "musical_instruments"
I use this for Video Exchanges on a guitar instruction website. It's perfect for vocals, podcasting, video recording and so forth. Shure makes excellent stuff. What's also great is you save some money as an XLR cable is included. I'm very happy with this purchase., "musical_instruments"
4 stars instead of 5 only because this thing won't tune your guitar or carry your amp. I use this solo, in a duo with a bass player, in a trio with drums and bass. I have a regular gig at a medium sized club that is basically one large room. I use it through a Pyle Pro self contained Pa into which I also plug my Martin GRP elec/acoustic. The sound quality is excellent. The volume seems limited only bny what the Pyle Pro will put out. I would have no hesitation using this for bigger rooms with a full band and PA. I haven't heard a hint of feedback and the on/off switch is a plus.The 36.99 price might seem to good to be true but think of the things for which we are paying less for than we used to. I bought a 32&#34; Toshiba flat screen for around 230 bucks, Think of what that would have cost even five years ago or less. The same is true of a lot of Audio Gear. A lot of companies are bringing high quality elctronics and music to the market but it's great to have a company like Shure make something so good and so affordable. They have always made a high quality product and now they have one that almost anyone can afford. I cannot recommend it strongly enough., "musical_instruments"
So far, I'm very happy with this Microphone. Tone quality is fine and does everything I need it to do for backup vocals in my band. Although a longer cable would be nice, it's great a cable and was included in the package., "musical_instruments"
It is so hard to get an honest review of any mike that isn't a Shure SM58. This is considered the gold standard by which all others are measured. Of course at least part of this reputation is deserved, but perhaps more for the durability of the SM58 than its sound. I have a couple of SM58s and a couple of PG58s. I was considering the SM48, but the PG58 has slightly better specs, and almost identical price.The first thing I noticed out of the box was that the PG58 is slightly bigger and slightly heavier. It also has a different switch than the SM58. The metal screens protecting them aren't interchangeable. I then plugged in one microphone cable so the settings would be identical. I tried both mikes, one after the other, first with speaking and then with singing and playing guitar, and then I changed the settings, or more specifically, the effects and the EQ on the PA. I repeated the experiment, speaking and then singing while changing between mikes.Here's what I noticed: The SM58 is slightly flatter in the mid range. The PG58 is slightly brighter and has a touch more presence. They are about equal on volume. The slight differences in tone can be easily manipulated with an EQ or just ordinary tone controls. Neither was susceptible to much feedback or vocal pop.I haven't tried out this side by side comparison in a live situation or even in practice, as it's too time consuming and interferes with playing. It's difficulty to judge in those situations too, or at least awkward, but I have used a combination of the two in practice and no one seems to be able to tell the difference, except one person actually expressed a preference for the PG58, but that could be just the settings.I looked at the specs for the two mikes side by side. The SM58 is a little flatter in response, especially at the high end, over 10K Hz, and it picks up a few dB before the PG 58, somewhere between 50 and 60 Hz. However, since the human vocal range is generally between around 300 and 3000 Hz, neither of these seems likely to have much effect, although the SM58 might be a tad more responsive for a bass singer.I also tried out two different Behringer mikes and a Radio Shack mike. The Behringer 8500 was totally outclassed by both of the Shures, sounding tinny and thin and with little presence or volume. I tried out a Behringer 2000XM and was impressed by the similarity. These mikes sound almost identical (The B 2000 and the Shure SM). The Behringer 2000XM seems to have been discontinued, though, and replaced with the 1800XM, an inferior mike offered in bundles of three for under $50.I then plugged in a Radio Shack mike that was a spare backup, not even taken out for practice. The model number is 33-3001, probably also discontinued. This was an excellent sounding mike, with good volume, presence and tone.I didn't have any other mikes to test in this side by side experiment, but I did reach some conclusions:There is quite a bit of snobbery in choosing microphones, with the Shure SM58 held up as some unreachable standard. They ARE sturdy, and they are good mikes and the price is not unreasonable, at around $100. However, there are other microphones which sound nearly identical and are also sturdy and reliable, at lower prices, including the Shure PG58, and most likely the SM48, though I didn't have any of those to test.I wish more people would give unbiased reviews based on actual performance instead of condescension toward those who are either on a budget or looking for alternatives to the standard bearer. I'm giving this 4 stars only because I haven't had enough time to give an evaluation of how this holds up in comparison to the SM58., "musical_instruments"
This microphone is great for singing with a PA and an electric guitar. I sing worship/praise songs and southern gospel and it is very smooth in the mid range and when you get up close it enhances the bass nicely. I don't think it is the same as an SM58 but it is exactly what I need. Built to last and it is a Shure., "musical_instruments"
Just got this, have used it for recording and rehearsal, it works well so far and I will revise the review if that somehow changes in the next few years.  Right now, though, I'd say great product., "musical_instruments"
I bought this one to replace a Shure 8900. It's a big step up from that one. I am pleased with it. The old one had a lot of handling noise. This one has a little but it is very good for the money I paid for it. My next one will be an SM58, but that will be awhile from now. I'm very happy with this PG58.Update:December 2012The handling noise is definitely something to consider. It would keep me from buying another one of these. Other mics I own don't have this problem to this degree., "musical_instruments"
I started with the Shure PG58 and most recently acquired the Shure SM58.  I'd probably be all too ready to agree with those who argue that a Neumann or Telefunken mic costing 5 G's simply isn't that much better than a Nady mic costing 10 bucks.  But with respect to the Shure, I'm less sure that the SM58 isn't worth 40% more than the PG58.  Perhaps if you have a sufficiently high-powered and \"clean\" amplifier and have tweaked the EQ settings to favor the frequencies of the human voice, the two mics could be mistaken for one another.  It was my attempts to occasionally use an instrument amplifier as an emergency P.A. that led me to realize the PG58 sounded somewhat muted and dull compared to the SM58.  Switching to the more common, admittedly more expensive mic, gave me just the extra gain I needed along with added crispness and clarity to the voice (at least for announcements).P.S. I notice that the head of the PG58 is larger than that of the SM58.  Since the rise of the \"digital audio workstation\" (who doesn't have a computer with free, included Garage Band on it?), large, even gold-plated, expensive-looking but cheap mics are on display all over the place.  Despite appearances, when it comes to mics, size doesn't matter--except for appearances (directors of high school show bands will dispense those headsets that wrap half-way around the face, knowing that the girls in the front-line think they're cool--they look just like Madonna'a or Janet's headgear). Some of the best mics are tiny, with an opening the size of a pin-hole., "musical_instruments"
good mic for simple live stuff that isn't too expensive.  it gets a good clear sound and has an on off switch that helps with all kinds of things, "musical_instruments"
This is a proven classic.  Using it to mic my Mesa Boogie Mark V 1x12 cabinet.  Sounds fantastic and is solidly built., "musical_instruments"
This is the #1 mic you should get, recording or live, instruments or voice, it always come through  with a great sound and seems almost indestructible.looking forward to work with it on future projects, can't believe it took me so long to get one of those, "musical_instruments"
Although this mic is now considered primarily an instrument mic, that was not always the case and I've actually preferred this same basic design for live vocal use since 1970 when I bought my first one which was then known as a \"Shure Model 545 Unidyne III.\"  That mic got stolen about 2 years ago, but remarkably was still working at the time it got boosted and I was still using it when I needed one with an on/off switch function.  I've owned or used countless modern day SM-58's and SM-57's along with dozens of other mics over the years from all manufacturers.  I have a fairly deep baritone to bass type voice and I don't need to get closer than about 7 or 8 inches to a SM-57.  To me the SM-57 sounds similar to the $469 Shure SM-7 studio vocal mic if you put a windscreen on it and get about 2 inches away.  I'd only use an SM-7 in a studio environment though because they are slightly more fragile and over four times as expensive.  By design the SM-58's require you to get much closer to the mic to get a full range sound than with the SM-57's.  I prefer the SM-57's over the SM-58's for vocal use because they sound crisper on the highs and they sound fuller on the low end.  The SM-57 sounds more natural on vocals and never sounds muddy or muffled.  The SM-57 has one of the most pronounced proximity effects of any mic I've ever used.  If you tend to shove the mic down your throat you may benefit from the less dramatic proximity effect of the SM-58.  If you are ever going to use an SM-57 for vocals I'd recommend buying the Shure A2WS windscreen with it.  That genuine Shure windscreen fits precisely and locks securely onto the SM-57.  The SM-57 will pop like mad without one.  The only possible drawback to the SM57 as a vocal mic is that there is no model available with an on/off switch these days.  I can't find a modern SM-57 with a switch anywhere.  However, if you've ever tried using a mic when you forgot that the switch was in the off position it probably just became a liability. For my money, the SM-57 is the best all around microphone of the past two generations for stage use and some recording purposes.  For studio vocals I'd use an SM-7, which really doesn't sound all that much different from the SM-57 when the built-in variable EQ on the SM-7 is set the way I like.  The SM-57 and it's predecessors are to me the best all around microphone since 1970 and certainly the most enduring and durable.  You can not go wrong unless you get too close with no windscreen., "musical_instruments"
Good all around mike. If you are looking for a solid mike to start your studio, I recommend this one. Best used for guitar and mid range instrument recording but not bad on vocals. Best mike for the price and purpose., "musical_instruments"
Seriously?  The Shure SM57 sets the standard, which by all other instrument microphones are judged.No kidding.  They work great with guitar (for a REAL acoustic guitar sound, drums, congas, tablas... You name it..  if it's an instrument the SM57 delivers.I hear it's good for vocals as well.  When the President gives a speech, the SM57 is there.In my experience a vocalist better have above average pipes to use the SM57.  The SM58 is better suited to those who lack vocal projection (most wannabe's).For instrument sound reinforcement...  bar-none... the best., "musical_instruments"
If it's good enough to track Tom Petty's vox on the heartbreakers albums, its good enough for the rest of us. Sounds great on amps and perc. Dropped one from a 12 story building a few years back into a parking lot and it barley dented the housing and still works 100%. My drummer still uses it on his kit and I never told him haha (hope he doesn't read this review!) It's a shame the new mics coming out (wireless stuff they make: IE Presentor, PG seies, digital series etc) are such flimsy pieces of garbage. This is the last of the cool from Shure., "musical_instruments"
There's a reason every mic cabinet has at least one of these (and if it doesn't, it should).  This is a great all purpose dynamic mic, I use it for instruments, vocals, even field recording sometimes.  The SM58 has a frequency response that is supposed to be more tailored towards vocals, but that doesn't mean that the 57 can't handle a voice.  They're pretty much the same mic as far as I'm concerned, and for the average amateur recording engineer or home studio practitioner I think you'll find the same thing.  And if you're operating at a level where you refuse to use them interchangeably, then you probably already know what you're looking for.  I'll be getting a 58 to add to my personal cabinet soon, but if you're like me and wanted to spend more on a nice condenser before filling out your dynamic mics, you can't go wrong here., "musical_instruments"
I use this to mic snare drums and sometimes guitar cabinets. It works as well as most mics and is more durable than most. I have used this in the studio when nothing else was available and it worked fine. As long as I run sound for a living I will keep some of these mics., "musical_instruments"
Considering that the SM57 was introduced to the world in 1967, a year after the Shure SM58LC Shure SM58 Vocal Microphone, I guess the 58 gets Batman status, relegating the 57 to that of Robin. But that's not really a fair assessment considering the 57 and 58 were developed at the same time, and except for the 58's acoustic foam lined cage pop screen, the two mics are identical electrically.The SM (Studio Microphone) 57 was designed to begin it's life in a recording studio, as a dynamic microphone used to mic the ever increasing volume of rock and roll amplifiers, drum kits, etc. In that capacity, it had no use for the pop screen of it's cousin the SM58, still one of the most sold vocal mics in the world to this day. So the SM57 slimmed down and even though it's still a fine vocal mic, you'll see it used mostly mic'ing instruments, which it excels at.One of it's long time and most important roles has been the official podium mic for the White House. A pair of SM57's is always seen on various White House podiums for press conferences and there is even a VIP bundled kitShure SM57 VIP Dual Microphone Kityou can buy for this exact type of use.The SM57 is an extremely rugged mic, built to tough standards and can take lots of road abuse. That's one of the things that makes it popular with touring bands and sound companies. And on top of that, it's just a great sounding mic for the price.There is a Performer SeriesShure Beta 57A Microphonethat looks very similar to the SM57 but the Beta 57 has a different mic capsule and transformer and sounds different. So make sure you try before you buy.Bottom line is the Shure SM57 is one tough road mic that sounds awesome and is not overly priced. A best value for sound companies, home studio recordists and touring musicians., "musical_instruments"
I use this for recording guitars as well as live vocals.  I've knocked this microphone around a decent amount, and it is plenty rugged.  I couldn't be happier with it., "musical_instruments"
This mic is well made (heavy on the mic-end).  However, I have yet to try it with my multi-track studio., "musical_instruments"
I bought this for my teen son for Christmas. He loves to play his bass and sing along. He had a different Shure mic and it was totally flat compared to this particular model. Nice and clean sounds, plus it seems pretty sturdy. We did get him a mic stand and it fits on it perfectly and stays put. Shure knocked this one out of the park., "musical_instruments"
these are my preferred mics for practice and gigs... an all around tough mic....great for all your needs...I highly recommend them.., "musical_instruments"
The industry standard for live performance, the SM58 has withstood the test of time and for good reason. These are the only microphones that I perform with, and the on/off switch makes it easier so I don't have to power down all of my gear when I am done practicing...I just turn the mic off., "musical_instruments"
It is not a bad mic for the price ( If you want a real good one with studio quality mic it would cost over 600 bucks) but it is no comparison to a studio mic since I have worked in a recording studio. Now, you need to decide what you want, getting a studio mic alone does not give you the result you are looking for; it is like having HD TV and BD player but playing an ordinary CD. You would have to compliment the mic with many other products like a studio quality mixer, speakers and so on. If you are a home or hobby user, then go for this mic. This mic is quite good for its price. I would probably say, it exceeds your expectations.Arrived as promised in a frustration free packing. Also, make sure you buy a foam mic hood for the mic to save it from unwanted dirt and spit.The only reason I did not give 5 stars is , mine had a little dent on the body ( may be due to transportation) but it has nothing to do with the function but just the looks., "musical_instruments"
How do you review an SM58?? I've used these most of my life, and will continue to. Very durable, I got this to replace the same, a 20 year old, rusted / dented grill 58 :) I also use a D5 (AKG - same price) and a line 6 wirelesss, but the 58 is always reliable first choice or backup., "musical_instruments"
The first rule of microphones is that, \"No one microphone is perfect for every purpose.\"  Rule two is, \"Experiment with different mics in different applications to find your signature sound.\"  I've used Shure SM58's along with their ancestors and relatives back to 1968.  I primarily used them for broadcasting and recording spoken word content but I have used (and still do use) them for singing some back up vocals.The SM58 does one thing well and that is vocal performance when used very close to the mouth for public address use.  Some people, me included, actually sound better and more comfortable in a live performance setting when using another mic, the Shure SM-57.  The SM-58 is a very good vocal mic and for some people probably the best choice.  For example, anyone who can not resist putting the mic right up against their lips while singing will probably want the SM-58.  People with softer or weaker voices will want the SM-58.The SM-58 is highly directional and has a noticeable yet manageable proximity effect (which means the bass increases the closer you get.)  This mic does not pick up well from much over 8 inches away.  The reason so many singers think you are supposed to shove microphones practically inside your mouth is because the ball type Shure vocal mics require you to get them very close or they don't sound right.  On the other hand, the SM-57 sounds best several inches away from the user's mouth and works fine up to 12 inches away.  While the SM-58 is certainly the number one professional PA vocal mic, there are precious few other uses for it because it has a colored sound with a prominent frequency response boost in the upper midrange plus a sound source has to be very close before it is picked up clearly.  It works ok for conga drums and the like, but the SM-58 is about the last thing you'd want to use to mic a sax or guitar.  Personally these mics are not the best for my mic technique or the basic nature my voice, but for some people they sound great.  The live vocal mic that works best for me is the Shure SM-57 with a windscreen.  However for other people the SM-58 works better.  It depends on your voice and what you want the mic to do.  If you have a very deep voice, the SM-58 might be the second best choice after the SM-57 which has a better low frequency response.One certain advantage of the SM-58 is the excellent gain before feedback capability.  This mic can be turned up louder than almost any other mic without that annoying PA squeal.  Another advantage of the SM-58 is that it is still available (at a slight extra cost) with a built-in on/off switch.  The SM-58's ball shaped grills are very sturdy and even if you should dent one you can get a replacement which screws right on for about ten dollars.  I've seen SM-58's dented, rusty, dusty, smoked up, spit into, with pieces missing and slammed into a hardwood stage with the full weight of a boom stand adding mass to the fall and yet I've never seen but one stop working and that malfunction was due to an on/off switch that got dirt in it.All the pro-line Shure mics are top quality.  The pro line Shures also hold their value well.  If you buy one and decide you don't like it, you can get about what you paid for it on eBay.  I would compare as many mics as possible before buying one.  Senneheiser's EVOLUTION mics sound really good too and are worth a look. The SM-58 will be the number one on-stage vocal mic for the foreseeable future because most people follow the crowd instead of actually trying out different mics and picking the one that works best for their particular voice.  These things are so durable that even if they stopped making them today they'd still be around for another 20 years at least., "musical_instruments"
legendary performance indeed! works perfectly, extremely easy to set up, very good sound, good price, that's 'bout all you need to know!, "musical_instruments"
Great all around mic used for vocals.  No frills, tough as nails, and great sound for live music.  If you're buying your first mic (or switching from a cheapie) and intend to use it for singing/vocals, this is a mic that any musician would probably recommend without hesitation.  I've never used another one since the first time I switched from a cheaper mic (that came with some bundle) 10 years ago.  I depend on the smoothness of my vocals to carry off songs and this mic reproduces the warm sounds I like perfectly.  You can stand 3 feet away and really wail, or get up close for some bass response, or anything in between.The SM58-CN comes with the mic, 25-ft cable, cable tie, carry pouch, and mic clip.  The standard SM58 does not have a switch (one less thing to break and I don't miss it)  but the SM58-S does have it for a few dollars extra., "musical_instruments"
I've just got the Shure SM58 microphone.As expected, this is a real workhorse of microphones; the sound is clear, crispy, robust, high quality product.Also, I've bought it at Amazon and they sold through J&R; Music and Computer World which is an excellent supplier. They shipped in less time than expected.I'm a really happy customer now., "musical_instruments"
no complaints here! the quality is great! the sounds is excellent! and my voice sounds wonderful and crisp. use it all the time., "musical_instruments"
A nice addition to my recording home studio!  I recommend it for any one who records ballads or light classical music., "musical_instruments"
This mic works better for some people than others. That being said it is the first mic I put in a lead singers hand upon meeting them. If it doesn't sound good then I try something else. I have no complaints it is my GO TO MIC., "musical_instruments"
I bought two microphones, a AKG D5 and SM58.  I like AKG D5 a little better than this because the vocal sounded a lot clearer and crisp on the AKG.The SM sounded muted compared to D5 without any sound modification out of box.  The output is also a little less sensitive than the D5.However I like the look of SM58 and it seems to be extremely durable., "musical_instruments"
In the immortal words that John Cameron Swayze used when hawking his Timex watches during the early days of live television, the Shure SM58 Vocal mic fits perfectly into that same category.Before I found a career as a film and television sound recordist and mixer, I played in rock bands and did live sound mixing. One of the very first mics we truly fell in love with was the SM58. Introduced by the Shure Brothers Company in 1966, the SM58 quickly rose to become the industry standard in rugged road mics that actually sound good to the ear and are nearly indestructible.The mic capsule is of cardiord (heart shaped) design which helps reject sound from either side. There is a 4K bump in it's frequency which helps vocals cut through stage noise. Construction is rugged, frequency response is 50 to 15,000 Hz, and the capsule sits internally on a foam shock mount to help isolate it from handling noise.We used to joke about the SM58 in that if you needed a hammer and you couldn't find one, just grab one of these, they are that tough. I've seen some of these on the road that you couldn't believe still worked, but they did and sounded great.The cage style pop screen gives the SM58 not only it's distinctive look, one that influenced many other mic brands from the day it was introduced, but it's part of the functionality. Internally lined with a layer of acoustic foam, the cage helps keep vocals pops from getting to the dynamic mic element. As a frame of reference, theShure SM57LC Shure SM57 Cardioid Dynamic Microphoneis the same exact mic and capsule, but without the pop screen.Shure also sells a Performer series mic, theShure Beta 58A Supercardioid Dynamic Microphonethat looks almost identical to the SM58 but uses a totally different mic capsule and transformer and has a different sound so try before you buy.The Shure SM58 is still considered the industry standard of live performance mics today and for the price, they really are a good deal., "musical_instruments"
I made the mistake of thinking I could save forty bucks and get by with the Shure PG-58.  I'm no vocalist but occasionally need to do announcements or accommodate a guest vocalist through an instrument amp (rather than a P.A.). Whatever the reason, the PG-58 simply doesn't have sufficient gain or oomph to be of much use with the Roland Cube / Peavey amps I try to employ it with (I use a 1/4\" adapter with the XLR connector that comes with the mic).  When I borrow a Shure SM-58 mic from someone, the difference is instant and dramatic--it's a far more efficient (i.e. louder) mic, producing a full, clear sound, and without additional pre-amplification, demonstrating why it's the most popular microphone in the world.  For five bucks extra, I can't fathom a reason for avoiding the SM-58S, the version with an on-off switch.  It's a small price to pay for quick solutions to feedback or the unwanted pick-up of \"private\" comments by indiscreet band members.  And even if you're an instrumentalist, it may be wiser to select the SM-58 over the SM-57.  The former mic is a little more ostentatious, but it's also slightly more adaptable, and the screen can filter out a certain amount of wind noise and unwanted non-musical sounds. Above all, the SM-58 has proven itself to be the Sherman tank of microphones, simply unparalleled for ruggedness and durability.[I see a review cautioning the consumer to be wary of \"this seller.\"  Perhaps a good point unless it's in reference to Amazon Prime, which is the Shure SM-58 of commerce: competitive prices, no postage, easy returns.  But anyone who returns an SM58 probably had no business buying it in the first place.  They are the populous drones of the industry, invariably purchased by professionals who know first-hand what they're getting--reliability and virtual indestructibility.  In fact, it's the very popularity of the SM58 that has led to all of the slightly less or more expensive imitators.  Consumers require choice, but with the Shure SM58 there need be none.], "musical_instruments"
There are plenty of flashier - prettier - modern-er looking or more nostalgic looking microphones out there.  Its all just so much marketing garbage. These mics are the best mic for the buck out there.  Anyone who claims to be able to tell the difference between this and far more expensive ones is blowing smoke up your a**., "musical_instruments"
The mic is well made (heavy on the &#34;mic&#34; end), but I have yet to try it with my pop filter and multi-track studio., "musical_instruments"
This is a well made, low noise and low cost cable. Unless you make a lot of money with your recordings, this will do just fine!, "musical_instruments"
Didn't know what to expect for under $10, but it proved to be worth the gamble.This cable appears to be well constructed and it works fine for me(amateur use, infrequent setup/teardowns).It's a decent 15 feet long, and has a locking button on the female end.I'm quite happy with it., "musical_instruments"
I use this cable for small home recording projects. I do not take the cable around to gigs or shows, as I am pretty sure it wouldn't last longer than a few months of heavy use. The sound quality is fine and the metal connecters feel a little bit flimsy. If your looking for something that is cheap and will do the job, this is your product., "musical_instruments"
Received it in time, standard blister packaging but the cable stopped working after 45 days. Since I was out of 30 days return time, sent an email to the manufacturer but no response till today., "musical_instruments"
These things are terrible. One wouldn't fit in my soundboard, another wouldn't lock in my mic. Plain and simple....if your looking for crap that doesn't work....buy this., "musical_instruments"
Pay a couple bucks more and you get one from a brand like Audio Technica and you know it's going to withstand the test of time.  Mine is working fairly well but the attachments are loosening so who knows what's next., "musical_instruments"
Everyone develops personal preferences over time for one reason or another.  I have a personal preference for the XLR ends with the really fine threaded plastic cap on the outside (first to slide down the cable) with a 4 legged gripper underneath that slides next down the cable and pinches down as you tighten the plastic outer cap into the metal housing with the solder contacts causing the gripper to strain relief most cable diameters.  Unfortunately that design isn't used here, but I chose to award the 5 star rating for value because you get 15' of good quality shielded cable with 2 XLR ends (M and F) for well under $1/ft.As for pinout it's straightforward, pin 1 is tied to the metal grip and shield and connects between both ends, while pins 2 and 3 are run isolated between both ends.  The end design chosen uses the single set screw connector (the tiny one that gets lost so easy if you need to take it apart) and the rubber bumper design on the back which I haven't had the best of luck making quick changes in the field with, however for interconnecting equipment on a temporary basis these cables are an important starting point of any audio engineer's kit because they will be used not if but WHEN the need arises.Another favorite of mine is the 6 pack of 3 foot male to female cables which do use my favorite XLR ends mentioned above, which amazon will rush you:GLS Audio 3ft Patch Cable Cords - XLR Male To XLR Female Black Cables - 3' Balanced Snake Cord - 6 PACK- these are very easy to open an end, change phase, lift ground, or input someone's oddball source signal.  Having 6 on hand means you won't quibble over cable costs before the show starts and that channel will be in the final mix.Back to pyle's product here, I basically took away 1 star for not using the easy to open and re-wire XLRs but gave them a star for value in the product since it's 15 feet long and will reach between my mixer and most anything else inside the booth for under a buck a foot.  It's also great when someone yells \"it's too short I need a cable stretcher at the podium!\" and quickly adds 15 feet of noise free movement to a stage snake that either wasn't planned for or got moved/quit working.  For the price they have saved many installations from being torn up or rewired which means no surprises opening the next showing.I finally equipped my cable kit with the usual XLR to  RCA, 1/4 TRS, hi-z transformers, and the above mentioned 6 pack of 3 foot cables to quickly gain access to the XLR terminals if need be, plus 2 of these 15 foot cables mainly to solve distance problems, and a roll of gaffer's tape for good measure to prevent tripping hazards.  I used to have 2ea 50 foot XLR cables but no sooner than the box was opened one became a permanent addition to the stage snake so now I have one left for my kit. With all that I had to build an emergency XLR to 2.5mm TS all metal shielded connector for a mike input on short notice so a soldering kit with misc plugs got added to my cable bin.  Even though all this was under $100 it has saved the day more than once and made the show go on, so a bit of \"what if\" thinking and judicial purchases can make you look like the miracle mixer in the black painted room and justify your existance when the owner's daugher's toy musicbox becomes a channel in the house mix thanks to some quick cable magic.My last cable advice is never deconstruct something you custom made.  It will no doubt be needed again, and since you made it you'll know why, how, and where it was used before, thus you save time not recreating a past fix rather pulling it from your magic box of tricks and solving the problem.  People think you can hook anything up where others tried and failed furthering your staff position.  My only exception goes to cables that violate every standard and didn't serve to fix the problem like that phase reversed ground lifted XLR 4 pin stereo Y splitter to dual TRS female cable I made for the harmonica duet where the performers had nose rings and lip bars pierced and kept getting static with their mics when they held the harmonica up to their jewelry.  I chalked that up to being part of the intended musical signal, wondering just how much it hurt to play with all the piercings scraping along the harmonica when I setup my monitor speakers to listen to just that (stereo) channel in rehersal at the console., "musical_instruments"
This is a great chord for anyone needing to not spend the money on a high quality chord... It's no PEAVEY but it works just as good..., "musical_instruments"
The product feels a little on the \"cheap\" side, but definitely does the job the way it should- so that's all I care about. It was cheap, and came fast. I recommend it., "musical_instruments"
I bought a pair of these cables and they work just fine.  There doesn't seem to be any noise and they seem to be built to last.  They do what they're supposed to do., "musical_instruments"
This was one of two I purchased. Also bought the 25' Length and used them on an assignment recently.  They fit my RODE Mic nice and tight, other cords I have bought didn't and the sound quality is excellent. If Amazon allowed a link I would give you a link to a video I just finished on the Independence of the Seas.  Go to my website and look for it...IPA IMPRESS dot Com, "musical_instruments"
Not much to say other than it's a good cable. Good solid connections with no play. After consistent use, it's going strong., "musical_instruments"
No complaints, it's quiet enough and the price is right. Is it a Monster cable? No, but it doesn't cost as much either. I've used this on lead vocal tracks into a studio condensor mic for professional album sessions and it was fine., "musical_instruments"
well made and the perfect length for my needs. the shielding was great as well. the end connectors were well made and strong., "musical_instruments"
I purchased this to connect a Sennheiser E825 mike with guitar amps. This requires, of course, the addition of a 1/4 inch adapter plug. The cable itself has worked perfectly and proved both durable and of a suitable length at least for jamming with friends and playing in small venues. Recommended.UPDATE: I marked this product down one star after a connector fell apart during what I regarded as relatively light duty. The set screw fell out and could not be found. I've had similar problems with other Pyle products. If you buy them, I recommend tat you get a micro-screwdriver set as well so that you can tighten te connector screws before you have a similar xperience., "musical_instruments"
Like most products on the market, depending on where and how the item is used, your experience may vary. For me, this cable is going to be used on a semi-stationary mic stand in my project studio, and thus far, it's done nothing but an exceptional job. I tested the cable with a few different mics and in each scenario, the signal was just as strong as the some of the other, more pricey cables out there. Would I purchase this again? Absolutely!, "musical_instruments"
The extra length gives me more flexibility and maneuverability.  Cord works well and hasn't been any problem, to date.  Plugs directly to the system, or my mini-amp.  Works well., "musical_instruments"
I have to tell you guys, these XLR cables that I have received recently are by far the best quality cables I have ever encountered in my entire music (professional) life.I would suggest these cables to any one of my colleagues., "musical_instruments"
Got a packet to try but I found they are better than the Gator screws that came with my case! My equipment is very secure. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
They are screws. They screw in and hold things. To say that they did less would've gotten the 1 star. I like them., "musical_instruments"
Good quality rack screws that come with rubber washers to protect face of equipment.  Arrived ahead of estimated arrival time which is always nice., "musical_instruments"
Excellent rack screws with washers. Its fit very good to rack holes. Good presentation and well packed. I will buy again., "musical_instruments"
So far the ones I have used have all threaded nicely into our 16u rack. There are exactly as described and do the job. What more can a guy say about a little box of screws? Maybe I should post some pics of the little buggers in action?, "musical_instruments"
Pros:* They look very nice.* They cause much less wear than the 2nd hand rack screws and washers.Cons:* More expensive and I had to wait a few days longer than it took my rack equipment to ship.I'd purchase these again, but I now have 25 but only need 16 at the most once my rack is filled., "musical_instruments"
I replaced all the stock mounting screws that came with our sound rack cabinet with these, as they were nearly invisible with the black rails and mounting plates. The plastic washers also seem to protect the finishes better than metal washers on the equipment I mounted. Inexpensive, and worth it., "musical_instruments"
Donr be fooled by the imitations... should be their slogan. There are some real junky ones out there and these are great, love the washers, life savers. Thanks!, "musical_instruments"
Great rack mount screws. Rubber washers are perfect, lets it give your item that tight fit without worry of the screws working out any time soon. I use them on my portable desktop rack with my mobile DJ equipment and they have held strong., "musical_instruments"
Other than that, when you need 10-32 rack screws, these are the real McCoy.  Wide enough pan to grab the ear, narrow enough to clear that next piece of gear!  Thanks, Raxxess!, "musical_instruments"
There are other rack screws out there, but Raxxess makes the best quality screws and soft washers available., "musical_instruments"
Well if this review survives the censors just know that these are great screws when you run out of the original screws you were supplied with your new rack.  They work., "musical_instruments"
Mics are like pants, you have to find the right fit. This one I like for my vocals live. I sing fairly low and airy - works great for me. Also used to mic resonator guitar through a tube mic preamp live, very sweet sound. I prefer it to the 58, seems a bit more bright and natural. Might purchase another one eventually..., "musical_instruments"
Why drive a Pinto when you can drive a Cadillac? This is the industries best mic as far as I am concerned. I had a Shure SM 58 like everyone else owned but there is no comparison between this mic and a SM58. SM 58 is garbage compared to the Beta 58A. Spring for the extra bucks and be happy. That's what I always say., "musical_instruments"
I have one of these, as well as several other microphones. The SM58 is a good all around mic - the reason it's an industry standard/go-to, but the Beta 58A is a better (in my opinion) vocal-specific mic...basically giving (again, in my opinion) a higher quality sound. The SM58 by comparison sounds muffled/muddy, where the Beta58A is clearer, stronger, and more articulate. If you're used to the SM58, then the Beta58A can sound thin and harsh, but, that is adjustable at the board - end result is that it's a tighter sounding mic with more clarity.Pattern-wise, it does better at rejecting unwanted sounds - I play drums and use this mic for that reason, is that it picks up less of my drums than a SM57 or a SM58., "musical_instruments"
Yes, it costs considerably more than the SM58 and I'm not sure if I could pass a comparison test between the two, but I love this mic!  To me, it sounds slightly brighter and clearer than the 58s I have used in the past.  If you are a musician who is strapped for cash or trying to make ends meet, get the 58.  If you have the extra dough and want a confidence boost, go for the Beta.  I would buy this again., "musical_instruments"
I'm an amateur sound tech. We've been using SM58 in our church for years now and our singers/song leaders liked it very much than the other mics that we've had before. Our singers are growing and we needed addtional mic so we thought of this Beta58A because of the good reviews. When I received it I cannot wait to test it myself and whoaaah.. For me, it sounded better than SM58. My songleaders have tested it and guess what... they dont want to use the SM58 anymore :), "musical_instruments"
While the Shure SM58LC Shure SM58 Vocal Microphone seems to be the running staple for live performance vocals, and rightly so due to its comparative value and amazing quality in sound and craftsmanship, the Beta 58A needs to be given its due. The Beta 58A is an amazing dynamic microphone that might alleviate some of the stress associated with its more cost efficient cousin. That is, the Beta 58A, in the confined live scenarios in which I have utilized it, has demonstrated a much broader sweet spot and completely eliminated some severe feedback issues. For vocalists that like to pull back from the mic a touch to really belt those sustained high (or, really, any) notes the Beta is a dream. This same effect helps if one is experiencing sibilance or \"popping\" complications and needs to sing past the microphone as opposed to directly into it.While I wish that I had a better understanding from a sound engineering standpoint so that the technical specifics could be expounded upon, I can confidently say that the Beta 58A is the best vocals microphone that I have ever utilized aside from higher end condenser mics in an isolated environment. Quite honestly, I would not be at all surprised if the Beta compared well even in confined recording situations. The bottom line is that the Beta 58A might be more expensive than its popular cousin, the SM58, but it is worth every penny. Anyone who has the opportunity should give it a chance to demonstrate its superiority. Six out of five stars!, "musical_instruments"
The Beta 58A along with the original SM58 are industry standards, that's well known. As a general purpose workhorse for live vocals they are by far the most popular tools out there. Quality venues throughout the country commonly stock these as their go-to house mics. In fact, I noticed Betas all over the place at a small theater (with a high-end system) that I played at just recently.I had used the old 58 for years before moving to the Beta and there is certainly a noticeable difference between the two. The Beta is definitetly hotter, with a more sensitive response. Your vocals will cut into the mix strongly and with more clarity than you might be used to. Mids and highs are picked up perfectly when singing a few inches away and there is a subtle low frequency roll-off to avoid that boomy, muddled sound you typically get when hitting low or quiet notes up close. You definitely need to stay within a close range though as the pickup pattern is very tight. This is a good thing because extraneous noise and feedback is effectively rejected.\"Built like a tank\" is probably a bit overused when describing products but Shure's vocal mics truly earn that title. They can take an enormous amount of abuse and never falter. Toss it around, drop it, bury it under other stuff, etc., NO problem. When you are maintaining a bunch of music gear, it's nice to have tools that you never worry about. For that reason, I'd highly recommend getting a used one if you can find a deal. Chances are, its in working order no matter what., "musical_instruments"
I actually replaced a BOSS TR2 with this pedal. Does everything it is supposed to do without the \"perceived\" (that's was they say) volume loss typical of many tremolo pedals. If it's perceived, then how do you explain how good this sounds? I have since had the pedal rehoused in a metal enclosure with a better switch because I was scared of breaking its plastic housing when switching it on and off., "musical_instruments"
Let me start by saying that I am a huge fan of Dano stomp boxes.  I probably own close to a dozen of from the various lines they make.  This pedal does a decent job covering your tremolo needs, but IMHO the tremolo from Dano's Cool Cat line is a much more durable pedal for only $4 more (at the time of this review).  The switches and knobs on this pedal are the weak link.  I don't think it's true bypass either.  The Cool Cat has a metal enclosure, true bypass, sturdier inputs and knobs, and a much better on/off switch.  The features and sound are the same.  Spend the extra $4 and you will have a much more bullet-proof pedal with the Cool Cat trem., "musical_instruments"
Hey, it gets the job done and that's all I can ask for.  I tried several \"cheapo\" pedals, and this one was my favorite of them all.  While some had better casings (metal instead of plastic), at the end of the day I'm looking for a good sound, not a pretty pedal board.  The pedal seems solid enough, it doesn't take up much space, it sounds great, and it has a versatile range of sounds as far as tremolo pedals come.AND, if you are like the typical musician, you are looking for something that's not going to break the bank., "musical_instruments"
When I first started setting up my little studio, I wanted something that didn't break the budget.  I tried a couple different combo pedal boards, (Digitech 500, Boss ME-70), but quickly realized I wasn't getting my sound and the money was quickly drying up.  With not much left, I tried a Tuna Melt as an example of Danelectro.  Who would think?  This thing is stunning in its ability to manufacture vintage tremolo sounds, as are most of this line of pedals.  I now own about 12-14 of these of all types, and have never been dissapointed save it's very hard to chain them without a lot of noise.Then I got into guitar building, and they all got put away.  Lately, I have been trying to make time to improve my playing skills, and joy of joys! I am rediscovering all these pedals and I absolutely love them.Forget the FAB series, they are not so hot.  Buy the old style as the Tuna Melt, or the big metal ones like the Dan Echo.  You will NOT be sorry!, "musical_instruments"
Hello Musicfriends - This is built cheap but sounds great. Good controls too. For me in the studio/songwriting  its perfect but I would not exactly go on tour with it..... There is something about the knobs I still love, even if all my other digital units have a tremolo hidden in it... may be  the age thing..., "musical_instruments"
it sounds great.  nice and warm and lush.  one of the better trems i've had the pleasure to use.  however, i hate the plastic housing, and how the input/output jacks are located.  I don't have heavy feet, so it will probably last a good long while on my board, but i really wouldn't want to put too much weight on it., "musical_instruments"
It is exactly what you need in a capo! You can cover all six strings, move one string over to get a drop d tuning or turn the capo upside down to get a partial capo (though a bit of adjusting may be needed to get the strings held down.).All in all, a great capo that is well made and will last forever.Kyser is an awesome small Christian company and I really like their products and supporting them with my purchases. :], "musical_instruments"
Love these capos and nice that you can get them in other colours.  Prevents you from getting yours confused with some one elses., "musical_instruments"
My son needed a Capo, expensive at music  shop where he takes lessons.  At Amazon found what he wanted at reasonable price., "musical_instruments"
The title says it all.  I got it for $16 (free shipping with Amazon Prime), which is cheaper than my local music store.  I keep it on the head of the guitar, and it is easy to add, move, remove.  With the trigger-type release, it makes it one of the easiest quick-change capos I've used.  It feels sturdy enough (lightweight aluminum).  And best of all... it works!, "musical_instruments"
I like it, it works well with my takamine acoustic jasmine s35 guitar. And it looks good. Overall, I recommend., "musical_instruments"
Quick to clip on and off. Really... Is there anything else to say? What else do you want it to do?These suckers are wonderfully reliable.I've had one for about 10 years. The only thing that went wrong with it was the removable rubber on the \"bottom\" of the capo became damaged because of my own neglect. However, for a $1, keyser sent me a bag of a about 6 of them. Can you go wrong? NO!Great product!, "musical_instruments"
a couple of bucks more than dunlop...which i have not tried..i own a couple wish they were cheeper i would have one in each case..but it works fine..and is well made...arrived on time..enjoy, "musical_instruments"
Like this camo capo's simplicity and its unique color.  My friend got a new one after seeing me using it, but his is a bit shorter than mine.  Mine works both uke & acoustic guitar, I have no problem to use it on single hand.  As the manufactor suggests for its duration, I don't clip it on the guitar when it's not in use. :), "musical_instruments"
This Capo looks great and does the job. It does take a bit of pressure to open the camp, but its better then the winding versions., "musical_instruments"
Purchased the 6-string Kyser capo when I meant to get the 12-string version (slightly longer, stronger spring?), but find that this 6-string Capo not only works great on my 2 6-string acoustics, but also works on my 12-string acoustic with a little adjusting.  Quality seems top notch, design is simple and effective., "musical_instruments"
I've owned the same one for 10 years and it's still going strong after many gigs. The spring tension is just right., "musical_instruments"
Basically because they are the easiest to squeeze in my opinion.  I have big hands which may be part of it., "musical_instruments"
high quality hassle free design.  Very quick and easy to install and remove in a hurry and dosn't mar the finish or use excessive force,  but strong enough to move the capo all the way close to the next fret closer to the headstock to allow maximum room for my fingers without any buzzing.  Very happy with this purchase., "musical_instruments"
I have had one for two years and no complaints, needed another for my travel guitar.  The lever arm is coated with a soft plastic sleeve which protects the neck, the spring is firm and in 2 years has not given up any tension. Finally on the string compression side the material is firm yet supple.  I take particular caution to make sure that I don't leave it on anything that would indent that material permanently..., "musical_instruments"
I've seen and used many different types of capos over the years and they range from the very cumbersome and difficult to use to the easily breakable but I've never used one as convenient and as well constructed as this Kyser one.  It is by far the best I've ever seen and I've been using it for years now and it still works fine.  It makes moving the capo quickly a cinch and the gold doesn't corrode or tarnish making it look like new even after all these years.Very highly recommended!, "musical_instruments"
It is very well made, is easy to use, and holds down the strings just fine.  It is well protected as to not scratch or nick your guitar., "musical_instruments"
Durable, affordable, easy to grasp and use., "musical_instruments"
This capo is as good as I've ever used and its in pink which perfectly matchs my shell pink strat. Great deal., "musical_instruments"
I currenty use two types of capos - the Kyser one and Shubb capos.  Both are the most popular capos around but have different strengths and weaknesses.The benefits of the Kyser is that it is the quickest changing capo I've come across, doesn't require tension adjustment, and can clip to the end of the headstock when not in use.  The primary benefit of the Shubb is that it has adjustable tension (and second, it's smaller).The main drawback of the Kyser is the lack of adjustable tension.  Because it's designed to work across the fretboard, it will apply more force than necessary to clamp down the lower frets, causing frets to wear faster over time.  Because of this I prefer to use the Kyser on my less expensive guitar and the Shubbs on the guitar I baby., "musical_instruments"
Easy to useGreat quality and I am looking forward to purchasing more of this brand. Thank you very much, "musical_instruments"
Got what I needed - a basic capo for a good price.  The tension is a little tighter than I'd like, but works for me.  Covers all strings, and depresses them fully.  I don't use it often, so I can't speak to its longevity, but good for me!, "musical_instruments"
I've played guitar for 5 years. Seen many different capos, but none that quite satisfies me as the Kyser.You really can't go wrong with this capo. It is very mobile, easily adjustable, sturdy, and durable.What's good about this capo is that you can use it as a regular 6 String capo and still turn it around to use it asa Cut capo. The transparent rubber piece does the same job.It comes in different colors also.I own the black, silver, gold, and camo Kyser capos.I also own the Cut Capo for other styles.I recommend it!All the capos I've had from Kyser are still in great conditions.Use them all the time at church and at home, "musical_instruments"
I started using Kyser capos a couple of years ago and have never looked back since. I now own several of them and have not had any problems with any of them. They work great on acoustic and electric guitars and they have survived the many children I teach lessons to even though they get treated rather rough at times. Great capos. You won't be disappointed., "musical_instruments"
The handle and spring strength make this uncomfortable to place on the guitar, and I feel rushed to clamp on the capo because it's unpleasant to use - hurts the fingers. It's cheap and easy to use. It'll do the job, but I don't like it., "musical_instruments"
What's to say?  It's not a high end capo and for the price I can lose it ( like most of the other capos I have owned).  It's not a high quality capo and it does take a few adjustments to get it seated properly., "musical_instruments"
I originally bought this for my guitar and it worked very well for that, so I tried it out on my 4 string uke and it works just as great. It's so much better than the elastic capos. So, it's doing double duty and going strong., "musical_instruments"
This style of capo CAN throw your guitar out of tune if you don't put it on right. When used correctly though, it does it's job just fine., "musical_instruments"
I can only repeat what everyone else has already said: this Kyser capo is designed and built very well. It's easy to put on and adjust, and just as easy to take off. There are probably a few capos out there that are a bit flashier, but this is still pretty stylish. And the price makes it a real bargain., "musical_instruments"
I don't believe there is such a thing as a perfect capo, but this one is quite good.  For those with reasonably strong hands it is pretty easy to use.  It does a very good job of compressing the strings to the frets and is definitely well built.  It is as with all capos,  important to take it off when not in use so the \"rubber\" does not get grooved.  This is just good common sense.  If this lasts a couple of years I will definitely purchase another., "musical_instruments"
I bought a 12 string one in blk.  Love it for simplicity and needed it so I didn't have to keep searching for the other.  Got gold to remind me it is for six strings., "musical_instruments"
I have used a few different capo's this is far and away my favorite. Very easy to take it off, holds the strings tight. What more can you ask for? Does what it sets out to do and its inexpensive., "musical_instruments"
It does what it says. It a Kyser Quick Change capo. This capo is great for changing keys in the middle of a song or anytime you are in a hurry. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
It's a capo... nice fit... yet, sometimes I wonder if it fits too tightly, as when I use it, and of course the strings are tighter, sometimes I feel that playing with this particular capo makes my strings too tight...yet, it is a capo, structured very well., "musical_instruments"
I am very pleased with this purchase. The strings play very clearly with zero buzzing on any position between frets. I can dramatically hear and feel the difference than when I used a cheap $5 capo before. This is well worth your pay :), "musical_instruments"
My husband usese this capo almost everytine he plays his guitar. His old one lasted about 10 years. Worth the cost., "musical_instruments"
Long time Shubb user, but decided to try something different.I think I've found how lazy I am. I ended up using the Kyser more often than the Shubb because of the fact that you can put the Kyser on the peghead.Reaching my hand to an always available position on guitars (i.e. the peghead) for the Kyser turns out to be much more convenient than reaching to something that is not on the guitar and that could change according to situations, e.g. maybe just by my side on the sofa in my living room, maybe a table or the floor in some other places, for the Shubb., "musical_instruments"
These Capos are wonderful. Perfect all the way around! long lasting and backed up by the company. I have three!, "musical_instruments"
Good strong spring and good strong materials.  The only improvement I would make is the clear protector that holds behind the neck.  The protector needs to be longer.  As the protector ages it slips off the end.  If it had more surface extended from end to the base where it pivots it would help., "musical_instruments"
I bought this Capo for myWashburn D10. It works on my Orlando classical guitar as well. I wanted a capo that was simple to operate and wasn't too expensive - and the Kyser Quick Change Guitar Capo fits the bill nicely:[Update 7/25/10: My Orlando guitar was stolen. Boo Hoo!!!]- Easy On, Easy OffThe spring mechanism makes it easy to put the capo on or take it off.- Rubberized ClampsRubberized clamps helps prevent the Kyser from scratching or marring the neck and the frets.- ErgonomicThe arched arm with the weird-looking loopy looking thingy and the other straight arm help you to firmly grab on to them without slipping so you can easily and quickly remove or reposition the Kyser Capo.- DurableThe Kyser is made from durable aluminum.[Update 7/25/10] I've had this capo for almost 3 years and it's still working like a champ! (According to Amazon's Instant Order Update for moi, I got this capo on  November 22, 2007.)- The Same Capo Colbie Caillat Used in BubblyCheck out the music video! It's the same capo Colbie Caillat used inBubbly!---The Kyser Quick Change Guitar Capo is excellent! I don't think you can go wrong with this one!, "musical_instruments"
I have owned several of these over the years and own a silver colored one presently. The price is right for these, and they work just fine. My only real issue is that sometimes, they will bunch or bend strings when setting them on whatever fret you're going to bar, thus producing a sound you weren't looking for. Some of the higher end capo's counter this by having screws and such rather than a spring. However, like i say, these work fine with a little care and attention to their placement on your fretboard, and are from what i can tell, the most popular model on the market., "musical_instruments"
Easy to use capo. Good strength - holds the strings down well.. Not sure that it's as good as the G7th capo, which I still find is the best for holding the strings down evenly so that they stay in tune, but the Kyser is much cheaper and does a good job., "musical_instruments"
Probably the best kapo out on the market. Very high quality and a sleek look. Easy to use, what more could you want?, "musical_instruments"
I use the capo for my guitar and it sounds awesome. I like to put the capo on the first fret and when I play a song I made, it sounds really really good. The capo is very easy to use as well., "musical_instruments"
The description says the color is gold.  It's not.  More of a greenish yellow, but does what it is intended for.  I think I would stick with the black color though., "musical_instruments"
I really like my capo, the blue looks good with my light natural finish accoustic, and it works as it should. However, I feel like it deserves 4 stars simply because it could be a much more robust product. For example, I think the bottom part of the clamp should be a little longer, and rounded (the back side of a guitar neck is rounded, after all). The spring could definitely be tighter...I do rarely notice buzz from not quite being tight enough. Also, the design is fairly nice, but it's mostly aesthetic...it's not really super comfortable and easy to move around necessarily.Don't get me wrong, this is a rather good product, and it's priced about right. It just isn't a high end product/5-star perfect., "musical_instruments"
The package arrived on time. This is the best capo around and works great. Does what it is supposed to do., "musical_instruments"
works great. Just clip it on and jam out.forget the screw on type, and spend the few extra bux for this one.  you'll be happier, trust me., "musical_instruments"
I chose the patriotic design for obvious reasons.  It is lovely.  Clear shard silk screening.  The capo itself is really good.  It is very snug on the strings., "musical_instruments"
i got pink cause nobody would steal it, and we all know how often capos get stolen from people pink is great, "musical_instruments"
This capo is awesome, it looks and feels very nice and premium, it works on all of my guitars not much more you can ask for., "musical_instruments"
These Martin strings (M170) aren't bad. They just are not the sound I was looking for. I ended up like the Ernie Ball Earthwood extra light instead. The Martin's are little shallow on the low end unlike the Ernie Ball. Other people will love them though. They are easy to play., "musical_instruments"
These are good for the average guitar player who doesn't want to much strain or pain on there fingers. Not the fullest tone, but you wouldn't expect that with extra light strings., "musical_instruments"
I have an electro acoustic Martin (second hand but without a scratch). I got it with .13 strings and well, is simply too much. Is good to play rithyms but can't do pretty much nothing else.I have installed a set (I got 8) and it sounds really good. Not as solid as the .13 but now i have more range to do solos and go up and down much easier.Recomended, "musical_instruments"
Martin makes great sounding strings.  I decided to use Light Martin strings (.12) because they sounded louder and better, and I could play them just as easy as the lighter strings., "musical_instruments"
Strings are not just strings. Guitar strings are another very important part of playing GREAT Guitar. And all Martin products are second to none., "musical_instruments"
I replaced a set of strings that were very used with these Martins.  They are, as named, very light.  They are easy on my fingers and give great tone.  Quality company, great strings, great price!, "musical_instruments"
I ordered a couple sets of this strings so I would have some extras for myself and my 6 year old son who is just starting out on guitar. this strings have good sound and hold a tune well. the best thing is the price is great. Like I said I am usinging these on mine and my sons guitar and my son was breaking string from playing to hard, but with these string it does not break the bank to replace them as needed., "musical_instruments"
The name Martin says it all & has for many,many years.Grab some extras because you will want more, Great price,great strings., "musical_instruments"
I love these strings, and use them for all of my acoustic playing. Best of all, I can find them here for $3.49 per set, so I'm not dumping a bunch of money on strings all the time. Easy to play, and they sound great.long lasting if you take care of them by wiping them down every time., "musical_instruments"
these strings provide a warm crisp tone that makes any dreadnought guitar sound like heaven I use them all the time, "musical_instruments"
Good strings with good sound.The Extra Light is easier on the fingers - but they sound thinner too.Go for the Light gauges for more solid sound if you can handle the pressure., "musical_instruments"
This is my third pack; the 1st pack has been using for two months, the sounds are rich and full, and the feels are still good.  I broke the high E on the 1st attempt of restringing, and luckily I had bought 2 packs at the same time.  So, I want to keep a completed pack for back up.  I have been fingerpacking for quite long time recently, sometime, i will practice for 4-5 hours+ until i'm tired for the session.  I have used light steel strings on my acoustic, but these ones are easier for fingers even just tiny lighter., "musical_instruments"
These are okay strings for the Folk Guitar.............nothing special but the price isn't out of the world either. Good buy for the money. Tried them on a Gibson J50 and they seem to do good., "musical_instruments"
I am yet another one of those \"Forever Beginners\" when it comes to playing the guitar. Never mind that...these guitar strings made second hand guitar sound so much better! After putting in new pegs and re-stringing with these strings...it sounds so much nicer! More richer! Now I see I need to replace the saddle and bridge on it as the pegs keep coming loose. I think that once I do this and then re-string these same strings on it...I will be set to go!I like that these strings are light as due to not having had much practice for a number of years...let's face it...my fingers get sore when playing! I also have small fingers and hands.I intend to continue purchasing these same strings for future use.I recommend!, "musical_instruments"
I restrung my Martin 0-16NY with these strings and found them to be excellent.  As a new guitarist,the light strings were very easy on my sensitive finger tips and have a very warm and rich sound., "musical_instruments"
Even though these are folk strings, I put them on my 35 year old dread and they sound really good.I hope they last longer than some of the reviews indicate.I also wipe them down after playing to minimize tarnishing.So far so good, "musical_instruments"
Great,great sound. The sound of these strings is different than any other strings you could get. They also teach a guitar player to use a lighter touch while playing to produce beautiful sounds. Well worth it., "musical_instruments"
the string work well but did not give the mellow sound on my guitar that I was looking for. The shipping was quick and the strings were recieved in good order., "musical_instruments"
I love these strings.  I bought a set awhile back for my Ovation, but never used them.  Then I came into possession of an old Yamaha acoustic guitar which was pretty beat up and needed new strings.  I put these suckers on there and wow was I impressed.  Even that old beater guitar sounded great and played easily with these strings.  So... I bought another set for the Ovation this time!, "musical_instruments"
I bought this pick holder because I hate putting a pick between my strings to hold it and because you can't play with a pick in your strings. I originally thought this thing would be kind of large and go all the way across the headstock. Boy was I wrong. The picture is misleading.  This thing is tiny and barely goes across three string. It wedges under neath two strings and you can put two picks (maybe more if they are thin) into the wedges on top. Stays in place well and is very convenient.Only negative is I don't know how long it will hold up. I think maybe a thicker rubber rather than this foam rubber would have held up better. I can see this thing eventually losing tension in the pick holder wedges and dropping picks., "musical_instruments"
I really like these things.  I don't stick tape and stuff to guitar body which if they do make a double sided tape similar to post it notes might be a good idea.  Bought a few while back and just bought a few more.  If you drop a pick there is another right there.  Have fun., "musical_instruments"
I love the idea that you don't need a pocket in your strap or elsewhere to store your pick. Further it will not add something else to find/loose in my pants pocket., "musical_instruments"
it's good but think its a bit expensive for just one they should give you two for that price or lower the price, "musical_instruments"
Doe's not stay on to well, moves to much even if you go for the pick lightly could be redeisigned., "musical_instruments"
After buying this product, I have concluded that $8.00 is a lot of money for foam! Does the job, but I think the velcro job would be preferable to this one., "musical_instruments"
Excellent simple product. Fits all of my guitars and stays out the way while playing. Easily holds 2 picks at at time on each end. Has grooves on ends and one can slide it down so that at least 2 strings fit into the grooves., "musical_instruments"
Since I bought these little gadgets everybody playing guitar around want them.I use to misplace my picks all the time when playing and now I do not have to look around for them any longer as I know where to find them.  I like to use different gage picks therefore.  I have ordered more for Christmas stocking stuffers whicdh will be enjoyed by my friends., "musical_instruments"
It's a lot smaller than the picture makes it look, but that's a good thing. It serves it purpose and fits snugly between the strings on the headstock., "musical_instruments"
I'm using this right now on my acoustic and it does its job in respect to holding your picks. It was smaller then I would have pictured, but it still is a good product. It can hold light to heavy picks and its super easy to put it and take it off. Only problem I had was that it moves a lot when putting my pick back in. Besides that, its highly recommendable to anyone. I will definitely pick up more for my other axes., "musical_instruments"
Not too much to say, it's made out of foam, made to slip between the strings, made to hold two picks.  I have several of these, for acoustics and for electrics.  My son lost one before during a performance on stage so it is not that secure that it won't be dislodged, still, it does stay on majority of the time.  I do recommend this.  My son's guitar teacher calls this a \"fancy little pick holder\" and I've had people ask where to buy one when they see it for the first time.  One must also be careful, my son lost one of these so I know it is a possibility of it falling off.  He lost it after performing in a play on stage.Please click YES if my review have been helpful to you, it will encourage me to continue writing and updating my reviews, and leave a comment if you have any questions, I will be more than happy to answer if I can be of help., "musical_instruments"
I use this to hold my picks on my acoustic guitar. Got tired of losing picks in mid jam, digging through pockets, scavenging for another pick. Now it's right there., "musical_instruments"
I have been using these for months now with 5-string bass. I think these are even more useful for bassists than guitar, as I often find myself playing with fingers, then suddenly a \"pick song\" starts and... where's a pick? I usually have to offset it, and with the tuner placement I can only fit one pick, but I still find them indispensable. And no tape or other sticky stuff!There is also a model made specially for bass. [Updated] I now have the bass model on all of my basses. It is definitely better for thicker strings.The guitar model is now on my Gibson Explorer. I do love it, but the \"spreading strings\" on the headstock makes it less secure than is perfect. So, still highly recommended if your headstock has a \"straight through\" design, not so much if you have a jackson or other radically angled headstock. (They should make a Metal Edition for that. :) ), "musical_instruments"
This thing does just what it was supposed to, i use it on my practice bass since i use any type of picks on that, and it does just what it is supposed to, "musical_instruments"
I was thinking it may affect the ability to tune properly, but it seems to have no affect at all. Super audiophile tone hounds might say it affects the resonance and sustain, but just take it off when recording. Very handy to have two picks with you at all times. It's great not to have to make a trip back to the mike stand to get a pick or having to attach something with sticky tape to the guitar's finish. Me likey!! Price can't be beat either!, "musical_instruments"
I bought one of these to try on my Asher Junior lap steel guitar to hold two finger picks and a thumb pick. Worked, but it was difficult getting all three picks in one Wedgie so I ordered a second one. Between the two of them, between the 2nd/3rd and 4th/5th strings up next to the nut, works pretty good holding these types of picks (which admittedly, the Wedgie was not actually designed for). Liked it so much I ordered two more for my acoustic and electric guitar and one for my bass (the bass version). Only down side I see is -- they DO seem loose like they could fall out AND I doubt the picks will stay in place when I case my guitar (haven't tried it yet). But otherwise, worth the price and a good doo-dad to have around. Especially if you have a lap steel and need a place to stick your finger picks on the guitar itself (real help to me staying organized!)., "musical_instruments"
I've played string instruments for the better part of 55 years... Starting with a cheap Tijuana Wood box as a 5 year old, progressing to Martin 6 and 12 string Acoustic guitars, and a few electric Fender and Gibson units.... All good in their own respect.I decided to treat myself to a Les Paul for my 58th birthday but, not having the financial resources to buy a $3,000.00 git, I shopped and shopped... Finally settling on this Cherry Burst LP-100.It arrived in perfect condition, the slightly smooshed outer packaging notwithstanding. It was even \"sorta\" in tune... but a quick dial-in with the electronic tuner brought that right.Simply put, Nice guitar. After allowing the strings and neck to settle in together, I spent a few hours a week later adjusting string height, intonation, and pick-up distances, and now this LP *ROCKS* !!!If you're going to spend mid-range $$$ on a fine practice / performance guitar, you can't go wrong with this one, kids - Two Thumbs Up ![Suggestion: A Fender Mustang 1 or 2 amp makes this guitar sound even better...], "musical_instruments"
exactly the same as describe here, love the sound and easy to play. great price for excellent sound, highly recommend to everyone., "musical_instruments"
I bought this as a present for my daughter to learn guitar on. She absolutely loves it. Everyone that has played on it over the past few weeks loves it. You can't beat this for the price!!!, "musical_instruments"
This is a fine guitar, but it isn't amazing.  My particular instrument has some issues with the finish in a couple of places around the perimeter of the guitar - they look like black splotches underneath the sunburst paint and clear-coat.  There's one near the top strap post and another near the place where the pick-guard mounts to the underside of the body.  Neither would be apparent to someone who wasn't appraising the guitar, but they are there and don't look normal to me.  Maybe I got the first one off the line after they switched from black-painted models?  My guitar also has a weird V shape on the back of the neck where the wood grain doesn't match at all - I'm guessing that it's a joint that has been glued together.  I know that the better Les Paul guitars have a one-piece neck, and since I didn't read about this one having something different, I assumed it would be the same.  Glue is stronger than wood and Les Paul guitars have a tendency to break in that area, so I guess my guitar should be more durable than some. Still, it was a disappointing and unexpected discovery.  I'm not sure that seeing these finish issues before-hand would've dissuaded me from buying the same guitar, but upon reflection it would've been much smarter to visit a music store and examine the guitar before buying.My remaining issues with the instrument have more to do with the general design of all Les Paul guitars versus my particular instrument.  The guitar is too small for me to comfortably play it without a strap, even while sitting.  The top strap peg is angled up slightly, where guitars with horns have them angled down, which means that investing in the install of a straplock system of some kind is a good idea with a Les Paul - the pegs just don't stay in the strap holes as well as on some other guitars.  It's great that this guitar has all the knobs and switches that &#34;real&#34; Les Paul guitars do, but from a practical standpoint it is rather cumbersome to have separate volume and tone knobs for each pickup.  The range of adjustment on the saddles is pretty small, and I found it impossible to setup the guitar for coated .09 strings without additional hardware.The guitar sounds decent, it looks pretty great (although not quite as pretty as the pictured one), and due to its shorter scale length it is a tad easier to play than some other guitars.  Note: the shorter scale length is characteristic of Les Paul guitars, it doesn't indicate that this is less than a &#34;full-sized&#34; guitar.  Though this is a fine guitar for the price, I'm not sure that I would make the same choice if I were in the same position again., "musical_instruments"
I have been playing guitar for over 30 years. I've owned and played a variety of guitars in my lifetime. My wife bought this guitar for me as a gift. I cannot begin to tell you how much I love this guitar. It is a solid, well built guitar. The finish is beautiful. The pictures do it no justice. It sounds incredible. It has great tone and sustain, wonderful harmonics. The clean tones are nice and warm. The neck is fast. No fret noise or hums. The pickups are really nice. Its very versatile and you can play just about anything with it. From blues to hard rock & metal. I would perform live with this guitar in a heartbeat. You cannot find a better guitar for this price. I would have expected it to cost much more. I am extremely impressed with this great guitar. You can bet, when I add the next guitar to my collection, it will be another epiphone. Well done Epiphone!!, "musical_instruments"
I had been learning on a Squier for about six months and really wanted a better guitar. After doing research, reading reviews, and checking it out in a guitar store, I chose this one.It's much easier to play than the Squier, and it has a better sound. Like the Squier (but not as bad), it gets a little buzzy on the top strings. I suspect it might need to be adjusted, but I don't have a clue as to how to go about it.It's also a good choice for women. I'm a small woman, and I really like that the neck is smaller. It's also fairly lightweight.Overall, I'm happy with my choice. A guitar tech told me it's the best guitar out there under $500. Maybe. I expect to be happy with it for a few years before I upgrade again., "musical_instruments"
I bought it 3 years ago here at amazon and I couldn't be happier.  This was my first electric and after over a year of owning it, I got a way more expensive Fender Strat and I still prefer how this Epiphone feels; it is really lightweight, a lot more that even other Les Pauls and the distance between frets is smaller than the one in other guitars I have tried, this makes it VERY easy to play, it stays in tune and it looks really REALLY lovely.I like it so much, that I decided to add a pair of Slash's Alnico IIs on it, that cost more than the guitar itself, this only made it sound incredibly awesome and improve the sustain, good ol' crunchy-bluessy rock.Call me cheap if you want and I wouldn't care, this is one of those items that makes you wonder, how come there's others way more overpriced and just don't find a way to justify that a \"real\" Gibson Les Paul will sound $800 - $1000 better.It wasn't until recently (after 3 years - I estimate somewhere around 1000 hours of heavy use) that it started fretting and that's why I gave it only 4 stars; but what would you expect from a $200 guitar...?  I'm sure this can be easily fixed by any guitar tech and it will continue been the sweet-tone machine it has always been.  If you're learning, looking for a first electric or just want a \"practice\" axe that will not dissapoint you, just go ahead and buy it, don't give it a 2nd thought and do it., "musical_instruments"
I have been playing guitar since I was 6 years old (over 3 decades) and I must say this was a very pleasant surprise.  I haven't had an electric in years, and didn't have the budget to get a Gibson, so picked up this Epi Les Paul 100 instead, along with a Fender Mustang I Amp.  Great combination.  This guitar has a very sloid feel, and came set-up perfectly right out of the box.  All it needed was tuning.  Unlike others, I didn't feel that the strings I got needed to be changed right away, but probably within the first two weeks you will want to change them.  Replaced mine with Ernie Ball \"Not Even Slinky's\" and couldn't be happier with the way this thing plays and sounds.  Great sustain, beautiful harmonics, the clean tones are warm, can get nice blues tones out of it, and superb thrash metal too.  Very versatile.  It does not quiet do country or jazz, but it wasn't really meant to.The action is extremely easy, fret board has a great feel to it, good width on the neck, not too slinder but not too thick.  It just feels good in your hands.The finish on this product is very nice.  One thing though, the pick guard is kind of a tan / cream off white color, not bright white as pictured, but it still looks great.Also, not mentioned in the description, but this does come with a 12 foot cord, but it's not the best quality.  Would recommend picking up a new one when you order.Overall, this is well worth the $500 that they list as the MSRP.  At less than half that its a steal.If you are considering this instrument, don't hesitate., "musical_instruments"
Well, the Epiphone Les Paul came in earlier this morning!Am I impressed? U bet cha!This thing is simply beautiful! It arrived well padded in a double box. Initially, I spent a few minutes going over the whole guitar with a magnifier to see if I could spot any flaws. NONE! Not a finger print on it anywhere! This guitar is extremely well made and put together right. It was in tune out the box and the action is smooth as butter. The neck is slim (which is good for my thick hands) and the jumbo frets have no burrs or other abnormalities. I put a quarter under the 10th. fret and it's right on the &#34;money&#34;!It's considerably heaver than than I thought.  I would imagine it weighs about 10-14lbs. I have a strap ordered and on the way.The maple top is a work of art with a superior finish. All the metal hardware appears top quality as are the Duncan pickups. This Epiphone is a lot easier to play than any thing I ever had.  Your hand floats over the frets!I don't think you could get a better piece for the price point., "musical_instruments"
This is one awesome guitar!  I also purchased the Fender Mustang I Amp, Epiphone custom case (fits like a glove) and Planet Waves Planet Lock Leather Guitar Strap (comfortable and very secure) which made for an UNBELIEVEABLE combination along with Rocksmith 2014.  I cannot imagine anyone being disappointed with this combination.  The only problem in my household is....who gets to play next., "musical_instruments"
Waited two months before reviewing my les paul 100 to make sure there were no issues.  I am very happy with the guitar.  It came well padded and was in excellent shape.  It was set up well and has played well out of the box.  Just did my first string change making sure I used the same gauge of string and didn't have to make any adjustments to the guitar.  Played as well after the change as it did before.  Was a little nervous about an online purchase and not being able to play the guitar before buying but when you live out in the sticks and it's a major trip to get to a real guitar store you sometimes take your chances.  Anyway it all worked out as the guitar is very easy to play, free prime two day shipping, no sales tax, and saved about $80 in gas it would have taken to make a trip to buy one in a store.  The savings in gas and tax paid for about half of my new Mustang 2 v2 amplifier.The only thing is on the epiphone site it states all their electric guitars include a cable in the box.  This one did not and from reading their forum it seems it is almost a normal thing for cords to somehow disappear before reaching the customer.  It is not a big deal to me but I thought I'd mention it for those thinking of buying a epiphone.  When I ordered this one I wasn't really sure if a cable would be included or not so I ordered one at the same time, I'm glad I did., "musical_instruments"
First off, the shipping was fantastic. It shipped the very next day and came VERY well protected in perfect condition. It is an extremely well made and solid product. I think a few people have given this Les Paul a rep of just being a \"Starter Guitar\". Trust me when I say, I have no problem leaving my Les Paul Standard at home and taking this one to a gig. It plays well and the sound?? INCREDIBLE. It even has a great acoustic sound to it when not plugged into an amp. I can't say enough good things about this guitar it's that good. If you're thinking aout buying this guitar, don't. Just buy it!! BUY IT!!, "musical_instruments"
It'd been about 6 years since I've had an electric guitar. I traded my old one off to pay a debt and just never returned. I decided recently after moving back to my home town that I was going to get back into playing electric guitar, only this time I wanted it to be more than a &#34;hobby&#34;. I fully intend on doing local gigs for fun and some side cash and this guitar will EASILY deliver.It came in perfect condition. The action is set perfectly and I don't have any issues with buzzing strings. It comes with clear (black) control knobs, which I'll likely replace with something a bit prettier. , "musical_instruments"
Purchased primarily for Rocksmith and it works very well for that.  Still learning how to play, but like the feel of this guitar.  Looks great and plays great.  Was packaged very well.  Only needed minor setup adjustments. I would recommend getting strap locks., "musical_instruments"
I am editing my previous review on this little guitar after taking the time to properly set it up, dial it in and play it for a while.  I edited yet again as someone didn't appreciate my \"gloating\" over other guitars I own.  Sorry to offend YOU.I made a knee jerk review (again) right after I got this.  But in all fairness I received my Gibson Les Paul on the same day, buying IT from my local music store and professionally set up, ready to go.  I was comparing apples and oranges, so to speak.  But now, even after comparing them to each other, they really aren't that far apart.The Gibson is the best guitar I've ever owned and made my previous comparison based on it.  But this little baby is now my second favorite.My other review was NOT FAIR!!!!!!  I paid a lot more for the Gibson and 149 bucks for this Epiphone.  Dollar for dollar this little Ephiphone is a steal!!!!  WOW!!!I must honestly admit, the edge goes to my Gibson, but not by as much as you'd think.  This little Epiphone is an outstanding guitar, regardless of price.  If I were to play them each blindfolded I would never guess one was $149 guitar, ever!  The tone of the Epiphone is much like the Gibson Les Paul.  It's easy to play, comfortable and has a sweet sound.  I can either rock out with it or mellow out and play the blues or classic rock.To be honest, I will probably play this Epiphone a LOT more than the Gibson.  After all, if I ding this one up I haven't broke the bank.  I think I'll tend to use this one a lot more than the other.I am very happy with this Epiphone Les Paul and will proudly play and OWN it.  I am amazed they can make this thing for the money they charge.  I may purchase another one and put it away as I'm sure the price won't stay this low.  PLUS, I'll get another one in a different color!!  You can never have too many guitars..  I am going to an a pickguard to this one.  The finish on it is outstanding and I'd like to keep it that way.If I were thinking of learning to play the guitar, this one is a no-brainer....BUY IT!!!If you're an established player looking for a really nice practice guitar, I'd buy this one is a heartbeat.  I was shocked at how sweet it sounds, how good it looks, how comfortable and light it is and how well it plays.  Sure it was way out of tune and required a few height adjustments but now it is FANTASTIC.New rule for me, no writing reviews until I own the product for at least one week!!!!!, "musical_instruments"
this is a beautiful guitar...the finish is amazing...and the tone is very clear...if you can't afford several hundreds or thousand for a les paul...this is a fun and very good guitar for the money...has 6 strings,,,from e to e...and if you know the g chord you will have lot's of fun...the volume control goes to 11 ,if you want to kick it up a notch...(only kidding), "musical_instruments"
Epiphone LP Special II Les Paul Electric Guitar, EbonyHello again. I have written a review on this guitar just after I purchased it and now it's been over a year and I still stand by my positive review. I own about 8 guitars now and this guitar is one of two of my favorites. My other favorite is a Dean electric 12 string.  When I hold and play this Epiphone Les Paul special 2 guitar it feels and sounds like something I could take on stage but it doesn't have the cost associated with a Gibson. What's also amazing is that it's still around a $150. It's well worth the noney. It stays in tune and it high quality. Well worth the money. I just purchased an electric/acoustic Epiphone ukelele today for my Chiropractor. I will review that later. If you are looking for a Les Paul guitar this is not one. Not his typical style although Amazon does sell one for about $250 so don't let the name fool you. It's still a very nice guitar though. Very solid construction and a beautiful polished ebony finish and tuners. I highly recommend this guitar. Buy it!  Thank you., "musical_instruments"
I've been playing for over 40 years. I currently own 60 or so guitars. My problem with LP's is they feel like a boat anchor around your neck, I've bought and sold quite a few. Another problem with real LP's, you only get one chance to drop one, just see how many used ones have head-stock repairs. They ARE beautiful guitars but not comfy for me to play. I deal in used guitars, picked up an Epi Special ll along with several other guitars at a resale shop for very cheap. I didn't mess with it until I was ready to set it up for resale. I fully expect to do a fret level on most guitars, even a lot of higher end guitars need it. I found on the Special ll the frets were actually very well done (Chinese version from 2011) and only needed a slight leveling (would have played fine without it but I am very picky). It didn't take much to get it set up, small truss rod adjustment, new set of 10's for strings. little bit of adjustment to the bridge, cut the nut a bit....note it played well the way I got it, just like my stuff perfect. Got it set-up and plugged it in to check the electronics and that's when I started to really become impressed with this guitar. Cheap pickups are supposed to sound muddy with no character, these sounded pretty good, actually very good, nice and bright with a nice tight bottom end. I check sound also by cranking up a backing track to stage level and playing a few tracks. It cut through really well. I noticed while doing this test that the volume had a very nice sweep to it and didn't lose any highs when turned down. The tone knob was also very usable with a good sweep, very nice. I popped off the back cover to check what was in there, full sized pots, maybe not the best quality but much better than expected. I normally upgrade electronics on my personal guitars to get the controls to operate the way I like but no need to fix what's not broken. Yup, I said \"on my personal guitars\" because I am keeping this one for myself. The neck is very fast and comfy, it's NOT a boat anchor so my shoulder will thank me. The tuners are the lower end trapezoid type but turn smoothly with no backlash and keep the guitar in tune fine, once again if it ain't broke don't fix it. Please note that most tuning problems are from a binding improperly cut nut. I've set-up hundreds of guitars and almost all of them need nut work, doesn't matter what price point you are at. This also has a bolt on neck. A lot of players say you have to have a set (glued) neck. I feel glue actually deadens the sound a bit, I prefer a good solid bolt on to transfer sound, IMO. I have found that the quality level of the low end foreign guitars has become very good. I know that corners have to be cut to get to the price point of these budget guitars but all in all the Special ll is good to go right out of the box with just a little tweaking. My advice is to go try one, my taste may not be the same as yours. There are a lot of good value well made guitars now-a-days, I just found at this price vs quality ratio the Epiphone Special ll really is special. Get one, get it set up for a few bucks if you can't do it yourself, and you will have a good instrument. Oh did I mention this is a very good looking guitar?, "musical_instruments"
G, "musical_instruments"
I got this pretty fast. I took it out of the box and wanted nothing more than to give it 5 stars just for value alone. I'm still shaking my head in disbelief that I got this guitar for the price. First, the 'tuner' issues that I've been reading about. Replace the strings! I stretched and stretched these things and they would not stay in tune. A set of D'Addario 10's cured that straight away (or whatever you prefer just change them). The tuners aren't the best but they are not to blame, it's the cheap strings. Now, technically if you only play open chords this was playable out of the box. The neck angle was so off the A string rattled no matter how high I set the bridge. The guitar would not intonate due to the ridiculous angle. Yes I could have sent it back but I suspect I would have gotten another just like it. I had to spend about 6 hours shimming the neck AND the nut (Never had to do this to the nut on an electric, not even on a used guitar. The nut slot was cut too deep), as well as working on leveling nearly every fret to make it playable. It required 3 business cards to shim the neck which is the most I've ever had to use. After I got that straight I removed a bit of paint from the neck and set it with wood glue in the pocket and on all the screws. In my opinion this helps a great deal with these and all bolt ons for that matter.If I bought this used none of this would have been a big deal. But as I'm looking at this horrid neck angle and doing all this work I'm steadily staring at the 'QC passed' sticker. Must have been built on a Friday afternoon or something.--- NOW--after I did this it is sweet!!. I play through a Peavey Valveking 100 and it rocks as good as my Strat w/  Duncans and Dimarzios. The quality of the electronics is not sub par at all. After adjusting the pickups screws to match the string height and getting all the horrible wax off them,  I'd argue that this is as good as any Epi I've ever played as far as pups and all, so don't hesitate there because I don't really care for Epis and I'm in love with it. (I bought this to sell mainly, but now????)  The build quality; hmm, if you can do guitar work go for it. Otherwise I'd highly recommend a more expensive model. The $299 models are great right out of the box usually., "musical_instruments"
If you are considering this guitar, I have to assume you're shopping for an electric guitar at the lower end, not trying to decide between this and a Gibson Les Paul Custom.  It is in the category of beginner/intermediate guitars that I rate this a 5 star instrument.I really couldn't find anything \"wrong\"  with it.  Yes, it has shortcomings as compared to the more expensive Epiphone Les Pauls, such as having only two controls for volume and tone, rather than four, which also means it has a slightly different look that the famous Gibson.  But you weren't planning to try to fool anyone, were you?  Beginning players would be well advised to focus on developing their skills and honing technique, rather than fussing around with tone controls anyway.The sound is good, and I found the appearance and finish of mine to be just fine.  The pickups are surprisingly good.  The same electronics are found on some of the more expensive Epiphone Les Pauls.  It was no great surprise to find that the strings are no good, although it would sure be nice if they didn't cut corners on such an inexpensive component that is also integral to sound quality.As for fit and finish, reading the reviews has convinced me that there is a lot of variation in both, and it is luck of the draw whether you get one that was made on a Monday after a long weekend of partying.  For several reasons, if I had this to do over, I would not buy it online (nor would I buy it from GC).  Better to inspect the actual guitar you'll be buying, and don't be shy about asking them bring out another one if you don't like the first one you see.I discovered too late that my local music shop would have sold me this guitar for about the same price, but they would have included a full professional setup, including string change.  You are likely to find a similar deal where you live, because the smaller shops are having to do more and more to compete with the Internet and GC.As it is, I took my guitar to the local shop and paid for a setup.  It had some intonation problem, the action was too high, and as others have commented, the strings on this guitar need to be changed immediately.  I asked the luthier his opinion of the tuners, as I'd read a lot of people trashing the tuners.  Bearing in mind that he had a financial incentive to steer me toward replacing them, he instead assured me that they were fairly decent, and advised against changing them unless a problem develops.Out of the box, I was a little unsure of my purchase.  However, now that it's been fully set up  and new strings installed, I am quite pleased with this guitar.  I don't believe you will find a better guitar, or even close, at this price level.I did a lot of shopping, and considered guitars up to $500 for my first foray into electric.  I was tempted to go with something more expensive, on the theory that in a couple years, I'll want to upgrade anyway.  Now I'm glad I chose this one.  For one thing, this is a guitar I'll always enjoy having around.  There is nothing cheap or toy-like about it.  In 2-3 years, my tastes may change.  I may want something completely different down the road, and now I still have that option.  Had I gone with a more expensive model, I'd feel locked in.  No good!BOTTOM LINE:  If you're shopping for a guitar in this price range, I think you'll be pleased with this guitar.  Buy it locally so you can see the exact guitar you're buying, and negotiate to have a setup included, because it will almost certainly need one.  Have it set up right, install some quality strings, and you'll be very happy with the Epiphone LP Special II., "musical_instruments"
I got one of these a while back and being like I am with guitars took it apart to see just what it's made of.Mahogany ply maybe or capped with real, but it's plywood body inside.Kinda shocked in competitive guitar market that epi would go there...Otherwise decent build, basic original lp design bolt on, surprisingly good electronics w/ full size pots and open back 3 way toggle, good neck but bad tuners.... Note: any 45% mount tuners, meaning mount hole at 8 and 4 o'clock position respectively... Will fit with the bottom hole of the 2 screw junk tuners mine had.  So add 10$ to get more than 30 minute in tune play here.And you can fill the other little holes with nail polish like it was made right to begin with.I like the style, and though there's plywood involved still good fit and finish, though many disagree it makes no real difference what electric guitar body woods are, only in looks.  Electric guitars don't resonate, that's why pickups are important.I don't like the idea of this as beginners choice for the simple fact of cheap tuning keys.You lose interest learning on something that can't hold good tuning.  So that bugs me that big player choice like epi would do that.It's likely they'll keep this style but revise it some... to be hardwood body and real tuners as I  think the price point demands it.  Otherwise a decent piece good wiring, decent pickups... But..., "musical_instruments"
Pretty sweet guitar for the price. Sounds like and plays like a Les Paul. I really like the vintage sunburst color (It's more orange than what the picture shows). The strings were setup on the nut close to the fret board the way I like it already when I got it. I just replaced the strings with heavier strings for personal preference. Overall, sounds and looks awesome! Would recommend it for anyone on a budget that wants the sound of a Les Paul., "musical_instruments"
My axesEpiphone LP Studio deluxe plustopFender MarauderTakamine G320Squier Standard StratSquier Standard PJ bassBeen playing 20 years.I had a Squier bullet and it was a cheap guitar I didn't care about that I could keep next to the couch to play rocksmith with. But it got old and I wore the frets out so I needed a new cheap guitar for rocksmith. I picked up the LP special 2 in black at Guitar Center for $130 and they kicked in free strings.Bought it for a game, but soon found myself using it more than my other guitars because it sounded so good, played so well, and had a killer tone.My LP Studio had it's pickups replaced with the Zakk Wylde 81/85's which made for good metal but it lost some of that bluesy tone that passives have. Imagine my delight when my inexpensive epiphone had great sustain, tone, and playability. Considering this thing is almost the same prices a Bullet Squier, it is easily twice the guitar for that price. You literally cannot find a better guitar for $150 than the Special 2.....Sound: 5/5Two passive humbuckers have a great sound with glossy highs, deep lows, and they put just the right amount of dirt on a tone for a gutsy clean or distorted sound.The pickups were wax dipped and did not have the microphone feedback effect.The pickups are high output and feel like AlNico more than Ceramic. Not sure which they have.So much sustain for a bolt on neck. I was shocked.Build Quality 4/5I did have 1 problem with the high E tuner. I didn't notice in the store but the string peg was 1/4\" up out of the headstock. When I discovered this I loosened the string, whacked it with my fret hammer and it popped right in and stayed that way.Intonation required no adjustment.Action was exactly the way I like itNeck was straight with no fret buzz or excessive bow.The finish was perfect. No nicks, blemishes, just oily black goodness.Neck was flush with no gaps or seams, and professionally shimmed. Damn good for a bolt on.Hardware is typical for the price but does the job, stays in tune very well.Back bending headstock and 3x3 orientation mean no string trees which makes tuning much more stable.The bridge is similar to my LP Studio with the tunamatic setup. Individual strings may be intonated but action is done with two nuts, IE can raise one side higher or lower but not individual strings.Weird having the toggle between the volume knobs but I soon got used to it. No pickguard and it doesn't need one. Lots of relief between strings and body. You won't find yourself hitting the pickup housings or body with the pick. Makes it easy to clean too!Truss rod is behind a nice body color plate.Frets were smooth, rounded, and played nice. Could use a little buffing for silky smooth but not rough.Neck plays fast but the nut took some getting used to. I would catch it on my hand when fretting at the top, soon got used to it and it wasn't an issue.500k pots and side body 1/4 TRplug keeps the cable out of the way.Overall 5/5Came with hex keys for setupCame with an awsome poster with all the Epiphone guitar modelsCame with a nice bumper stickerNo manualBody was packed in foam shroud with foam blocks, about the same as any other $150 guitar.Summary: This guitar is the best bang for the buck of any instrument I own. It sounds good enough to gig with out of the box. IT's well built, plays well, and if you treat it well it should give you years of great music. The frets are medium jumbo's and a little deeper than a fender meaning they should last longer before needing re-fretting than a typical Affinity or Bullet (2 squiers in this price range).I would say this guitar is suitable for all styles of music. I did blues, metal, country, and pop. The pickups are humbuckers which means they are darker and higher output than a Fender, not as much of those nice Fender bell like tones and chime but it makes up for it with power and clarity.One thing I like about Epiphones and Gibsons is the volume pot is not close to the bridge. This makes it VERY easy to palm mute and play with high gain. I lay my pinky and the knife edge of my hand lightly across the strings right where they hit the bridge and it makes a nice mute but on my Strats the damn volume knob is in the way.As an experiment I took the pick up pole scews out of the bottom pickup to see if I could get a single coil sound out of it. What happened was a mess because of the parafin wax which got EVERYWHERE. The tone was a little brighter and output a little lower, still no hum but you wouldn't fool anyone into thinking it was a single coil. I ended up putting the screws back in.I will likely put my LP Studio stock pickups back in (hell yeah coil tapping here I come!) and move my EMG 81/85's in this LP Special 2 and make myself a nice little metal guitar.Do yourself a favor, buy this guitar even if you already have a better guitar. It's cheap enough that you won't care if you bang it around a little, and good enough that you will enjoy playing it for many years., "musical_instruments"
This guitar is very attractive looking, and plays well right out of the box.  I am a beginner guitarist, so please take this review for what it's worth.  I am extremely pleased, and don't plan on ever upgrading.  This guitar is a darker cherry red wood color in the center than shown in the picture.  So expect it to be a different color than what you order.  See customer pics.It comes with strings installed and almost tuned.  The volume knob is well designed for smooth and convenient use.  The tremble and rhythm switch is far enough out of the way that you're not going to accidently hit it while strumming.  My only gripe is that the high E string gets caught on the top pickup when I'm playing hard, but maybe I'm just a novice.  I will say that it's very easy to play.Everything on it is very adjustable which I also like.  The only BUYER BEWARE statement I can think of is: you're going to be addicted to it!, "musical_instruments"
I purchased this when it was on sale during the Christmas season - I figured that for the asking price at the time I could not go wrong.My expectations were frankly low. I had heard nothing but horrible things about Epiphones, with the main complaint being they would not stay in tune. Other complaints included p, "musical_instruments"
Listen,If you want an inexpensive guitar with great sound and easy playability, buy this one.  Period.I bought a black one to leave in the trunk while I was at work, in case the guys called for a practice session, so I wouldn't have to go all the way home to pick up my gear.I have other, way more expensive guitars, like a Gibson ES-335, Dean 12 string, and a Fender Strat, but I gotta tell you, I like this one soooo much I play it more than the others!  No kidding.And if it gets banged up, so what???  It costs a buck thirty!  Buy another.  In facte I bought 2 others with different finishes, just for a cheap change up guitar.Dig it., "musical_instruments"
I'm updating a previous negative review. I had some issues with this guitar when it arrived. I couldn't get it setup, the action was very high and I couldn't set the intonation. Notes at the 12th fret were very sharp, and I couldn't lower them with saddle adjustments. I missed one vital checkpoint, the bridge needed to be lowered. Setup is finished, and I can now agree with most reviewers. For the price, this guitar is far better than any others in the price range. I know my grandson will enjoy it, at least for awhile. If it ends up as a dust collector, I'm not out much on the purchase price. I'll add it back to my own collection, and upgrade the electronics., "musical_instruments"
The Epiphone Les Paul guitars don't particularly sound that great, but they stay in tune much better than the cheap squier strat you can get at the same or lower price. If your kid is serious about wanting to play guitar, but you're not completely sure if they will stick with it, if you can spend another $100 and get a used mexican made fender strat or tele. The reason for this is because for 1, if they decide it's not something they want to do anymore, you can resell it at the same price you bought it for (as long as it is still in decent condition) and little no money is lost. Second, if they do decide to stick with playing guitar and eventually own a &#34;better&#34; or more high end guitar, Mexican made teles or strats are great back up guitars for stage use. I have a couple different high end guitars and I will not get rid of my Mexy Strat because it sounds great still. I'll never pick up my first guitar which is essentially this., "musical_instruments"
I purchased this guitar after much thoughtful consideration of other possibilities, but the nearly universal high marks for this particular make and model finally persuaded me to go with this one, and I do not regret that decision.First of all, it is a beauty. Initially, I was a little disappointed in that very little wood grain shows through the orangish finish. (My guitar was made in China, which may account for the darker hue.) I thought I had wanted a lighter color, but the more I look at it the happier I am with what I have. Second, this instrument is no light-weight, either in heft or playability. It is solidly constructed, very well put together, and plays like a dream. (I lowered the action until I encountered some fret buzz, then backed off the adjusting screws just a bit; that's basically the only adjustment I've made, or likely will make.)It's been barely a day since the guitar arrived and, as yet, I've only played it unplugged. I can't wait to hear how it sounds amped up., "musical_instruments"
I have been playing for about 7 years now and have a Tak Jasmine Acoustic and a Jay Turser Strat knockoff.  I really love the Les Paul sound but my pocket book is not large enough for the Les Paul price.  I've read just about everything I can on these Epi's and finally went to my local Music store to try one out.  My initial impression was somewhat mixed.  The sound was good but the action seemed \"off\"  After playing a few scales and a couple easy chords I began to get a feel fro the action on this guitar.  Then I switched from the rear pickup to the front and BANG there was that sound I was looking for.  Classic Gibson Les Paul sound (in all fairness the amp was setup for a strat).  After playing around a bit more I asked to try one in the cherry finish.  They unboxed a new one for me and WOW this guitar looks AMAZING!  I sat down plugged it in and played a bit. Instantly I was in love.  The action was perfect (despite the some what heavier strings than what I'm used to).  The sound off both humbuckers was classic and playability of this guitar has to be tried to be appreciated.  Tuning is a breeze, and is held as well as any other guitar I own (I always retune before every session anyway).  Epiphone really did everything to capture that Les Paul sound in a economy guitar.  Yes I know you puriest will point to the bolt on neck, the cheaper humbuckers, the flat top construction, and the basswood body.  I point to the angled headstock, mahagony neck, rosewood fret board, and Gibson electronics.  I love the simple volume and tone controls (yea a little more knob spinning when switching between pickups) and the tun-o-matic bridge and tail piece is gonna make string changes a breeze (so much better than having the try to thread thru the body).  Even with my somewhat limited practice amp this guitar still sounds amazing, oh and the sustain from it well lets just say I hit a low E last night before I went to bed, and I think it is still reviberating in the amp this morning (lol  If your looking for a Les Paul sound at a discount price- consider this your answer. Oh and my local shop was able to give me this guitar at $20 less than any place else, AND they will do a FREE setup for me after I've played it for a while (so far it's been perfect out of the box)., "musical_instruments"
Wow, you would have thought this was the Holy Grail when it arrived at my house.  My son practically ran to the UPS man when the truck pulled up.  He is thrilled with this guitar.  Great purchase., "musical_instruments"
I got this guitar at Guitar Center, i was scared to get this guitar from amazon because of a review saying it looked like a toy, so i wanted to see it in person, i saw it, i tested it out at guitar center and it was amazing, its better than my other les paul special ii, this guitar plays great, its set up very nicely, the pickups are very nice, the electronics work perfectly, i have no problems with it, but the guitar is very beautiful, i would highly recommend getting it, i just dont know if anyone elses will be the same, not all guitars are made the same right?, "musical_instruments"
A friend showed up at our monthly guitar club meeting with this and I loved having an on/off switch right at my fingertips. Genius!I bought 2 immediately. The shorter one goes from my guitar to the pedal board and the longer one from the pedal board to the amp. Works like a charm and no excuse now for damaging amps or ears.Two issues to consider. The right angle plug was a mm or 2 short of being able to stick into my Tele and my Takamine. It would not seat properly and would slide out. I had to turn the cord around and use the right angle on the pedal board side, where it worked, but now the switch is &#34;down there&#34;. I don't think Planet Waves is the first connector that I had a problem with that so I dont blame them, but maybe stick with the straight jack if you are not sure. Second issue is simply that these little button-switches are fussy. You have to make sure you have it in the right position by looking at them - feel wont do. (If you see the white edge they are &#34;quiet&#34;), "musical_instruments"
This is my third circuit breaker cable. I play in church and no one wants to here the \"POP\" if I have to leave the sanctuary. Why three: 10foot, 15foot, and 20foot depending on the setup for the group - I hate cable jump rope. I really like the right angle connector makes it fit no matter what guitar stand I use., "musical_instruments"
I love this cable. It is perfect for making guitar changes without noise. The cable itself does not seem quite as good quality as my other Planet Waves cables but it is still better than most others. The switch is easy to use., "musical_instruments"
So far I am a very satisfied customer with this cable.  For what is worth, while I have used these cables before, this is the first one I have ever owned, so I am no expert., "musical_instruments"
A nice concept that actually works, The cable is very nice, too with an adequate gauge. Try it out for yourself!, "musical_instruments"
Update: The right angle switched end started developing crackling issues and is now intermittently cutting out. I've had it just over a month, so Amazon won't help me. Despite the lifetime warranty, Amazon has only offered to let me pay shipping and to give me a partial refund. Despite being an \"authorized retailer\" for Planet Waves, AMAZON DOES NOT OFFER EXCHANGE UNDER THE PLANET WAVES WARRANTY beyond the standard Amazon 30 day return policy. Amazon support referred me to the manufacturer. I've emailed Planet Waves, but the instructions for the warranty are to return it to a dealer for exchange. I don't have a dealer within 100 miles of my home, so unless the manufacturer comes through, this one is quickly becoming unusable and it looks like it might cost me to resolve it.I frequently switch instruments and this makes it easy to do quietly. I've used cables with the G&H; quiet plug (which also works well), but the switched connector on this has an advantage over the G&H-; you can use it as a mute and tune with a head stock tuner without unplugging your instrument. The cable itself is a bit stiffer than I'm used to, which makes coiling for storage very easy, but it can quickly become a twisted mess on stage if you more length than you really need. The little elastic cord keeper strap works better than I could ever have imagined. I've never given the sound of a cable a thought, being a bass player who doesn't use much for effects and who plays mostly passive instruments. But using this with my Genz Benz Shuttlemax 9.2 and fEARful 15/6/1 cab, I really notice a pronounced difference in clarity and dynamics. The sound is much more alive with this over any of the other cables I have from a variety of manufacturers (Hosa, Proco, Whirlwind, etc). I've never had to warranty exchange a PW cable, but others tout the easy swap at any PW dealer as a great reason to buy them. I like knowing that. ** EDIT: AS STATED ABOVE, YOU WILL NOT BE ABLE TO EXCHANGE IT THROUGH AMAZON BEYOND 30 DAYS **, "musical_instruments"
Wow, these cables are made really sturdy. And the noiseless feature is priceless. Definitely a real good value for the money., "musical_instruments"
30 feet of cable for what I paid for a 10 footer from my local guitar shop.I highly recommend!, "musical_instruments"
A long time Planet Waves user I trusted that the circuit breaker cable would be up to their usual high standards... IMHO it is not.The plugs are great but do not seem to have good cable grip. I like their old cables that had a long cable protector extending from the plug allowing the cable to flow gracefully from the guitar (and into the amp at the other end). The actual cable is horrible.... it is a hard plastic outer shell and does not lie or flex well like a good cable should (e.g. like my old Planet Waves cables do). They claim that the shielding is excellent but I find it to be mediocre. Very disappointing purchase., "musical_instruments"
I'd chose this cable cause I own an older one with the angle plug and needed another longer cable with the straight end. I like the idea that you can cut the power  and remove the cable from the instrument with having  mute the amp or mixer. I recommend this product to anyone who likes the ability to disconnect without doing anything else., "musical_instruments"
I purchased this for my pedalboard a few years ago, and have always loved it. I only use 3-4 pedals, and this is always one of them. It sounds great, is indestructable, and takes up almost no space. The controls are great, and you can get a large variety of sounds. I have played \"boutique\" chorus pedals, and the Boss is loads better in every way. You will not regret this purchase.Pros:-easy to use-no hum-small-sonds awesome-indestructabecons:-NONEIf you want an awesome chorus that has been around forever, will last forever, and sounds incredible, get this., "musical_instruments"
I bought this little pedal back in 1996, about a year after I got my first guitar.  I've tried other pedals, but ultimately, this one gives me the best sound.  It's very versatile and it's really easy to dial in just about any sound I want.  You might get a more dramatic effect from expensive rack units, but for cost and practicality, this pedal is your best bet!, "musical_instruments"
Very very good product! I have no complains about it.  Definitely a great buy and a Must have in your pedalboard., "musical_instruments"
First, let me start by saying this pedal has been part of my setup for nearly 7 years now and still looks/sounds as great as the day it came out of the box.Its a Boss product, which means you are going to pay for what you get.  You get the best bang for your buck with Boss products.  Solid, rugged construction that is built to last (no chance of breaking one of these things) and an outstanding analog stomp box with a genuine sound.  Good customer support as well and if you ever feel you need to sale your Boss pedal, resale prices are always good.While this pedal is capable of hundreds of tones and sounds (chorus is one of the most useful and versatile effects in my opinion)  Here are some of the best uses I have found.1. Tweak the pedal just to thicken your sound and give that 2 guitar effect.  Perfect if you want to fatten up that really heavy chorus in a song and make it sound really full.2. Dime out the speed and depth for those crazy out of this world Korn type effects.  This is a really handy pedal for imitating tones of other bands because it can do so much.  There are a lot of bands tones I can come close to exactly matching, tones that took them 2 or 3 pedals to achieve.3.  Liquify your sound and give a beautiful tone to cleans and leads.  This pedal will help simple parts that would normally go unoticed stand out.  If you play any kind of Christian music you will soon learn it doesn't matter what you do as long as you put chorus on it.  Walking in on Sunday morning and turn out some Slayer while using a chorus pedal and they will go nuts.  Chorus is just one of those effects no matter what type of music you are playing, you will always find a use for it, so there is no excuse for not adding this pedal to your rig.In addition you have some great features, easy access battery compartment, accepts a 9v power supply, works well with both guitar and bass, 2 out puts so you can run to 2 sources if desired, and all the controls you need to really be in complete control.  You HAVE to get this pedal!, "musical_instruments"
Sweet chorus, I have the CE5, the CE20, a CE3 and this one. This chorus is my favorite, it sounds just right, the analog CE3 is awesome but too weak, Boss should include a level knob instead of a stereo control, anyway this one is a keeper!, "musical_instruments"
OK... I am a pro musician & rely on gear that will stand the tests of the road. I was using an old Ibenez Chorus Pedal (one of the first to hit the market) of which I did not use much basically due to it's used for certain songs. I upgraded from using 2 separate pedal boards to a single unit & decided to buy the Boss CH-1 Super Chorus to add to the collection. After my first gig I removed the Ibenez Chorus Pedal because of the tonal superiority of the Boss unit. I am certain there are units that may boast of being better but, I have found through my 40+ years of playing that more money is not always better.Great tones! Easy operation! And it is the best bet for the money!, "musical_instruments"
I like the product a lot. For me, the only problem is the time of the \"sustainer effect\".It is not so long as I thought. I though it would be like the piano's sustainer. But it's a good pedal effect. My guitar get a good sound with the \"attack effect\". Thank you., "musical_instruments"
As several of the previous posters astutely mentioned, 'you will need a noise gate to use this pedal'. I completely agree with that. And it will sustain your notes. It will actually raise the volume to make them sustain. But you will have extraneous hiss when the guitar is not playing to cover it up. The only way to get rid of this hiss is to use a noise gate. I use the NS-2 when I use my chain of pedals. That said, this pedals has some wonderful uses. Every note will have the same volume. You can hit the chord as hard as you like or as softly and it will play at the same volume. You can set it to sustain for days. Again, you will need a noise gate. There is nothing transparent about THIS compressor as there is almost all of my other compressors, but none of them are as \"ACTIVE\" as this one. Perhaps that's the price you pay for what this pedal can do. I recommend messing with it quite a while. You can do some incredible funk, jazz, metal vibes out of it., "musical_instruments"
Man this is perfect! Some people says that the cs3 is noisy but I thinks that depends on what type of electric conections you got at home or place you play, if you don't have a independent circuit for your pedalboard there's gonna be a lot of noise, most of all bcuz of the compression (obviously)... For me this is PERFECT, doesn't make any noise with my conections... Tottally recommend this!, "musical_instruments"
The Boss CS3 is right for me, I have been using it with excellent results, I have many compressors, Line6, MXR, Behringer, Digitech, and although I alternate their use the Boss stands out on many rig configurations, it can feel a little bit overcompressed sometimes but in general a very good product, I highly recommended it as your main compressor, if you dont like it probably you dont know how to configure it, good luck., "musical_instruments"
It really pains me to give anything but a 5-star review to a BOSS product, since I'm such a big fan of their product line and build qual, "musical_instruments"
As a pro musician, I am always on a quest for better tone to expand and comply with different gig situations. I had a bad experience with a few Compression Pedals through my years only to toss them in the closet & give up on the thought.When I upgraded my pedal board, I decided to give the idea of adding a Compression unit to give my G&L; American Legacy (Stratocaster style guitar) more sustain at lower volumes. Boss is the company that dominates my effects board... I rely on their Chormatic Tuner, Digital Delay (2 of them), Line Switch & Direct Box almost every night (for gig & Practice).With a somewhat negative attitude going into this I had a great surprise to find that I really, really like this unit. It did what I wanted & then some! Great tone & sustain oozes from this little box & stays in the \"On\" position for most of the time I am playing my electric guitars, especially any Stratocaster styled guitar I own., "musical_instruments"
Guitarists have become a bunch of cork-sniffers. There are so many players more concerned with the name on the headstock of their guitar and their amp and the endless \"boutique\" pedals in their collections that many seem unable or unwilling to give a listen to \"stock\" gear, or anything that doesn't cost an arm and a leg.The fact is that if you're a gigging musician, and I am, you come to realize that all those subtle, detailed nuances of tone that so many want to obsess over get lost in the band mix, and in the poor acoustics of wherever you're playing.  Yes, we want to sound good to ourselves because that's inspiring, but frankly, I don't need $200+ dollar distortion/OD pedals to be inspired.I haven't owned a DS-1 in a long time, but recently got one because I was looking for a distortion pedal on a budget.  Frankly, I'd forgotten how musical this pedal is.  With the distortion set to minimum (it never gets clean) it's a good, moderate-gain overdrive that still lets your guitar's basic tone get through.  I play a strat & and jazzmaster - those guitars still sound like themselves with this thing.  With the gain at halfway you get great AD/DC crunch.  And even with the gain maxed out you still get excellent note definition on chords.  What more could you want?  Sure, it's \"old school\" rock distortion. The usual \"may not appeal to metalheads\" caveat applies, maybe. Combine this with an eq and you could scoop the mids as much as you want.I also have a Barber LTD (great, relatively cheap \"boutique\" moderate gain OD that doesn't break the bank) and a Visual Sound Route 66, which is a tubescreamer clone (with much more gain) and a compressor in one pedal.  Both the LTD & Rt 66 have the usual TS9 midrange hump, though much less pronounced on the LTD.  What's refreshing about the DS-1 is that the strong mids are there, but , "musical_instruments"
Think of this as an artist's tool.  And for every job there is the 'right' tool.  Is this the best distortion pedal?  That really depends on what sound you are trying to get and what other gear/technique you are using with it.  If you are using bad gear or poor technique it will not perform miracles.  It will not make your 15 watt solid state Ibanez Soundblaster amp sound like a raging Orange Rockerverb and it will not make single coils sound like EMG 81/85s.  But arguing over what pedal is 'best' is like two painters arguing over what color is best used to paint a sunrise.  This pedal is good for a tight kind of distortion- but not so heavy that you can do modern metal if running into a clean amp - if that makes any sense. It it doesn't make sense, there are ample Youtube reviews you can check out before pulling the trigger.  It has been used by professional players like Steve Vai, Joe Satriani, and Kurt Cobain. It is a professional pedal used by professional musicians.  It's built like a brick and durable as all get-out.  I found mine used for $20, but the new asking price is fair. I would like to see Boss start using true bypass instead of the buffered bypass they use, but admittedly I don't detect any tonesuck with it.  I've run mine into a tube amp on the verge of breakup and it can really get things cooking.  It also takes an overdrive or sustainer pretty well to bump the gain and get some singing leads.  With the exception of 'modeler' type pedals from companies like Tech 21, I do not think that any dirtboxes- this included- perform optimally when run into a solid state amp.  So if you are not happy with the way it is distorting your Marshall MG, the problem is in your amp., "musical_instruments"
I have had this pedal for about 15 years, just replaced the old one a month ago. It distorts sound, not quite the way you would imagine though. This effect sounds really good through a fat cab or a larger amp that can let the cabinet give the tone a little color. I use it through a Epiphone Valve Jr and a Marshall 2x12 stack with JTM45 on top and its fine. This thing through a Champ or smaller amp will not give you the meat you are probably looking for without a EQ pedal.This does just what it says it does. One Volume knob, one tone, and one distortion knob. CRANK IT., "musical_instruments"
This pedal is a must have for any pedal board. I love the overdriven sound of this pedal in that it has a distortion element but not so distorted single notes are lost in the fray. Thirty some odd years and counting and still one of the best., "musical_instruments"
This was the first pedal I ever bought when I started playing guitar 15 years ago.  It's still in my primary set up!  The sound it puts out is very balanced:  you can get a subtle overdrive-like sound out of it, or a high-gain hard rock/80's metal sound out of it.  For those looking for insane crunch, this isn't for you.  Anyone that wants a nice, versatile pedal, this IS the one you want!, "musical_instruments"
This is a cheap piece of junk that does what it says, it distorts, You want something to make your guitar sound like junk, this will do it. Why pedals that make your guitar sound like a piece of junk are the most popular is beyond me. This is not a boutique Distortion pedal like Hendrix would use. Boutique and distortion are an oxymoron.These things are built with heavy metal, it should last, I kinda hope it doesn't(just kidding), you want distortion, you got distortion, "musical_instruments"
This is a distortion pedal. It will give your amp a boost for solos and turn a clean amp into a dirty girl. It's pretty harsh in tone - kind of a white noise distortion. The DS-1 DOES NOT warm up the tone in your amp. You can dial the tone in, but it's a pretty harsh sounding.That said - the DS-1 does exactly what I wanted it to. My amp gives me a nice warm crunch, classic rock style. The DS-1 gives me the 80's metal and punk rock sound I wanted, and it does so flawlessly.It took me about 5 minutes of tinkering to get a nice transition from my amp to a matching tone on the DS-1. It's BOSS, so it will last forever.Th only drawback is that it's an item that is currently cheaper elsewhere. Usually Amazon catches up with that sort of thing, but word to the wise, don't pay more than $40 new for this thing., "musical_instruments"
I find that if I play this pedal along with my Boss Super Chorus pedal, my guitar with Tex-Mex pickups captures a lot Gilmour's sound tonality., "musical_instruments"
This pedal has been on the market for a very long time and it was a smoking deal for a Boss pedal at $40. The pedal works great with almost any guitar pickup set but sings with my EMG powered Schecter and tube amp.Different distortion levels can be dialed in and to my surprise, it works good with a bass although bass players know they will lose some bottom end.The guitar universe always raves about Boss and the distortion pedals and how any guitar player should have one of the distortion pedals. Buy it and experiment with the gain and settings and find your favorite tone.I may buy another one and mod it to use with my bass., "musical_instruments"
From Greg Abrams review, entitled \"For all but the tone snobs,\" a review further down on this product's page:\"Alright, so you want to get a good (if somewhat \"basic\") distortion sound for less than $100? This is your deal.\"I strongly disagree.  You can find MUCH BETTER distortions for $100 or less, even a few near or under the $40 mark the DS-1 is currently priced at.I've played guitar for over 10 years.  Like many people one of my first pedal purchases was the DS-1.  Afterall, everyone talks about them, they're available at any given music store in the nation, you hear about all these famous musicians using them, plus a DS-1 is actually pretty cheap!  So I snapped one up just like everyone else.  Come to find out that just because something is POPULAR, that doesn't always mean its GOOD (see: Nickelback, the Transformers movie franchise, the Kardashian family, etc...).So I plugged it in and didn't really care for it.  The distortion was harsh, thin, artificial sounding and always noisy.  I tried it on both my amps (My practic amp: a solid state Fender Frontman 25R, and my big amp, the B-52 AT100, which is a 100w tube halfstack) It was was not very diverse, and the basic sound was not very likeable to me.  I've read the Japanese made DS-1's are better in sound than the newer, made in Taiwan models but, either way, the DS-1 is just not a great pedal in my mind.But, like many newer players, I didn't know any better at the time.  Fast forward a few years and I've bought and sold literally dozens of pedals.  There is a whole world of great tones to be found out there if you keep your eyes open.So here are some pedals I currently own that I like much better than the DS-1.  All of them are great general purpose distortions, easy enough to find new and used in most guitar shops, and can, at the time of this writing, be bought brand new for $75 or less here on good ol' Amazon.com, and are rugged enough to last for years:Boss DS-2 Turbo Distortion:  Lest I catch any flames from people thinking I'm a Boss hater (I'm certainly not, I loved the TU-3, the ODB-3, the MD-2, and the XT-2, among others) I'll start with the DS-1's big brother.  This pedal has a much nicer tone to it, not to mention 2 distinct distortion modes.  The I setting is pretty much a higher quality DS-1, the II setting is a brighter, richer tone.  As the DS-1 completely overshadows the DS-2 in popularity, you can find DS-2's all over ebay for very cheap prices.  A very worthy pedal, unfortunately overlooked by many.Pro Co RAT2:  Great dirty distortion pedal.  Probably my personal favorite.  You've heard this box used on literally hundreds if not thousands of songs in the last 30 years, its used by just a ridiculous amount of guitarists.  Its a rich, full distortion that at higher gains gets slightly fuzzy.  I've never heard a bad tone out of mine. Its great for getting a \"big amp\" kind of sound out of a small practice amp.  Its also great for pushing a big amp with too much headroom into the overdriven sweet spot without having to crank the amp volume.  A truly excellent pedal.EHX Little Big Muff:  The Big Muff is another pedal you've heard on hundreds of songs.  Its kind of a fuzz, kind of a distortion, but definitely owns its own sonic territory.  Very big, saturated and warm.  Used heavily in the 70's for classic rock tones, also in the 90's and beyond for tons of grunge and garage.  Used by everyone from Carlos Santana and David Gilmour to the Smashing Pumpkins, Dinosaur Jr. and Jack White.  I personally reccomend the Little Big Muff, not only is it a touch creamier in tone than the recent NYC reissue, its smaller, uses a regular 9v adapter and its CHEAPER!  A great pedal.MXR Distortion +:  The Distortion + is a great first distortion, and can usually be found pretty cheap.  Whats nice about the Distortion + is that it sounds great on anything, and the lack of a tone knob helps keep it somewhat transparent, i.e. you can more easily hear the natural tone of your guitar and amp, it doesn't cover over your equipments sound.  Used by quite a few famous folks, including the Greatful Deads Jerry Garcia, Randy Rhoads (Ozzy's famous guitarist) and Steve Jones of the Sex Pistols.Danelectro CM-1 Cool Cat Metal:  Make sure you get the Cool Cat Metal, NOT the Metal II.  That's a fine pedal as well, but its definitely more of a traditional metal pedal.  The Cool Cat Metal, or CM-1, is actually a very very different pedal from most metal pedals.  Basically, its a pre-amp that sits on the floor.  It has a fully adjustable EQ with tons of volume and gain through the roof.  So you can do anything from a clean boost (with the gain at minimum there is virtually NO coloration to your tone) to high gain metal stuff, with plenty of great overdrive and rock tones in between.  It works well with any amp I've tried it on, and you can find tons of great sounds.  Its an unbelievably versatile pedal, and its even true bypass.  The best part is, Danelectro seems to have made way too many of them, so you can easily find one used or even new for under $30.  A true hidden gem that's actually CHEAPER than a DS-1.Joyo JF-03 Crunch Distortion:  This little guy surprised me.  Its supposedly a clone of the MI Audio Crunch Box, and, if so, that must be one awesome pedal too.  Its essentially a Marshall stack in a box, and boy does it ever succeed at that.  Great crunch, tons of volume and gain, it really can make your practice amp sound like a big ragin' stack!  It even sounded good going into my modeling amp (very few pedals work well with my modeling amp, and this one even sounded better than the Marshall simualtion built in), and you can get a brand new one for $40 shipped, fantastic!Speaking of Joyo, I've had a few of their pedals as well as one or two from MOEN, another Chinese pedal maker, and I'm honestly floored by how nice they sound given their shockingly low price tag (especially theMOEN MO-FM Fuzz Moowhich honestly out Big Muffs every Big Muff I've ever played through).  So JOYO and MOEN, they both make a variety of great sounding fuzz, od, and dirt pedals, check them out (and before anyone gets all up in arms about supporting a Chinese company, please keep in mind that NONE of the pedals listed in my review, DS-1 included, are made in America, let alone the western hemisphere).Hopefully these suggestions give you something to look for.  Also, if you can't actually try a pedal out at the store, YouTube is great place to hear demos of what different pedals can do.I should also mention that if you try and love the DS-1 and it suits your needs, than more power to you.  Tone is subjective, every pedal sounds different running through different guitars and amps, and just because I may share different opinions on something that you love, that's okay.  My main reason for posting this lengthy review is to give newer players some information.  You have PLENTY of options for distortion pedals, the DS-1 is NOT the only thing out there that's affordable.  Find something you truly love and buy that.  If its the DS-1, one of the pedals I've mentioned here, or anything else, the important part is that it sounds right to YOU., "musical_instruments"
Here's the deal with this pedal. It is inexpensive and you can get a better pedal with barely a bit more money and sometimes a little less money. In my opinion, for spending less than $100 for a distortion pedal, whether it is your first pedal or 700th pedal, a few more bucks will get you the MXR Badass distortion which has a much crisper tone to it., "musical_instruments"
This is a little more expensive than some other brands, but i think it sounds great and it's way more durable than a plastic pedal.I'm pretty new to electric guitar so i'm not really a distortion and tone expert like some other reviewers.  To me this this sounds better and is easier to adjust than my modeling amp, so I think it's a good purchase., "musical_instruments"
This is the best deal ever my first pedal was a zoom 505 gfx and it was really electronic and synthesized sounding alot of echos and stuff. Honestly the best effect it held was the phaser/jet pipe effect. I got this today and man it sounds so crisp clean and evenly distorted. It does the job distortion and sustain best buy for a best price!! bodow!!! from Trinidad!!, "musical_instruments"
This pedal has been around for a long time, and though , "musical_instruments"
I love these pedals. Inexpensive to purchase - easy to mod to your liking.This pedal received the gain and JCM mod.I will purchase more of these and will mod each and every one of them.This pedal is also good stock for a lead boost. Love this pedal., "musical_instruments"
There's some element of nostalgia with the DS-1 that I've just never understood.  I know they're cheap.  I know they're incredibly durable (as are all BOSS pedals).  I know everybody had one or tried one at some point, and Kurt Cobain (apparently) used them with his Fenders.But I also know that I've almost never been happy with the tone I get when I step on the pedal.  It's incredibly thin and harsh, and lacks proper sustain, even cranked all the way.  I've used it on Marshall solid state amps and Vox tube amps.  Fender single coil pickups and guitars with humbuckers.  You can mess with the TONE and DIST dials all you want, but there has to be dozens of other affordable pedals, and even on-amp distortion, with a richer, deeper tone.Coincidentally, I also used the BOSS OS2 Overdrive/Distortion for many years, which is supposedly merges/blends a DS-1 with an OD-1.  That pedal isn't ideal either, but if I turn the knob all the way to \"distortion\", it's a much better tone than I ever got out of a DS-1.Then again, it is very dependable and usually only $40 (or less), so I can't really give it a bad review because it probably does belong in everyone's collection.  That just doesn't mean you'll want to use it all the time., "musical_instruments"
... it's a very generic-sounding distortion and is not really useful for much beyond a lead boost into an already distorted amp.  The same is true of many of the pedals from this era, including the (gasp!) Tube Screamer.  The Tube Screamer is a great lead boost into an already distorted amp, but not too many people will tell you that it's a great stand-alone distortion because it's not.  Same goes for the Boss DS-1.  Now, here's where things get interesting:  There are PLENTY of modifications that can be done to this pedal by Keely, Monte Allums, and others, that turn this otherwise mediocre pedal into a raging beast, dripping with tone and gain that sings for weeks.  For the cost of this pedal, and the $30 or so that it costs to get the materials for a mod, are well worth it.  Mine is modified with the Monte Allums Tri-Gain Rectifier modification and it's absolutely killer.  I use it as a lead boost, but by itself it's a nice overdriven tone that you'll find plenty of use for.  If you want a basic, solid, well-built distortion pedal, this is it - but by itself the Boss DS-1 is really nothing special.  But as a platform for great-sounding mods, you can't go wrong., "musical_instruments"
I know, I know, many people hate on this pedal, calling it &#34;stale&#34;, and &#34;generic&#34;. The problem that they have is that they simply haven't found the right settings on the pedal and the amp, because, after all, the settings on both the amp, and the pedal do make a difference. One thing to note is that it is a bit on the quiet side in my opinion. I have a Digitech Bad Monkey, and I set the level on that to 2 so it matches up with the amp. With this pedal, I have to crank the level to make the clean tone the same level as the distorted tone., "musical_instruments"
This is an excellent distortion pedal for people who want a traditional rock sound. I use it with a Fender Mustang amp and an Ibanez guitar with good humbucking pickups. It's very easy to use and rugged. If you play metal, you might want to get the HardWire TL-2 instead; that pedal delivers more distortion (an insane amount, if necessary) and more tone control, but it's also more expensive. But you can easily boost the distortion achieved by the DS-1 by using it with your amp on an overdriven setting. The DS-1 is an excellent general purpose distortion pedal. I don't know of any other that achieves this level of quality in the same price-range., "musical_instruments"
First off I am no expert on these things but I can tell you in the brief period in which I have owned my DS-1 I have enjoyed playing/practicing a lot more with this pedal.  I have a Fender wannabe guitar, and a Fender Sidekick 10 which means my gear isn't the best but the pedal produces a wide variety of distortion and tone changes which keeps me interested.  I am having so much fun that I don't even notice my fingers hurt anymore.  Honestly, this is an essential buy when starting out along with headphones and a cord extension so the police don't come a knockin.(update Sept 2012)It is a year later and I have a much better guitar and amp and a lot more knowledge.  I am glad I got the DS-1 but for other reasons.  Sure it made me enjoy playing and practicing a lot more but I soon found the sound was off considering I like more blue and classic rock.  Again for the money I dont think you can beat it but more importantly when you have a few buck you can send it out for modification from Keeley.  Initially I had wished I went with and overdrive (OCD or Boss OD-3) but with the mod done by Keeley I have a super flexible pedal that cover just about all the sounds I need.  In closing, spend the $40 buck and get this....and then when you start wishing it could do more send it off to be modified and you will thank yourself later., "musical_instruments"
Good metal distortion tone with bags of sustain but sucks a lot of tone (most metal pedals do) and is moderately noisy. If you are looking for classic rock sounds you won't find them here. Can get muddy at times but there are plenty of settings to tweak to get the sound you are looking for. I find it useful for high gain leads and palm mute rhythms but note definition is not so good with chords. For the price this pedal is a good deal though!, "musical_instruments"
I've had this for about 11 years now. Even with some of the newer metal pedals on the market, this pedal still sells well. Not to mention, it's probably also one of the most modded pieces out there. Any number of mods can be found online to change the sound. They're usually on the side of improving the stock tone, which I'm happy with.I've always liked the parametric EQ on this pedal. The variable midrange allows me to get Marshall or Mesa flavors. For most metal/hard rock music, the gain range is enough for me. If I need yet more gain, I punch it up with an overdrive, or a compressor pedal for a cleaner boost. Even without a boost, I can use it for death metal. I think if you play the tighter, more technical styles, it's better not to have too much gain anyhow., "musical_instruments"
To be honest, I was looking for a pedal that would give me distortion similar to Megadeth's first album KIMB. So far I havnt got a perfect setup on it yet, but ive got close enough to it. This pedal is great, only a couple notes I should make about it. Do NOT buy this pedal if your expecting to play classic rock, or just rock in general. This pedal is for metal. The battery drains like a MF. I dont understand why. The only possible explanation I can think is that I leave it plugged into guitar and amp, but ive had other pedals that wouldnt drain the battery unless its TURNED ON. I prefer just to get an AC adapter and not use batteries. Other than those few things iv had no problems with this great pedal., "musical_instruments"
I have a lot of pedals...  In fact, I have 2 distortion and 2 overdrive pedals (though only the MT2 and the OD3 are regularly in my rig.)  This pedal won't give you a \"cranked up tube stack\" sound.  No...  Instead, it's very edgy and smooth as can be.  It has a mid-sweep knob on it to help sculpt your tone.  I usually use it as a mid-boost for solos.  You'll find that you get amazing sustain and a huge sound that you won't be able to replicate (easily... I'm sure the huge Boss distortion box comes close, but for the price...) with any other pedal., "musical_instruments"
I bought mine used three years ago and it works great. It works for a Metallica, Pantera type sound. You can also get good rock sounds with the gain turned down and eq. adjusted., "musical_instruments"
Its a great pedal, sound really crunchy, I got a peavy vyper sometime I use this If I want a crunchy style, but the amp I got is really good and has its own distortion styles, I use the heavy metal config on this pedal, I recomend it to anyone... does not introduce noise, I run it on the stock battery, it still works, you can make your guitar sound like Metallica or Megadeth, of course it also depends on a lot of things, like pickups, amp, etc..., I also have a very old little peavey practice amp, this blows away the distortion that it has with less noise and gives it a new life.Listen to it on the Boss website, I heard to it and then I thought the sound was not going to be similar because of the equipment used by them, but it does sound really really close. regards. forgive my english... not from the U.S, "musical_instruments"
BY FAR the best distortion pedal out there. No doubt about that. Several of my friends use this pedal, and they all love it. I also see many popular bands using this distortion pedal. It's great for medal. It have a nice punch to it along with a great &#34;cut&#34; so you're palm mutes don't blend into each other like other pedals. There are several knobs offering seemingly unlimited combinations. AMAZING, "musical_instruments"
First of all I want to say I love a tube amp distortion.  Overdriven tubes are just how its meant to be.  I run a Randall G3 hybrid amp and it destroys any solid state I've used or heard.  For recording I use a Peavey 5150 and its so sweet.  Tubes are how guitar was meant to be heard.Recently I started playing with a band that required a dirty tone that I felt like could only be achieved through a pedal.  There is absolutely nothing wrong with using distortion pedals, I used the DOD death metal for years when I first started playing.  However, there is a downside.  Go cheap and you get a piece of crap that makes your rig sound like an old AM radio, if you want something that sounds pro quality your going to shell out at least $250.  Quality dist. pedals are not budget friendly.I chose the MT-2 because I know Boss makes a quality product and it was the pedal the other guitarist was using.  It gives a variety of sounds.  It can be set up for an overdriven light distortion sound or full blown high gain metal tones.  The controls make it very tweakable and I have gotten a load of very nice sounds out of it.  Read the included book, look up some MP3s over videos online and check out other guitarists' settings.  It will help you tame this pedal into what you want.  Perfect pedal for those not wanting to spend a whole lot.  There are also mods you can buy and install in the pedal or buy preinstalled from certain dealers that open it up to even more shaping and make it more useful.I've seen a lot of complaints about the pedal sounding like nothing but fuzz.  I must say learn how to shape sound, spend time dialing it in to your rig.  Within 10 minutes I was pleased with the MT-2.  I used it on my overdrive channel to push it harder and got a really thick, heavy distortion with a good response.I say the MT-2 is worth an investment if you're looking for a big distortion sound from a little pedal.  Surely something guitarists should consider adding to their board., "musical_instruments"
This is a great pedal I picked up used, they can be had cheaply on the used market. I actually use it with both an acoustic electric guitar to get a little distortion and the bass guitar for some grit. The 2 EQ pots on the front panel make it very versatile, enough to use with a cigar box guitar also.The pedal can preserve bass signal and still be EQ'd for saturated distortion. The other reviews speak for this pedal both here and on other sites and one can see why it is so popular. I also other Boss Distortion pedals. Like most people, I own a DS-1 and an MD-2 which are both cheap and effective. I own a HM-2 Heavy Metal 2 which caters more to the traditional metal sound and I actually think this pedal is more versatile IMO with different guitars where you may not want a strictly metal tone.I also own an older 80's HM-2 Heavy Metal which will run circles around the metal zone for classic thrash and speed metal tones and almost any other heavy distortion pedal that I could never part wi, "musical_instruments"
Bought it as a gift. Friend loved it very much., "musical_instruments"
I love BOSS pedals. I owned a DS-1 (Distortion) and a MT-2 (Metal Zone) for years, and loved them both. This one, is a good \"meet in the middle\" of those two. It's great if you want some really good bluesy distortion, or you can crank the color and get some thick distortion.As always, this pedal is very well constructed and sturdy. I love it., "musical_instruments"
This pedal was the mainstay of my effects for a few years.  It really does have a ton of range, although it only does one effect at a time, so you'd have to reach down and change the knobs mid-show in order to get the other variations.  My most commonly used setting was with the overdrive-distortion mix knob at about 2 o'clock, which produces a very professional sounding Grunge-type effect.  If you want any of those 90's sounds, excluding the heavier metal sounds, this pedal will definitely get you there., "musical_instruments"
very simple, very user-friendly,and the feature that is most important i think, versatile. the OS/DS and drive knobs allow you to chose between a very different bunch of tones. and also, for the money, a great deal. 100% recommended., "musical_instruments"
I first used this pedal when my green screemer died. A friend had and os-2 on hand and let me use it. I had used Boss's metal zone before and it produced too nasal of a tone for my liking. So I plug into the OS-2 and I was pleasently impressed with the range of distortion and overdrive the OS-2 pedal produced. I play through a '59 fender bassman and the mix of those tubes with this pedal produce some very sweet tones. I have also played this pedal through a solid state amp and I am still impressed. I have spent years searching for a pedal that could produce a nice tight churnch with a warm and low bottom end, my search ended with this pedal. I highly recomend this pedal to any rock, blues, metal, country, or punk guitar player., "musical_instruments"
It's a good OD, but I thought it would be higher output, and more articulate. Just personal preference. I mean, the Pedal is a Classic for a reason., "musical_instruments"
This thing freaking rocks! I LOVE this pedal. I can't stop using it. Sometimes I just play long, drawn out chords so I can listen to this amazing tone [in combo with distortion on my amp - it's perfect metal!!], "musical_instruments"
excellentI like I am very happyI am looking for money for the following purchase for amazonthe pedal boss arrives in the time necessary thank you, "musical_instruments"
For the money, I have no complaints.  The enclosure, dials, and footswitch are all durable.  Not true bypass, but none of the BOSS pedals are.  It doesn't suck tone.  This pedal isn't the end-all be-all overdrive, but with asymmetrical clipping it fills a niche that TS pedals don't. You lose a little low end when it is engaged, but that actually works pretty well for leads- especially with humbuckers or amps with a looser kind of 'classic' distortion encountered with EL84s.  As a stand alone overdrive, I prefer other pedals.  But where this pedal really works for me is as a boost to other dirtboxes or an already overdriven amp.  You get singing, harmonic leads when it is dialed in right.  Like any overdrive, you introduce noise when the pedal is engaged and things can get hissy while you are palm muting if you crank it too far.  I am a dirtbox hoarder and I like to rotate the pedals and try different combinations.  Lately, I am running this into either the V1 Cool Cat transparent overdrive (Timmy Clone - very, very nice) or the Behringer BO-100 (which is a dead ringer for the Boss Blues Driver) then into a tube amp that is dialed in on mild crunch (Jet City Combo or Palomino Combo).  As with any overdrive, this thing will not sound very good (IMHO) running into a solid state amp.  That's just not what it was intended to do. It was intended to drive preamp tubes into saturation but YMMV. Because I'm a cheapskate (and because these things are durable like bricks) I bought it used for $20, but it is well worth the new asking price., "musical_instruments"
It's yellow, its metal, its Boss.  If you want your drive sound to have definition this is the pedal to get.  The best OD I have ever owned.  Makes me want to see if my tone could cut board in half., "musical_instruments"
I picked this up in order to boost my gain on my amp a bit.  It does a wonderful job of that (Drive set low and the level set high.  Tone set to taste.)  The additional noise it produces is relatively low, so you won't have any excessive staticy buzzing sound to deal with.  As with any other Boss pedals, it's well made and reliable., "musical_instruments"
Bought one of these 15 yrs ago used and it died a couple years back. This is one of my favorite overdrive pedals ever. Smooth tone, the right amount of gain, perfect to push a tube amp. Plus there are now dozens of (DIY or pro) mods available which add a lot more potential. Recommended., "musical_instruments"
I bought this pedal used and have used it with both a Fender tube amp and a Marshall solid state using clean channels. I can get a variety of tones from it with different guitars, and reccomend it as a first overdrive or to add to a collection.While I have several overdrive pedals, this one is good at giving some basic overdrive tones while keeping the amps low end. I can get decent tones from a Telecaster and Les Psul by keeping the level and tone knobs below 12 o'clock and adjusting the drive to taste.The OD sounds great through Fender clean tubes and I also tried it with a bass guitar. With some adjustment of the tone and drive knob, the bass has an overdriven tone with a good drive.The other reviews here prove this pedal is typical and iconic Boss in build quality. I find the Boss pedals good for their purpose and have mostly modded the ones I've owned after some time, but I may keep this one as is and use it as a boost. These pedals last forever and I only paid $20 for mine., "musical_instruments"
This is a standard on my peral board along witht he Blues Driver.  This little yellow box is the most bang for your buck you are going to find in an Over Drive pedal.  It is tough, sounds like fire, and will serve you well.  For $50 there is seriously no better deal., "musical_instruments"
I use this pedal all the time now even more than the DS-1 . Great chrunch for the buck From classic blues to rock its very eash to dial the sound you want in., "musical_instruments"
I held out from trying the Boss SD-1 Super Overdrive for many years.  Like many guitarists, my first distortion pedal was a Boss DS-1, which was durable and aggressive, but also extremely frustrating.  I might have formed some negative impressions about Boss, when it was probably unfair to do so.The SD-1 is widely owned and very affordable (usually around $50).  It's similar in a lot of ways to the Ibanez TS-9 Tubescreamer, except that a Tubescreamer reissue costs twice as much.  A lot of guitarists consider the SD-1 to be more of a \"rock\" overdrive, while the TS-9 is more of a \"tube/blues\" effect.  There's probably some truth to that, but both of them are excellent pedals.However, the SD-1 really impressed me with its transparency and versatility.  You CAN simply plug into it and use it alone with a clean channel.  But that isn't necessarily the best use for the pedal - it excels as a \"booster\" pushing an already overdrive amp, or stacking with other distortion/OD pedals.  One of the best settings is turning the Level all the way up and the gain all the way down.  This adds just a little bit of grit to your tone, and really sounds great.A feel that lot of people give the SD-1 mediocre reviews for reasons that aren't fair.  You hear things like \"it cuts out too much bass\", when that's really what the pedal is supposed to do.  The midrange hump, when set up properly, can take away the muddiness of your tone and help you cut through a band during live playing.  And, like I said before, I feel as if it's MORE transparent in retaining elements of the clean tone than the TS-9, though preference between the two is entirely subjective.But you also know that it's a Boss pedal, which means it's as durable as they come.  The thing will stand up to years of abuse, and can be used in any number of roles.  If you're looking for a single pedal to make a small amp sound \"big\", there are probably better options in this range.  (Try the under-appreciated MD-2 Mega Distortion, or the excellent Joyo Ultimate Drive).  But if you understand what this pedal is supposed to do and use it for that purpose, you'll understand why this thing has been popular for over 30 years., "musical_instruments"
Great as a booster, as others have said. For solos, it'll boost your mids and your signal. As an overdrive, it's great, kind of a midsy, Marshally sound. It does suck out some of the low end, but you can fix that on your amp or board or whatever. It's a Boss, it's solid - and a great price. Remember, this is overdrive - not distortion. For distortion, look at other Boss pedals., "musical_instruments"
I have several overdrive pedals, some of which are much more expensive than the BOSS SD-1. For a long time I overlooked my SD-1 and used other pedals. But when I went back to trying the SD-1, I was pleasantly surprised to find that this relatively inexpensive pedal is superior to some of the pedals I had been using. I don't mean merely that it's \"very good relative to its price\"; I mean that it's \"very good--period.\" It easily outclasses some pedals for which I paid much more. The price for this pedal sometimes goes down to about $45 on Amazon. At that price, it's an amazingly good deal. Note: This is definitely an overdive pedal; it will not deliver metal distortion (at least not by itself). If you want to ride the crazy train, look elsewhere (like Deltalab's Metal Distortion pedal). What this produces is smooth old-style overdrive. It's excellent. It sounds especially good through a dash of chorus. I plug my SD-1 into a Fender Mustang II amp and turn on the amp's chorus; the result is delicious. I've used the SD-1 with both single-coil and double-coil pickups. Both sound good, though, not surprisingly, you get a heavier punch with a humbucker. But it sounds great with single-coils too., "musical_instruments"
Forget all the volume drop comments.  There isn't any and it does not color your tone one bit.  I have tried a couple miniature novelty pedals. They were more like a boost volume and tone pedal with tremolo thrown in.  I wanted something to dress up slow ballads, and of course \"Born On The Bayou\".  This pedal goes from nice subtle background effect to deep depth if you want it.  And no variance in your guitar tone or volume when you click it on. I play a lot of acoustic solo and this really is a nice addition to change up my sound here and there and not over do it., "musical_instruments"
Sure there are fancier Tremolo pedals out there, but I've always been a fan of the Boss TR-2. It's got a more mellow and vintage Fender Tremolo output, and suits my playing to a T. Pair this beauty up with an Electro-Harmonix Cathedral Reverb pedal, and get lost for days. Definitely worth the reasonable cost!, "musical_instruments"
This tremelo pedal works nicely and it's great when you're playing through an amp without tremelo. Problem solved! The price was also very good., "musical_instruments"
This is a great Tremolo pedal.It is very quiet and when used correctly, there is absolutely no signal drop or volume drop whatsoever.You can blend the Tremolo type from a smooth sinuous pulsing waveform to a sharper edged \"on/off\" type tremolo.Tremolo varies the volume of the sound. It does not vary the pitch.You have control over the \"depth\" or \"amount\" of effect, and you can control how fast the effect pulsates the sound.A very simple, popular effect that I wouldn't want to live without in some form or another.Pretty teal green color.As with all Boss products they are built like a tank and generally last forever if they are not abused or damaged.I have no idea how fast this pedal eats batteries because I use a power supply.There is no on/off clicking when depressed.There is no added hiss, hum or distortion.The battery compartment is easily accessed without having to unplug anything.Simply a great effect and quality product from Boss and tends to hold its resale value well., "musical_instruments"
I've played this pedal for a while now and really dig it. I'm old school, Fender Blues Deluxe reissue and Strats and Teles, this pedal has a great, warm, organic feeling tremolo that I use a lot. You can barely bring it in for some warmth, or really crank the speed and depth for a great sort of rotary speaker effect.I'll use it with the rate set at tempo for a song and record clean guitar chords up on the middle of the neck. This effect will give you a nice almost Hammond B-3 type of organ sound., "musical_instruments"
This is a superb tremolo pedal: [1] Its dials allow for enormous control of the effect. [2] It's very sturdy--an often-noted feature of BOSS pedals. Further, [3] it's utterly easy to use, [4] allows for both 9v battery and power supply/adapter operation, and, most important of all, [5] it delivers beautiful tremolo. (Note: It comes with a 9v battery installed, but it does NOT come with a power source/adapter.) If the price is more than you're willing to pay, consider the DANELECTRO COOL CAT TREMOLO. This also delivers good tremolo, but it does not allow for as much sound-manipulation as the BOSS product; it's still quite good, but the BOSS takes the prize. I paid about $75 for mine and have zero regrets., "musical_instruments"
I own three units capable of tremolo: Boss TR-2, Line 6 MM4, and the Boss SL-20 Slicer (like a tremolo on steroids). Plus my amp is a Twin Reverb so it too has tremolo. If you are unfamiliar, tremolo modulates the volume as if turning it up and down rapidly.The Boss TR-2 is the simplest of the three stompboxes to operate, with three controls: \"Rate\" of modulation, \"Depth\" of modulation (how much does the volume vary), and a \"Wave\" shape (jagged, square, or somewhere on a continuum in between). Unlike the other Boss stompboxes I own (CE-5 & PH-3), the TR-2 does not seem to compress sound so that it seems like you're \"playing in a fishbowl\" (as another reviewer puts it).The \"Wave\" control is what gives the unit its sonic versatility, so it is a nice feature to have. Most tremolos have it, but not all. For the price, it can give you a decent set of classic tremolo sounds with nothing too crazy. It is the unit that Tom Morello uses on \"Guerilla Radio,\" and it does well with tremolo classics like the Smiths \"How Soon Is Now?\" I hear no volume drop problem like other reviews suggest, and this is something I am sensitive to because I generally turn modulations on/off over the course of a song rather than leave them on full time.Like all Boss stuff, the box is sturdy and I like their big, quiet footswitches over any of the little, clicky ones on other units. The color is a sort of a dull military dark green, not the most attractive thing but not bad either.The small Boss effects do not come with a power cable, so you will have to factor that into the cost. Boss instructions tell you that you need their particular adapter, but I don't know anyone who says this is a must. I run it off a pedalboard power supply and it seems to work fine. If it didn't I would not buy Boss product period.Bottom Line:(1) Gives a decent array of basic tremolo sounds, nothing crazy(2) Not a bad price (factor in a power cable)(3) Simple to operate(4) Nice casing and footswitch; drab color, "musical_instruments"
Wanted a way to plug in my BOSS ME70 to save on batteries. Didn't want to drop the money on a BOSS PSA, so I got this one instead which does the same job, just for less money., "musical_instruments"
Bought it for using Danelectro mini amp, so I don't need to worry about the battery.  It works perfectly as an adaptor should be, & you won't have any surprise by its performance. :)  two stars out because of comparing the price with the mini amp (less than $20), the adaptor is pricy ($8.50), but it still saves me $$ for the long runs., "musical_instruments"
I got this to power my Danelectro Honeytone amp since it eats batteries like candy.  It's a power adaptor, so it isn't too exciting, but it works fine., "musical_instruments"
I use this mostly with my Honeytone mini amplifier and Reel Echo tape echo simulator. Works very well with no problems. A lot of Danoelectro pedals may eat up batteries and this is a great alternative when you have access to Ac voltage outlets., "musical_instruments"
I was having some problems with my Ego Compressor comp getting noisey, sent it back and found out that It Had been using a slightly drained battery, so I got one of these and it is great, nice and quiet again, half the price of the boss one., "musical_instruments"
This is the best little guitar pedal adapter I've used, and I've used many over the last three decades. It's exceptionally quiet, which many are not, and it puts out 9.6 volts, which will drive your pedals a little more solidly than all but a brand new alkaline battery. And you won't have to buy a new one every dozen hours!I've used this on a splitter to drive three pedals, but at four and up I can hear the current drop a bit. Still, that's a good thing because it reminds me that tone comes from my fingers, not a box on the floor. But it sure is nice to have some Gilmouresque delay, and a little extra gain driving the tubes, and this is the best 9v adapter for pedals available that I know of, including the Boss ones. Dan has released some cool, well-made pedals in the past 15 years, and this little wall wart is a worthy companion.A very good deal at 15 clams., "musical_instruments"
As stated in the title, this adapter is what you need if you use your Danelectro a lot and are going through too many batteries. You can now plug it into the wall! As advertised, it keeps electric current hum to a minimum and has functioned fine for the year or so I've owned it. The reason I took off one star is because the wire is really thin and doesn't seem too durable, so because of this I have been very careful so it doesn't get broken. You might be able to find an off-brand adapter for cheaper but this one is made for the Honeytone so you won't risk ruining it., "musical_instruments"
...is a must if you have any of the Danelectro/FAB pedals.  As anyone who has one of these pedals knows they eat 9-volts like candy, this is the solution.  You get one of these and hook it up to a power splitter (Search for Visual Sound One Spot Multi-Plug 5 Cable) and you are good to go for up to 5 pedals!  No more battery swaps, no more searching for a 9-volt every 5 minutes..., "musical_instruments"
What can I say lower priced than most and very low distortion I could Not hear the hum but for multi pedals to save on cost I use a godlyke power supply but this Is a good power pack., "musical_instruments"
Got this to use with the Behringer compressor I ordered with this. They are not indicated as compatible but it worked great! Price was right. I already own two and had no problems. Quiet. No hummmmm. Buy it if you need a wall wart., "musical_instruments"
My first wah was a Morley Steve Vai Bad Horsie. I loved it. It's a switchless pedal that I put through hell. I had it for 3 months before I had to send it back cause it broke. It's still an ok pedal but I wanted the ability to leave the pedal \"open\" to achieve a certain warm sound. That's when I went looking at the cry baby.At the local retailer they had several different kinds of cry babies set up. I put this one against the Hendrix, Classic, and 95-Q cry baby pedals and this basic one sounded by far the best. The only one that sounded better was the 535Q but at over $200 it was out of my price range. I paid $97+tax for my GCB-95 cry baby and it was worth every penny. I don't even touch my Morley anymore. It's cry baby all the way, "musical_instruments"
I've been using a Crybaby for going on 30 years now.  Some guitarists claim that having them in your signal chain affects your tone in a negative way.  Well, I've never noticed.To me these always feel perfect.  Also, you can adjust which part of the sweep you're using very easily - ie if you want more treble or bass you just the little \"comb\" that moves the wheel on the pot.I've tried other wahs.  Morley doesn't do it for me, and the Vox is very good, I just have always gone with what I knew.  No complaints with the Crybaby., "musical_instruments"
I got this pedal cause is not so expensive, and I love music. I used to play in big concerts but no more but I can tell you that for the price is good who ever wants to have some fun and learn how to use a pedal., "musical_instruments"
Well, just got one of this and been messin with it for a couple of hours...Now that's a Fun king wah wah!!It's big, it's hard and it's heavy but when you turn it on you understand why this is the original. It sounds exactly like how i always imagined, like in all those records...This one gets the big 5 for being everything i wanted it to be!, "musical_instruments"
MY experience with crybaby is it has a great tone.  More overbearing than the Vox or cleaner wahs.  BUT I know several people who have had problems with the switch, and I have watched countless others stomping on their crybaby in futile attempts to engage or disengage the pedal.I actually use a BBE and Vox since this frustration with my 1st wah.  But I am not sure that I am giving up tone in exchange for the headache avoidance!  I kinda think I am.  The VOX and BBE seem to have a brighter sound which is less \"wah-ed\" if you will.  It could be accentuated by me playing a Strat instead of the Les Paul Custom/Boogie combination I used with the crybaby., "musical_instruments"
Great pedal, but if you pull it open and put in a couple of cheap mods, this thing is absolutley rediculous!  It's a boutique pedal with only a little time and solder., "musical_instruments"
In my opinion this is one of the finest pedals to exist. The crybaby is still on my pedalboard and will be for as long as I can foresee., "musical_instruments"
WaWa pedals come and go, and get modded and re-thunk....But I always wanted an original Cry Baby... So this was a birthday gift to myself.Not disappointed.Down the road I MAY add some of the gazillions of electronic mods available now to personalize the sound, but for the time being I'm gonna enjoy this pedal \"As-Shipped\".Very Good Buy, Great packaging, earlier-than-expected delivery - Thanks Amazon !, "musical_instruments"
My Cry Baby is about 20 years old and is the oldest pedal on my board. I have rewired it for true bypass and replaced the Potentiometer to give the Wah a broader range but it really doesn't sound any better. This pedal covers the &#34;White Room&#34; by Cream Tone perfectly. I gave it 4 stars because it hasn't been maintenance free. The pot came loose and the switch had to be replaced but considering the fact that it survived several hundred gigs in smoky dives, I probably should give it 5., "musical_instruments"
Sounds like my original.  Enough said.  Great pedal and it is still built like a tank.  I do appreciate that on this version, one can use a pretty standard AC adapter. A+., "musical_instruments"
The problem with this pedal is that you have to step all the way down on it to turn it on, which produces a sound.  The Morley pedals have a separate on/off switch, so you can turn them on or off at a given position.  The difference is the sound is just a bit more professional if the wah isn't always turning on or off at the top of the wah frequency.  Suppose you wanted to set the wah in the middle, and just leave it there.  You can't really do that with this pedal.  It is a bit smaller than a morley wah, but in my experience, the sound is equivalent on the base models., "musical_instruments"
this is my first petal of  any kind.  I had read that the Wah shoud be your first so I went with that.  glad I did.  this Wah petal is so much fun.  you can make as many cool sounds as your imagination will allow.  It is hours and hours of fun.  the sounds are great.  I have had no problem with performance.  it works as it should.  I highly recommend this petal.  it's price is attractive as well., "musical_instruments"
I love this wah. It's just perfect. I really can't find any negative about it. It's just a perfect standard wah. You won't regret this purchase at all. Just put a good analog fuzz after it & you're good to go., "musical_instruments"
I've got a MXR MC404 CAE for my concert line pedals... but this one is the one I use for local gigs and home use with Fender Telecaster and Hot Rod., "musical_instruments"
Finally broke down and got a new one after my original crybaby bought in 1976 finally died. A great pedal, well made!, "musical_instruments"
If you want your guitar to sound like Eddie Van Halen, Joe Satriani and other guitarists studio album guitar sound, then get a BOSS GT-10 (guitar multi effects processor) and install BOSS GT-10 Patches by James Limborg. Search Google for BOSS GT-10 Patches by James Limborg., "musical_instruments"
It is a good pedal, but it just doesn't have the sound I was looking for. It is great for playing funk music, but for us metal heads, the wah is just too weak. For metal artists, I would recommend looking elsewhere. I am going to look into getting an Ibanez Weeping Demon, or a Morley, or whatever it is Behringer is limping to the barn with these days., "musical_instruments"
\"Oh its a crybaby\", \"I have a crybaby wah\", \"You suck because you don't own a crybaby\"...I'm tired of hearing these statements from guitarists that are so fresh they couldn't even tell you how many strings their instrument has!  This wah pedal just doesn't cut it.  Maybe at one time, but not today, it hasn't been up to par in a LONG time.  As a young player I insisted on having a wah pedal.  My mom bought me this one.  I thought it was awesome until I learned better.  It took me about a week to learn how to turn it on and when I finally did I thought I broke it!The eq on this pedal isn't good, there is no smooth transition from heel to toe.  There is a big drop in the freq. that kills the effect.  You have to pump your foot really fast to avoid having that drop.  You have to pretty much push it toe foward and then literally stomp on it to turn it on and then follow the same steps to turn it off.  Very inconvenient for someone who is trying to rapidly move between effects on a board.  I can't say its just a complete piece of junk, it does give you a wah effect, it is a classic pedal but THERE IS BETTER out now so why are we still stuck in the stone age with this thing?  I even had someone mod mine and while it gave it a little more headroom and fixed the dropping issue, I still had to slam on it to turn it on/off and it still sounded like a cheap wah.My suggestion?  The Mark Tremonti wah is great!  Kicks this things end when it comes to range and simplicity to use!  It may cost more, but you will probably end up hating the crybaby and getting one anyway, so just go with the Tremonti Power Wah to begin with.  What I use for wah is the Digitech RP250 processor.  You may say that this is a cheap processor, and it is, but I've been using it for years and I haven't seen anyone that can tell the price of it based on the sound quality and thats what matters.  Why I suggest it for wah is you can control the sensitivity, how hard you have to press your toe down to turn it on (I have mine set fairly light) and you can totally shape your tone right there on the board very easily.  You even have presets (crybaby being one of them)  You can get an entire processor full of effects AND an awesome wah for a little bit more.If you want a cheap child's gimic-type toy, this is for you.  Want to get serious about a wah?  Spit on every crybaby you see and go elsewhere., "musical_instruments"
I've had my wah pedal for a number of years now. What I can say is that it has put up with a lot of use, no problem with the pedal itself, mechanically. However, the cheap rubber feet were the first victims of perhaps taking a few cheaper short cuts on producing the product. That is to say, the rubber feet began to come off in no time. If you mount it on a pedal board, you will probably remove those feet and this won't be a problem. Also, the power supply that comes with it does a stellar job of powering the pedal. If you are like me though and place it in a pedal board where a unified power source makes sense and must use a different power cable, at least on my unit, the jack is not fitting properly leading to some serious shorts. Those shorts can make a crowd deaf in no time flat. What I have learned is that when using a different power supply to be sure the power jack is push ALL THE WAY in, otherwaise, ZAP. Other than those two issues, the power issue really no fault of Dunlop's if you use the supplied power cable, its been a great pedal. A classic that will surely live on., "musical_instruments"
the orig, still the best! do you like guitar music? chances are good you know the sound this pedal makes. it is the one. my only stand alone outside a multi effects unit, "musical_instruments"
The Cry Baby has proven itself since the 60's. It is a very well made pedal that is a must have, if you play any classic rock. It takes a bit of practice to master, but when you have mastered it; you can take your music to a different level., "musical_instruments"
It sounds good but it adds soooo much noise to my pedal board. If that's not a problem, definitely worth the price., "musical_instruments"
Some things just don't need to change. Some Wah pedals try to tempt you with built in fuzz, eq, or other wacky add-ons but WHY? I'd rather have one pedal that does its job perfectly than a pedal that does a bunch of stuff but sounds less than great. The Crybaby is a great effect to have for any style; everyone from Jack White to Jimmy Hendrix have used some incarnation of this pedal. It's a must have and that's really all there is to say., "musical_instruments"
I acknowledge that this is a minority opinion - perhaps I just had bad luck with my unit and the attempts to repair it afterwards.  But while I loved the sound and functionality of this wah-wah pedal, it would literally last me a few months at a time before it became unusable.  I suspected that the potentiameter was shot, so I had that replaced, but the same problems reoccurred.  Like a horrible static noise as soon as started using it.Good product, but hopefully they make them more durable than the particular unit I had., "musical_instruments"
I keep a capo in each instrument nothing wore than showing up without one. I am using this on my Martin 12-string. The spring holds tight but can easily be adjusted with one hand., "musical_instruments"
Best 12-string capo I have ever used--and that's over decades.  Works easily and flawlessly.  Very well made.  Five Stars, "musical_instruments"
This is my 6th Kyser capo.  This one for my new Ovation 12 String CC245 is what I needed.  I always recommend all Kyser Capos.They last forever and do not lose the strong holds., "musical_instruments"
does what is designed to do easy to use seems sturdy should serve me well for years to come ...was not too expensive for such good quality, "musical_instruments"
If you play 12 acoustic you gotta get this one.  Just a hair longer on the padded area which is what  you need.  You can tell them from the 6 string version by the ridges being much closer together on this one., "musical_instruments"
This capo does exactly what it should.  It clamps the strings tight to there is no buzz and it does not change the tune of the guitar when used.  I have 4 Kyser capos, one for each of my guitars and will never buy another brand., "musical_instruments"
This is for theKyser Banjo/Mandolin CapoThis is one of three capos I use for a ukulele.  It works, and is my second favorite.  I can park it on the headstock of my ukulele, and it is easy to add, move, remove. With the trigger-type release, it makes it one of the easiest quick-change capos I've used. It feels sturdy enough (lightweight aluminum).  I like how the trigger portion sticks upwards, and does not get in the way like myDunlop Trigger Banjo Capo, Black.  My favorite is still the G7th capo.  This is a close second to the G7th.My only nitpicky complaint is how it is not eligible for Amazon Prime.  UPDATE:  I just saw that this capo is eligible for Amazon Prime.  Free shipping for Prime members!!!For the price and quality, this Kyser capo works on a uke. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
works great, stays out of the way... cant ask for much more than that. (and expect to get it) the price was half of what i was locally., "musical_instruments"
I've only been playing ukulele for about 3 years, so I'm new to using a capo.  It seems to hold tight., "musical_instruments"
It says for a Banjo or a Mandolin but ukulele is the first instrument listed on the box. It is just the right size to clamp over four strings and taking it on/off is really easy., "musical_instruments"
Costs about 2x as much as some cheap capos, and it's worth every single penny.  THis has a strong clip, yet does not damage my concert or tenor ukulele necks.  It won;t budge once you clip it, and it's low profile.  Made of metal, it should last a lifetime.I took off one star only for one thing: the hand clip portion of this does sometimes get in the way of fretting because it sticks out from the neck quite a ways.  Some other capos, like this oneJim Dunlop 7828 Russell Banjo/Uke Capodoes not have anything that you can hit your hand on when fretting.  Sometimes I try the Kyser on the opposite side, away from me, the player.  But, it seems to still hit my hand on some chords, just different ones.  That said, I can work around it, and it's a lifelong capo of fantastic build and keeps those strings from buzzing at all on all my ukes. If one was to have large hands, as I do not, this interference may be even more of an issue to consider.C ya.  Happy strumming.  Mahalo., "musical_instruments"
A very strong capo..too strong for bigger instruments, but works good on ukes and mandolins and banjos with not too thick of a neck.  I have several of these capos, one for each instrument., "musical_instruments"
Bought this for my husbands Mandolin and he loves it, it works great, we swear by Kyser that's all we use on our guitars is Kyser capos, great product, no complaints and the price is worth it., "musical_instruments"
Works great with my Baritone Ukulele.  Same quality as my full size acoustic guitar capo.  Easily fits in my ukulele case, too., "musical_instruments"
It's a very cute little capo. It works great on my ukulele and mandolin but of course it's hard to use because when you get into the higher frets the frets are VERY small. But it works., "musical_instruments"
Although this capo is marked as correct for a mandolin, it only works correctly above the 3rd or 4th fret on my mandolin. Any lower on the fretboard than that and this capo doesn't have enough pressure to work on the 1st or 2nd fret position on my mandolin, even though my mandolin has a fairly low action.I have a number of Kyser capos and very much like the style (I own at least six Kyser guitar capos and use them on all of my guitars from a Taylor 12-String to a Fender American Strat without any problems), but in this case the banjo capo didn't work for what I need. Perhaps the capo sent to me was defective, although I have enough decades of experience with stringed instruments to know that it didn't seem broken, just not up to the task.From feedback others have sent to me it is possible this capo may work for you if you wish to take a chance on it, but I know that I don't have time while on stage to take 20 seconds to set a fussy capo 'just right' to make sure it is holding just right and then hope it doesn't start to buzz on me in the middle of a song. I went with another brand after talking to some bluegrass guys who had better luck with another style of mandolin capo., "musical_instruments"
I use this capo all the time on both instruments. A friend of mine saw it and asked me to order them one also. I did and they love it!, "musical_instruments"
I have several types of capos, this one seems well built.  A little bulky for 5 string banjo especially if you are fingering near it.  I really don't need to change that fast so use it very little, might use more in a performance setting but that is a ways off., "musical_instruments"
It's a good banjo capo.  Inexpensive  and it works well without squeezing the strings out of tune. End of story, "musical_instruments"
You can never go wrong buying a Kyser capo.  They are made to last and really do what they are designed to do.  The great thing about this capo is that it fits both my banjo and mandolin so I don't have to have a seperate capo for each.I also have a capo for guitar made by Kyser and I can tell you that works just as well.  You can never go wrong with a Kyser.  Not only that I like the idea that it's an US company.  I've had some cheaper capos and they just don't do the job.  They either don't press down on the strings hard enough or they wear out too quickly if they get used much.  This Kyser will last a long, long time., "musical_instruments"
I've been using one of these Kyser's for a good while now. I only have one so it usually stays with the mandolin but works just as well for my banjo. If you never used one, it's makes it MUCH easier to change keys although I usually only use it when I'm playing chords, when I solo I like to play with open strings and this makes it a breeze to pop off and put back on. With a little practice you'll be able to do it quickly without having the strings buzz., "musical_instruments"
This is such a nice bag for the price.  Nicely padded with an ample zip compartment that can hold your snark, capo, or whatever.  There is a handle and a shoulder strap.  Plus, it is reallly a nice looking bag, black with a little white trim in front., "musical_instruments"
These are the best strap locks in my opinion, good quality, easy to install and remove, secure, and they look good.  All my guitars have these locks on them and I'm very satisfied., "musical_instruments"
In particular, I favor the Dual Design. Why? If the need arises, it's possible to use a regular strap that doesn't have the button locks installed. I have two of the black ones on a 7 string Ibanez RG7321, and Laguna LE200QBC guitars. I have spare straps for both guitars, and sometimes I lock those spares with the plastic Dunlop discs.I have some older bass guitars with similar Dunlop locks (the standard version), two of which had locks installed in the mid 1990's, and one from 2003 with the gold DD. All three of them have held up with no issues. I didn't need to re-tighten the screws on those guitars until about two years ago. Then again, I don't tour around the world like the metal stalwarts known as ... MetallicA. ;), "musical_instruments"
So I bought these because being Dunlop, I trust the brand. I dont even mind that they are sorta big and bulky. The only problem I have is, they scare the piss out of me. Its not a \"tighten washer and nut\" situation with what ive normally seen on strap locks. These have pegs that insert. Its so hard for me to trust these, I always have 1 hand gripped firmly on guitar even if just adjusting the amp I clench my guitar. So scared that the little metal balls things will just slip, peg fall out and ruin a $500 guitar. I havnet had a single problem with this system yet, and I never hope that I do. But if it happens there will be an update to this. Good product so far, just wouldn't recommend it. There is too much crap in the world to be worried about, strap locks shouldnt be one of those things., "musical_instruments"
The screws are too long for my very thin bodied Gibson SG Classic.  I can not find shorter screws which fall into the pin so that the straplock will work either---the heads are all too large.I believe I used these on my Gibson Les Paul Custom years ago, and they worked perfectly.  Not on my newer SG though--at least with the new screws it comes with.Fender Start appears to take the system well--only time will tell., "musical_instruments"
yes, if your willing to swap out strap locks with originals these work fine...i did have a problem with drilling new holes into my guitars...but its explained what  size bit to use so wasnt a big problem...i tried not to drill on most of my guitars  some fit without drilling some did not..good luck...good price welll made.., "musical_instruments"
best strap locks ive ever used, dunlop has always had great products.easy to install and i highly recomend them to any bass player, "musical_instruments"
Almost dropped my bass on the floor a couple days before i got these bad boys. When I put them on I felt confident that I wouldn't have that issue anymore. It's easier to strap up because of the quick release tab. This should be every bassist/guitarist's best friend., "musical_instruments"
I tried this model a few years ago, and I never had a problem with them (once I got it installed), but I went back to the Schallers I had on my other instruments.  I thought (and this has been mentioned by others) that it makes the strap stick too far out from the instrument, which I thought looked goofy.  I also didn't particularly care for the push button release, and getting the locking part on the end of my thick strap was a challenge; these have a C clamp, not a nut, so there's no allowance for differing thickness. I also felt safer with the Schallers, which hook onto the end of the guitar strap button and didn't depend on a spring loaded button to keep the parts together.  As I said, I had no real problems with them, so if they look like they'd work for you, great.  As with all replacement strap locks/buttons, you have to make sure the screws are secure in the button holes before you start jumping off of drum risers, dropped out of airplane, or what have you., "musical_instruments"
I had to actually follow the instructions and drill holes as specified, then it worked like a charm!  Glad I got them, much less hassle tuning up for a gig., "musical_instruments"
These strap locks were easy to install and use right off the bat. You may have to drill deeper holes into your guitar in order to use them. Just follow the instructions and you can easily attach and detach your strap whenever you feel like it., "musical_instruments"
I've tried a few different straplock options and these are the best. Not only do they securely hold the strap to the guitar they also look pretty good. Highly recommend., "musical_instruments"
Great product, I've use them before and have always thought they were top quality.  They aren't much larger than the originals that came with the guitar and that extra piece of mind is great!  Easy installation without any modification (at least on mine) and they connect/hold very solid.  Just make sure the buttons are all the way in or you could have mishap ;), "musical_instruments"
they work well. For me, the instalition wasn't that hard, it took me maybe four or five minutes. The screws provided were a bit bigger than my BC Rich Avenge Beast's stock strap system, BUT when you read the directions and lube the screws up with a small amount of bar soap (or wax- i used the bar soap though) the installation becomes easier.Once you put your strap in, its NOT comming out unless you try hard to undo the system, lol.If you need to clean your guitar strap, take off the locking pin and use a flat head screw drive to pop off the retainer clip. Its a quick and harmless way to do it and it may take about a minute or two to undo both strap locks. Its not that hard though and the reward is worth it., "musical_instruments"
No complaints about this hardware.  Easy to install with patience, easy to use.  The click on/off system securely holds your strap, and prevents the strap binding from slipping off the post.These work like a light switch...on/off, so I'm not sure how you can rate them as poor.  There aren't really any directions, so it takes a little mechanical knowledge (just a little...it's not rocket science) to make them work.Quality metal, secure function, and easily replaces posts on instruments already equipped with standard strap posts.I've installed these on a 3/4 Hoener, Full Sized Squire Acoustic, and 2 Fender Strat's., "musical_instruments"
After receiving theDunlop Dual Design Straplok Systemalready installed on my Gibson Standard electric(7.36 lbs.), and liking them, I decided to try installing them on my Gibson Studio electric (7.23 lbs.). Noproblem. Just follow the instructions exactly and they will work perfectly.I had no problem either installing them nor using them since the installation. Money well spent makingsure my stringed instrument does not accidentally fall to the ground. Besides safety I also like being ableto swap out my straps on my guitars. It's a nice convenience. If you are so inclined you can use the samestrap for all your guitars.If you are not sure if they will work on your brand guitar seek out an online forum and either search thatforum for the answer or join and ask your questions. You've got a pricy piece of wood there and will wantto take care of it properly.What I don't care for, but feel okay with because they work so well, is how big they seem to be. Theydon't get in the way when being used but look almost out of place. That is why I chose Black for mysecond set. Helps keep the product's profile down a bit. Other than that, the product works asadvertised....NOTE: As of June 2014 I have installed two other sets and all are still working as expected. Do rememberto check and make sure your hardware is secure. After repeated use the screws can come loose and therewill be trouble if this happens. Do NOT use any glue in case you need to swap out the Straploks in thefuture., "musical_instruments"
Very easy to install, rock solid, and in my opinion, look much better than Schaller locks.Grab a set, you wont be disappointed., "musical_instruments"
This product is a must.  Why?..... because it makes strap install and removal so simple and reliable,...and when the strap is clipped into place it is secure.  I've owned numerous Straplok systems on the various bass guitars I've owned, and would not ever own an instrument without installing this system., "musical_instruments"
I have two sets of these for my straps.  The push button action is most convenient vs. fighting stubborn leather openings, especially if new.  The gold finish matches my instrument's hardware and they are sturdy and durable.  Works for me!, "musical_instruments"
It's worth a few extra dollars and a little extra time to install these. It sure beats fixing a cracked neck, headstock, or guitar body after a guitar slips off the strap pins and falls for a great height!, "musical_instruments"
Oh Yeah, Love this item, sleek looking and very easy to maintain, would definitely buy again for next strap, thank you Jim Dunlop., "musical_instruments"
I have had these on a Les Paul for years and just purchased some more for the rest of my guitars.  Does what it says it will do - keeps your strap locked on.  I have had zero issues with these.  The installation takes 2 minutes, and has stood up to countless hours of play.  Highly recommended!, "musical_instruments"
these dunlop straploks are amazing! never had them fail on me, and always gave me a good piece of mind knowing that my guitar is safe from hitting the floor on stage or at home, they stay secure when done properly, I've looked at other strap locks and tried some others but the dunlop ones just seem to work, and work well., "musical_instruments"
Very high quality they look as nice as my Fender originals .  Make sure to take your time installing them correctly and consider using a quality wood glue / adhesive during installation.  You want to make sure they can be removed at a later date without damaging the guitar ., "musical_instruments"
i've had these straplocks for a few years now and they haven't failed me once! i love them, and i never have to worry about my guitars getting damaged from a strap falling off or so. they rotate in full circles, and are super durable. you should buy them for all your guitars, and you'll never have to worry again. they are also very easy to use, and &#34;install&#34;., "musical_instruments"
This is the first time I've used the Dunlop Straploks system.  I've always used the competition.  These work just as well.  I guess you just have to make sure you lube the little ball bearings once in a while., "musical_instruments"
What's great about the Dunlop design:They work!  The only thing you need to do is ensure you've got them engaged properly at the time you attach your strap onto your guitar i.e. just make sure you established a solid connection then go ahead and gig your rear-end off without worry.The design encorporates bearings that allow the strap to freely move around/rotate on the post, which is exactly what you want.  The schaller ones (see below) have a major flaw in them from my family's experience.  We will never run anything other than this design going forward.What doesn't work with the Schaller Design:Our family of 2 guitarists and 1 bassist have been using Shaller-style locks for a while now.  Every one of us has had continual problems with the locks periodically unscrewing themselves from the guitar body. I had one back out during a gig and damage a brand new 60th Anniversary American P-Bass...not good. My son had one come out on him in the middle of a gig last weekend. The problem with the design is there's a ton of friction between the top and bottom pieces of the lock which results in the tab that's screwed into the body unscrewing itself.  We've tried applying bar soap, petro jelly, and a spray can based dry lubricant.... none of which prevented the ultimate forces that cause this phenomenon.We tried to make the Shallers work but just could not.  Maybe we're all too active on stage but we cannot tolerate the equipment damage nor the performance distruptions these have caused us., "musical_instruments"
Straplocks have been around for a long time, but now You can use the instrument with a regular strap as well, This dual design sold me on it..Easy to install on the guitar. A little difficult getting the lock mechanism installed on the strap, still only took about ten minutes to do.  The added security of knowing your 1200 dollar bass isn't going to hit the floor makes it very well worth the small cost of this item.., "musical_instruments"
I have never owned a Straplock system prior to owning these Dunlops, and boy am I amazed!  Every straplock system I've used in the past, on friends' guitars, semi-permanently mounted the strap to the guitar - often with extra ties and all manner of things that made it impractical to detach the strap on a whim.  In contrast, these locks have a mechanism that make it trivially easy to pop the strap on and off - it's great!  Better still, the hardware fit almost perfectly into my existing screw holes, making installation trivial.  And the new posts are so close in size and shape to the old ones that I think I could slap any strap onto my guitar in a pinch, using the posts like the OEM ones.  This is a great system, and I would highly recommend it for anyone who uses a strap on any electric guitar., "musical_instruments"
I use these on my basses and they do the job quite well.. They are easy to install on the bass and the strap., "musical_instruments"
These came stock on my Jackson Kelly KEXMG. All the other guitars I own have Schaller buttons on them and I have one main strap I use for all of the guitars. I figured since the guitar came with them I would try them out. Not twenty min later I was removing them and putting Schaller buttons in their place. Here the 3 major reasons I did not like them over Schaller:1- Bulky. They stick out too far and on any guitar with a strap button on the back it jabs you in the stomach or below!2- Problems engaging. I would push them into the receiver and they pop back out. It wasn't until I forced them in while pushing the button that they went in a stayed in. Schallers click in and you know they are ready to go.3- Cheap. They just feel cheap. Thin metal is used in comparison to the Schallers; which have a very heavy and solid feel to them.For a few bucks more I'll stick with Schaller's. I have been using them for 10+ years and have never seen one fail., "musical_instruments"
I've been using the same Straploks on all my guitars for the past 10+ years.  I have not had one fail on me ever.  Just be sure to tug on it after you put your strap on to make sure it's on right.  I've struggled with the C clip in the past, but what are you going to do?  It's a one time thing when you first install, so it's no biggie., "musical_instruments"
I was very disappointed in both the quality and engineering of this product. A work-around for the main issue follows the review. The flaws that bother me in order of significance are:1) Quality: Very weak soft-metal screws. Using minimal force and a well aligned driver there was some damage to the screw-heads on all 4 that I worked with. 2 of them rounded out so much that I was afraid they would be hard to remove later, causing me to run to the hardware store for higher quality replacement screws.2) Engineering : The instructions recommend, and the screws (the ones that come with the straplocks) are designed for a #2 Phillips screwdriver. However, a standard #2 driver is too big to fit into the strap-buttons. So you are likely to have to choose between grinding down a screwdriver to fit, or using a #1 which will increase the impact of the first problem above since it is the wrong tool for the job.3) Engineering : The point of connection for the strap is 5/8th of an inch out from the guitar. The strap button has a radius about 3/16ths of an inch. Therefore any lateral stress (i.e. weight of the guitar) is magnified by more than 3x due to leverage pulling outward on the screw. A 9 pound guitar would be applying a constant 27 to 30 pounds of force on the screw and the wood around it (half that when the weight is distributed evenly on two strap buttons of course). Get a little too active on stage and the level of force could go way higher.Realistically, if the screws weren't total crap, this might have been a 3 or 4 star review. Once you deal with the fact that a normal screwdriver won't fit and get the things properly installed, it would probably work out for most people. So if you are stuck with a set, here's what I recommend:Go to a hardware store and buy #6 x 1\" oval-head stainless steel replacement screws. Note that these won't fit properly, but they are the closest match and can be modified. (They are 21 cents each at my local stores, and would have cost Dunlop maybe 10 cents more in bulk than what they paid for the crap screws that come with this.)Put the screw into an electric drill (pointy end in) so the screw head is rotating smoothly when you operate the drill. Run the drill while using a file or a belt sander to take a fraction of the diameter off the screw head. It doesn't need much. I used a belt sander and it took about 20 seconds each. While you are at it, file down a cheap #2 screwdriver so it will fit into the strap button.Install with the new screws as normal, and recommend that your friends try a different brand!, "musical_instruments"
The very first thing I noticed about the design is how far from the guitar's surface the strap is actually connected.  What this tells me is there is considerable added stress to the screw and the wood surrounding it because of the added leverage to the guitar's weight.  The &#34;fulcrum&#34; is the surface of the wood, if this makes sense, and I can't help but wonder if it could eventually (eventually over much time and use) cause cracks or splits as a result.I found someone selling only the Dunlop strap buttons, which is a great idea for someone with 2 main straps and several guitars, and was about to order them when I found Planet Waves Elliptical End Pins.  I think this is the best idea yet for keeping a guitar on a strap, unless you're going to be spinning the guitar around your shoulders, and no additional stress on the guitar's body.  I've ordered a set., "musical_instruments"
Sorry, I don't like these as they're just too big. They stand out too much. They do work and they're effective but they are too pronounced. There are many good alternatives; strap gaskets, strap locks, undoing the pin and putting it straight into the guitar strap.  Again, they work, but they're not aesthetic nor elegant. I also got a gold set for my bass and now it looks like I should be wearing big purple platforms when I play. Not cool., "musical_instruments"
I like these straplocks, but they were a little tight to get on a Levy's strap.  I did manage to get it on.  However, I found it was easier just to buy a strap for each guitar., "musical_instruments"
Quick snap on and off. Sturdy.  If it is not convenient, it won't be used.  In this case, it is very convenient and easy to use, hence, your prized guitar will not drop to the floor by accident.  Well worth the money spent!, "musical_instruments"
I agree with another reviewer that the included screws strip much too easy.  I purchased a set of these strap locks years ago, and I dont recall having this issue, so I'm thinking that Dunlop changed the screws at some point.  I was luckily able to get the screws in with some muscle, and the locks are secure.  However, due to this issue, I'm considering other alternatives for another guitar of mine that could use strap locks.  I hope Dunlop fixes this issue soon., "musical_instruments"
The Dunlop Dual Design Straplock System is a sturdy, fairly easy-to-assemble and easy-to-install alternative to guitar straps slipping off of instruments.  The screws that are used to attach the Straplok to the guitar are heavy gauge and pretty large--there's little chance that these are going to come out.  The locking mechanism seems like it is secure and should require little maintenance.  The only disadvantage of the Dunlop system to Schaller's system is that the the Dunlop sticks out measurably farther from the guitar's body.  Ordinarily, it seems like this should be only the most minor of inconveniences.  On an instrument such as a Hofner \"violin\" bass, though, or any guitar with a strap button on the back of the instrument, this makes it difficult to hold the body of the instrument against your body for support.  Schaller's strap locks might look a little more elegant to some players.  The Dunlop Straplok System is sturdy, should provide a long life of service, and can be found at a better price than several of its competitors.  Recommended for most guitar body styles, "musical_instruments"
Installed on two guitars and I love them! I can switch out many different guitar straps without worrying that they will fall off. Great product, would recommend to any guitar player!, "musical_instruments"
These are great.  I have these on all my guitars.  Only problem is the clip on install to the strap.  If you can't get it done google for install videos which will show you how to use a pliers to push the clip into place.  Once installed you are good for life., "musical_instruments"
I know this is a great product.  I've had a set before.  I have to knock off a star because a part was lost during shipping that renders the product useless.  The product comes in a clam shell package.  For me it shipped with some heavier stuff that impacted the package and let it open some.  There are two retaining clips that slipped out and since the main shipping box wasn't fully taped up one slipped completely out of the box and is probably on the floor of some warehouse or truck somewhere.  I found the rest of the small parts in the box and the larger parts still in the clam shell package but without the one retaining clip the system is useless.The product is too inexpensive to bother with a return.  If I find a retaining clip that will work (I do have one to compare with) then I can use it.That said, I'll say again, the Straplok System is a great product.  I know, I've owned another set for more than twenty years!, "musical_instruments"
A little story to back these lock's integrity.  I installed them on a Korean made Washburn WG-587v.  Incredible guitar after tweaking.  I did a guitar spin at a show and the guitar went flying.  The strap lock was still on the strap and locked into the holder.  The screw had ripped out of the horn of the guitar!  The screw tore through about a half inch of solid wood (and I epoxy all my screws in) before the strap lock broke.  Amazing.Nice, tough hardware.  The only complaint I have is that you must use screws with small heads if you choose not to use the stock screws provided.  Easy to install, just unscrew your stock strap holder and screw in the lock holder.  Attach the lock to your strap and BAM quick release system.  Fast to take on and off of your guitar.I would suggest getting a tough, thick leather strap with a nice reinforced eye to install the quick release button in, cheap lightweight straps will eventually start to tear.  Also, the button can be a slight pain to get on certain straps.I have now switched over to DiMarzio clip lock straps instead of the leather straps with Dunlop locks for many reasons and I am very happy, but this product is GRADE A! I always felt 100% secure with these straplocks.  Our bass player uses some expensive (and heavy) Fender basses and he loves these strap locks., "musical_instruments"
I've been using these straplocks for over 10 years now and never had a guitar or bass break free on me either live or in the studio...they simply work and cost next to nothing to boot. Folks, this is the best insurance you can buy for protecting you precious instrument from popping off of you strap, even if you do some serious gymnastics on stage it's not going anywhere. This is a must have, just buy it!, "musical_instruments"
I'm in love with the dual design system! It works extremely well and allows me to switch between straps easily and quickly. There is one downside to this system, as the strap that is used will be fairly far away from the guitar itself. Which might not be a bad thing considering wear and tear on the guitar from the strap. There was one hiccup while putting this together for the first time. One component, which was this thin but big washer was pretty hard to install and the directions weren't much help either. The directions did have it on there where it is supposed to go, but I didn't know the name of the piece nor could I readily find it in there. After that, I installed this into my new guitar and strap and, I was ready to go. I HIGHLY recommend this! It is much easily to switch out straps w/o the possibility of striping the screws or boring into the screw hole and cracking some of the wood in the process., "musical_instruments"
I've been using these Fender straplocks over the last year:Fender 099 0818 300 F Straplock ChromeThe problem with those is that they use screws to secure that part that is on the strap itself, and the screw will slowly back itself out and you get yourself a disaster. I've decided to try these because they use a \"dual\" system: you can use the lock on your strap, or just use your \"regular\" strap without the locking mechanism. I've only been using these for a week, but so far, I like them much better than Fender's. I think I will replace all Fender straplocks with these.I do agree with the others on the fact that the screws are of lower quality, and the screw heads will strip if you're not careful. When I was installing these strap nuts, I screw in a half turn at a time, and applied lots of pressure so that the the head won't strip. If you can get over the installation, you got yourself a pretty good locking strap., "musical_instruments"
I have used Dunlop Straplocks for 32 years. I bought the original style years ago for my Strat, Les Paul and Partscaster; the last two having the most weight.These things have lasted through gigging and anything else i can throw at them with no problem. I ordered strap pins only a few months ago to put on a few more recent guitars and one of the push button locks finally went out. It was on the strap I used the most for the heavier guitars so I got some mileage out of that thing. I ordered a whole set of new ones here last month and put the locks on a new strap and the buttons on another guitar.I suggest these over the other brands - watch what touring bands use. These things lay flat and there are no protruding parts to catch. If you happen to be without a strap with locks on it, these new pins can be used like regular pins but are larger so a strap will be pretty much secure.The price is good, price them anywhere else and include shipping. I always buy strings, picks or other stuff to get free shipping., "musical_instruments"
Good Quality, great price, easy to install, easy to lock and unlock, fast delivery. Better than going to the always overpriced Guitar Center., "musical_instruments"
I always purchase Grovers for my guitar straps but my 2014 Gibson Les Paul Standard Plus had a bigger strap knob so I bought this Dunlop and it fit the guitar perfectly. A good guitar is a big investment and you owe it to yourself to protect your investment with a good strap locking system., "musical_instruments"
These are good if you have a few of guitars and got a favorite strap.  Buy alot of extra buttons i got allparts.  seems really sturdy and well made., "musical_instruments"
I went a long time convincing myself that I didn't need these.  I had numerous times when my strap would come undone - fortunately never during a performance.  These solved the problem.  I still check, but they just won't pull out or release., "musical_instruments"
These guys are rock-solid and really easy to install. Any time I get a new instrument I change the stock buttons out for Dunlops!, "musical_instruments"
I have these on my Jazz Bass, my guitar player has another brand. We were playing a HUGE downtown street gig in Altanta and were throwing T shirts to the crowd. Bending down, picking them up, then throwing. My guitar player had a different lock system, and his $1000 Les Paul fell to the stage, completely knocking it out of tune. Mine stayed locked perfectly..., "musical_instruments"
they work. its great not worrying about dropping your instrument on stage. ive done it  it sucked! worth every penny!, "musical_instruments"
Have them on four guitars. Never a malfunction. Easy installation and use. Watch out for bridge interference when screwing in the back lok. Might require a slightly shorter screw on some basses., "musical_instruments"
Work very well, nice low profile, easy push button on and off but, it is true, not good for thick straps. And the Gold Tone ones discolor easy with minimal use., "musical_instruments"
These are really great guitar locks!! I use them on all my guitars, and I would highly recommend them to anyone!!, "musical_instruments"
These work just like you want them to.  But a new strap and put these on right away.  It's worth it., "musical_instruments"
i have purchased 5 of these strap locks. i would recommend them to all. they work good. very solid hold. thanks, "musical_instruments"
Again I feel line I work for Dunlop.....I don't just love the products .all my guitars and Basses have these locks, "musical_instruments"
I replaced the Schaller strap locks on my Strat with these. The Schaller ones ground on the connecting hardware to the point where I had to oil them a few times a month or I'd end up with an audible creak.Hands-down I like the Dunlop ones more. They installed in just a few minutes and the guitar feels very secure. No problems whatsoever. I just ordered my third set a few minutes ago.I'm a total convert - every new guitar I get is going to get a set of these put on it., "musical_instruments"
I put a pair of these on every guitar that I own.  I have a lot of extra strap clips around since I have many more guitars than straps, but these are great; they are all plenty tough, and if I find myself with my Straplok'd strap, it's nice that these work fine with a normal strap in a pinch., "musical_instruments"
Do as the manual says, lube them up every so often, and these will work like a charm. I got these after an unfortunate incident with my strap slipping off of the strap button, and taking a chip out of the binding. The black ones work well with most finishes, and it works with most straps, as long as the ends aren't ridiculously thick. Inside of the box, it came with 2 screw sizes. One thing to note however is that these make the strap protrude much farther out of the guitar than normal. No biggie however, as most straps are adjustable, so just adjust for the change in strap position, and you're golden!, "musical_instruments"
My bass had original-equipment Dunlops on it, but they were silver-tone, whereas all my other hardware is gold.  And after 30 years, they looked kind of dirty and tarnished.  So, I knew it was time for a new gold set, and I couldn't be happier with their look and quality.  I have used that other S-brand on other instruments, and really prefer the Dunlops., "musical_instruments"
About 4 years ago,  one of my friend dropped his bass and its body broke in half. that bass had regualr strap button, ever since then he use this dunlop straplok system. i recently built a bass myself and i install this one. it's very easy to install, very straight forward to use it. it holds my jazz bass without any problem. i would buy this from now on for all my electic guitars., "musical_instruments"
These are the ONLY straplocks I use, and I have them for ALL of my guitars.  They are the only ones I trust.  They are solid, secure, and they look great.  And the push button release makes them pretty convenient too, without sacrificing security.  Love 'em!!, "musical_instruments"
This the second set of strap locks that I've owned. They are a little difficult to attach to the strap if the thickness of the strap is a bit on the thicker side. The quick release and secure connection are great., "musical_instruments"
Dunlop is not the best strap lock system because it's a pain to switch which way the lock is pointing and people complain that the button is easy to unhook while playing. I can see the merits of screw on locks, what with the ease of switching the locks, but these work fine for me., "musical_instruments"
I hate spending 13 bucks on a couple little pieces of hardware that probably cost 13 cents to make, but its better than the 20 bucks local music shops want for this same set.  Overall they work really well and look sharp.  They fit perfectly on my Schecter Hellraiser.  Very happy with my purchase., "musical_instruments"
The Dunlop strap locks work pretty well, but the standard hole cut in a standard leather strap is not big enough to accomidate the locking buttons.  The strap has to be modified by increasing the size of the holes.  This for all intents and purposes means that you will not be able to use that strap with standard strap buttons ever again.They do work as advertised and they are easy to take on and off for strap adjustment when required., "musical_instruments"
I play guitar and keyboard and, sometimes, I need to quickly put guitar on my back to play keyboards. I would not do that without this straplok., "musical_instruments"
The first thing I do when I get a new instrument, is put a straplok on it before gigging with it.They're easy to install, I haven't had one fail on me yet.I have straploks on nine instruments right now, and I just ordered another for my new bass...I can't recommend them highly enough!, "musical_instruments"
I&#8217;ve used strap locks before and never found any to be easy to attach or remove but these are well made and easy to use. Very secure. The best I&#8217;ve used so far., "musical_instruments"
I don't know if this is a common problem, but i have these on both of my basses, and one of the arms that attaches to the actual body of the instrument is starting to show some sort of blemishing, like metal does before it rusts, it is literally only one of the arms out of 4 i have so i think it was just a random thing. The problem is that it makes it so my strap doesn't just spin free in it so the screw keeps getting loose, and one time (the first time) i didn't notice and it actually fell out. Notice i still like the product, this was just one of those things i think, so I would still recommend it., "musical_instruments"
I like this strap lock very strong very sturdy! Keeps things in place.. one problem.. The coating will wear out in a short time (a few months) and if you never take it off it might rust a bit on the inside. This might make it a bit hmm I don't want to say hard to lock, but you'd better make sure it is actually locked every time you fit it on by tugging on the thing to be sure, Mine has un-clipped a couple times because I didn't check. Our climate is humid so it's rust friendly which could contribute to why I'm having issues. However once clipped properly you shouldn't have issues! Great buy, "musical_instruments"
Strings are half the battle with stringed instruments. A bad pair of strings on a nice instrument sound awful, and a good pair of strings can make a cheaper instrument sound tremendously better. Either way, stringes drastically effect the sound of an instrument at any price point. These strings make my cheap ukulele sound not-so-cheap, and I imagine they would do even more wonders on a uke of a higher price point. I also play guitar and Martin is one of my choice brands for strings so I figured they wouldn't let me down when I decided to play the ukulele - I was correct., "musical_instruments"
.I BOUGHT A UKULELE  TO GIVE AS A PRESENT.  I KNEW THE STRINGS THAT COME EQUIPPED  ON NEW MUSICAL STRINGED INSTRUMENTS WOULD BE OF POOR QUALITY SO I PURCHASED THESE MARTIN STRINGS AS A REPLACEMENT.  I'VE USED MARTIN INSTRUMENTS FOR MANY YEARS, AM FOND OF THE MAKE AND QUALITY OF THE MARTIN PRODUCTS.  THIS WAS AN EASY CHOICE FOR ME. THERE ARE OTHER EXCELLENT STRINGS AVAILABLE.  THIS JUST WAS MY CHOICE THIS TIME., "musical_instruments"
I've been playing the uke since before they became popular again and must confess I own a quiver full of the addictive things (ranging from plywood beaters to a solid wood art object with an electric in between). Over the years, I've tried several different brands of string. The truth is there was nothing wrong with any of them. It's just that the Martin M600 strings seem a little bit more compliant than the others and this allows me to tease out a bit more articulation and tone. Given that string changing is a frequent occurrence with multiple instruments to fuel, the Martin string set's relatively low cost is a nice bonus., "musical_instruments"
Great guitar companies don't always make (or sell under their aegis) the best strings. I love my Teles but I can't stand Fender strings. Likewise, I love my Martin ukulele, but trying these strings for the second time, I had the same conclusion as I did the first; Aquila's are far better. Aquila's have a more organic feel and a fuller, richer sound. The Martins begin to hold their tune sooner - Aquila's take a couple of days or more - but the sound is thinner and the feel isn't nearly as friendly. The approximately 3 dollar price difference is not, for me, worth the lesser satisfaction, even on my least expensive ukes. Considering how seldom one usually changes uke strings, the higher-priced Aquila's still seem to be worth the extra couple of bucks. Use the Martin's (or any cheaper string) when you are working on your uke, put the stress of repeatedly de-tuning and re-tuning on them. Then switch to Aquila's for playing. Some may like the Martins but few won't love the Aquila's., "musical_instruments"
Great replacement string  for your ukulele, great to have on hand in case or replace your strings after you get your uku., "musical_instruments"
Works as it should. Nice materials and I think it will be durable. Simple to attach to your mic stand and adjust as needed. It will improve your recordings, getting the pops and sssss out of your sound without having to do sound processing as much anyway., "musical_instruments"
great easily setup but some time i feel its not perfectly stop the P's, i don't know why but some time i have to keep distance for that issue, "musical_instruments"
I'm not very familiar with how pop filters actually work, apart from getting rid of unnecessary peaks when recording. I have noticed an improvement in recording quality with this pop filter on. I don't know how it compares to other pop filters though, but this one seems like it works for me., "musical_instruments"
What a difference a pop filter makes, I use on a condenser mic, it lets me get a little more gain input, clamps on easy and holds good, the flex piece holding the filter could be a little more rigid but does the job. I like the way it looks when mounted on the mic stand extension, It has improved the vocal tracks. Just one more affordable improvement for the home studio., "musical_instruments"
Great quality and construction. Does it's job well. Only complaint is that if the design were a little more streamline. These bolt on with attitude and are a bit heavy. Overall, stays in place and does it's job well. A workhorse for sure., "musical_instruments"
Don't even hesitate buying this thing. It's everything you need. It's a pop filter. It clamps on to anything that isn't over about an inch and a half in thickness.It gets the job done. Buy it., "musical_instruments"
For the price, this is the perfect pop filter... really good length and the clamp is decent, hope it will last me awhile..., "musical_instruments"
When I bought these I was looking for pop filters to use with a pair of condenser microphones to help keep the wind pops from ruining a recording.  Once these are in position they work just fine, the problem is that getting them into position can be harder than it looks.  The device clamps onto a microphone stand and then you adjust the goose neck to get the filter where you need it.  The filter and the goose neck are fairly heavy and as such it was often a struggle to get the filter where I wanted it and to keep it there.On the plus side, the device looks nice and professional and it has held up over three years of use., "musical_instruments"
no complaints.  attaches firmly and does the job.  Can't beat it for the price.  Order this with eyes closed.  Great deal., "musical_instruments"
It works as a pop filter should and is a huge upgrade over my make-shift panty hose pop filter. What else is there to say?, "musical_instruments"
Pop filter works great. This really eliminated many subtle flaws I had with audio recording. Granted, you can make a make-shift pop filter using a hollow ring and nylon. But the adjustable clamp is really...well adjustable so fits many unique mic placement situations. Plus, although it is flexible, it is also very sturdy so don't worry about and vibration noises coming from this., "musical_instruments"
filter works very well and looks professional. only problem i am having is that the clamp seems to work specifically with a mic stand or similar type structure., "musical_instruments"
the thing is that they don't seem to stay! i mean, you can change the position of the pop filter by varying the shape of the metallic &#34;arm&#34;, but it doesn't stay where you put it. and also the material of the filter is of kinda poor quality. but, i think if you're lucky if just might get the job done., "musical_instruments"
This works fine, although the mount is a bit weird to me... but I see that most are the same.  As a pop filter it works perfectly and I was not able to hear any clarity loss or sound coloring.  Just pop filtering through black pantyhose !! lol, "musical_instruments"
I purchased this after reading the great reviews but like a few of the comments that are on here lately this thing is not good. Looked almost used when it arrived and the gooseneck stand is useless. Does not come even close to being able to hold up the weight of the filter. I would have returned it but I completely destroyed the package getting it open (which oddly had staples holding it closed)., "musical_instruments"
this little guy has help me record with my Apogee One voices and amps, to prevent air-flow shock on diaphragm... wanna have excellent recordings? get one!, "musical_instruments"
wind screen is way too big its bulky and to me useless, the screen came out, was thinking of glueing it back in but went to ebay and bought 2 metal mesh pop filters cheaper that is MUCH better...avoid this!!, "musical_instruments"
Wow the reviews for this thing are a little ridiculous eh? Some people pay for silver and expect gold ;)Okay, so I bought this because I do app review videos for a blog and my Blue Snowball mic was picking up the awful \"pop\" sounds that this is supposed to filter \"hard P, hard T, hard B, S, and a few others.\" So I got this. Here are my pros and cons:Pros1. It works. I tested in Sony Vegas pro with and without the filter. The \"pop\" sound is completely removed with the filter. Which means it does what it was designed to do. 5-stars. It does not affect voice volume at all, just smooths those rough edges in your speech :D2. It looks nice. Attached to my Blue Snowball, it looks like a professional product. It doesn't really matter since I work from home and not in a public place, but it's nice to know I can show it to people and it \"looks nice\"3. The clamp, bendable arm, and everything work appropriately. The clamp is designed to hold onto a bar and not a flat surface. So mounting this to, say, a desk probably won't be a stable as attached to a round thing, like the stem to a mic.4. I don't know why people think this \"isn't sturdy\"...I mean you're not going to the local rink and playing hockey with the darn thing. The build quality is quite excellent considering that it's 2 fragile screens attached to plastic and metal.Cons1. It's pretty big. I used to shorten the stem on my Blue Snowball and stash it in a cubby hole in my hutch desk for easy storage. I can't do that anymore with this pop filter on it. Now it's become a permanent member of the front of my desk.Outside of this thing doubling the space my Snowball takes up, I have no complaints about this pop filter. It works well, it attaches nicely, it does what it is supposed to do, it looks nice, and the quality is good. This should be the last pop filter I have to buy for a long time., "musical_instruments"
Filter is of good size (6\") and easily comes apart for changing the fabric (I will probably use panty hose) if it gets torn. Other than that it works so what more can be said, "musical_instruments"
I ordered this product to use for personal recording, and thought...what could possibly go wrong? I ordered it \"New,\" and it definitely shows signs that it not new. First, the package was stapled, that's right- STAPLED together in a way in which you could tell the product had been opened. Then, to make matters worse, there is a hole in one side of the fabric. When I order something new, I expect it to be new. Based on this product alone, I would not recommend buying from this seller., "musical_instruments"
What my headline says. It does exactly what it's supposed to do. Removes those annoying popping P's out of your recordings. Until you can afford a Sennheiser condenser microphone that has a built in pop filter than you're going to need this. And the price was right too., "musical_instruments"
it keeps the spit off the mic and looks cool when recording - it does great at keeping you mouth off the mic so you dont breath it out and fits great on the stands with easy clamp, "musical_instruments"
Yes, you can make your own pop filter at home, but you don't want to.  Why else would you be reading this?  Besides, it won't look this good.I've purchased three pop filters thus far in the last four months.  The most recent one I purchased was NOT this one.  I wish it was.  I thought I'd try something different, just to see the differences.  Well, I can tell you that there are significant differences between this, and some of the others featured here.The bottom clamp on this one features a rubber piece that grips the metal pole that you attach to.  The competitors that I've tried do not.  If you do not have this rubber piece, any clamp will tend to slip down the pole and not grip properly.  This is a huge mistake as this makes using a pop filter on a boom stand impossible.  Fortunately, Nady placed this rubber piece on it's clamp so this has never been an issue.The only complaint I have is the screen has actually popped out of the plastic ring a couple times.  A single dot of superglue fixed that.Compared to the other pop filters I've seen and used, this one is perfectly suited for any microphone and at a reasonable price you can't beat it.And yes, pop filters ARE A MUST with condenser microphones.  Just buy one now, save yourself the trouble., "musical_instruments"
It does what it's supposed to do. It's as well made as most, I think. They all look cheap to me, unless you get a studio professional grade. The screen pops out easily, but it will pop back in. It works well for my home recording., "musical_instruments"
Peter Piper Picked A Pack of Purple Peppers - test passed, no &#34;puh&#34; sound to be found on the recording., "musical_instruments"
This is a decent pop filter. It gets the job done but it has a few flaws. It attracts a good amount of dust, the screen tends to mess up (which caused me to tear the first screen), & the goose neck tends to unwrap it's self out of place. It also gets shakey so I tend to have to screw it back in. Other than that, it's a decent pop filter but not for the price. Under $10 would've been better. I should have went with something cheaper than $20 *cough cough* the Auphonix pop filter *cough cough* but, I will in the future., "musical_instruments"
does not stay in place well., "musical_instruments"
I read several reviews of pop filters on Amazon and was surprised by how dissatisfied many were.  Finally I just went with this one and I'm pretty happy with it.  It seems quite servicable.  It is a double filter and attaches to my stand well enough.  The arm is just a little weak butit does stay put if you just don't bump it.  I guess there is a balance between stiffness and ease of possitioning it.  I think possitioning it would be a little easier if the arm was just a little stiffer.I can blow on it directly (not quite as hard as blowing out a cake full of candles) and I feel nothing on the other side and hear no wind rumble in my mic.So then, I'm gonna keep it and use it 'till it rots or gets lost., "musical_instruments"
Though I'd warn if you don't know about audio this does not mean you can place your mic right in front of you and have the pop filter magically de-esse the whole thing, but between the pop filter and a slightly off-center placement it seems to keep the majority of erroneous pops and esses's from making an appearance in any way., "musical_instruments"
works very well, keeps the popping to a bare minimum, easy to install, cleans in a flash, lightweight and works, "musical_instruments"
I do a lot of podcasts and dubbing over videos, and after using this filter, the pop that occurs with P's and B's in the voice are basically gone. It makes your audio more professional when you eliminate these annoyances., "musical_instruments"
When you record singing, you need this to prevent the pop sound. It is definitely worth it. It also makes you looks professional., "musical_instruments"
This pop-filter rocks. I like it a lot, does well compared to lots of other filters I tried. It's got a nice look too., "musical_instruments"
Use this for home recordings and some voice over recordings for work. I like the long neck on it and its a double filter so you get a tad bit extra. I tested it against my single filter and it did make a difference, as expected. It makes sense that if you have an additional layer there it will filter more effectively, but I wasnt sure if it would effect tone or highs, and I didnt notice either effected., "musical_instruments"
This was a great investment for my home studio. I've been able to eliminate the majority of pops coming from my Condenser Microphone. I should of bought this a long time ago!!, "musical_instruments"
I use it with an Audio Technica 2020, it work very well, the filter stays in place and it really improves the quality of the recording. Not much else to say., "musical_instruments"
works well but wish it was a bit heavier and the construction was a little better made. but other than that works as intended., "musical_instruments"
I love this pop filter!  It is every to attactch and doesn't scratch the mic stand as some pop filter clamps do.  The adjustable arm is very flexible, yet sturdy to assure you of proper pop filter placement., "musical_instruments"
For the price, this is one of the best pop filters. It easily clamps onto my stand and doesn't move around after I place it. However, there is one problem I've had with it. It can easily lose grip of the arm holding the filter. What I mean is that, if I pick up the mic, the arm will swivel away. Granted this was caused by me dropping it once, but before it was fine. So for a good price you get a filter that works., "musical_instruments"
Tested this on my Blue Yeti USB Microphone and could tell the difference with the POP filter on right away. Good investment., "musical_instruments"
There too many required words to type for a product that doesn't need that much explanation.  It mounts to any mic stand and is formable to any position you need.  sturdy., "musical_instruments"
A needed accessory for any vocal recording, period. My only gripe about this model is why the straight bracket part needs to stick out so dang far, since you can bend the arm out in any position anyway., "musical_instruments"
Well thought out unit that does what it says it will, drop all that POP! I really like the way the clamp connector is rubberized to protect the finish of your mic stand. And being that it is rubberized, it allows you to adjust the filter to the mic without having to loosen everything up because rubber has an inherent &#34;give.&#34; And this is where the flexible arm allows you to fine tune the filters proximity to the singer, allowing you to do what you do best -- Sing! And then; and now for the really important part: everything stays where you last left it. Hell, even my cats can't do that, and they're porcelain., "musical_instruments"
Good solid construction. It hooks onto the mic stand and works as advertised, i.e removes the pops from vocal recordings., "musical_instruments"
Very sturdy and awesome pop filter. Adjustable to any length you want and just a great pop filter! I would recommend this to anyone!, "musical_instruments"
This filter arrived very quickly! I use it with a Scarlett mic and it does exactly what a pop filter should. Good purchase., "musical_instruments"
These are high quality cables, both construction wise and in audio quality.  I use these shorter cables if I have to run bits of my rack to external amps/units, ie: unplugging and plugging in a lot, and I find these cables stand up to more abuse than the average cable.  I'm satisfied., "musical_instruments"
Good Quality cable and price. Works as good as those expensive 99 dlls cables.It does not make any noise, "musical_instruments"
Sometimes I have to run a longer cable to a snake if I'm doing the big band thing. Otherwise, I use this cable at every show. Love it., "musical_instruments"
Looks vintage but works great at a great price. As good or better than my Monster cable for a lot less money!, "musical_instruments"
This is my second Spectraflex cable and I love them. I love their flexibility, options for colors and ends, build quality and price. I like to use quality guitar cables for a good sound but I don't need to spend a fortune on them to be run over on stage by roadies or ripped off because the cable costs more than some guitars do., "musical_instruments"
got this short cord to go from amp to waa! It works perfect for it I own a few Spectraflex cables and they are all fine, "musical_instruments"
Rugged ends very flexible seem like this cable should hold up very well , does not tangle which is a real plus if you tend to move around a lot , connectors seem to be heavy duty , time will tell but I would assume that this cable should last a long time ., "musical_instruments"
After suffering through crackles, lost signals, and all the rest, I decided to heed the numerous positive reviews of the Spectraflex tweed cable and purchase one through Amazon.com.  Because the new acoustic-electric classical I received as a gift has an end-pin outlet, I bought the Spectraflex with the right angle connector.  Although I have been using the cable for only a few weeks, I am very impressed.  The connections on all the guitars and basses on which I've used it are sure, with no loss of signal, no crackles.  Perhaps most impressive is the fact that I can turn the right angle connector around and never have any change of signal.  Finally, I can be confident that when I play, something will consistently come out of the amplifier.  By the way, the old-school tweed look is a plus, too., "musical_instruments"
Well, what can I say? Based on the customer reviews, this purchase seemed like a no-brainer. However, after only 4 months of light use (used on my rig at home) it is toast. The cable barely holds a signal now (constantly need to jiggle the thing to work). And before you ask, &#34;is it perhaps your output jack?&#34;, all of my other cables work with my gee-tar. So it is definitely the cable :(Anyway, I gave it 2 stars because while it WAS working it sounded great through my Roland JC120., "musical_instruments"
Spectraflex makes great cables. I bought this right angle 10' red cable for my older Ibanez guitar. This cable is built to be extremely durable, is made in the USA, and comes with a lifetime warrantee. The 20 gauge construction and rugged nylon braiding makes for a very low noise cable, and the connectors are very secure and feel quite substantial (especially compared to a cheaper Fender cable I had been using that required almost constant tightening.) Though Spectraflex cables are not the least expensive (nor the most expensive,) they are a great value and I am definitely a fan. I recommend this cable without reservations., "musical_instruments"
I purchased three of these (three different colors) to make a mini-snake for my keyboard to their Di's.  I typically used Mogami 2524/Neutrik, but need cakes while in the road (I usually roll my own to exact length).  These have worked well, quiet, no handling noise, seem well built (I treat cables well, so I don't really test them with under tough circumstances) and hopefully will remain in their spot for the foreseeable future.  They are used 6 nights a week, and after 50 uses, no problems.  I recommend them (plus, for live, the fabric cables in different colors are great for easily identifying which is which for a road crew member who might not know audio well.).  Nice pieces..., "musical_instruments"
I keep this cable on my pedal board -Pedaltrain MINI With Soft Case. I've posted a photo on the pedaltrain Mini page. The right angle connector is great to exit the last pedal on the board and the straight connector goes into the amp. I use a Mogami silent cable -Mogami Platinum Guitar 12, Straight to Straight with Quiet Plug 12 feet- for the input to my guitar, but I can't justify paying a LOT more money for the side that goes to my amp (it's not getting bumped around, plugged and unplugged, etc.). This cable works perfect for it's purpose. Oh yeah... and it matches my tweed amp!!, "musical_instruments"
This is a pretty strong cable. I wanted something I can plug into my top loaded amp and the jack would stand out in case I'm sitting on the amp. the angle does the job. seams strong , seams like it will last., "musical_instruments"
I bought two to run from my amp to a lone pedal effect that I use with my bass.  The 90 degree ends go to the pedal and it makes for a non-intrusive smart looking setup.  I'm pleased.  I've owned them for a few months now.  No issues at all and they look good., "musical_instruments"
I'm a professional musician and love these cables, they look great and perform great and feel a lot tougher than the rubber covered cables I've been using, "musical_instruments"
This has become my number one cable for my Carvin bass. I gig with it a couple times per week and it has been rock solid. I only use something different if I need a longer reach. And I love the tweed cover. Very satisfied with this one., "musical_instruments"
I've had this little amplifier for a few weeks and I couldn't ask for a better practice amp. It's amazing how loud it gets in an otherwise quiet room, but it'll get drowned out pretty quickly when you add competing sounds. It's rugged and portable, and it's fun to play around with some of the effects. The fact that it runs on batteries is a huge plus., "musical_instruments"
Might work well for recording too when you take the output jack.  Speaker is acceptable quality but can't be compared with a Fender amp as this one has 5 watts and a small speaker and the other has 10-20 watts.  I'm opting for the convenience of the size.  I got this after getting a couple smaller amps and headphone monitor plugs since it has both and was better sound with good effects.  I like the 'brit' setting.  I sound like a rock star with it.  Good product for practice or recording.  You could get away with microphone to amplify it for a gig.  But for around the same price you could get a Fender amp.  This product works for me and the quality is pretty good.  Other mini amps and similar accessories are toys compared to this., "musical_instruments"
There are several types of practice amps. High end modlers (Line 6, G Dec, Vox VT) that can still run $400+ and are typically overloaded with features. The low end tubes (Fender Blues Junior, Bug V22, Peavey Valveking, etc). These typically are more stripped down (in features, not neccessarily quality). And then there are the micros. I always thought they were just a notch above toys, the sort of amps found in a prepackaged guitar set up from Wally World at Christmas.Boy was I wrong...I needed a portable amp for my son to take to and from practice after school. It was important to me that he could schlepp his own gear. He's not a big kid, so even 15lb. amps are pushing it(plus a gig bag and school back pack). That was initially what brought me to the Micro. Not sound or features, just the smallest possible amp for my little virtuoso. Turns out this is an AMAZING amp. The tone destroys the Line 6 and the features crush the Vox Pathfinder (6watt?) or Bug V12. And the Fender frontman - not even in the ballpark.Each of the models are distinct. The cleans are sparkly (more trebly) and the high gain models are very articulate. Obviously this isn't a loud amp, but that's not all bad. You can get everything this amp has to offer at reasonable volumes. It also can be battery powered (the life is suprisingly long), includes a regular wall plug, headphone jack, built in tuning fork (which is kind of lame) and a series of onboard effects that can be run simultaneously. For example, I was able to crank up the delay and tremelo and pull off some Dick Dale surpher licks with suprising accuracy.Don't let the size fool you. I honestly thought it was nothing more than a toy and I couldn't have been more wrong.  There are several big websites and it's tough to find any negatives about this amp. Quality sounding and durable for a great price.Oh - and the red - if you can find it - looks pretty sweet too., "musical_instruments"
Great little amp. I had to take my Ampeg Jet in for a maintenance and I just love this little practice amp. I enjoy using it with both my Fender Strat and my Rickenbacker., "musical_instruments"
It is a fun little practice amp, and I agree with the praise it gets. The positives have been covered so I'll point out a few (minor) things I don't like.First of all the power button is on the back, which is annoying. The rest of the controls are on top, why do I have to grope around the back to find the most important button. Plus I keep it in a cabinet so I have to pull it out to turn it on and off.Next! I wish they'd just name the settings &#34;clean&#34;, &#34;overdrive&#34;, &#34;distortion&#34;, and so on. JC Clean, Black Panel, Brit combo and R-Fier mean nothing to me.Then there's another minor annoyance that the input is recessed. A 90 degree angle plug won't fit unless you run it around the back.Lastly, the amp is solid and rugged but that means it's heavy. Not heavy like I can't pick it up, just heavy for something called a micro amp.None of these are deal breakers, just things I find annoying. Overall I have to say I prefer my VOX mini 3., "musical_instruments"
I bought this amp to replace a Squier SP-10 that came with my guitar.  The Squier had no effects, just a clean channel and an overdrive button.  I couldn't afford a bunch of pedals, but I wanted some effects so I could get cool sounds from my electric guitar.  I saw the reviews for this little amp on Amazon and decided to give it a try.  It is Awesome!  For such a small amp, the output is plenty loud for practicing at home, and it runs on batteries, too, so I can take it anywhere.  The effects are better than I'd hoped for.  This is certainly not for the pro who performs onstage or with a drummer, but for an intermediate level guitarist (like me) who just plays for his own pleasure or to please his family, this is the amp to get.  It has several modeling functions and you can choose between chorus, flanger, phaser, or tremelo while still adding either reverb or delay.  I'm one of the growing number of retirees who decided to pick up the guitar and learn more about it now that I have the time.  I don't need the deafening stacks that the kids like.  I love this amp., "musical_instruments"
This pupppy is pretty powerful just running off the batteries.  We've used it on a couple of gigs an it worked well with the volume only half way up.  We are not guitar players and are not using guitars with it.  We are using an mp3 player for backup.  The sound is not quite as clear as we get with our Roland Cm-30 (so only 4 stars from me).  The micro cube is a lot easier to transport and set up and it's nice not to have to load up cart to roll around.  Guitar folk will like this unit with the fx features., "musical_instruments"
The MicroCube came with new AC Adaptor that supports 110V and 240V. Now I can take it along and use it in Europe/ Asia and USA.I saved $30 from buying another AC adapter that supports 240V.Happy Customer!, "musical_instruments"
A good solid piece of equipment! It sounds as good as it looks and it is absolutely beautiful! The description listed slight wear marks on the back, but I had to really look hard to find it (one). It came as well packed as a brand-new guitar and looks like one!, "musical_instruments"
Tone control didn't work so it was returned.  But it was pretty nice even though I felt the fret-board quality is higher on my 900 Gibson Les Paul but what can you expect.  If I had to order it again I would pay 140 more and get the SG 400 which has the quality pickups.  The sound is let's say... average.  Good beginner guitar, or a guitar that can be upgraded with new pickups.  The bolt-in neck didn't bother me but the SG 400 doesn't have that which is another reason I would step up next time.  Shape is ok.  Purely subjective.  I like the solid Les Paul shape now a little better since it's more conservative.  But the size is good and almost more comfortable than the Les Paul style.  Can't believe they can make a good guitar like this for only 160 bucks.  Also, even though I was tempted with the faded finish, the glossy finish is really nice.  This guitar will make a player proud., "musical_instruments"
For the money you can't find a better deal.  I am currently overseas and didn't want to bring my good guitar along.  This is a great playing guitar for the money, comes packaged extremely well and high quality all around for the price., "musical_instruments"
I bought this at Guitar Center and now wish that I hadn't.  The reason I said this is that I would have rather saved the taxes, but oh well. Now on to the guitar itself.....This was the second of my three Epiphone guitars and for someone who isn't a professional musician, I still want to sound like one.  The sound from this SG is true to its big brother from Gibson. Awesome crunch and great sustainability.  I can take or leave the kill pot.  The electronics, mainly the switch could use some replacing.  I'm not complaining, I just noticed some extra noise when switching pickups..  For $169, you can't expect to have the top of the line.To sum it up, I love this guitar.  I keep in E flat tuning and it stays.  To me, a guitar with this sound and crunch deserves to drop it's tuning a little., "musical_instruments"
i love this thing!!!  action is perfect,  great sound,  good feel, easy to play i highly recomend this, "musical_instruments"
At first it look small for my guitar but it fits perfectly with my Epiphone LP-100 Les Paul Electric Guitar, "musical_instruments"
Now-a-days I just search amazon because they have always got what I want at reasonable prices. This is no exception. I am not a musican but wanted a case to carry my Epiphone Les Paul Custom Pro to the guitar guy for setup etc. This was was better then I expected. It is sturdy outside and nice fusion inside with a tight but not too tight fit. In other words great all around. I know it sits on a self with many other guitars when I take it in to the guitar guys so I am perfectly confident that it is well protected. and it is lockable (with key)If you are looking for a more then good case for your Epi LP just get this one. You will not be disappointed.Also. I ordered it on a tuesday and it came the next day. No special shipping. Maybe it is my locations but that was great too. Well packed., "musical_instruments"
love the case nice and simple, it really look exactly the same as the picture. highly recommend to everyone looking for a case., "musical_instruments"
Bought this along with the guitar as a present for my daughter. The guitar fits in this case perfectly, and is very well protected., "musical_instruments"
I ordered this for my Epi LP Special 2 and obviously it fits like a glove! Beautiful interior and a comfortable padded handle. Solid hinges and even comes with hinge lock on the center hinge., "musical_instruments"
Basically, this case is very sharp looking - made with good quality materials. The inside of the one I received was grey fur. The case would probably take a beating over time, but its not a SKB case. Nice enough that I wouldn't check it at the airport. Survived a trip in a moving van from Philly to Boston.Would definitely recommended if you need a case that your Les Paul fits very snugly and safely into., "musical_instruments"
This case it built really well, it has really nice plush interior... storage area for picks-strings-tuning fork-etc in the neck, it DOES have a lock on one of the latches. The case actually kind of stuck the first few days after i got; so much so that i thought it was locked with the key inside when i first got it. Turns out thats actually impossible to do with this case unless you have an extra key... so dont worry. Just dont be an idiot like me and give it a good tug when you get it.Above all it fits my Epi LP perfectly... as it should! hehe., "musical_instruments"
Its a tight fitting case. I am a proud owner of aEpiphone Les Paul Custom Proand it fits as snug as can be. When I ordered the case I assumed it would be made for my guitar. It arrived double boxed and wrapped in plastic. I am sure I received a new case. Being perfectly  protected as it was, it hadn't a mark on it so.As far as the construction, it not a flight case by any means. It looks as though it will hold up to at least some abuse and still do its job, to protect the guitar. My guitar does not move in the case due to its perfect fit. With this said, over time there is a possibility of wear. I would predict the buckles may be the first to fail. And then handle doesn't look as durable as it could be , we'll see on that.Overall this is the case for the Epiphone Les Paul. I saw the Gibson case and I just don't see them as superior enough to justify paying more. I am satisfied with my purchase and I think most people would be. Five stars for now. I will edit in the future if necessary., "musical_instruments"
Very nice case for the price.  Solid construction and perfect fit and protection for my Epiphone LP.  Would definately recommend., "musical_instruments"
Hello, I bought a Epiphone Goth Studio guitar and I also bought this beauty. I'm very satisfied with the quality of this case, as it makes my guitar looks very nice and very nice protected., "musical_instruments"
this case is the best i've ever had...very plush on the inside, and hard construction on outside is very strong...the handle extreamly soft to the touch...i guess all my other cases just don't measure up to this one...it even locks...if your guitar fits...but this for the quality!!!, "musical_instruments"
The case is hard on the outside and soft on the inside as it should be. The pocket inside is nice for holding accessories. It does include a lock on the middle latch, but somehow mine eventually stopped working, as the lock isn't very good quality. The lock cylinder itself fell inside the lock and can no longer be used. Otherwise great case, highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
I use this for my Epiphone Zakk Wylde Custom Les Paul. It fits perfectly in the case, one of the best cases I own and have seen, the carpet is awesome, also has a pocket in the middle, what holds the neck up, and can fit a strap and even a pedal. Very durable case and seems like the younger brother of the more expensive Gibson case., "musical_instruments"
An affordable guitar case that fits my guitar perfectly. That's all there really is to say, if you need a sturdy guitar case  for a Les Paul styled guitar and don't want to spend a butt-load of money, look no further., "musical_instruments"
I bought the bigger version of this for my Riviera P93 and this case is just as plush and protective- best deal going for a brand new case - I just wish they had these for more brands-, "musical_instruments"
I do some guitar repair work and one of my customers needed a LP case. I have bought a lot of stuff here on AZ so looked at this one and had it shipped to him. He says its great so that is my review.Prices are always great on AZ and Prime saves me money in shipping.4 stars is my tops, anywhere., "musical_instruments"
I could not believe the quality of this case, fits my Epiphone Les Paul 100 like a glove.  Very plush interior, plenty of storage and very durable., "musical_instruments"
I'm not much for brand names on my guitar cases. I figure it tells would-be thieves what they're getting!  I sprayed a little matte-black paint over the Epiphone logo. The case itself is quite sturdy and the inside is very plush. It fits my Line 6 JTV Variax in a very cozy way. Great case for small cash!, "musical_instruments"
Ordered one of these Gig Bags for a new Les Paul - the hard shell cases are back-ordered, and I didn't want the guitar just sitting attracting dings and dust.Fits a LP Studio perfectly, has room for small items in an outer zippered pocket. Does the Job !, "musical_instruments"
If you're looking for something to protect your guitar until you can afford a good hard case, this is it. For the price, it has better padding than I expected and is equipped with carrying handles and a shoulder strap with metal buckles and snaps. Good deal for the price!, "musical_instruments"
As the title states, this is a lightly padded duffle bag, nothing more. If you're toating between practice with an instructor, it's okay. I purchased it for that reason...and I'm an adult, so I can be careful. This bag is useless for kids as a drop would likely result in damage. I would even go so far as to call it a glorified dust rag. It will prevent my guitar from scuffs, dings, dent & dirt, but that's it.There are better gig bags at a comprable price and the only reason I gave it two stars was becuase of the dirt cheap price., "musical_instruments"
This houses your guitar and I have a couple humidipaks  in there because I live in a northern desert. Not many frills to this bag. It does the job., "musical_instruments"
This bag is light, with two back pack straps, a pocket for accessories, excellent quality material and a good quality zipper.  If you just need something lightweight to protect your instrument this is it., "musical_instruments"
This bag fits my Epiphone Les Paul II electric guitar very well...but no room to spare.  The outside pocket is too small for sheet music, but works for small things like a tuner and short cable.  I prefer a bigger pocket, but aside from that I can't complain.  This gig bag looks really sharp, and has two shoulder straps for convenient carrying., "musical_instruments"
Good quality bag for my Epi LP. Fit like a glove, in fact I wish they were a little larger to hold some accessories., "musical_instruments"
This gigbag is a very tight fit for my Epiphone Les Paul. Their is minimal padding, so it is little more than a dust cover. I tossed it aside, and bought a Fender gigbag. The Fender is heavily padded, and gives me some serious protection., "musical_instruments"
At &lt;$20, this is a great bargain, but it is a very basic bag. It fits my Les Paul Standard snugly and has back straps for easy carrying. These are also easily removed if they bother you. This Epiphone gigbag also has a zippered pocket for accessories (holds a strap, patch cord, but not much else) and features nice looking graphics., "musical_instruments"
Rugged, robust, flexible. Couldn't ask for more in a momentary switch. Like all Boss products it will probably last longer than me., "musical_instruments"
I got this for use with the Boss DD-20 as a tap-tempo. It does the job well, it's a little big for what it is, but definitely worth having with a delay pedal, "musical_instruments"
I got this for my Boss Loop Station, but it doesn't work very well.  I keep hoping I'll find something it DOES work well with..., "musical_instruments"
No problem at all.Great quality and I am looking forward to purchasing more of this brand. Thak you very much!, "musical_instruments"
I'm using this footswitch to control a drum machine. it does the job and i've had no problems with it, "musical_instruments"
I could not beat the price. The pedal does what is suppose to do on my Dynamic Wah guitar pedal. It is well build and I can use it on other Boss and Roland gear. Also, it not to big. It does not hog up a lot of space on my pedal board. Very happy with this item., "musical_instruments"
nuff said.works great.latest purchace is used as a trigger on my drum machineused the CODA kick pedaltrigger a boss sound moduleplay it all the timealso use one on my Vocalist.  and eff mute.  and chan change.like the option of NC or NO.  saved my gig just tonight when one of my Midi controllers lost it mind an needed NO instead of normal NC., "musical_instruments"
Summary for those who don't want to read the whole thing: This is more than worth the money. If you're a beginner looking for a first guitar or if you're experienced and are searching for a backup/travel option or anything like that, get this. Do not hesitate. A cheap guitar doesn't ALWAYS mean a POS!Alright, full story/review:So, when I was a kid up until my early teens my (insanely talented and self-taught) older brother helped me learn how to play guitar. I got pretty decent but somewhere along the way I stopped and I've regretted it basically every day ever since then. Recently, I decided to stop internally griping about it and realized I should actually DO something about it. So, here I am.Having previously lived in a house with multiple guitarists, I have heard the sounds of expensive guitars and I have heard the sounds of the cheapest guitars (like a typical beginner's First Act). I knew there was a middle ground and I was determined to find it. I got way more than I bargained for.I began my quest knowing that my funds were limited. There was no way I could afford to dive right in and buy a high end, top of the line Fender or Martin like I had had the benefit of learning on back in the day. I knew I had to go cheap, at least for now. I began scouring the internet in search of the best rated budget guitars. After an exhaustive amount of research, I chose this one due to the positive reviews and because all of the demos I'd pulled up on YouTube were excellent. Plus, Epiphone has a pretty good reputation in general.Despite the positive reviews, I was still a bit leery; buying instruments without actually handling them first is always a bit of a gamble. Even if it sounds nice and plays well, sometimes a perfectly solid, functional instrument just doesn't FEEL right. As I went through the checkout I silently reminded myself that I could send it back for any reason. I went into this fully knowing that there was a good possibility I'd just have to bite the bullet and buy something better, even if costlier.Well, it arrived earlier this week and I am not disappointed. I certainly didn't expect perfection and I was convinced that I would find some kind of error, if only cosmetic, with such a cheap guitar. I am here to tell you that I have not found anything wrong with it. Even if I had (unless it drastically affected the sound/playability of the instrument), it would still be worth the price.Along with the guitar I bought some new strings (Martins) because 9/10 times the stock strings that come on instruments are awful. I was pleasantly surprised to find that the stock strings are more than usable. I see that some of the other reviewers disagree. Maybe their strings were older or maybe it's just preference, I don't know. All I can say is that the stock strings on my guitar were not at all corroded/old. Shockingly enough, the guitar was pretty close to being in tune right out of the box! It doesn't seem to have any trouble staying in tune, either. All of that being said, it wouldn't hurt to pick up a pack of strings just to be safe. I mean, I'm sure that when I do finally put the Martins on I'll be even more mind-blown than I already am with the way it sounds.This guitar has a full, rich sound, plays comfortably (the low action helps!), and has zero issues with buzzing or dead frets. Oh, and contrary to what other reviews have said - YES, it DOES have a truss rod. While we're talking about its positives, let's not ignore the fact that it's also super attractive with its shiny black finish. There isn't much about it that would give away its price. No, it's not a $1000 guitar but it certainly doesn't play like a $100 guitar either! I don't regret this purchase at all. Even in the future when I progress and upgrade I will definitely be keeping this lovely gem!If you're still unsure, do what I did and listen to some demos on YouTube. I doubt you'll be disappointed. (Pay no mind to the reviews the guy on the GearWire YouTube channel did. He clearly doesn't know what he's talking about and I, as well as everyone else in the comments section, was sure to express my feelings about that, haha! One user even claimed Epiphone should sue him!) Check out the video reviews by the users/companies GoldHat3, SamAshMusic, GigGear, and ShadowFW.My only complaint about this guitar is that I didn't buy it sooner!Good luck on your search, I hope this review has helped!, "musical_instruments"
First off; let me start by saying I bought this guitar because it was only $100 and I was board on my deployment and wanted something to brush up on before I return home.I DID NOT: expect good quality, sound or comfortably from this guitar.I DID: want something cheap I could toss around and use out here in the desert without worrying about it getting beaten up or trashed.When I unboxed this guitar I was floored! The hardware is much higher quality than I had expected by far. The strings it came with weren't complete crap, but I swapped them out for my favorite set of strings: Ernie Ball 2406 Ernesto Palla Nylon Black and Silver Classical strings. The guitar sings beautifully; the tone is rich and vibrant.It's quite comfortable to play, I have no problems playing up to the 16th fret without this guitar having a cut away. I'm not a big fan of the pick guard that has the Epiphone 'E' on it, so I will probably end up removing it; but the sunburst is really nice looking. I have received many compliments on the look of it already.OVER ALL: this guitar is a really great instrument for the price tag. GET IT!Also; I'm buying a hard case to take it home, or shipping this guitar back home to myself because I want to keep it as part of my collection. My original thought was to buy this guitar and leave it out here at the Rec tent for other people to use after I'm gone. Even if I do decide to leave it out here; I'll be buying another one when I get home!, "musical_instruments"
This is NOT my first guitar. Nor am I breathless Epiphone supporter shouting how this guitar is the sonic equal of Taylors and Martins. It's not. Here's what it is: An exceedingly well-constucted, AMAZINGLY playable guitar. Fit, finish, feel and action were all VERY nice... Sound on the other hand? Let's face it. It's plywood all around. It SOUNDS like plywood. But that doesn't distract from the fact that it's a great guitar for $100 bucks.It's a fine &#34;first&#34; guitar. It's a great beach/camping/cabin guitar. Leave it in your car to practice at lunch. Leave it in the office. ANY guitar is better than no guitar... And this guitar is better than a LOT of other entry level guitars.Seriously consider changing strings the second you take it out of the box... New, premium strings DO make a difference.If your expectations are for a playable, rugged, affordable guitar you won't be disappointed. If sound quality is your primary concern, well... You are going to have to spend more than a hundred bucks to be happy.For my desired application, this guitar was great... I'm very happy with it and would buy it again in a heartbeat., "musical_instruments"
It is my son's first guitar and he is learning on it well.  It is still in great condition. good quality Guitar!, "musical_instruments"
this thing plays great!!  action is low but does not buzz, very easy to chord.i highly recomend this guitar., "musical_instruments"
Well constructed with quality woods, saddle/nut and bracing. Neck and frets are straight, level and do not snag. This guitar rings like a bell, stays in tune and is light weight. Do not let the low price fool you but do not expect the guitar to come set up to your tastes. Any guitar that you buy will need to be adjusted to your style of play. The strings may be too high or too light or whatever, just be ready to do a tiny bit of work to get it like you want it then it will serve you well. Do not buy a Luna, Davidson, Main Street, or any other 'no name' - get this one., "musical_instruments"
I normally use nylon picks but do some songs with flatpicking intros and the nylons were to flappy. These picks keep a nice bright tone, very little friction on the strings - so low string noise. Enough grip to stay put in hands well too., "musical_instruments"
I've been buying Dunlop pick for at least 15 years now, and I love the feel and the grip. The picks last for a really long time, and I would recommend getting several thickness' for different applications. But for sitting in a room playing around, with my acoustics and electric guitars this is a decent all round pick, "musical_instruments"
I tried this but ended up going back to Tortex.  I like the satin finish on the Tortex better and the way it bends.  The Ultex has a little brighter attack though and wears out less quickly.  Ultex sounds more like the Fender celluloid., "musical_instruments"
Sounds great. I own 5 different gauges. I like the gripping surface. .90 is my favorite gauge and the rounded tip is super fast., "musical_instruments"
Guitar picks make a huge part of your tone.  Especially on acoustic.  These are the best acoustic picks on the market today in my opinion.  They have a long life and do brighten your tone.  Freshening up the picks is easy just by rubbing them on your carpet or  carpet scrap to bring back the original shape., "musical_instruments"
These are nice, I like the 1.14 rigidity and these are just fine for me... you will wear them out on acoustics though if you are a more aggressive player as I am.  Once these are worn, as with most picks, they sound considerably different.  Much more grainy and tin-y but that may be a plus for you?  I also like the side edges for a real mellow and / or speeding picking style.  They stay in your fingers well., "musical_instruments"
The grip is excellent. But I prefer the 1.14 Sharps over these. These are sturdy and look like I won't be needing another set for quite some time, "musical_instruments"
We all have different tastes in guitar picks, I know,  As I wrote elsewhere, the Dunlop Tortex are awful for acoustic, in my opinion.  These Ultex are much better.  Not as noisy, better feel.  Still not my favorites.  I'll have them with me for spares., "musical_instruments"
I bought the wrong gauge. I read a review that said that you should get a size less then you really want but they are wrong. I bought the .90 gauge at Guitar Center and love them. These were made for that Dave Mustain muted crunch sound. I don't know if I will use these forever but for right now I love them. Just hard enough for speed picking but light enough to stay in your hand without moving around like 1 mils do.Dunlop Ultex sound awesome and so far they still look like new.Buy em!!!!, "musical_instruments"
I love the pick attack with these.  I have used almost everything out there over 20 years of playing and have settled on this pick as my go-to choice for acoustic guitar., "musical_instruments"
Didn't think I'd be compelled to review something like a guitar pick, but the Dunlop Ultex has really impressed me thus far.  I use the .60 thickness, which is equivalent to the orange plastic Dunlop pick.  The orange pick is my favorite for acoustic and most electric playing, but they do wear down and fray on the edges, and have a little more friction that I'd like.This Ultex seems very resistant to wear and has surprisingly little drag over the string.  I find the matte finish very easy to grip and hold.  It gives just enough to use for smooth strumming, while being rigid enough for individual notes.Some reviewers have noted that they crack after some use.  If that turns out to be a problem, I might reconsider my review.  But out of the box, they perform as well as any pick I have used!, "musical_instruments"
Grabbed these on impulse as I needed some new ones. Normally I used the old Fender Medium or Heavy picks, but I gotta say these are great. Stiff but flexible enough to maneuver plus they glide nicely. Not sure what could be said to prove it, but they just feel great., "musical_instruments"
I've used the Tortex picks for a while now, and have been really happy with them. This pick however, takes it to the next level. Very strong and great bite for a relatively thin pick. I use the .73 for acoustic and the same holds true. Great product., "musical_instruments"
This polish was recommended in one of Dan Erlewine's books and it works great.  It really makes the natural high gloss finish on acoustic guitars pop.  The effect isn't as noticeable on darker finishes though.  It really helps on the back of the neck too, makes it slippery and fast.  Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
I got this to clean my Washburn acoustic guitar, and it worked great. I used it to clean off the fingerprints and grime, and then would buff in a circular motion with my soft, lint-free rag, and it would act like a polish. The finish sparkled afterwards, even in the light. Great product., "musical_instruments"
Ive been using this polish since the early 80's. It doesn't smell the way some do and works fantastic on all of my guitars. Wonderful polish and has not hurt my guitars. What has hurt my guitars is me dropping them or sweating all over them, but this polish? No way. Martin knows what they're doing. I use it on my expensive nitrocellulose finishes., "musical_instruments"
Used it once, but once was enough. Had been using Gibson Polish, although it worked fine, just couldn't force myself to use it on my Martin Veterans Model Guitar., "musical_instruments"
This product is excellent.  Cleaning is thorough and leaves no residue.  Made my little Martin look almost as good as new., "musical_instruments"
this is the one that everyone told me I should use, being new to guitar I figured one polish (car) has to work well, that was very incorrect on my part, this is for the delicate woods and preserves them far better than ordinary polishes, "musical_instruments"
I bought this for my son to clean his guitar with. He really likes it a lot. It works very well if you use it with a microfiber cloth. I would buy this product again!, "musical_instruments"
put it in my Fender dreadnaught and only wish i have held out for the the next step up in quality with the mic as well...  Love it to death, had it pertinently installed and love the sound and the versatility.  the built in volume knob it a GREAT tough.  I could go on, but there are reviews on you tube that will do a better Job than here., "musical_instruments"
I like the fact that it can be &#34;partially&#34; installed with the cord coming out of the sound hole or it can be easily installed on a more permanent basis by cutting the cord to length and running it inside the guitar body through the end pin hole (which will have to be enlarged a bit).  Either way, once plugged in, it sounds great.  This pickup maintains the great acoustic sound of my guitar, a Blueridge BR-160.  I installed some Fishman &#34;under the saddle&#34; pickups in a few Martin guitars and this pickup sounds just as good, if not better.  If you don't mind the pickup visible in the sound hole, this is the way to go.  Another nice thing about it is the ease of changing out the batteries as compared to the undersaddle type pickups where the batteries are attached to the inside body of the guitar., "musical_instruments"
This is not a bad product, just not great.  As soon as I received it, I installed it on my custom made Grit Laskin Guitar, and played with it for over two hours.  Installation was fast, and only took a couple of minutes.  My problems with it are 3 fold:  #1.  Sounds just a bit \"tinny\" = too much on the high end, and not an equal amount of bass.  #2.  A small complaint is that you have to dismantle the entire installation just to change the batteries, and I couldn't get mine to work in \"passive\" mode.  #3.  And the biggest complaint, is that the volume control is difficult to get to when you're performing on stage.  You have to stick your finger in the hole on the top side of the strings and fumble around trying to change the volume which is very sensitive so all of sudden you can be too loud or too soft.  Like I said, it is not a bad product, just not top notch, and definitely not for professionals.  If you're just fooling around at home, or recording at home, it is fine, and will do the job for you.  BUT!!!  If you're a pro, you'll want to spend double the money and get an L. R. Baggs M-80.  The M-80 gives you the truest sound (unbelievable), works in passive mode, and is very easy to change the volume control.  Sincerely, Doc, "musical_instruments"
Great pickup, combined with the Fishman Aura Spectrum D.I. you will have an excellent experience.  Even the pick up by itself into a quality amp will make you happy., "musical_instruments"
I was looking for a sound hole pickup and this came as one of the best and found it to be all I expected. I use it for practice and recording myself. I really like it but for the price I wish it had just a bit more otherwise its perfect. I have it on my 1994 Martin D-18  which has a big bottom end and no matter what it always sounds fine. I have had the pickup installed for four months and it is good., "musical_instruments"
What can I say? These are probably the most well-known pads available and probably the best. This was the best price I could find on Amazon and they arrived as described via very prompt shipping., "musical_instruments"
Ok, so I just installed these things for my KRK 6's (no stands...just sitting on two other speakers).  What can I say?  The bass, which previously had disappeared in my studio, is now present again!  My monitors sounded kinda thin before because I was losing so much energy to my desk, but these things have made a ton of difference!  My stereo image even feels wider now!Sure, they're a little pricy, but hey...THEY WORK!  If that's what they want to charge for them, and people continue to buy them, I'm cool with that!  I'm happy with the reults my $40 got me!5/5!, "musical_instruments"
These really do work great. No more desk vibrations and the sound out of my monitors are very clear now. I do only wish i could of found these in a smaller size since they are way bigger then my 5\" monitors. If anyone knows where to get smaller ones let me know. Thanks!, "musical_instruments"
I'm using them to angle my speakers up in addition to isolating them from the desk surface. Unfortunately, these angle the speakers down by default, so I had to do some cutting and rearranging, but it worked out. If you need to cut these to fit your speakers, try to find something better than scissors, because it's quite hard to cut the foam evenly with them., "musical_instruments"
These MoPads are pretty amazing. I recently just purchased the Atlantic 33935701 Gaming Desk so I had a feeling that I would need these pads.These pads are a must for an amateur recording studio setup with little or no acoustic treatment. Sitting your monitors or speakers on these pads will produce an even better quality sound experience and they also will get rid of unwanted bass vibrations from your desk. I love that you can use the extra pads to angle them any way you want for your set up. These pads make my bookshelf speakers sound AMAZING. It's like I'm using actual studio monitors. At $40, you can't go wrong with these pads for you studio. It is a MUST to have these., "musical_instruments"
These are laser cut pads for your studio monitors. I feel more vibration from a hard drive spinning on my desktop than the sounds coming out of my speakers. And they look professional too., "musical_instruments"
Just what I needed for my Home Studio Monitors that sit on the table next to my Computer and my DAW system, was surprised at how many different versions I was sent, they all work well thanks heaps......, "musical_instruments"
The reviewer who wrote that that these are \"cheap foam\" worth $5.00, doesn't understand or appreciate the quality of these speaker isolators. A/B these with some $5.00 cheap foam and you will realize how good these Auralex isolators work. I am using a pair of Behringer Truth active speakers that weigh 33 pounds each. These isolators not only support them very well but solved a big problem I had. It seems my speakers were \"audio coupling\" with the console they were placed on making the console vibrate with the spaekers and muddy up the lower fequencies.My problem started when I noticed that my mixes sounded good on other systems except for the bass frequencies around 80-125 HZ. Apparently my Behringer speakers were not accurately reproducing that fequency range and I was EQing that range badly to compensate. I didn't hear it when I mixed my Hafler M-1 speakers. I was about to give up on the Behringer Truth speakers but I really thought that they sounded excellent on every other frequency and are very detailed in every other range. The Behringers also had all the power I needed (active speakers) and can be played really loud in my studio without any distortion. Except for what I can only describe as a muddy or not clearly detailed low end, I love these speakers. Fortunately I was at a friends studio (a great pro studio) and I saw that he was using the Auralex Isolators under his speakers. He said he loved them. I bought them and placed them under my speakers and remixed a project I had been working on. WOW!! What a difference. It was an immediate difference. The bass is now nicely detailed and that muddy tone is no longer there. I had to reajust the EQ on the lower frequencies (cut them back to almost flat)on the new mix. I immediately bought a 2nd set for my small Hafler speakers. Why take a chance that they were also not reproducing accurately. These isolators are a great product and problem solver that saved me from buying new speakers and discovering that I still had the same problem. \"Cheap foam\"?? I don't think so., "musical_instruments"
Some will argue that these are not necessary for your monitors, however as somebody who has worked in music for more than half their life, I can assure you that, whereas they're not life or death, they do make a significant improvement on the listening process, especially in your project studio. No, they're not going to make your music sound any better, but they will give you a more detailed and accurate bass response when your monitoring. Even cooler is the fact that the pads come with 2 extra pieces of padding that will essentially let you customize the position of the monitors in that you can angle them up or down ever-so-slightly. Lastly, although my monitors fit perfectly on the pads, I can't help but to think that if my monitors were any larger, I would need a second pair, especially if they were positioned horizontally. All and all, overpriced or not; they really make a world of difference., "musical_instruments"
These strings are very bright and full.  They sound great for a couple of weeks and then get a bit dead.  I haven't had any problems with breakage, just a loss of tone over time (seems faster than some other strings I've tried)., "musical_instruments"
As a guitarist who's had the opportunity to work at Guitar Center (back in 1999), trying each type of string on the market was a fairly inexpensive and easy task.  While I'll chose D'Addario EXL's for electric, Martin SP are my top choice for acoustic.  The sound and reliability are unmatched for the money.  They also have a neat bronze shimmer to them...  Granted that's only aesthetic., "musical_instruments"
Ive been trying different strings for years!!!  Ive been stuck on elixirs for some time now and wanted a change.  These are very bright and clean!!!!  very playable!!!, "musical_instruments"
I have tried different brands and weights of strings in search of the ones that would give my guitar a clear, bright, yet robust sound, and I found that in the Martin MSP 4050 SP strings. I knew I had found, &#34;my strings&#34; after a short time playing with these. They are light on the fingers, sound great, and priced right., "musical_instruments"
Martin makes a variety of good sounding strings, and these are toward the light end.  The sound is bright, but lacks a fullness found with some of the heavier strings such asMartin MSP4150 SP Phosphor Bronze Acoustic Guitar Strings, Light-Medium.The custom light are easier to play and have a bright tone to them, but can make a guitar sound like a cheaper model compared to the Light-Medium. Some disadvantages to the thinner strings are that they can limit your dynamics. If you strum harder, they are more stretchy and the tuning will be less consistent, changing the tone for the same reason a \"bend\" would. If you play at a fairly consistent sound level you can expect more of a bright sound than a resonant one.On the other hand, compared to some other brands with more of a dampened sound, the brightness can make an instrument sound quite good.Depending on your style, these might be a good choice. If you are used to playing a solid body electric with a lighter feel to the strings that make medium strings uncomfortable, these might seem more at home.  If you are used to Martin medium strings, but want something that you can play for a few extra hours a day without feeling as if you are overdoing things, you might like these too, but when you pick up a guitar with the Martin Medium strings, you may find that even a cheaper guitar sounds better in comparison to these on a more upscale one.I wouldn't say I dislike these, and I wouldn't quite say that those who gave it five stars oversold them, because they may deserve five stars for your particular needs. But as an all around choice, there are better sounding ones from Martin. But it's a moot point if you don't feel comfortable playing them. Make sure to read a variety of reviews before deciding because there are other equally valid viewpoints just as each player is unique., "musical_instruments"
I bought these to put on my really old Martin acoustic. The guitar still sounds amazing, and these strings certainly fit my budget, and provide a great sound., "musical_instruments"
These are one of the best strings I've used. I'm a blues guitarist so they take a beating well. Very much worth the cost and I thank Amazon for having them!, "musical_instruments"
These are good strings, for a good price.  I have purchased these strings several times and they sound good and last a long time., "musical_instruments"
These strings retain a good feeling for a long time, well past the point of them needing changed because they've lost brightness., "musical_instruments"
But these seemed to work well on the guitar I was re-stringing. My son thought they were great and he knows quite a bit more.Recommend., "musical_instruments"
I bought these a while ago but just got around to using them last week. I don't ever remember the non wound strings being bronze but these are. To me it looks weird but they sound so much better than my ancient strings that were on there., "musical_instruments"
Brand name, good string, good tone, seem to last awhile but I change strings often so never really know how long a set will last., "musical_instruments"
I used to use Elixir Nano string, and a good as they sound, they do not last. These do. great sounding strings., "musical_instruments"
I've used these strings on all my acoustics and even gave some to a band mate.  They seem to keep their tone for a long time and don't change the instrument tone like some strings I've tried.  Like a lot of folks, I'm not that picky about my strings, but for those who are, this is a good light string that will sound great on your acoustic., "musical_instruments"
These strings are great sounding, and great looking on the fretboard, because they are bronze. One issue I had, was the 5th and 6th strings were too big to route more than once through the tuning head, but it still wound up very nicely. I would actually say that you might want to get the Extra Light gauge, but it's probably just my tuning machines, they kind of suck., "musical_instruments"
These are the best acoustic money can buy in my opinion. They play extremely well and last a Long time. There's nothing better than these strings., "musical_instruments"
I have a 1993 Taylor which is in mint condition. I always use Martin on any acoustic. I bought the Taylor about 6 months ago and have found that the Medium Martin Strings are best for this particular guitar ... every acoustic is different though., "musical_instruments"
Fast shipping, great price and most of all great stings, very satisfied would buy these strings again and would recommend to a friend., "musical_instruments"
Long story short, this string set has a strong metallic character, which distorts the natural sound of your guitar so much. Many people might like it, but for me, absolutely Noooooooo!I have a seagull guitar, so by its nature it sounds mellow, warm and mild with stock strings. So when my strings wear out, I got this. Now I feel like playing an EMG bridge on my fender/archtop's neck position, WITHOUT the power that an EMG pickup has to offer. Yes, it is that bad, you can't do this to guitars like Seagulls...Bottom line, I recommend this string set for people looking to boost distortion on their guitar. If you have guitars like seagulls or so, definitely avoid this string., "musical_instruments"
If your not sure what to buy you are prob looking for the light strings. These are a littl ehard to play., "musical_instruments"
These were purchased for my sons guitar. He loves them. I plan on buying him another set of them for Christmas., "musical_instruments"
I really like the mediums.  They are able to play the biggest variety of styles without being to heavy or not durable enough., "musical_instruments"
The Martin MSP4200 SP Phosphor Bronze Acoustic Guitar Strings, Medium  are very good strings that are just below strings like Elixer's except they are much much less expensive., "musical_instruments"
With a nice clean, crisp sound, inexpensive price, and durable history, I've made these strings apart of my acoustic set. I've got at least 6 spares at home right now. XD, "musical_instruments"
I am not a connoisseur but nothing great about these strings.  They have pretty good sound but they seem to die quickly., "musical_instruments"
I've used these strings for quite a while now. They have a fantactic tonal quality and longevity. If you're looking for a good string that last a fair amount of time before dead string syndrome hits... I'd recommend these., "musical_instruments"
They sent me the 1mm (Blue) by mistake but it turns out I prefer that size after testing it out.  Fast shipping.  I play bass rock/metal, "musical_instruments"
These are nice and sturdy picks.They sound real clean.I'm having better luck with them on the heavier acoustic strings.I still have to get used to the harder picks for my electrics., "musical_instruments"
I used to swear by Hard and stiff picks on my Les Paul Custom, but I recently bought a Strat '62 re-issue--and these are TOO MUCCH FUN for fast rhythms with a WAH or Phase 90 (phaser) pedals!!!, "musical_instruments"
Just the perfect pick I was looking for, I've tried experimenting with several types of picks. Finally found the right one!, "musical_instruments"
arrived on time..packaged well. happy with purchase...they are your regular picks..will order again if needed. happy with purchase. hope you enjoy em..., "musical_instruments"
I have tried few picks, textured, mallow color, and this bright green.  I like it bright color that is very easy to found, and 0.88mm seems right for me to strumming on an acoustic guitar., "musical_instruments"
They work as well as any Dunlop pick; they don't crack, which is a big plus if you use the general Fender variety.  I go a little thicker than I would for regular plastic picks, because they get flimsy after a while.  Take note of the price of the picks and the shipping cost - it might be cheaper for you just to go to your nearest music store., "musical_instruments"
I've used everything you can think of in the way of picks and the Tortex are one of my favorites. I have at least 100 of them in various thickness' and these and the Claytons, are all I need. The Claytons are great too, but there are times that I want a different thichness and with the Tortex and Claytons you can find the perfect pick for anything you want to play. They last forever and have a great grip.You gotta try them out, "musical_instruments"
I bought the .73 mm picks & I would consider them medium thickness. If you like lighter get the smaller thickness or if you like heavy go for the larger thickness. The .73 mm is right for me, I really like them., "musical_instruments"
Love these picks. Have used them for years. Feel very firm yet still flex when needed and last forever. Highly recommend., "musical_instruments"
I've always used Planet Waves nails but I wanted to try the Dunlop buying me this little package. A very good experience. Durable, comfortable and of a texture that makes it easy to use and does not allow them to slip easily., "musical_instruments"
I know that pick choosing is a personal matter. I choose this specific model because the thickness and flexibility are perfect for me., "musical_instruments"
I use Dunlop Orange because the thickness is perfect. I hit the strings very, very hard and these picks are heavy enough to get the job done yet I don't break many strings., "musical_instruments"
i've been using these tortex picks for a few years now and won't buy any others.  they feel great, don't fall out of my hands, and have a decent life span (plus the turtle logo is sweet), "musical_instruments"
Great picks for beginners and pros alike! Go for these thinner picks if you like more versatility in your playing., "musical_instruments"
I think Tortex / Delrin picks are the standard that others are judged by.Durable, good to gripping surface, easy to identify thicknesses by color.The only way I can think of to improve these would be to replace the black ink logo and script with some sort of raised embossing.Then your fingers will not smudge and the grip would be even better.Take a look at \"Cactus Picks\" to get an idea of what I mean., "musical_instruments"
I've been a huge fan of dunlop picks for a long time. I started playing 15 years ago, and used the slim, floppy picks for a long time. As time went on and my guitar skills grew, I needed a pick that was sturdy, and wouldn't flex to play more intricate and detailed songs.The tortex purples are my favorite, and they're the thickest ones I can find. I like the soft sandy feel of these. They don't slip out of your hand easily, and because they're so thick, they take a long time to wear out., "musical_instruments"
I like the picks a lot! They are super strong and look like can take a lot of use in a good shape! Recommended, "musical_instruments"
Yes.  The 1.0mm Tortex picks are BLUE!  I was quite surprised at the number of reviewers that complained for not getting a multi-color pack.  If anyone has ever been to ANY guitar shop, the Tortex Picks are all color coded!Anyway, I've been playing guitar for about 15 years.  I've been using the Blue Tortex picks for about 14.  At first I messed around with all the different picks I could get my hands on.  Teardrops were too small; Fender brand were too slippery; Guitar Center brand wore out too quickly; the Jim Dunlop nylon picks just felt too weird to me.  The 1.0mm Tortex give just the right sound on the attack, don't feel too flimsy in my fingers (I keep a tight grip) and the grip on them is far superior to any on the market (gator grips feel too porous for me.)  Durability wise, I'll lose the pick before it even comes close to wearing out!, "musical_instruments"
Whatever size you are looking for Dunlop is the best option. It lasts long, sounds great, and feels very nice. It is probably the most favored pick among all companies. I recommend the orange one for beginners, and in general would not go much higher than the green ones because when it gets too heavy it does not feel to comfortable anymore and does not sound as well, but it is totally up to what you want. Either way, Dunlop is the best and for a great price., "musical_instruments"
I've always used these dunlop picks, I've tried other ones like fender, other dunlop picks as well but these just feel right, I've never like the thicker picks or the picks with the weird grips on them these just feel right when playing, give them a try! ... if not you'll just wind up with a cool little turtle tortex sticker instead, "musical_instruments"
I've been playing guitar for over 40 years, and these Tortex picks are nearly the worst I'v ever used.  They are so noisy that they overpower the guitar strings with their clackity-clack noise.  Dunlop Ultex picks sound much better., "musical_instruments"
thankfully i still have most of these picks. i'm always losing them, but they work super well and i will always buy this brand from now on., "musical_instruments"
I was looking for something that was able to bend a bit but not fall out of shape or stay bent after much use and these are great.  They have good tension but still sound nice with my acoustic and the grip is great.  It's almost like a microscopic layer of felt is on these.  It sucks when your hands are cold and the pick keeps slipping out of your fingers...you don't want to keep licking your fingers or breather warm air on them and these are easy to hold onto no matter the condition., "musical_instruments"
I've been using these picks for 10+ years, they've always been great.  Between these blues and the yellow, I'm covered., "musical_instruments"
I love these picks.  The flex is just right for me, and they last forever.  I have never had one break., "musical_instruments"
If you don't know what type of pick you like, buy a sample pack. Picks make a big difference to sound and playability. These are thin and flexible. Easier to use for beginners and easier for strumming in general. However the tone is different. So you'll need to decide what songs they work for, etc.As far as quality, these are great. Easy to grip, and as durable as most., "musical_instruments"
Good picks, great feel and brings out sound loudly. Mostly for Electrics. I prefer the lighter sound of the Acoustic but these work very well with my friends Electric, Fender., "musical_instruments"
I used to use a lot thinner pick until reading an article from Paul Gilbert saying that in order to play fast you need a minimum of 1mm. These things are great and yes, I can shred faster now!, "musical_instruments"
If you thought a pick is a pick (like I once did long ago) you would probably come to realize that it would be a mistake to assume that position as your playing and playing strength increases in attack and/or complexity.I use the Dunlop Tortex 1.14mm Purples.Early on in my playing I was using thin to medium picks but read in a guitar magazine along with hearing from several friends that a heavy pick is better. Why? After messing about I found that the player is able to fully control the pick and not let the pick interfere with input and attack.  The interference with a thin or medium pick is that it has give, or slackens when attacking hard. With a heavy gauge pick that lack of rigidity or slack is only introduced by the player and not through the picks flexibility.I tried it and liked it and have been using heavy gauge picks since the mid '80's.I like the Dunlops feel, grip, and durability. They hold up for a very long time. How long? I have had some last a few years. They are an incredible bargain given the long lasting durability.My students use them too, I don't demand it, but I do stress the control aspects with picks of different gauges.Highly recommended. You won't be disappointed., "musical_instruments"
Finally decided in getting the 1.00mm picks because I don't like them too thin or too thick, this was the perfect gauge I was looking and hoping for. The logo will wear out in a few uses but I don't much about that. Been using it on a daily basis to practice and so far it's not wearing out too fast. Recommended!, "musical_instruments"
I think these are great for the price they give you. John Mayer uses these picks and hes one of my favorite guitarist so I am sticking with these., "musical_instruments"
I've used these picks for years with great results. If you've never used this stile picks you won't be sorry., "musical_instruments"
In a fit of boredom or curiosity, I decided that I would check out some the other picks out there.  After spending too much money for various brands of picks, including every model of the DAVA picks, I came back home to Dunlop Tortex green.  They stil play great, sound great against steel strings, and last a long time., "musical_instruments"
These will pluck Guitar and Bass strings decently. If you want one set to cover both applications, this is a good choice., "musical_instruments"
I like it.  Grip is good and the thickness is just right for me.  I wish the tip was sharper but it is good as is, "musical_instruments"
Tortex is great i really like their picks there may be better but these have fit the bill i prefer the yellow ones they are a little thinner, "musical_instruments"
The thickness of the pick you use is a matter of personal preference. For my style, the .60 Dunlop Tortex is perfect.  The surface is matte and not too slick.  I don't think I have ever worn one down to being unusable; they seem to last forever (or until they're lost).  I've tried other brands and picks made of other materials, but I always come back to these. I'll probably be buried with one in my hand!, "musical_instruments"
i ordered one pack of these and got an entire box!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! either way the picks are great although i would suggest the Jazz picks over these, "musical_instruments"
I always keep a lot of these on hand.  These are the only picks I use when playing my acoustic guitars (strumming style & vocals).  Since I play for several hours nearly every day I have a tendency to go through a lot of picks.  These definitely last longer for me than other brands (similar weight) that I have used.  For example, I can &#34;round-off&#34; the end off a Musician's Gear pick or a Fender pick in about an hour or so of playing and seem to get much more mileage out of these picks.  The weight is great for my style of playing.  They seem more durable than other brands.  They're inexpensive and since I play a lot of hours I always keep lots of these on hand.  I love 'em, use them daily, and rely on them !!!, "musical_instruments"
I love the Tortex .50mm picks (red).  I have one that's over 4 years old and still going strong!  Yes, the turtle and writing eventually get rubbed off, but they never leave black residue on the pick or the strings.  I use the red, yellow, and orange Tortex's exclusively for practice and performance (I'm a church worship leader).  My highest recommendation., "musical_instruments"
I love these picks for playing my acoustic. They give such a nice, crisp tone and the perfect amount of flex for playing acoustic. For me I prefer a slightly thicker pick for playing electric, probably a .70 or .80 but I still like the tortex picks for that as well. And these picks are inexpensive enough that you can keep an endless supply., "musical_instruments"
These guitar picks are just the best. Simply put. They are easy to grip onto, even when your hands are sweaty from rocking out all day. Highly recommended. I will never use any other guitar pick other than a Dunlop Tortex. I use the green 88mm picks, and also the orange 60mm ones. I recommend you buy both the green picks and orange picks. Great for beginners or the pros., "musical_instruments"
I enjoyed this set very much due to the variety of picks, as it was interesting to try different models. Dunlop picks are great!, "musical_instruments"
As a kid I learned to play the trombone proficiently, but my heart wasn't really in it, so I took up the guitar, which I love. I played for several years but stopped playing for lack of time. I recently started playing again and was looking for the perfect pick for classic rock (I have an old Ibanez and a Les Paul Custom) and have tried several picks in that quest. There are several I have liked (and several that I haven't) but thus far my favorite is the 1.0mm Tortex (blue) picks. They have a very nice, almost powdery, matte feel that minimizes slippage and they just don't break, though the 1.0s are fairly stiff. Depending on what you are playing there are various thicknesses available, and most people will find something suitable for their personal preferences. I won't say that I will never try anything else, but thus far I find myself picking up my 1.0 Tortex more than other picks., "musical_instruments"
I don't seem to drop these at all as compared to other picks I have used in the past that just seemed to slip...., "musical_instruments"
I absolutely love the feel of these guitar picks! They are so grippy, I haven't broken a single one yet, they stand out from all of the other junk in my studio, so it's hard to loose them, but I still do. If you have like a child, nephew, niece, sibling, or parent that plays guitar or bass you can't go wrong with getting these for them, or if you are a guitarist just playing the cheap little Fender picks that break if you strum a chord, and if you are lucky enough not to break them, they just slip out of your hands while you're playing. They are a little thin for rhythm playing however, and I recommend the .88 mm picks for that., "musical_instruments"
my favorite picks. Can't go wrong with tortex. the only habit I have with picks if just chewing on them and destroying them so I have to buy like a ton of them, "musical_instruments"
i've used pick when i play most of time and i used white color thinnest one. i like to use thin ones because i play strumming most of time and this one works perfect. very easy to grip and last long. one thing to point out is that print on pick fades away very quickly but i do not mind. highly recommand this for anyone needs pick!, "musical_instruments"
These are such comfortable picks... I love the texture on them, which makes them easy to hold without being distractingly aggressive like some of the other picks' textures. This is subtle yet effective. My favorite pick now., "musical_instruments"
They feel very nice with a soft touch finish on them. Fair priced and I love the color of the green ones. I like the .88 mm because its just the right mix of medium and hard; great for someone looking to play blues or rock. Cheap and easy to use, can't beat these picks!, "musical_instruments"
Great picks, buy it. This pick, rocks for me, im a fan of dunlop for many years and all there products are amazing., "musical_instruments"
I have always used tortex picks. I like them a lot and they last forever (almost :)these were a little thick for my tastes. The red ones are a little thinner and give better action for strumming and also for fast alternate picking patterns.If you like a medium thick pick though, these are rockin., "musical_instruments"
This is the pick I learned to play with.Great feel, doesn't slip in sweaty fingers.Good tone, you can get plenty of use from one pick, as they hold up very well!, "musical_instruments"
good deal., "musical_instruments"
I have been using Dunlop picks for a long time. Good feel, grip and not too heavy or thick. Good deal., "musical_instruments"
I prefer nylon picks because they have a softer feel on the strings to my ear - less \"clicky\" - than a standard plastic pick.  My favorites are Snarling Dogs Brain Picks which are very similar to these.  I guess when it comes right down to it these are essentially the same, I just have more of the Brain Picks at this point, so I use them more.  But these Dunlop nylon picks are excellent.  They're almost impossible to drop, they sound and feel just right to me, and they last seemingly forever.  Hard to go wrong with these if you like nylon picks., "musical_instruments"
I can't hear the sounds of the strings over the flick of these flimsy picks across them. better for electric guitar but still hard to play fast, "musical_instruments"
Ever since I started playing the guitar, I've used the nylon Dunlop picks. They're better in a thicker size (1.0mm or larger) but the .73mm size is about the same thickness as a regular Fender pick. They're flexible and easy to pick with, but the biggest plus about the nylon picks is that they will NOT break. You'd almost have to melt one of these things with a lighter to harm it -- so one pack of them will last you yeeeeears.Also of note: the price keeps going up on these here on Amazon for some reason -- don't pay more than $3-4 for a pack of them, as you can get them at your local music store for about that., "musical_instruments"
I bought these because I wanted durable, flexible picks for easy strumming. I would recomend these to anyone that needs more stable strumming., "musical_instruments"
I like thin picks myself, and this one is VERY thin. You won'tuse it all the time, but every now and then it can be used in the right situation. If you are a player who is somewhat meat-fisted when it comes to playing and needs to take the edge off, it is ideal. Also, if you are doing very soft strumming on an acoustic guitar, it is awesome. No power chords with this little guy, but it is a good tool to have in the tool box when you need it. The non-slippery texture and it's grippy textured surface of Dunlops is what I love about them the most, it makes them easier to hold on to. I give them a thumbs up!, "musical_instruments"
They're just great.  Awesome for chord based songs.  If you need to pick individual notes/strings, then you might want to go a bit thicker.  With that said, you can do it with these, but the tone is not as nice (sounds a bit softer)., "musical_instruments"
I am a bass player so I like my picks to be a bit thicker and wider. I tend to Play with Fender 346 so I was pleasantly surprised when I found that this pick worked really well for me., "musical_instruments"
I would give these picks five stars, but I do have a couple of other types I prefer more.  Still, these are nice picks.  So far I've only used them on 12-string guitar, but I'll soon be trying them out on 6-string guitars., "musical_instruments"
They're very thin nylon picks. They're good for practicing the hand motions of strumming; they put up very little resistance, so they train you to keep your hand stable. I still sometimes play with them since they give a really nice bright tone, but I usually want something thicker in order to be able to flatpick melody lines in between strums. I also sometimes use them when practicing flatpicking, since flatpicking with a really thin pick reveals things about your body mechanics that you don't notice with a thicker pick.They're great for what they are (thin, flexible picks), and Amazon has the best price., "musical_instruments"
cant go wrong with Dunlop pick, they last and don't break. end up losing them verses breaking. This .38 mm is a bit soft for my liking, will go a size thicker next time~, "musical_instruments"
These just don't have the right feel and the sound isn't that great compared to other materials.The quality control is so so. The picks aren't cleanly cut out they are injection molded and as a result they are left with a thin trim all around them.I'll stick with Dunlop Gator Grip .96mm or PRS 1.0 picks. For more flexibility or acoustic, I prefer Fender Medium Celluloid picks., "musical_instruments"
yes, i think you should try these.  if you're looking at them, then get them.  they are thin and flexible so i purchased them to develop my pick skills as i was a finger type guy w/o any pick experience.  i don't drop these and get a feel for where the sting is located w/o looking., "musical_instruments"
These have been my favorite picks, for decades now. They grip very well, and last forever, and they're a tiny bit more muted than other, more &#34;plasticky&#34; picks., "musical_instruments"
I've used the .60mm and .73mm Dunlop Nylon picks during my entire professional music career.  I rock hard. Acoustic, electric, and Bass!  I've tried almost every other pick on the market and they break far too easily.  Dunlop's Nylon picks don't break, and once you find the thickness that fits your needs, you'll find that they have excellent string attack and are easily kept in grip. I rarely ever drop one of these picks while preforming. Maybe 5 times in my entire career.  Buy these picks., "musical_instruments"
Im not loyal to brands on the whole but when I reach for a pick I hope this is the one I get. They wear out and get nicks so I have to remember to keep ordering them.Edit: Watch the Steve Vai interview where he shares his secret for restoring the edge of worn, nicked, picks. Rapidly,firmly wipe the pick edge against a carpet. The motion is as if you were trying to cut into the carpet with the edge of the pick, repeat 3 or 4 times and whadda u know! The edge is now smooth and nice., "musical_instruments"
I've been using Dunlop Nylons for almost as long as I've been playing guitar (twenty one years now). I find the .60's are just a bit too thin, but for more chord strumming style playing, such as playing rhythm, the .73's are perfect. They are flexible, but not flimsy. The tips will wear down after a while as with all picks. I estimate that a solid thirty to forty hours of playing is all you'll get with a pristine tip. However, they're definitely still usable after that. One other advantage these picks have is that they never break. So, i dont see how you can go wrong., "musical_instruments"
These Dunlop 88 mm picks are the right size, not to big or too small.  Been using these for years.  Always good to have extras on hand and put into the cases.  They never wear out.  They are not too stiff or too flimsy.  They work good for the sound on the strings.  Easy to hold on to., "musical_instruments"
I ordered these because I bought a variety pack of picks from Musician's Friend and there was one lonesome very thin celluloid pick in the pack. I loved how it quieted the strumming on my acoustic dreadnought, so I went on the hunt for very thin picks. The celluloid one fell apart quickly, so I wanted a better material.These white nylon picks should last a lot longer. The non-pointed end is all grippy (textured), so it doesn't work great if you like to use the more rounded corners of a pick, but it does the job and I like it. The pointed end is very thin and slides off the strings nicely, but you can still pick with it if you're combining picking and strumming.I'll keep using thicker picks for picking-only songs and for louder strumming, but for more mellow strumming and to keep from bothering other folks in the house, these are great.UPDATE: I've been using them for more than a year now, and they are pretty flimsy for picking notes in a mostly-strumming song... but you can do it. This is still my favorite pick for strumming. Hope this helps., "musical_instruments"
OK, so picks are a very personal thing to guitarists. I've been playing for about 30 years now and have used many different brands an types of pick. There is no 1 perfect pick for everything, depending on what your playing and your playing style you'll want to choose different thickness and materials. However, I have found this line of pick to be my favorite and my general goto pick. My hands sweat and the textured grips on these do a fantastic job of keeping the pick in my hand on not on the floor. I also really like the Nylon material. It produces a softer sound without dampening , "musical_instruments"
These picks are nylon, so each one will last you a couple of years (as long as you don't lose them!!) this is thicker than the .60mm, so you can dig into the strings a little better, but still a hair flimsier than the Snarling Dogs .73mm picks (I know, they're the same size, but trust me these are &#34;flimsier&#34;), and the grip is ok. You can't go wrong here., "musical_instruments"
alright I got tired of forking over 30 cent a pick at my local guitar store for instant gratification and decided to get some more online, and let me tell you, these picks get the job done. don't expect to be playing metal with these as they are on the soft side but work well for casual playing along with some heavy palm mutes and stuff like that. a few of the tips broke off but I think that's my fault for playing too hard :) Great picks, would recommend to anyone., "musical_instruments"
I use the Dunlop .60mm nylon picks as my current standard,  but decided to give the lighter .38mm a try.  Unfortunately,  the volume they produce get completely swallowed up when accompanying singing with an acoustic guitar (especially in an outdoor picnic setting),  and basically unusable for that purpose.  However, I did find these were just the ticket for personal practice, allowing me to hear a  metronome or backtrack far easier.  So although they failed my original performance intention, 5 stars for filling a need I didn't even know I had.  :), "musical_instruments"
This nylon pick has great play feel.  It is stiff enough to pick individual strings and still feels comfortable stumming chords., "musical_instruments"
i like these kind of picks because they have some grip to them, normal picks i use slip out of my fingers some times but these dont.if you hate droping your pick while playing,get these., "musical_instruments"
These picks are nice and thin, just what I was looking for in a pick.  They seem durable so far and the light color makes them easy to see when you drop one or set it down.  I'm satisfied with these picks., "musical_instruments"
This picks are comfortable, nice quality. They'll get dirty as they are cream (or white as I see) but worth it!! Wanna play fast? take these n try em out, "musical_instruments"
These picks have just the right amount of give to really make strumming sound nice and clean. Very forgiving on technique also. Great for beginners., "musical_instruments"
I only use Dunlops. For a number of reasons. First, the texture of the plastic gives a good sound, and easier to hold on to. Second, the \"grippy\" texture they put on them makes them easier to hold on to. Thirdly, they make many sizes, for all the right occasions. Two thumbs up! Use these for general acoustic guitar strumming, they are not too thin and not too thick. I use the .60mm, .48mm, and .38mm. sizes., "musical_instruments"
i purchased the .38mm and these (.46mm).  after using the .38mm and learning how to use the pick now i feel better using these.  i like the small amount of texture provided in the grip area.  not too much, but at least something., "musical_instruments"
Normally I prefer a harder pick but I switch to these after 9pm when playing my acoustic guitar to keep the peace with the neighbors. These super light flexible nylon picks are great if you're trying to play quietly. If you prefer a flexible, softer pick as many people do these are also excellent for your regular go to pick., "musical_instruments"
ive been using dunlop nylon standard picks since the early 80s. they have never let me down. very comfortable in the hand., "musical_instruments"
I'm not sure what else to say. The picks work well and they don't wear out easily. I like these because they have a nice grip and when my fingers get sweaty they don't slide out., "musical_instruments"
the are last forever! much better than plastic ones, especially if you stay in the light thickens.  TH ANK you!, "musical_instruments"
The .6 MM pick has just the right amount of flexibility without flapping around like thinner picks. And the dunlop nylon standard is my first choice for mountain dulcimer playing. I know people use yogurt containers, credit cards, bird feathers and even coffee stirrers for picks, but for me, the consistency of the Dunlop pick can't be beaten. And the price is right, too!, "musical_instruments"
I only use Dunlops. For a number of reasons. First, the texture of the plastic gives a good sound, and easier to hold on to. Second, the \"grippy\" texture they put on them makes them easier to hold on to. Thirdly, they make many sizes, for all the right occasions. Two thumbs up!, "musical_instruments"
Perfect fit for me. I don't like a pick that is to stiff, and I like the grip. My hands sweat a lot so I really need the grip., "musical_instruments"
Durable and affordable. The .60mm is a perfect thickness for those looking to strum and occasionally pick., "musical_instruments"
I'm an Irish-style DADGAD guitarist.  These picks cut through the string really nicely, and are great for driving rhythms.  I'm starting to lean towards the Tortex .5mm, though -- I think the roughness on the surface of the Dunlops adds a little bit of scratch to the sound that I don't like.  Still, great picks., "musical_instruments"
I've used the .60mm and .73mm Dunlop Nylon picks during my entire professional music career. I rock hard. Acoustic, electric, and Bass! I've tried almost every other pick on the market and they break far too easily. Dunlop's Nylon picks don't break, and once you find the thickness that fits your needs, you'll find that they have excellent string attack and are easily kept in grip. I rarely ever drop one of these picks while preforming. Maybe 5 times in my entire career. Buy these picks., "musical_instruments"
Pretty flexible due to the 0.60mm thickness, I would recommend the Dunlop Max Grip picks over these picks.  The Max Grips have a much better grip.Please click YES if my review have been helpful to you, it will encourage me to continue writing and updating my reviews, and leave a comment if you have any questions, I will be more than happy to answer if I can be of help., "musical_instruments"
I like a flexible pick and these at .60mm work just fine.  They are also in a good color so they don't stand out too much., "musical_instruments"
i'm a beginner on play guitar and most time i play strumming in church praise team. when i play faster songs, thick gauge picks are very easy to lose. so i like to play with thin gauge picks. i have used the 0.46mm (white)one and i want to make the guitar sound more brighter. i pick this gray one and i played last friday and sunday worship, it made sound that i desired and it wouldn't fly away from my hand while i was plying fast praise songs., "musical_instruments"
As a vast multitude of guitar players will solemnly agree, we all have experienced the search for the personal Holy Grail of guitar picks.  I am no exception.  Dozens and dozens of makers, styles, shapes, gages,  materials,  price ranges, (oh ya, the 30 dollar picks), you name it, I've tried it (even nail picking on metal strings).  Now if you are new to the &#34;perfect pick quest&#34;, you must understand that picks are as subjective as scent, with personal grip, sound interaction, a host of music ingredients making your Grail different.  However, if you play a light metal-string acoustic (my main is an Aria AF tenor guitar), check out these Dunlops .60 Nylons.Even within the Dunlop line, I have tried the different grips and thickness gages, and after all said and done, these relatively cheap picks are all that have remained standing as my first choice.  Just heavy enough to be heard unplugged without folding the pick around my thumb, light enough to strum fluidly without yanking at my lighter strings, just the right material to keep my low strings thumping and my high strings singing.  Even the Dunlop Nylon Max grip of the same .60 gage didn't acoustically perform quite the same.Would I try another pick if the chance was presented?  Sure, most of us would since the quest for the Holy Grail never truly ends,  but until then, Dunlop's .60 Nylon is without hesitation the closest thing I have gotten to pick perfection., "musical_instruments"
These just happen to be my favorite.I always keep .46mm .60mm and .73mm sizes on hand. (mostly use the .60's) I've been using them for years and so will probably never change. I like the 'grippiness' of them .... I hate smooth picks.Picks are cheap so just keep trying different ones until you find one you like., "musical_instruments"
I think many/most guitarists are always on the lookout for new things and picks are and easy and cheap thing to try.  My favorite picks for the last ~8 years are Snarling Dogs Brain Picks - they're nylon picks that have a raspy \"cat's tongue\" surface that makes it super easy to grip.I've also had a few of these Gator Grip picks for a few years now and I like them quite a bit, but they're not my favorite.  I tend to use something around or just under 1 mm for electric and a bit less than that for acoustic.  These picks have a matte finish which makes it easy to retain your grip on them.  Sound-wise I don't find that they're significantly different from any other pick.  If they ever stop making Brain Picks these could very well become my #1., "musical_instruments"
I've been using the Dunlop Delrin 500 2.0 picks.  Purple ones with the turtle/500 on them.  I thought I had found my pick.  Because they were so slippery, I had to rough up each side to have enough texture to improve the grip (I'd rub each flat side against the edge of a honing stone).  At the music store I stumbled on the Dunlop Gator Grip 2.0.  Yes they do offer a better grip (I think they're still a little slippery but much better than the Delrin 500).  But since I solved that problem with the honing stone, I was more curious.  So - again, they are better, grip wise, but I was very surprised at the difference in tone.  They give a much mellower tone than the 500s and since I'm using these with flat wound 12s on an archtop - the less bright sound often is a better t, "musical_instruments"
Smooth sound and attack. Grips soft, loose, and yet well. I own HUNDREDS of picks. These are some of my favorites., "musical_instruments"
I've been playing for more than 30 years. There are a lot of great products out there and I've tried a lot of them. I have to say that the feel and tone of these grey Dunlop Gatorgrip 2mm picks surpasses the Dunlop yellow gels, Fender 351 X-heavies, and Golden Gate or Dawg mandolin picks. This is just my opinion, but I hope you'll check them out because I'm sure you won't be disappointed!, "musical_instruments"
It's a pick... everyone has their preference, but I happen to like the 1.14's a lot and the &#34;powder-y&#34; grip on these is a real bonus.  It take a bit to wear that off but they are still good when they are &#34;clean&#34; as well., "musical_instruments"
I use the 1.5 mm Dunlop Gator Grip for twenty years. The non-slip surface doesn't take long to wear off, but I have a work-around. I've even put them in a vice, and filed new points on them. I prefer an extra heavy pick because there's no delay from pick deflection., "musical_instruments"
You can't go wrong with these picks if you enjoy a full size pick.  They have a better grip and a more full sound (to my ears) over the Tortex picks.  I have since went to the Jazz picks but these picks are a solid product., "musical_instruments"
This pick is great for strumming. Some people are complaining about the grip but they are better than celluloid picks in that regard. If you are looking for the best grip you need to find a pick that has a textured grip., "musical_instruments"
Since they were named &#34;Gator Grip&#34; I expected them to have a good gripping surface.  That was not the case.  The entire material and holding surface is the same material.  Also they weren't as large as I expected.  They are still usable as decent picks., "musical_instruments"
I'm glad I tried these, I wont order them again. I thought they might be a good alternate for my Dunlop nylon picks, not really though.Edit: Im nothing if not fair. My last review of these was in the context of my playing my Strat or sometimes my 335. I stand by that review. However, now Im playing my Godin 5th Ave and suddenly these picks are perfect. Ive gone back and forth trying different picks with my guitars. In the end these are the picks I reach for when Im playing the Godin.I will buy these again. I changing my review from 'Just Okay' to \"Contextually Perfect\". Ok I'll add a star, your right I should add a star. There!, "musical_instruments"
These have been my favorite pick for years now but, I must say that they are not real pointy and I have recently been trying some pointier pick and I'm now on the fence..., "musical_instruments"
I started doing a lot of fingerstyle guitar playing, and it seems to have made my fingertips slick.  So I have a hard time holding on to picks (when I use them) on upstrokes.  I'm sure I could improve my technique and fix the problem, but it's more fun to blame the pick!  These picks were no different from picks without the &#34;gator grip&#34; IMHO.  But Gorilla Snot worked beautifully., "musical_instruments"
I've been trying to find a pick which combines a good grip, the right string resonance for strumming, and enough stiffness for accurate picking and these picks might be the closest I've found so far for my style of playing. I'm a naturally hard strummer so I want a pick that I can hold more loosely, strum more softly, and still get enough clarity and volume. I want to give them 5 stars but I think that would only apply if they were perfect for strumming and picking - they're very good for both but not quite what I would consider the ideal pick for me if one exists. If I were perfectly satisfied with these picks I would never buy any other picks. For now these are my preferred picks but I will keep experimenting with other brands and types of picks in search of that elusive ideal., "musical_instruments"
First, I love these picks and used them exclusively for years.  I have dozens of them, they never wear out.  I used to use them when playing in a loud rock band, and never had any issues.  They are very comfortable, and easy to control.Now the bad: the sound.  Not the sound of the plucked not itself, but the hard plastic of the pick against the string makes a very noticeable \"plinking\" sound that is audible through your amp.  If all you're playing is loud music, this may not be an issue.  But I essentially stopped using them when I started playing in a different band with more dynamics, because during quieter passages the plinking sound of the pick on the strings is VERY noticeable to me.So, too bad.  I think these are great picks, but I'd like them to be made of a softer material., "musical_instruments"
I got these picks a week ago and have fell in love with them. I generally use a Dunlop 1.0m pick, but have to switch to a thinner pick for rhythm play. This, of course, can be very annoying, especially if playing rhythm and lead parts in the same song.  These Big Stubby picks have solved that problem. They are easy to hold onto, great for leads, and because of the way they are shaped don't hang on to the strings like the regular picks do.  Great picks. Definitely worth the little extra they cost., "musical_instruments"
So, these picks are really nice, but the picture is not what you will get.  These picks are translucent purple.  Other than the strange color, they are good picks.  They really do help with speed and accuracy.  Great for mandolin playing.Updated: Amazon has changed the image for this item, so now the picture really does show what you will get., "musical_instruments"
I always find it interesting the different opinions about products.  Some don't like the sound, others say these wear out in a day (really -- do you play for 24 hours?).  Some say that the grip is good.  Here's my take -- for what it's worth.  I've listened to these with hollow and semi hollow body guitars.  Round and flat wound strings.  My general take is that these picks give a better, fuller, rounder bigger t, "musical_instruments"
These  picks  R awsome!  I have tremmors  in my  hands  and have a hard thime with pick control.....They Have a Gell  center,  Whitch  tingles,  It feels like muscles are activating in Your Hand  GREAT THERAPUTIC PICKI seem to do better with controll picks rather then ordinary picks.These  picks have a indentation so U know where put UR thumb and index fingerThey really Do what they say....If U have hand problems,  try these.....they really work., "musical_instruments"
I dont know why they are called big stubby. They are on the small side.  Way to thick for me.  They do sound good though and will last a long time.  I feel like I am playing with a nickle. I like the indentation. Helps the grip a lot. I should have paid more attention to the size and thickness. Still looking for the right picks for me.  If these were slimmer and a bit larger I would buy again., "musical_instruments"
Looking for picks for bass , this one did not work for me, it is thick and hard, good attack.but only thumb picks work, so i can use my fingers too., "musical_instruments"
The thing about picks or plectrums if you prefer is that they are really a matter of preference and once you pick one (no pun intended) you should try to stick to it and get used to it through practice.  I've used many different types of picks over the years and I've not found the ideal one for me until recently when I decided to use a SilverPick which is basically a standard triangle thin design but made of silver which I find fits my needs the best and so far it's just a case of getting used to it.  This particular Dunlop pick is as described being fat, stubby and sturdy with a nice grippable centre and if you are the kind of lead guitarist who uses a lot of pinch harmonics this pick will be good for you as the maximum grip and most comfortable holding position exposes very little of the pick face.  The hardness will make it good for fast playing but the thickness also makes it difficult to get a firm grip too and the very small size makes it easy to lose your grip if you hit the strings too hard.  This makes it unfit for bass players and for strumming although you could get used to this for lead guitar playing.  For me though, I'll keep this among my collection of picks for use but it's not my default or preferred choice for play., "musical_instruments"
I admit I'm not the guitar flatpicker some of my friends are, but I find this pick to be perfect for picking mandolin.  The picks have almost zero flex to them, meaning the player has solid control.  I like 'em--even if they are purple., "musical_instruments"
If you're worried that the 3.0 mm is too big for your guitar, you're probably right.If you don't use a pick for your bass, then you don't want this either.But if you want to pick your bass, this is the plectrum for you!, "musical_instruments"
When I first got them, I thought that they were going to be cheap, as they felt extremely light and came in the cheap packaging, but it was ok, I wasn't expecting much from them. The picks were actually made from extremely sturdy material. They did not bend at all when I tried to (and believe, me I tried). Pick wearing is virtually non-existent, and I utilize Alt-Picking a lot in my practices. I actually learned my first sweep shred (D major) with these picks within a day of getting them.I highly recommend for the shred guitarist.My only complaint, is that pinch harmonics are kind of hard to do (becuase of the grip) but i got used to it rather quickly.IMPORTANT!!!You can get these in 24 packs at [...] for only $10!!! Free shipping as well!Sorry, Amazon, but that is just to good a deal to pass on..., "musical_instruments"
I have them in purple which makes them stick out.  They have the little cut out to make it easier to grip and hold when I am playing the mandolin.  Already planning on purchasing more., "musical_instruments"
These picks have a very unique shape and sound that have helped me play faster with a smoother tone.Unfortunately, these picks did not receive a five-star rating because of their price and lack of durability.  They wear down fast.  Mine are usually worn out after a day of use and I don't think I play particularly hard.  At around $4.50 for six picks, these are some expensive pieces of plastic.However, these picks are so full of awesome that I am compelled to pay a little extra.  I will definitely be buying more., "musical_instruments"
Currently my favorite pick, it's thick enough to control and the etching makes it easy to handle. I'd recommend to guitarists for jazz, fusion or the like., "musical_instruments"
I first want to mention that this is a pack of 6 picks. The product description didn't mention that, but I was pleased to receive more than three!My son told me he needed some new picks, and since lately he's been playing Ozzy Osbourne songs I knew he needed a better pick than the standard Fender picks he's been playing with for three years. After hearing him play with these picks, I've noticed he can play faster and more accurately with these. The finger grips help tremendously and these have really helped to bring his playing to the next level. My only complaint is that they sent us a pack of purple picks. I wish we could choose the color, or maybe they could send a color assortment. We'll be buying these for a long time to come., "musical_instruments"
another item never received but i would not use anything over .88 mm anyway was mean for experimentation i have learned since this purchase., "musical_instruments"
The right pick is a personal preference. Nothing wrong with Dunlop Stubby Pick, but it's not for me. I bought a pack of 2.0mm  picks last year and loved them but left them in Florida when I went north. I forgot the name of my favorite pick and bought these by mistake., "musical_instruments"
I bought these wanting to try the nylon Big Stubby but was sent the lexan /clear purple ones instead. I wanted to mention this because the item description is vague(PLYS PK) and the item pictured is nylon. I'm still happy with the purchase these have the same picking dynamics as the Jazz Stubby but they give you a much larger surface to grip., "musical_instruments"
I bought my first set a long time ago and they were perfect! Then I re-ordered and I got what I think was an acoustic type because they were the same 2.0mm gauge but were too small for me to comfortably hold, so I just ended up with two dozen wasted picks. So just make sure you get the right one.12.5.11 Update: Okay, so I just realized that there are \"Dunlop Stubby Picks\" and then there are \"Dunlop BIG Stubby Picks\" Sorry..., "musical_instruments"
I've been using these 2.0s as my primary pick for years now and I love them. The way the material surrounds your finger tips is unique and not found in a flat pick. They're very easy to keep a grip on and allow you to go after the strings confidently.You will however find that there is a sweet spot in the life of the pick's tip. When you first use them the business end is extremely pointy, sharp almost. After playing a bit, the tip begins to round off and is perfect for a long time. Eventually, it really rounds out and you'll want a fresh one. I typically lose them before they wear out and they are so nice, you won't care., "musical_instruments"
How a guitar pick \"feels\", is such a matter of individual preference, that there really doesn't seem to be much point in trying to rate them, as what I like about a particular type of pick, may not be relevant to another player.  Most picks have high ratings, because players who like that particular type, write reviews that rate them highly.  Obviously, the best thing to do is playing with a pick on your own guitar, but that isn't always possible.  With that said, for what they are worth, here are my thoughts regarding Jim Dunlop's purple colored, Big Stubby 3.0mm picks.I like a pick with a sharp point for better control, and the Big stubby certainly meets that criteria.  The sharp point and the pick's rounded edges, help the Stubby to slide smoothly off of the individual strings, which makes for easier picking.  Besides electric guitar, I find these picks nicely suited for acoustic, and semi-solid body guitars, where the string tension is greater.I had tried the 1.0mm Stubby previously, but the 3.0mm pick is much thicker, and heavier, and has absolutely no \"give\" at all.  I'm still getting used to playing with something this stiff and hard.  Although the pick has rounded depressions on each side for the fingers, when picking rapidly, I find that maintaining grip can still be a little tricky.  Keeping the pick clean and dry, does help.My favorite pick had been theDunlop 0.6mm nylon pick, but I am very pleased with the performance and feel of the 3.0mm Stubby.  I can locate the strings easily, and be more precise, while still being able to play with decent speed.  Time will tell, but this may become my new favorite pick.The \"pick pack\" contains 24 picks.  I only paid $2.99, which is simply an outstanding deal.  If you're a player looking for a really stiff almost indestructible pick, you might want to give this ultra heavy duty Stubby a try., "musical_instruments"
Using the stubby spoiled me for all other picks. You simply play faster, no matter what level you are. Alternate picking speeds increase because there is no more flat-pick drag. Now I only use flat picks for acoustic play when I want to hear the crunch. 24 picks in a pack, is an insane bargain. You pay twice as much in a store., "musical_instruments"
I use different kinds of picks, this one is very special, the strings rings out really pleasant, and great for speed picking too!, "musical_instruments"
As a beginner guitarist, a few friends let me try out their picks.  I was displeased with most of the standard picks, partially because I didn't like that flimsy feel to them and their sound just didn't sound quite as robust as I like (hopefully, that makes sense).  However, when I was handed one of these, it produced a pleasant sound and I didn't feel like I would somehow break the pick while playing.Needless to say, now that I have my own guitar, I ordered a pack of these and I am certainly not disappointed., "musical_instruments"
I've been playing guitar my entire life. And I've tried almost every pick there is. After hearing how great it is, I decided to buy it. It felt really small at first, and i kinda was dissapointed. I put it down, and didn't use it for quite some time. For some reason i decided to pick it back up, and after a few minutes i came to like the pick. Days after using it, i got accustomed to its size, and I became much more efficient with picking. And I no longer had to worry about the pick slipping. I can't really go back to normal sized picks now.. haha. That's like the only downside I can think of. There are many dif versions of this style, so buy em all, and try em out. If these don't work for you, you can always buy the V-pick., "musical_instruments"
Real nice Guitar Picks. It came in a 6 piece pack, they deserve the Dunlop brandname because these things last a long time., "musical_instruments"
it's kinda small for my hand but it works great! it's more easier to pick the string. This pack comes with 6 picks., "musical_instruments"
I've been using only these even since trying them, wonderful picks for speed and precision, you won't go back for sure., "musical_instruments"
These are shred picks, they are very accurate. Pinch harmonics come easily. The point is made to scream over wound strings, gallops, are a breeze. I gave one to the other guitarist in my band now he only uses them., "musical_instruments"
I recently bought a few packs of Jazz IIIs and I was shocked.  They don't play at all like what I was expecting.  Under high magnification the edge doesn't look the same as the old Jazz III either, and they don't play the same if you turn them over!!!  What's up with that?I'm sorry to give such a poor review to a great brand like Dunlop.  Let's hope this is just a short-term fluke., "musical_instruments"
I love these picks. Great for lead playing, and with small fingers like I have, they feel great! Nice quality pick., "musical_instruments"
After you use these the large, flimsy old school picks will be used just when you don't have one of these babies available.  These are the best picks out there.  If you don't have these already you better purchase them now.  Black or Red, the color is the only difference., "musical_instruments"
I do like this pick as well.  It's the third color of the same pick I purchased.  I will probably always use these., "musical_instruments"
just to let people know off the bat i can tell you these picks are small, and if you are used to big picks these might turn you off for a while. But trust me when i say that once you get used to these picks and you start using proper technique these picks will improve your technique rapidly.i never thought i would say that a pick helped me improve playing but it does. now when i try any bigger pick i even use those picks with more skill now because of these picks. trust me if you put up with these picks for a while and you get used to them you will improve or at least i and many other people agree. :D, "musical_instruments"
Give these picks three days and you'llNever go back to another style.Almost impossible to slip out of your fingers, great tone, amazing clarity, effortless harmonics, durable and fast.This pick literally makes you play better!, "musical_instruments"
They work good.  Way to stiff and small for me though.  Great attack but holding onto it is the problem.  The slick finish makes it kinda hard to hold onto and the small amount of pick that shows makes strumming difficult without hitting your finger on the strings.  I imagine it would work great for lead players but I'm a rhythm player., "musical_instruments"
Nice tone, very easy to grip, last me a long time. One of my favorite picks I've tried for electric. Don't enjoy them as much on acoustic., "musical_instruments"
They are half the size of a regular pick.  Bit too thick for me.  Sound nice. Will last forever. Wish I had sized them before I bought them., "musical_instruments"
I love these little guys. The small size forces me to hold it so just the very tips is exposed. They have a nice textured grip. I bought the red ones this time so I can see them when I drop them!, "musical_instruments"
I used to use Fender medium picks only. Now for Jazz and metal I use this pick. You will just have to try it for yourself to see if it is right for you., "musical_instruments"
I like Dunlop products I used the purple tortex 1.14mm almost exclusively until I met up with this Jazz III.  And now my personal debate continues...  I like a thick pick and this Jazz III is.  I like tortex and this isn't but...I really like the orange color which makes it easy to locate if you drop it.  I rarely and I do mean rarely drop a tortex pick but this nylon might get a bit slick at times.They make 3 or 4 picks in this line with varying degrees of tip pointiness.  I like the pointy model the others have round and rounder tips.This is the new and improved jazz style pick and I am still trying to figure out if I like this or the trad Fender jazz pick.  Or perhaps having a few slightly different picks laying around isn't such a bad idea after all., "musical_instruments"
I have always been a thin or medium 351 style pick person, but when a fellow musician had one of these on stage I was quite surprised at how well it worked. I have used it on guitar and also on bass and it really works well with a good solid grip to it., "musical_instruments"
Been using these for longer than a decade, and met many people who prefer minimal picks , and jazz III among them. This is the closest to playing with bare hand that I can get., "musical_instruments"
I bought this in a few colors so my other reviews are on as well.  I like the thickness of this pick.  Easy to hang onto when strumming.  Love the tone I can obtain too., "musical_instruments"
the title says it all. it may take a while getting use to these smaller picks but in the long run you will e happy that you tried these picks. also since these picks are smaller, i found it was easy to do pinch harmonics on these compared to bigger picks, so if you are having a hard time with pinch harmonics try these out., "musical_instruments"
I bought these and used them for a week before giving my review.If Amazon used half-stars, I would have given them 3.5/5. I just couldn't bring myself to give them a 4/5 so I went with 3/5, here's why:I've used standard medium picks for over 20 years. Switching to these was not a problem at all. Sure, they are smaller but not small enough to cause me any problems. By far the biggest change was the &#34;pointy-ness&#34; of the picks. The distinct point on the pick drastically changes the sound of your playing, especially when playing chords. Everything is much more pronounced, which isn't necessarily a good thing in my opinion. It's especially bad when playing clean electric (picking notes or strumming).If someone was to ask me if these are good picks, my answer would be &#34;it depends.&#34; It really does, in my opinion, it depends on what you're playing. From a rhythm standpoint, I don't like these at all - they take the warmth out of the chords because the point of the pick makes strummed chords sound too sterile to me. For lead work they are OK because you can really dig into each note and have it come through.Could I play faster with them? No. Could I pull off amazing licks that I couldn't do with my normal picks? No.I tried them, but didn't like them. Maybe if you typically play a TON of lead work, constantly, these would be the way to go. I don't, and they aren't for me. I'm glad I tried them, though, because I'll never wonder again if they were for me., "musical_instruments"
I've used these for more than two years but recently shifted to its big brother, the jazz 3 XL. Same thickness and feel /tone, but in a larger form factor. I would definitely recommend the XL version if rhythm+lead work is required. For strictly solo work with easy to achieve pinch harmonics, this one is better., "musical_instruments"
I bought some of these a few years ago just to try them out.  The \"gel\" in the name sounded intriguing.  These are OK, the colors are bright, but otherwise they're just standard plastic picks, which on an electric I prefer nylon because it's less \"clicky\" on the strings.  These are fine, and if I pull one out of my gig bag I'll use it, , "musical_instruments"
I tried three of these on a whim and they impressed me favorably. In fact, they were so good that I purchased ten more when I went back to the same music store. My favorites are mandolin picks like Golden Gate or Grisman \"Dawgs\". The round side of the XH Dunlop Gels gives me a similar attack and a nice warm tone. I would recommend these to anyone., "musical_instruments"
If for some reason you're looking for a pick with a specific color, this is a nice set. The bright colors make them difficult to lose., "musical_instruments"
I have used the Extra Heavy picks for many years but am still searching for that perfect pick. Its strong enough to play metal and some blues style rifts but not so strong it cracks and brakes. I do like the fact it wont turn to powder or fray while playing either but it does wear out fast when playing on heavy gauge strings., "musical_instruments"
I like Fender Mediums, always have, but, I gotta branch out man.  Not sure about these picks yet.  The feel a little more stiff my usual.  I want them to last longer.  What happened to the days when you carried the same pick around in your pocket for months and played it until it was round?, "musical_instruments"
I recently ordered a wide variety of picks to find the ones I liked best. These sounded different \"gel\" picks. I do not like them. Being see through distracts me. They are a little scratchy on the edges. Perhaps a more experienced guitar player would do fine with them but being at the stage where I am still looking at what I am doing - I just can't use them well., "musical_instruments"
Not too light and bendy, not too heavy and stiff, these picks are just right. Dunlop also makes quality picks, and I have yet to break one of these. They last a long time. I am a guy so at first I wished they weren't purple, but since Dunlop only codes their sizes with certain colors I like them so much I don't really care what color they are anymore. I bought a pack of these picks for much less money at my local music store so I would recommend looking there first. Now please stop cutting up milk jugs and go buy these. Now!, "musical_instruments"
They play well and hold up well(never had one break) They are my second favorite pick. But this pick is better in some songs than my favorite., "musical_instruments"
I actually forgot that I bought the heavy and medium versions of this pick.  It's not a bad pick, I will continue to use them but I wish they had a softer center, or softer coating where you grip the pick to prevent it from turning or falling out of my fingers., "musical_instruments"
For keeping your guitar picks where you can quickly grab them the Dunlop mic stand pick holder is EXTREMELY efficient and useful ESPECIALLY when performing live.Always great products and always dependable.I also own the guitar maintenance kits and the capo.Not one product has let me down yet.My capo is 8 years old., "musical_instruments"
As I mentioned in the title, this simply snaps to the stand and holds picks. Enough said. It does its job and does it ok for my taste., "musical_instruments"
I love these pick holders.  They're easy to get on and off.  They hold a nice amount of picks.  And you get that rock-star feel (throw picks at the audience).  A must for any gigging guitarist., "musical_instruments"
Holds my picks in place  nicely... snaps on 2 microphone stand firmly...  Never come up short again...  Its just a nice accessory to have and cheap too, "musical_instruments"
I have the small version. But for the price of this version is more useful for a few dollars more. I used in all my concerts and its excellent! 100% recommended!, "musical_instruments"
Fits nicely on my mic stand and hold a butt load of picks. It is quite tight on my picks, but I imagine it will loosen slightly as it gets used., "musical_instruments"
I drop my pics on purpose now just so I can use it more often! It does what it's supposed to do, what else can I say., "musical_instruments"
I bought this thing not thinking I would use it too much, but wanted it for future use, I was wrong, no more misplacing picks for me. Highly recommended, also fits on my guitar stand, very cool., "musical_instruments"
There isn't much to say about this product, except it works as advertised.  If you don't have one of these and you are a live performer, I highly recommend you pony up the few dollars and pick one up (pun intended)., "musical_instruments"
I tend to drop picks from time to time and it's nice to have them at the ready when the time arises.This was a basket filler when I needed to get to $25 for my free shipping one day but I find it very useful and use it every time I play.Don't know why I waited so long to get one.., "musical_instruments"
Works really well! This is very convenient for when your on stage and are switching to fingering style or something. You can just drop the pick in your hands and pick a new one up when ready., "musical_instruments"
This pick holder is awesome. It just snaps on to your mic stand...add 6 picks and start rockin'! It holds the picks securely so if you're performing outdoors the wind wont blow them away., "musical_instruments"
The mic stand pick holder is a great way to keep picks available while playing.  I switch between playing guitar and bass so I often change the gauge of the pick I am using.  This pick holder is a great way to have the picks available if you change picks often. The holder snaps firmly to the arm of the mic stand and does not slide around the arm. It holds the picks firmly, there is no chance they will fall out of the holder., "musical_instruments"
I put it on the boom of my mic stand. Tight on some, not on others. I need to put a shim on it for some stands to keep the picks in place., "musical_instruments"
If you can't find a container and add your own sponge, then buy this.Keeping a valuable guitar humidified is essential.I think this item should cost three bucks at most, and $1.50 would still yield a healthy profit!I made some more from stuff from the dollar which I think are better.I use this one for my baritone uke, and the bigger ones I made I use in my dreadnaughts.If you make your own, just make sure to not let the sponge drip, ie, wring it out, and make sure it does not actually touch any bare wood., "musical_instruments"
Excellent product, simple and practical design,holds firmly inside the guitar mouth and keeps humidity levels in the safe zone.If humidity levels in your area go below 40% you simply need to provide extra humidity to prevent cracks., "musical_instruments"
Planet Waves humidifiers are simple to use and a great product to guard against drying your guitar and causing splitting. Dampen the sponge, squeeze out excess water, insert the sponge into the holder and the holder between hte strings. Check on it every few days and keep the sponge damp. Couldn't be any easier. I use them all winter long in my guitars., "musical_instruments"
It's nothing special.  No frills, just a simple concept that works.  It's important to maintain humidity in your instrument, especially in a dry climate like west Texas.  The evaporation rate will depend on the amount of humidity in the air where you store your instrument.So, when you first start using it, you have to be diligent to check the sponge regularly to ensure that it is still moist., "musical_instruments"
This compact humidifier is easily filled with an included plastic syringe.  If you don't over-fill, it will not drip, and you can simply place it in your case instead of the usual sponge., "musical_instruments"
Purchased this to replace the Dampit as a no drip alternative. With the solid base it will not drip and it fairly easy to use. Distilled water will extend the life of the sponge. Overall simple and effective.However, I may have added too much humidity. Was using in conjunction with humidipak to keep them from drying out thinking they would absorb any excess humidity, but I then noticed an irregularity in the reflection of the pick guard and the tone seemed to be muted so shifted over to humidipak only and will re humidify them outside the guitar case.I do use a hydrometer but I don't think it was effectively reading the inside of the guitar, but only the inside of the case.So I think the Planet Waves humidifier works well for its intended purpose, but you do have to monitor that you are not over or under utilizing it., "musical_instruments"
I have an electronic indoor/outdoor thermometer that shows relative humidity and a whole house humidifier.It is interesting to see just how quickly relative humidity changes inside and outside with that electronic thermometer.The whole house humidifier pumps out about 3 gallons of water a day into a 1500 sq ft house during the fall and winter keeping the indoor humidity around 47%.This makes the house feel warmer and makes my breathing easier. Makes the whole house safer for the Martins.Now you can use a little in the case humidifier like this to help with humidity, but I think you really need a whole house solution and a monitor system.A sponge in a zip lock bag with a few holes works well too. Just don't get water on the wood.And don't forget to take the silica gel packs out of the little accessory compartment in the case. Many guitars come shipped with these and their job is to remove humidity from the case.All the better acoustic guitar shops I go to have a big humidifier running in their showrooms., "musical_instruments"
I thought I would throw my two-cents in about the new design and effectiveness of this soundhole humidifier.After making a few homemade case humidifiers out of things like a travel butter container with many holes drilled into it and a sponge, I started thinking about how some of the cases separate the body cavity from the neck & headstock cavity inside the guitar case and not allowing the humidity to flow freely to all areas, especially the body where it is needed the most.Even though I was getting acceptable humidification in the case I was concerned about the body being dryer in comparison so I went ahead and splurged the 8 bucks on these. (I actually bought three of them.)I crank the gas heat up in the house in the winter and A/C in the summer, keep my guitars inside their cases and inside a closet. The humidity drops quite low, but the sponges remain moist for several days before I can no longer fight the urge to re-wet them. lol.Two great tips in one:Use a regular, more dense sponge, thicker like the ones at the dollar store. Cut them to size and stuff them in!Throw away the sponge when it starts to get yucky and don't worry about distilled water, unless you want to. I can't argue using very pure water compared to the possibly toxic crap that comes out our faucets, but for one dollar you can get a boat load of them after you cut them to size, and toss them away without any regard when needing replaced.Don't worry about the &#34;thing&#34; hanging in-between your strings. It will not damage anything unless you get the sponge  too saturated and it leaks. I will either squeeze the excess water out, or shake the container with the sponge inside until I am satisfied that it won't drip.The humidifier will not cause any stress or damage to your strings by spreading them when you wedge this inside your soundhole.If you ARE rough, careless, thoughtless, or stupid, you could possibly knock this loose and have it rub or fall out, but I would be more worried about the guitar and what it would take for this to happen. This would be more extreme to the guitar than the humidifier or any harm it could cause.The top snaps on by squeezing the sides to release little tabs that stick through the top cover. The sponge inside is quite small, and there isn't too much room for a much larger sponge. The device is simple and fairly solid. Treat it gently and it will last forever. You can easily clean the inside or run it through a dishwasher. If you give the inside a quick rinse every few fills, I'm sure it would be a decade before anything &#34;built up&#34; to require extensive cleaning or replacement.Keep an eye on it for the first few days and then weeks to get a feel for when you should be re-wetting the sponge.Try to keep the sponge moist when it's dry.I strongly suggest getting an Oasis case humidifier, (or similar) mini sized about 1&#34; X 4&#34; costing around 17-20 bucks.This will take any guesswork out of the equation and give you fairly accurate readings inside your guitar or instrument case.Remember, too much humidity can cause your acoustic guitar to warp. Too dry and it will shrink and crack, split the soundboard (top) also leaving the edges of the frets sticking out like the backbone of a fish and quite abrasive!If you spent more than one hundred dollars on your guitar and live where it gets cold and/or dry, you would be negligent (if not careless) to spend the pittance to make sure your 'baby ain't thirsty', or worse...dead & broken!Hope this helps!, "musical_instruments"
I wish it was a little longer lasting but it does do the trick. My guitar would probably not be happy without it., "musical_instruments"
This is a upgraded version of the guitar humdifier, The first one had that green stuff that florists use in it and you used a plastic syringe to ad water to it. This has a replaceable sponge, you take it out, soak it and squeeze out excess then put it back in container, would say it gets more humidity out., "musical_instruments"
It's simple, basic, but I don't think it does that good of a job. This is because it doesn't really humidify that much and doesn't extend very far into the guitar., "musical_instruments"
A simple system for gettting humidity into the guitar; The price is just right and it is very simple to use., "musical_instruments"
This is a simple humidifier for guitars with a round sound hole.  It would not work for an f-hole archtop or other types of instruments such as mandolin or ukulele.  Inside the sturdy plastic case is what appears to be an ordinary kitchen sponge.  If you use distilled water (as recommended) it should last quite a while.  The top comes off with a gentle press on the sides.  The dry sponge can be a little difficult to remove with fingers but tweezers or needle nose pliers work perfectly.  Don't push it all the way in after moistening and you won't have a problem.  I drip a little distilled water on the sponge, squeeze out any excess, and the assembled case pops in easily between the D and G strings, suspended in the middle of the sound hole.  They can't be seen in the photo but there are small ridges on each side that hold the top in place against the strings.  I've never had one of these move from where I left it.If the sponge isn't dripping wet you should never have a problem with drops of water in the guitar or case.  When the humidity is very low (30% or less) the sponge dries out in 2 to 3 days even if the case isn't opened.  As with most humidifiers of this type you will have to check every few days.If you have ever had a crack appear in the top of favorite guitar (or don't want to see one) use a guitar humidifier!  Especially during the winter - heating a house tends to drop the indoor humidity below safe levels (between 45% and 60% is ideal for most guitars).  Air conditioning can do the same.  For especially valuable guitars it would be worth buying a hygrometer to keep in the case but for most guitars having one in the room where you keep you guitar(s) is okay.  For many reasons it's always best to keep your guitar in a case or gig bag when not in use.  A humidifier is inexpensive extra precaution at those times of year when temperature or humidity changes quickly., "musical_instruments"
I bought this product with the notion of being cheap No refills to buy, except distilled water.  In all actuality, its a really simple design.I like this design better because of one simple fact.  If the wood in your guitar is already dry, you'll have to refill your humidifier more often initially.  i'd rather be using distilled water than hydration pack refills that are required in some other guitar humidifiers.  After the guitar gets \"hydrated?\", I usually end up wetting the sponge every 4 to 7 days.  It definitely gets taken several time between refills, so it's not that much of a hassle.Overall, good product that you could probably fashion yourself but why bother.  Try not to over-douse the sponge in order to avoid water damage to the guitar.Peace out and cheers~J, "musical_instruments"
Fits nicely into my acoustic guitars. Just requires you to dampen the sponge with distilled water. Luckily I keep that on hand!, "musical_instruments"
I bought this guitar humidifier for my Taylor.I received exactly what I purchased and works as it should.This product has been recommended to me by many other guitar players around me.It is a simple design that fits perfectly between the strings.Easy to use because really all you have to do is moisturize the sponge and keep it in the plastic container.Price is good., "musical_instruments"
Works for me. But It splits the two middle strings way more than my peace of mind allows me to be comfortable with it. They made it thinner so it doesn't stretch the strings too much & as a consequence, it will only fit a thin sponge which dries easy as far as Arizona & California is concerned.Suggestion to Planet Waves: I think you can make it thicker but instead of splitting the strings, redesign the mount, say with a Velcro so that it's still hangs on the sound hall but it's attached to the strings. It's possible to attach your product in a different way because I've modified mine & to my personal preference works without splitting the screen., "musical_instruments"
I have one of these in every one of my cases. It's a plastic sponge holder with holes in it; nothing special but it does the job., "musical_instruments"
This is good for now! Keeps my guitar from drying out, warping, cracking,! For the money it works! Recommend this product., "musical_instruments"
We all know it's just a container with a sponge in it, no biggie. I bought it to get Super Saver shipping on something else and because I plan to keep an all-solid acoustic guitar at a weekend place where it will sit unused for long periods of time. Jamming it between the guitar strings and getting it hooked onto them feels a bit rough on the strings. But it should do the job., "musical_instruments"
it does what it says it does.  only complaint is that sponge is very small and in very dry areas it needs to be checked and refilled 2 times a week., "musical_instruments"
I agree with the others reviews.  The sponge is too small and too thin but the humidify is small so it wouldn't fit any larger sponges.  Okay for the price., "musical_instruments"
Cleans your strings and makes your fingers go across the strings a little faster.This is a good long lasting product and a little goes a long way.It is VERY safe for guitar finishes., "musical_instruments"
That cloth... They should have included something that doesn't fall apart.Otherwise it's great. I use it as recommended by the container and it keeps the strings nice and conditioned, but I'm with other people here who commented that you can't really tell how much of the stuff is left inside. Good idea to keep more than one of these around., "musical_instruments"
I play 5-string bass, both electric and acoustic and love this stuff.  Each bass I have has different strings for various reasons and I use this on every one.  My wife uses on her 6-string acoustic and electric guitars.  We keep a can in every case!, "musical_instruments"
No spill, no mess. This is one of the easiest to use products for cleaning strings and necks. Just use the fast fret and wipe off with a rag. It will not dry out, and lasts for years. The only thing I don't like is the can will not fit in accessory area of my guitar case and the led has sharp edges, so put it down before using the cleaner., "musical_instruments"
Fast Fret, or at least some kind of string cleaner is a 'must have' for anyone who plays guitar. Because, if you think about it, strings get really dirty over time, and this product solves that issue. :), "musical_instruments"
This stuff will lube up your strings pretty well! The only downside is that it leaves tiny pieces of fuzz on my strings after a few times of use- but it comes with a little cloth that I assume is meant for this little inconvenience., "musical_instruments"
There's not much to say about this product, except that it works. It makes my strings last longer. Sometimes I get lazy owning so many guitars, and 20 minutes per &#34;well done&#34; restring adds up. This is a great way to put that off and keep jamming for as long as possible. It's small and conveniently stored too. I recommend trying it out!, "musical_instruments"
I have used Fast Fret for a number of years and think it's a great product.  It now comes in a metal can and has a cap over the applicator versus the old plastic can with no cap over the applicator.  This is a much better way to package the product and will probably help it retain the lubricant longer., "musical_instruments"
I really love this. Tends to be very linty with time but it is still a very good product. Recommended., "musical_instruments"
I am in agreement with others that state this is a must-have. I battled with fret noise on recordings and fingers dragging on the fingerboard. This really lowers the friction and makes for a much more playable instrument and supposedly protects the wood. I've used it on the back of the neck as well and it helps as much as on the fingerboard. I rub the entire neck down before and after I play. It makes the guitar smell like it came right from the shop, which I suspect is what they must've been using all these years and never told me, though I never did ask...foolish me. Since I've recently gotten into doing my own setups, where I've read many forums and posters have recommended this and I figured what the heck, it's less than $5., "musical_instruments"
I discovered this string lubricant many years ago and I concur with what most of the reviewers here have said about it although I wouldn't call it a string cleaner although you indirectly clean the strings if you use the cloth and like another reviewer stated you should also use the cloth to clean the undersides of your strings as well.  I unfortunately live in a very humid climate being only a little above the equator and so strings have a very short life here and so anything that can prolong their life is a real boon for a musician here.  I agree that the only downside is the inability to tell in advance that you are running low on lubricant until it actually turns dry but I guess given the price and , "musical_instruments"
The name says it all. FAST fret = FAST fingers!  I played over 40 live shows from 45 min sets to 2.5 hr sets just this year on national stages.  My strings take a lot of abuse and slow down with all the sweat, grime, and dirt flying through the air. This stuff honestly works very well.  It is part of my regular arsenal., "musical_instruments"
Especially for the price, this is a great buy.  The strings on my acoustic were starting to get a bit loud when I would slide up and down the fretboard, and I was noticing quite a bit of lag when sliding too.  The only downside is that it would be much easier to apply this directly to the frets without the strings on, but the appeal is to bring life back to strings that aren't shining like they use to.  I just had to take a little extra time and care to get as much oil onto the fretboard and then make sure I wiped it in/off as thoroughly as possible, which required folding the provided rag and inserting it between the strings and fretboard and taking my time as I went from fret to fret.  Not a big deal though because the result was very pleasing.  The ease of sliding was tremendously improved and the strings sound and feel better than ever!  Take 10-15 minutes and do you and your guitar a favor..., "musical_instruments"
I just got this yesterday so I don't know how long it will prolong the string's life but I have noticed a difference already. It's a lot easier to play since the strings feel a lot smoother which makes this worth buying for that alone. Also, it's cheap so I would give it a shot if I were you. I'm really happy that I \"discovered\" this product, in fact, I'm already ordering 2 more., "musical_instruments"
This is my fifth time buying this stuff! I really like the new container. The tin is way nicer than the old plastic one. This stuff works great and lasts forever! I play daily and one stick will last me at least a year before it gets too dirty/dry to use. One swipe is plenty (2 strings at a time from nut to bridge); then just fold the cloth and wipe clean. Makes moving power chords and soloing so much easier., "musical_instruments"
I have been using GHS Fast fret for over six years and it's amazing stuff, I apply just a tiny amount to the strings before I play and then wipe them down afterwards, I used to change strings every one to two months and now strings can last me a year. It's easy to control home much you put on and one can of this stuff lasts me a year or two, there isn't really any reason to just soak everything with it I don't think, I mainly use it to clean the strings. I'm really glad I found this stuff!, "musical_instruments"
Very nice product. Strings feel and sound noticeably better plus the white mineral oil smells really good when applied to the neck., "musical_instruments"
I used this on a bass guitar with older strings and it made the strings brighter and more lively. I will try it on all of my guitars as it will prolong the life of most strings. I like the packaging and the small cloth it comes with. I use sections of t shirts to clean my strings and put them inside the packaging along with the cloth. This is a must for any fingerpicking guitar or bass player., "musical_instruments"
This product is great, I use it after every session. Keeps your strings clean and conditions the fret board. Every guitar player should keep this in their case., "musical_instruments"
Not an expert but it is cheap and simple and cleans and protects the strings. Hope that helps thank you, "musical_instruments"
This makes sliding on the bass real smooth. It's also nice for cleaning. It is hard to tell if you are running low on oil or whatever liquid is in this thing but they seem to last for a fairly long time. And it's super easy to apply. Even though you're not a pro, act like one and slap some of this stuff on your bass or guitar before you play., "musical_instruments"
This product is not what it seems. It has a cool name, but that's about it. It's a tool oil that stinks. I tried my best to get use to this product, but learned that there are much better ways after going into the studio and recording for the 1st time. After doing away with the Fast-Fret, my playing has improved and I hardly ever have to change my string because of gook. Not to mention that getting that crap on my fingers was just nasty. I now use Old English and my guitars thank me, my nose thanks me and my fingers thank me. You will too..., "musical_instruments"
Seems to work well, though I don't know how long it's supposed to last. I have sweaty hands, and when I'm done I wipe my guitar down with this lil guy and it helps a lot to keep the strings from getting dirty or cruddy., "musical_instruments"
I agree with all of the reviews, but have found another area to use fast fret on: THE NUT. When tuning, the strings (especially the lower wound strings) hang up on the nut which causes the string to pop instead of slide as it would on a roller nut. Dab Fast Fret onto the nut before tuning, and this problem is greatly reduced., "musical_instruments"
I got this product to clean and condition my guitar fretboards (well duh!)  Does it work?  Yes and no.  First it did not appear that anything was coming out.  After a bit of rubbing I did notice a &#34;slight&#34; bit of solution (turns out its mineral oil)on the fretboard by the frets.  I tried to spread it out with the included cloth and discovered that the cloth was useless (a paper towel would hold up better- seriously!)  I used an old tee shirt square and spread some of the oil around- but honestly it took me 10 to 15 mins and I noticed NO difference in the appearence or the playability of the guitar.  It says to use it before and after each session- thats about 30 mins of my time per guitar (I general play 2 guitars durning the course of a session).  I do still use this occasionally, but I would not spend money to purchase it again.  Just not what I was looking for in a fret board cleaner., "musical_instruments"
Let's cut to the chase: this is, more or less, a tight roll of gauze soaked in mineral oil.  But that's exactly what I need to clean and protect my fretboard.  The lubricating feature is just a nice plus., "musical_instruments"
I used this on a 5string bass. I liked how this helps me slide around the fretboard easier. My friend tried it on her acoustic guitar and hated it.Her reason for her opinion is simple. This stuff puts out a LOT more oil (or whatever it is) than you would think. This has the unintended consequence of the oil making your hard-earned callouses soft...which when playing guitar can lead to bleeding fingers pretty fast (and did for my friend).To apply this you simply hold the handle and press down while running it along each string, one string at a time. I highly suggest you only use one slide down each string. At first it may not look like anything is getting on your strings, but give it a few minutes and you will start to see the excess oil appear and start pooling under the strings on your fretboard. That's ok. You will need to wipe away the excess, and I'm telling you, if you accidentally get too much, that excess oil may not come off easily (didn't for me at least). Mine left little pools of oil between the frets, and I only used one swipe and thought I had just a little on there. Naturally, this product also makes your fingers very oily feeling. My friend hated that part too, and I agree with her. Soft callouses = no callouses. This is a good product idea, and I like it in theory, and with my thick bass strings I didn't have the severe problem w soft fingertips that she did. Just be aware of the possibility of that being a problem for you.It does what it says, but you may not like what else it does or how it feels on your fingers., "musical_instruments"
I've already posted about Fast Fret.  I love this stuff.  It's a mandatory inclusion in every one of my guitar cases., "musical_instruments"
The tips of my fingers often get pretty dry and cracked, especially when I've been playing a lot.  The problem, at least for me, is that pieces of the dead skins sometimes catch on guitar strings making slides, bends, and pull-offs less fluid.  A few strokes of GHS makes the fretboard give me a much smoother playing experience.  An alternative would be using Vaseline on my fingers, but that would probably be terrible for my fretboard.  Also, I sometimes use an Emory board to smooth my fingertips which helps, but I'd rather do that as little as possible to keep callouses strong.  GHS allows me to minimize that., "musical_instruments"
The best buy for your bass drum, "musical_instruments"
These patches will greatly extend the life of you bass drum heads. Even if you use felt beaters on your kick pedal these pads greatly increase the strength and toughness of your bass drum head in the exact place it is needed most. As far as I can tel these do not change the sound of your head much if at all. They stay exactly where you put them so be sure to get it right the first time.If you have a double bass kick pedal I highly recommend either this patch or one from another name brand company., "musical_instruments"
These impact pads came very fast and do their job although one of the pad I received ive already warn through in less then 3 weeks, "musical_instruments"
This has saved my bass drum head from many holes. Also has no affect on sound of bass drum.Would recommend., "musical_instruments"
This works, and I really like Evans. But I got 2 of these and they both looked different and looked cheap. Although I have been using it for awhile now with hard use and it is holding up great and saving my kick drum head from abuse., "musical_instruments"
The Evans Pedal Patch will work for you great.. It will keep your mass drum head from gettingworn and nasty..  I cheap buy and it works excellent.., "musical_instruments"
In writing a simple review for such a simple product there's only a few concerns you should have. 1. Would the adhesive dry out on this and 2. does it wear over time? The answer is it gets 4 stars. It doesn't dry out but I had to replace mine after 5 years because it eventually wore out. That's pretty good! Not perfect but pretty god!, "musical_instruments"
They add depth to your bass drum by muffling the overtones a bit, and it is the pads that wear out rather than your bass drum head so these actually save you money and sound better. I've used a couple different brands, and they pretty much are similar., "musical_instruments"
they look slick and work really good, i would recommend this to anyone that needs a bass drum patch or so, "musical_instruments"
its a patch that goes over the spot where your beater beats on the bass drum, guess it provides some useful purpose like kicking thru a bass drum skin, came with a few which is nice, price was right, so why not...go for it!!!, "musical_instruments"
I think this patch looks cool on the bass . I don't really hear any difference in sound ,But does give your drum head a better life span, "musical_instruments"
This strap kicks butt im a tall and big guy so its hard to find longer straps for cheap and baby is long if I have it to max its TO LONG that never happened to me and im 6 4 300 LBS so if your tall buy it don't waste your time with the Planet Wave ones there junk too short and the leather ends are really thin and brake after a few weeks of hard usage, "musical_instruments"
Very good strap. Fine quality. Your guitar will be fixed surely. Just one thing: that strap is too big for kids. So if you choose some kind of mini guitar, than you'd better to find something else. Else, this is a really good choise!, "musical_instruments"
Good stitching, no slippage. Awesome strap. Fits straps locks just fine. Perfectly happy with this strap. Thank you earnie ball!, "musical_instruments"
I needed a new strap but I didn't want to pay $20 for one. I saw the ernie ball ones and decided to give it a shot. I'm glad I did. The strap is awesome. It's very very comfortable and can expand longer than any strap I've ever had. It totally deserves 5 stars!, "musical_instruments"
A very good strap., "musical_instruments"
perfect size for us big guys. i do recommend some snap locks for it though. . . . . ., "musical_instruments"
I was displeased with a somewhat poor-quality strap I was using before.  It just didn't seem to want to hang on, so I went ahead and decided to buy a replacement.This is what I chose, and notably, I chose it for the color, just simply because I thought a white strap would look nice on a red and white guitar.So far, it's given me no problems, and it looks very nice and functions perfectly.  This is a great bargain, too, since it's certainly not an expensive accessory., "musical_instruments"
A nice simple adjustable strap that has well reinforced ends to hold the attachment posts on my guitar without any worries.  It is a bit slippery so for top-heavy guitars like Les Pauls the neck tends to keep slipping down so you have to support it with your fret hand a little.  I thinking of sewing a silicon mat on the underside so it will stay put on my shoulder., "musical_instruments"
It's comfortable. It's adjustable. The color was a good match for the guitar. Unless you regularly gig for hours at a time, why spend 50+ smackers on a strap when this one does just fine? Put the dough into the guitar, not the strap. By several colors for whatever look you are going for at the time., "musical_instruments"
For the money, this strap is as good as any other poly strap.  Plus, it was made in the U.S.A.!, "musical_instruments"
I've only used it a few times but this strap looks like it's here to last. No frills, just a plain black strap., "musical_instruments"
This is just what it looks like - a very economical strap.  The great thing about it is the length.  As any other tall person will tell you, finding a strap that adjusts to longer than normal can be frustrating.  This strap is very long, if you need it to be.  For the price, very hard to beat this.  Works well withDunlop Dual Design Straplok System, Blacktoo.  Overall, a good buy, for a backup strap or your primary., "musical_instruments"
I've always loved the ernie ball straps from playing it all the way down to your knees, all the way up to you chest the strap never fails, I've owned countless ernie ball straps and I always come back to them for the main reason, I've never had one fail! a great strap for a great price, "musical_instruments"
i've had this strap for at least a year now, and it still works so well. goes great with my guitar too!, "musical_instruments"
For at great price, this strap does all that it is suppose to do.  It is very will made, has the Ernie Ball logo on it and  works just fine., "musical_instruments"
What you see is what you get. It's cheap, It's basic, and It works. The best thing about this synthetic product is the price, and color options!, "musical_instruments"
Made of quality material. I do not need anything fancy,because I am a simle person! It does a first class job on my vintage electric guitar!, "musical_instruments"
Great inexpensive strap.  Really, what more can you say?  I wanted something to hold my guitar up, and it does just that., "musical_instruments"
A very attractive and well constructed strap. I've been somewhat disappointed with some of the more expensive straps but this one is Excellent...................AND NOT SO EXPENSIVE. All the Buttons fit well (Snug) and it adjusts easily and quickly., "musical_instruments"
this is a great strap. nice tight fit, snug and secure and very flexible. Best part this strap gets long long long. Yep here it is., "musical_instruments"
Great build quality, works like it should. Feels comfortable to wear also. No complaints at all :) Great color also considering my guitar is a shade of green :D, "musical_instruments"
Cheaply made and thin leather leave a lot to be desired. At least it's long enough for even the lowest slung of guitar postures. This should accomadate a bass as well due to the extra length.I am comparing it to $10 guitar center straps which have double leather ends which are much sturdier than the ones on this Ernie Ball strap, which are thin and single ply. I wouldn't trust this strap without a strap lock., "musical_instruments"
I really didn't expect this guitar strap to be anything more than what it is. It's tight knit nylon with leather to attach to the strap posts, It's not a super fancy top of the line guitar strap, but it serves it's purpose well. feels sturdy enough and it's adjustable for a man of any size. I ordered it on the 20th and received it on the 23rd, no complaints here. If you are like me and do not feel that it is necessary to spend 20$ or 30$ on a guitar strap then this would suit you just fine, for 6$ you can't beat it. buy one or 2 nothing to lose here, "musical_instruments"
I like purple, and it is purple. The strap is sturdy. It works, what else needs to be said; it arrived timely, is decent quality, and a nice color., "musical_instruments"
this makes the second one of this straps that I have ordered and I love them. They are longer than your standerd strap and that is great for a big guy like myself. I don't have not one bad thing to say. great buy and will do it again if I ever need anouther strap., "musical_instruments"
So sexy with my SG. Great quality. I was going to get a pink furry one... this is better I think., "musical_instruments"
Got three of these straps as we got tired of changing them whenever we needed one on a different guitar.  This is a great strap for the money.  They leather ends do not rub the guitar finish and the holes do not wear out as fast.  If you want to spend more money, you can and get a little better (leather extends higher on the strap on the more expensive ones -- nicer) but if you want something that is functional and looks good this is a good value., "musical_instruments"
This is a very nice guitar strap in light gray.  The strap material and the double-leather ends are heavy duty and should last a long time.  I got this at an awesome price too!, "musical_instruments"
Product does what you would think. I use it on my bass and haven't had a problem with it yet. If you are constantly playing shows, this may not be your first choice, but if you just need something to hold your guitar or bass up, then this is it. You can't beat the price., "musical_instruments"
I have both black and white Ernie ball straps, really comfortable, easy to adjust, holds guitar securely, and both colors look great with black guitars!, "musical_instruments"
Nothing special. Just like every other strap of its kind. I compared it to other poly straps I have and it's OK. No better and no worse. Price was good. It took a long time to come. Leather ends seem OK. I mention that because it appears to be the main complaint..I'm using it as a spare so it should be OK. I'm a little disappointed. I'm used to a higher quality from EB products. It is very adjustable and should be able to be used by nearly everyone. I don't perform a lot of antics on stage, it's just me and the axe. I don't expect any problems. Hope this helps. Small &#34;thumbs up&#34; to Amazon., "musical_instruments"
Finally I found a long strap for my new guitar.  I had bought one earlier that was leather, but was way too short.  It felt like my guitar hung around my neck.  This new strap is plenty long enough, and looks good.  My only negative is that it is sharp on the sides of the strap so most players will feel it on their neck, but it sure fits nice and long.  I would recommend this to any guitar player., "musical_instruments"
the hole at the end where you hook it up gets worn out easily .. just try and leave it on always..its cheap but it wont fail, wont drop your guitar, if you're careful., "musical_instruments"
I'm sure glad that I bought these straps, there not leather but are put together very well. I plan on using them as backups in the studio. The price was just right, cam quickly and I'd buy them again., "musical_instruments"
I figured at this price I wouldn't be able to use this strap to secure my Dean from Hell guitar. But figured if it wasn't up to being a reliable strap for my expensive & pretty heavy ax that I could always use it for my Rock Band guitar. And I'm rather certain that this strap will outlast the Rock Band guitar. So very pleased with this strap & would recommend it for any beginner with a inexpensive guitar that's likely 1/4 plastic and very lightweight., "musical_instruments"
I've used this strap on different guitars and it works great on all of them.  If you're looking for an economical strap this will work great.  My experience has been that Ernie Ball makes great products., "musical_instruments"
My preferred strap was a hand made leather with my name on it, but it wasn't adjustable.  I bought this one for its adjustability., "musical_instruments"
I've tried leather straps, I've tried Rocksteady straps, I still keep coming back to this strap. It's steady, Highly adjustable. And it works very nicely with the Dunlop Dual Design Straplok system. Good job Ernie Ball! I even prefer this to a nice Levy's strap that I own because the Ernie Ball strap is a bit slipperier, "musical_instruments"
So perhaps I don't know what shade burgandy really is. Or the picture is a bit misleading. It is as stated, although the picture shows a criss cross pattern this is just woven. As too \"DEE\"s reveiw... the buckle doesn't seem to bother me. I am not calling him or her out or anything. My best guess, it's playing style. I myself play bass, when I first started I played on the 3\" inch straps and found they bothered me, went to the 2\" straps proplem solved. I am sure that at certain lengths it does become a bother. But for me and the way I play... No complaints., "musical_instruments"
Great strap, durable and good lookin. It Works great for me, i like this type of strap's, simple & durable. Try one., "musical_instruments"
This is my second Ernie Ball strap i have gotten, and sure there are cheaper straps out there its a crapshoot what your going to get from them. These straps have leather ends that hold the guitar securely, the strap itself is a step down from a seatbelt (If a seatbelt will keep me in place at high speeds this strap will keep your guitar in place at low speeds), and the length would be sufficient even if you are 7 ft. tall. Coming in several different colors to match any color guitar this is the only strap i will buy in the future., "musical_instruments"
Not a great mic, but if you need something realitively cheap, it'll do.  Limited dynamic range.  But, it works.  Wish I'd have gotten something a little nicer though., "musical_instruments"
This is my second SM48 in 25 years! What's the difference between the 58 and the 48? The 48 is made in Mexico. There is a noticeable difference in tone with the 48 with the on/off switch. (I did not buy that one) If feedback is an issue in your practice space, get the one with the switch, otherwise opt out for better clarity.I say go for it!! Save $50., "musical_instruments"
This mic is great! I have one I have used from coast to coast to coast to coast. Unbeatable in price and quality. You can't go wrong with a brand name like shure. I have had mine for 14 years and it still sounds like it just came out of the box. You will have no shame in your game with this in in your arsenal. As a veteran bluseman I recommend it. It rocks! As clean as a marsh 'possum., "musical_instruments"
I got these mics because I am in an environment where we needed the ON/OFF toggle on the microphone and - for us - it works great. These mics sound great for both normal speaking and singing in a small room. They sound similar to the Shure SM58 and we use them every day. They are still going strong., "musical_instruments"
This microphone is the best microphone I have ever owned. It is very dense, a little quiet, but the sound is absolutely brilliant quality. It is very clear sounding, and very well built. Get this mic. You will not regret it., "musical_instruments"
I like the durability of it, and the on/off switch. it came with a carrying bag and a mic holder + adapter. its not as powerful and clear as i though it would be, but its far better than the other mics in the price range that i have used. i haven't tried this through a PA live yet. i just bought an Helicon voicetone and im hoping it boosts it a little. im sure i will have this mic for years to come and hopefully i can spring for a better Shure later on., "musical_instruments"
Holy guacamole, you guys- this amp...I was terrified at first because I plugged in and turned on and had NO SOUND.Took the batteries out and fumed over my foolish purchase, then decided to try once more.Fired it up with my electric kazoo plugged in and WE HAVE LIFT OFF!So rocking.I actually got this for my acoustic-electric ukulele and it sounds beautiful through it. I keep the volume low and the door open about 1&#34; to get a clean-ish tone. Haven't cranked it up yet for that dirty blues sound but I'm sure it'll sound awesome too., "musical_instruments"
First, I have to say the only reason I bought this is that we have two pot belly pigs that live in our house...so this was a no-brainer to purchase just to have as a fan of pigs, and I play the guitar too.Now for the review.This little &#34;collector&#34; amp turns out to be something I will actually use rather than put on a shelf to look at with all of our other pig stuff.I was very surprised how well built it is.  It's solid as a rock with chrome handles, edge guards and a pig snout for the volume control.It looks like a mini suit case and contrary to another review, the AC adapter fits into a compartment inside so it may be stored internally.  It also operates on batteries which makes this little thing quite the gem to take with us this summer.  Now I can take the Fender or Gibson electrics rather than the acoustic.Okay, I keep getting off topic here...The sound is clear and crisp for it's size.  Sure, it's not my Fender Mustang IV, but I didn't pay 600 bucks for it either.  But then my Fender doesn't have a pig's snout!!  There are no controls on this for tone adjustments, just a volume knob.  But, most of our modern electric guitars have quite a bit of tone adjustment anyway.  I would compare the sound coming from it as above average but it's the novelty of the amp that is the real attraction, for me anyway.As for it's size, I would say it's just about the size of your average small jewelry box.  But it's much heavier, deceptively heavy but I like that.  It doesn't have that &#34;cheap&#34; feel about it.Like I said, I WILL use this occasionally, especially during summer months when we cruise in the convertible or in the conversion van.  I look forward to the comments the amp will get, I'm sure way more than my guitar playing skills as I still have a lot to learn.  But, learning should be fun and this little amp and is just another way to make it even more fun.In summary, I would highly recommend this to any pig lover who owns a guitar or to anyone who's looking for a portable amp that operates on either batteries or an AC adapter.A word to best describe it....&#34;COOL&#34;., "musical_instruments"
I have had this amp for quite some time and find that it does exactly what I want it to!  It is so much easier to carry around and needs no outlet.  Turn in half way up, you get a clean sound...crank it maxed and you get that distortion that made it so famous.  I own a piece of the legend and music history!, "musical_instruments"
Put away your effects pedals, modellers, and software for awhile and get back to the earth - or at least the simple appreciation of what an electric guitar sound can be, straight off the axe with nothing but pickups, volume, and tone pots to shape it.For me the classic Pignose-and-a-Strat sound is the opening of \"I Looked Away\" from Layla, but I'm sure everyone's got their favorites.Loud enough to \"feel the air\" and coax a variety of natural-sounding distorted tones. Stick an SM-57 in front of it and fool a lot of people into thinking it's a tube amp. By working your guitar knobs you can get a clean sound, along with that \"barely breaking up\" holy grail of tone for many blues and rock players.By learning how much you can do with relatively little, you'll gain a new appreciation of the strengths and weaknesses of all the tone-shaping tools that have come along since.It might surprise those who take today's hyper-saturated, over-processed metal distortion for granted as the official, community-sanctioned guitar tone to discover the challenges and pleasure of touch and response with subtle dynamics and without infinite sustain.One bit of weirdness: When I began playing my Pignose I immediately noticed a buzz, as though something small was rattling around between the speaker cone and front grill. The four mounting nuts were easy to loosen and, sure enough, an extra washer had gotten caught in there during assembly. Fortunately it slid right out and there was no damage.Get the power adapter and save the batteries for when you absolutely have no choice.The first amp I ever had was a small Ampeg tube from the early 60's with a single 6 inch speaker, volume and tone knobs. I've no idea how many watts it put out - not enough for my parents to complain from their bedroom next door. With that baby cranked, I spent many happy hours in tone heaven. All these years (and amps) later I guess I've always been searching for that sound and the Pignose comes closer than any tube distortion, blues overdrive pedal or rat-ty box I've tried.For the money, you can't beat it., "musical_instruments"
Fantastic. Just love this little amp.At first thought it was broken, but batteries were  not sitting in right.Very happy it's ok., "musical_instruments"
Sounds simply great!  As greasy as a Pignose has to groan and as simple as it has to be.  Great on bass notes and can also get clean with highs; it does sound different when opened and by moving the guitar volume, it changes its distortion (the louder, the more distorted).  The Pignose power supply (Pignose AC9 Power Supply for Pignose 7100) is helpful when been home, but also works with 6 AA batteries.  You can also amplify it's sound by connecting it to a higher-watt amp.  It comes with really nice looking stickers.  I'm planning to keep it for years.Update on review(Jan 9, 2013).I admit that it might be more expensive that other 5 watt amps, but as time goes by, I just fall more in love with my Piggy!  I've learned to use better it's own volume combined with the guitar's.I have other amps of higher power that can get a LOT louder that the Pignose, but I just LOVE the level of distortion it gives; I cannot get this crunch with the other amps, no matter how much pedals, bells, whistles I have tried... This crunch is unique and the world loves it, as simple and plain as that.  The good thing is that it has an output at the back to connect it to louder amps and like that you can have at louder volumes that unique crunch I so much fell in love with.The 7 chords give a clean amazing sweet-grumble (the one that make teenage girls sigh for you...) with high volume on the Piggy and low on the guitar., "musical_instruments"
I didn't know a little battery powered amp could sound so good.  It sounds just as good if not better than my Roland Cube 20, of course without the effects and such, but still, a great little amp for practice and a little gig with family and friends.  Puts out pretty good power for a little 5w.  Has a great sound in my opinion., "musical_instruments"
The Pignose is not the world's best travel amp, or portable amp, or practice amp. It's not very good for vocals, it's inefficient, what with its 40-year old design, and it distorts way too easy. There are far better amps for most purposes from Boss and others that deliver a lot more clean volume, thanks to modern class-D amp technology, and a variety of digital effects to boot.BUT... there is one area where the Pig prevails. If you're looking for the sound of a big overdriven amp in the studio, or miked on stage, the Pignose will give you that sound for less than the cost of one good quality overdrive pedal. By opening and closing the box, you can get a range of cabinet sounds from the open-back Fender to the classic Marchall sealed cab, and everything in between. Frank Zappa recorded a lot of his guitar parts using nothing but his SG running into a Pignose, and he got fantastic sounds.Beyond that, it's cool looking, reasonably rugged, and even has pegs that allow you to hang it from a guitar strap. Every rocker needs one., "musical_instruments"
The previous reviews are pretty accurate, though I would add that when the Pignose cabinet is closed, it can often sound rather boxy. It sounded much clearer and cleaner when it was opened a couple of inches.As for using pedals with it, it will take distortion to a degree. It reaches a point, if pushed too hard, at which the definition of the distortion will begin turning mushy and shrill. You can use a distortion + overdrive to decent effect, especially if you are running a cleaner sounding OD like a Tube Screamer. I don't think it would do so well with a Bad Monkey, for example, though, which has more dirt in the tones it produces. I don't have a fuzz box (not yet, but have one on order), but I think most fuzzes will sound like crap unless you use a relatively cleaner, sweeter one like the Red Witch Fuzz God or the Seymour Duncan Tweak Fuzz. Otherwise, you will hear too much ground asphalt in the sound.My wah wah, a Morley Power Wah, was almost useless with it. The limited frequency response of the 5\" speaker made it sound overly throaty on cleans and when I put the boost in the shrillness would show itself again.A chorus pedal sounds totally sweet on it, but a phaser, in my case, a Phase 90, just destroys the sound. A flanger is also not really advisable. You can use delay, just not with very rapid repeats. Putting a compressor in front of your clean signal would probably make it more manageable for the Pignose' speaker. I just bought a Dynacomp, but haven't tried it on the piggy.This is a good cheap first amp to buy for a youngster who is just beginning their journey on guitar and for practice when you are on the road on vacation or business. Once the young 'un seems dedicated, though, it is time to think about moving up to a VOX AC15C1 (note: that amp can do hard rock fine, but not high gain metal) or an ENGL Screamer. I personally can't imagine recording with it, but Y guess that would depend on the engineering skills available to you., "musical_instruments"
Using this to mic my Mesa Boogie Mark V 1x12 cabinet. It is holding a Shure SM57 microphone.  The microphone clip that came with the stand is plastic, but I'm using the one that came with the microphone which has metal threads., "musical_instruments"
I just purchased the mic stand for my desk at home. It does the job well. If you're looking to do some desktop podcasting or internet radio, then, it's perfect. Many adjustments to get just the right position. It's definitely not a performance mic, as it does feel a bit filmsy, but, you won't notice the flimsiness except for when you're adjusting it. Adjusting it is a tad tedious, but, you can get a really good position with the microphone after a couple minutes.I've mounted my Samson Q1U Dynamic Cardioid USB microphone to it. It works well for sure. Then, I attached the standard pop filter, and the microphone started tipping it over. Make sure the boom is aligned with a leg extension, or it will tip over if there's too much weight. Just find something semi heavy and find a way to attached it to the existing counter-weight, and it will be excellent. So this mic won't play nice with your large condensers + pop filters + shockmount at the start, but, just find a good counter weight and all will be well.It looks great, and will definitely be easy on the eyes in any room. It was a good investment, and all in all, you definitely get what you pay for. If you're hesitant on attaching a lot of stuff to it, then, I would recommend shelling out a couple more dollars for a sturdier stand.But atleast for me, it does the job, and does it well., "musical_instruments"
This little fellow is well built out of mostly steel and is heavy for its size. The locking knobs do their job without fail and I don't have to over crank them to get them to hold. I use it sitting on top of my table which holds my computer, recording interface and all the other stuff I use for recording. It adjust perfect for vocals and I drop it down if I want to use it for recording my acoustic guitars without using a pickup. Same with my violins. I get a different sound recording through a mic than I do a pickup.The base is heavy and will hold a mic with the boom extended all the way. You must turn one foot in the direction of use to get a full extension but with a minute retraction, it will stand securely in any direction. I set it where I want it then just swing it out of the way till I need it. I have used it sitting on the floor by my chair and reaches fine for vocals or acoustics. It's just more accessible on the desk. This would work fine for drummers.I would recommend this to any of my critical buddies. Thanks, "musical_instruments"
This mic stand will work great for mic'ing full stacks and guitar amps.Some people have mentioned the counterweight could be heavier but they need to pay attention to how they are orienting the feet in relation to the microphone. You should make sure one of the feet is pointing in the exact same direction as the microphone arm so that way the downward force is applied directly onto the support leg., "musical_instruments"
Just got this stand today.First impressions are always important, and this stand gave me a good impression.It seems to be made solid enough, not like some cheap off brand crap.The base is solid and heavy to keep the stand from falling over.The telescope mechanism is quite well made.Comes with a cable clip and an adjustment piece for smaller mic adapters.I got mine set up to extend up to 3ft tall. It's quite the perfect height for when I'm seated on my stool.One thing I did not quite like about the construction is the crew on rod to the base place. It unscrews easily when the mic stand is moved. Maybe adding something to keep it screwed in?Would recommend to others.Probably will be buying a few more to mic my amps and cabs., "musical_instruments"
this is a great stand for anyone looking to mic up their guitar amp, seems well built and rugged, although the mic clip is just a cheap plastic component you should immediately replace!, "musical_instruments"
I use this with fairly light mics (seeNady DMK-5 Drum Mic Packagefor details).While I generally do not mic bass drums, when I do this stand allows me to do it my way, which may seem unconventional to some folks. I place the mic on the batter side of the drum about three feet back. Since this can be problematic with the floor tom and throne (and hi-hat) hindering access, the boom and adjustability of this stand are a great help.Where the stand shines if micing amps. Some small amps, such as theFender Champion 600 Electric Guitar Amplifierare usually placed on a raised surface to keep them off the floor. This stand will reach any stand that is chair seat height. For larger amps that are on the floor or tiltback stands, this mic stand will still allow you to position the mic where you need it.My use is relatively narrow - kick drums and amps. But for each, this stand is excellent in my opinion. With the mics I am using it is heavy enough to remain stable, and for where I need to place those mics, it allows me to do so with relative ease., "musical_instruments"
Rock Solid! Sturdy! Everything about it is exactly how you would want it to be. I use this to MIC my Blackstar 2x12 Cab with an SM57, "musical_instruments"
I look at many stands before I brought this one, the rating were great and I'm very pleased with the purchase.  If I need another stand I will buy this one again with no hesitation., "musical_instruments"
This is a well made table top stand. The weight of the stand holds the mic and wire in place with ease. I would get this stand again., "musical_instruments"
I have quite a few mic stands, and picked this up to use for micing a guitar cabinet. I love the low profile and the design of the feet - it's very sturdy, and all around better than the DR stands that I have which cost twice as much. It has plenty of weight to it and enough reach to easily reach all 4 speakers in my 4x12 without becoming &#34;tippy&#34;.5/5, though it would have been nice if it shipped with more than just the single cable clip., "musical_instruments"
I purchased this for a friend who has just taken up playing the violin, she prefers it over the rosin that came with her student violin because of the wood that forms a grip around the rosin., "musical_instruments"
Its much better than what I got with my violin.  Its been good I can't really complain, considering its basically tree sap., "musical_instruments"
it's ok but a little cheaper quality than I expected.  I would recommend going a little higher price.  It also arrived cracked., "musical_instruments"
The rosin does the trick, and it's cased in a nice wooden holder, so it shouldn't crack easily (unlike those round rosin containers)., "musical_instruments"
really cool looking rosin, works well and is j, "musical_instruments"
I had some other rosin that was just a mess to apply.  This rosin is great because it's encased in a wooden sleeve that leaves your fingers free of rosin.  It's so easy to apply and doesn't leave any messy residue on my fingers.  I haven't been playing the violin for very long but did know I needed something to rosin the bow easily.  This was exactly what I needed., "musical_instruments"
I got my daughter a cheap fiddle here and the rosin SUCKED big time so we got this to use instead. Works well once you learn the trick of scuffing it up the first time you use it. I know everybody knows this already, but I've never played with a bow before, most all my instruments use pics or at least fingers., "musical_instruments"
Good length but very slippery.  I had my wife sew nice cotton fabric to the backside using white thread and it look better and doesn't slide around.  I took sandpaper to the lightning bolt for the more faded rugged look and it is actually a very rad strap that I have been commented on a few times now.  For the price, why not?  Be creative and make it original and it can be a very nice addition to a nice acoustic or electric.  As far as the base product, it has gone through a lot of use and is not showing any signs of wear., "musical_instruments"
I just put this on my Dot Hollowbody.  It's a big, heavy guitar and this strap looks good and does the job.  I like how it looks and feels and would buy another one just like it.  The price was great, had the Gibson name on it and was a great value.  5 stars., "musical_instruments"
Got this for my electric guitar.  I am able to adjust it to the length I play with.  Very sturdy guitar strap., "musical_instruments"
It just randomly pops off my bass, it's so slick that when you let go it the neck just goes straight down. I hate it., "musical_instruments"
i love the design, and the strap holds up very well. i would reccomend to anyone who likes gibson or the lightning bolt symbol., "musical_instruments"
I hope there had been a closer picture of the product.I was a little surprised when I got it because it doesn't look as great as I imagined.The white lightning is stamped on the black strap, the same goes for the GIBSON name on the end of it.Maybe it will get better looking in the long run., "musical_instruments"
Had this strap for 20 years now and still going on strong. Just a simple well made product that does the job. Perfect for those who use the instrument very high on the chest. Looks classic too!, "musical_instruments"
A perfect match for the original I replaced.  These fit the American sized pots perfectly.  The price at Amazon was the best I could find without buying used crap., "musical_instruments"
This is an original Gibson Gear replacement part. Don't change your knobs or any kind of part in your Gibson (Les Paul, SG or any other) if not for the real deal. I have a Les Paul and I definetely intend to maintain its value in the long term by using original parts. Besides, they look great and will perform their job for many, many years!, "musical_instruments"
I replaced the metric pots in my Greco LP and needed new top hats. These look great and work perfectly., "musical_instruments"
I like replacing pickguards, truss rod covers, knobs, etc. on my guitars. This is a nice part.  Looks awesome on my Les Paul Traditional Desert Burst., "musical_instruments"
These are stylish and fit perfectly on my guitar.  They are even and not warped like the stock ones were., "musical_instruments"
Like all Gibson products, this is high-quality polish that one would use on a high-quality guitar. I have used Gibson polishes for 38 years...., "musical_instruments"
I bought this recently and I love it. Why?  It has no &#34;smell&#34;, it leaves no residue on your hands, it's very &#34;light&#34; but yet it cleans, shines, and polishes your guitar beautifully.  It leaves a protective coating on the guitar which not only protects the finish, it also makes it ultra-shiny glossy and brings out the rich deep colors. This is fantastic stuff. If you own a guitar this is the best product out there. But what else can you expect from a US company like Gibson. I was very suprised that it was this effective. This little bottle goes a long way. I have already polished all of my guitars and my friend's guitars and I still have more than 1/2 a bottle left. If you need to polish your guitar look no further. This is your best choice., "musical_instruments"
The cloth that comes with the product is a high quality polishing cloth but some idiot thought it was best to package it stuck to the bottle with a glue button that leaves glue stuck to the cloth. This glue is only removable after a expensive bath using Goo Gone or similar glue dissolving solution, then washing with warm soapy water by hand and rinsing thoroughly in clear clean running water until all soap is removed, then hanging the cloth up to air dry, preferably outdoors in the sunshine if you have that available. The cloth is so nice it is worth the time-consuming and correct method of cleaning, but is not why you buy a product that is supposed to clean and polish in the first place. Somebody better redesign the packaging for this product as the Gibson cleaner polish is first-rate and puts a high lustrous shine on the guitar surface which comes out bright, dry and hard almost like having used a high quality paste wax but without residue. Very good stuff, very irresponsible packaging for the convenience of the factory I assume but without forethought to the customer's needs., "musical_instruments"
I was unsure what kind of polish to get for my guitar.  I would have thought pledge would work, but after a little reading I found out that could be bad for the woods tone and resonance.  After scoping out Amazon I came up with this product, and I am happy.  It makes my black guitar shine and is very easy to use.  It also comes with a nice polishing cloth...great deal for the money., "musical_instruments"
I bought this to get the grime and finger prints off of my Les Paul before putting it on eBay to sell. Worked great. Didn't harm the finish at all., "musical_instruments"
This is my second condenser microphone and I have to say that I love it. I previously owned an Audio Technica 2020 condenser mic which sounded thin and not as natural to me. I noticed that this mic does not really boost any frequencies like some other mics do in this price range. With this microphone, what you hear with your ears is basically what you get. Of course, room acoustics and microphone positioning all play a large part in the final sound.I use an Alesis mic preamp with a Focusrite 2i2 interface and the recordings sound clean. Another thing to mention, this is a variable pattern condenser mic. However, even with all the polar patterns that this mic has to offer, I usually just leave it on cardioid since I mainly use the M179 for vocals. Although I usually only record vocals, I also record electric guitar, acoustic guitar, and drums with the same microphone.Overall, my experience with this microphone has been pretty great. I think that for this price, it will be hard to find another microphone that can perform on the same level., "musical_instruments"
I sent it back, probably due to my ignorance.  Has multiple patterns to collect sound.  Was a clear mike but I didn't detect any body to the sound.  Maybe a preamp would have helped.  I checked out many mikes and ended up with a Rode NT-1A which is probably similar in character.  My goal was to record my voice without color and this came close.  I wonder how this could have a zillion ratings of five stars?  Suspicious ratings to me.  Now that I have more experience I would be curious to check it out.  But since I found a good solution I don't think it's worth the effort., "musical_instruments"
Ok here's the deal...I'm just a small home studio type of guy, and honestly I wasn't expecting much when I shelled out the $120 for this mic.  I have just always seen it around and I thought it would be a solid choice for my first multi-pattern mic!  The first time I recorded with it, I had it on omni mode and played some acoustic....it sounded amazing!  I can't believe this mic is that good.  Crisp, clean sound (who cares if it's made in China like that one guy says?), and very flexible usage.  I've since used it on toms, acoustic, a room mic for amps, and even some background vocals, and it has shined every time!So if you're like me and looking for a low-price LDC with multiple patterns, GET THIS.  You won't be disappointed at all!  :), "musical_instruments"
this mic gives a great range of recording purposes! Seems well built and rugged, the only complaint I have is that the face plate on the front fell off after only a month of light use, they must use a cheap adhesive for it, I had to clean both surfaces and give it a dab of gorilla glue to get the plate back on, "musical_instruments"
I bought this mic after hearing good things about it, but I had never tried it. It has impressed me quite a bit since then. I use it in a small home studio set-up, along with a Presonus Firebox and Logic Pro on a Macbook.For the price, this mic is a very good deal. It sounds much better than an Audio Technica 3035 that I had (and ended up selling shortly after getting this mic). I also got an Oktava MK-319 that is a much more expensive mic, and that was then sent to be mod'ed by Michael Joly (and therefore cost even more) and I'd say the two mics are very similar. I end up using the CAD M179 a lot more because it's less valuable, but sounds just as good.What else? It has low noise and combines the crispness you want from a condenser without being unpleasant. It sounds particularly great for male vocals, in my opinion, although I have used it for as a room drum-mic. I would highly recommend this mic, especially at this price point., "musical_instruments"
Got mine for under 130, and it's a great Mic.  I can use it for vocal tracks, or recording for webcasts that kind of thing, or recording studio guitar sounds etc.  Awesome mic., "musical_instruments"
I've done a good bit of recording over the years. This microphone has very very low self noise, low distortion and a continuously adjustable variable pattern.I've listened to and recorded with this mic and compared it to many other high priced options. This mic is outstanding, the sound of the mic simply disappears  . . . it records just about anything presented to it very naturally with great detail, but without hype or over brightness.I applaud CAD for keeping the price low which provides a great mic for drum mixing which would not be possible at the price point of this  more expensive functional competition., "musical_instruments"
Last forever and easy to hold onto.  Not much more to say but there really isnt much more that needs to be said.  My favorite picks., "musical_instruments"
Great all round pick, one of my favorites.  Easy to grip and are pretty quite.  They wear out extremely fast though., "musical_instruments"
I recently bought a bunch of picks of different gauges and materials for a shoot out. I think you have to see what kind of tone you are looking for - yes, even in a pick (sorry guys! - but for me, this material and gauge had a full sound, without being thin and the material feels best in the fingers. (I previously used .63 gauge acetal Claytons., "musical_instruments"
I like these pics.  I use a variety of thickness and this are moderately thin.  good for fast strumming, etc.  they feel good in your hand and are easy to hold onto.  I would buy them again., "musical_instruments"
Years ago I used the Clayton &#34;small teardrop&#34; picks. I couldn't tell from the picture, that these were full size, and I didn't check the size in the description.  I still had a few of the small ones, so I used them as templates, to cut these down. I would have rated them higher, if I could have used them as is. It's my own fault for not looking at the specifications. I purchased two six packs of Clayton Teardrop picks, but found Dunlop 423R60 0.60mm (Orange) Tortex Small Tear Drop Guitar Picks, 36-Pack which are a lot cheaper., "musical_instruments"
Clayton's rule! Been using since they debuted and will never change to anything else.Long lasting and great tone besides.Awesome.yes,indeed.khjghjjh hgkjhgk, "musical_instruments"
I owned a Boss graphic eq many years ago and never really took to it.  Ah, the folly of youth.  First, this pedal is dirt cheap, but the build quality actually seems very solid. The sliders have a nice feel to them, as does the on/off switch.  If you have any tonal issues with your amp then a graphic eq is an easy solution. No, it won't make you love an amp you hate, but if you're ALMOST THERE, or even just want to add some sonic variety, you won't really realize how useful and vital a graphic eq is.My rig right now is a strat and jazzmaster into a Pro Jr.  I love the amp, but as the volume goes up the treble gets a bit piercing.  I've been able to tame that issue with this pedal.  It's a subtle thing. It takes some time to play around with the sliders and figure out what will really hit your amp's sweet spot - at least in my application, where I'm leaving it on all the time.  This pedal would also be good for a solo boost, as it has plenty of output to make your leads punch through.Overall, for this price, you can't go wrong.  This is one of those pedals that has a million applications and will always have a use in my setup.  I'm thinking of getting a second one and building a pedalboard specific to my acoustic rig (comp, eq, chorus, reverb)., "musical_instruments"
Seriously, this is a great pedal. I can't improve upon what others have said, but I will mention a few points.1. I use this after the preamp or dirt boxes for a lead tone, or to add more crunch to my Fender Frontman 212 when inserted in the effects loop. It's run before time based effects (delay, phaser, etc) for me.2. I sometimes use it before the distortion as a clean booster, while focusing one of the sliders to boost a few frequencies.3. If it gets noisy or \"self oscillates\" after a while, change the battery to a fresh one. Better yet, use an AC adapter.I found out about the last issue after reading a few Harmony Central reviews. Otherwise, it's been on my setup for about seven years. I take care of my stuff., "musical_instruments"
Well, just got one of this and been messin with it for a couple of hours...I still think it takes a bit of brightness on bypass but when it's on it's great! I've been thinking on using it mainly as a boost for leads but it sounds so much better with it i can't seem to turn it off!it's light, small and it looks well built but only time will tell how resistent it is but hey for 30 bucks it's a great deal!This is a good EQ for an excelent price, not an excelent EQ so i give it a 4 out of 5 and look forward to testing some others danelectro pedals., "musical_instruments"
For your money I can't recommend the EQ enough. It's cheap, works well, and is small enough as to not clutter your pedalboard., "musical_instruments"
Originally I purchased a Behringer EQ700 equalizer pedal for my rig. It was cheap at around $20+ some change but like the other reviewers noted, it's noisy with hiss. So I took the advice of another reviewer & bought the Fish & Chips model by Danaelectro and it's terrific.I plugged it directly in line on my SKB pedal board, turned them both on, turned on the amp, put it on clean then distortion channels while cranking up the volume to max & no discernible hiss nor hum. Mind you this is not a boutique pedal so there is a tiny bit of noise at full volume but not to the point it is noticeable.This pedal has a cool 1950's style & appearance. It has a great punch when you raise up the Level and the tone selections are great to help model various guitar & amp sounds. For a modifying pedal, you cannot go wrong for the $30 price tag. If you're in the market for a great 7 band EQ pedal, then you'll be hard pressed to find one for the price of this one.This product rates 5 out of 5 possible stars., "musical_instruments"
I been playing guitar for 12+ years now. I play lead and rhythm. I needed a good EQ to sometimes scoop the sound a bit since I have a variety of guitars and they all sound different (some too much on the low and the others too much on the high). I don't like interfering with my mixer and amp settings and decided to get a pedal EQ instead. A boss EQ is solid and all yes but cost ALOT more. This EQ achieves almost the same results and I paid less! It has it's own level BTW., "musical_instruments"
I've been useing this pedal for several years and it does the job.  Yes, it could be metal, and I wish the button gave a satisfying 'click' when I step on it.  For under thirty clams I can look past these things.  I have not had any issues with noise (crackling or oscillation).  I really have no complaints at all with it's performance so I am glad I didn't shell out 3-4X more money so I can feel more secure when I unlatch my pedal board in front of gear-snobs.  I don't think I need to run this pedal with every amp I own but it does a great job 'opening up the sound' of boxy or dark sounding amps.  When I run it in the effects loop of my Palomino V8 (great little practice amp btw) that little amp sounds HUGE.  Also great in front of my Blues Jr.  If you own an amp with a single tone knob (Pro Jr, Valve Jr etc) or if you find your tone stack lacking responsiveness you owe it to yourself to buy one of these. Even if you are satisfied with the responsiveness of your amp's controls, this pedal can double as a volume boost when playing lead.  Once my sound is dialed in, I leave typically leave it on and forget about it.  It's also pretty indespensible for shaping the sound of your amplified acoustic guitar-, "musical_instruments"
I wasn't expecting much from this pedal but it has been a pleasant surprise. I use it to zero in the tone of my Alvarez acoustic for live shows. The pedal is quiet and solidly built. The price is great too., "musical_instruments"
This is a basic EQ pedal, that is a bit noisy in my testing. Even when running on battery power, there is a bit of hiss that is just enough to be annoying in my rig and probably enought to be very annoying in some higher gain rigs., "musical_instruments"
For a cheap EQ it does great. Sometimes though when I hit the switch the light turns on and there is a second before the signal comes back. If it was not for that it would be a 5 star rating. I am not too worried about it because the pedal + loop pedal is still cheaper then the MXR or Boss Eq's, "musical_instruments"
I needed an EQ pedal since my current amp has no way of adjusting it's EQ. Most distortion pedals I plugged into it ended up sounding way to &#34;bassy&#34;, and so I bought this in hopes that it would help clear that up a little. I really didn't expect much since this pedal was so cheap; and for a brand new one at that; I was completely surprised that this worked and also helped improve , "musical_instruments"
I bought this EQ pedal to use with a 70's amp project. I replaced the speaker and needed some mids so I bought this pedal to use for a clean channel. The EQ and boost works great for being a plastic box. I have seen the F&C; be called 'pure gold in a plastic box' on a Telecaster forum and read reviews all over the net saying the same thing.The EQ works wonders for tone and is priced less than it's MXR and Boss counterparts. I am not going to rehash all the other reviews, but I use it with a bass/guitar amp and it works surprisingly well with the old amp and a passive bass. The boost combined with the 2 low bass EQ's works wonders for low end.I use a Boss GE-7 EQ pedal with a different amp, and the F&C; works as well as the Boss as long as you don't mind the cheap construction from Danelectro. I do not gig with the pedal so the plastic doesn't matter to me. I am wondering how long the switch will last though, but at this price, who can be critical.Some Danelectro pedals can be sorted into the novelty realm, but this one is actually very functional and can open up all new sounds. I also tried the EQ with a Telecaster and the pedal gave me alot more bass and low end. I hope this lasts as long as my old all plastic FAB distortion that I bought used for $5., "musical_instruments"
These Danelectro pedals are great quality for the money. I use this pedal behind my dirt pedals for added flexibility and bringing out some more \"brilliance\" to the tone. The case is plastic, not very attractive, and perhaps not very sturdy. Also the button to push down for the effect leaves a bit to be desired -- it doesn't feel very solid. But I intend to use this more for recording than live use, so I'm not worried about that. Anyway, there aren't many EQ's on the market, and for the price, it can't be beat. I would recommend it., "musical_instruments"
Had this for about 3 years now - it works great, and for 30 dollars, it was a heck of a bargain.The construction is ok - it's plastic with a metal + rubber bottom, but seems sturdy.  Battery is easy to get in and out, and comes with one (but is not shipped connected to the terminals).Signal wise, if on, it adds a tiny amount of hiss and static, which raises the noise floor by a hair.  The noise isn't noticeable unless you are paying attention when turning it on or off.  Besides, if you are boosting the high end, you are going to get hiss.Works great in front for a clean or unclean boost, but I tend to use it in the fx loop - where it does what it's supposed to do.  I think it's a must for getting the most out of an existing amp setup, especially if the amp's EQ isn't doing it for you, or the cab or speaker choice is less than optimal - this thing fixes it all!I would definitely choose this over more expensive EQs, but I tend to take good care of my stuff., "musical_instruments"
This pedal, fish and chips, which i find it to taste nothing like, works nicely.And was pretty cheap..I've heard some complaints/worries about the flimsiness of the plastic.As of 03.13 the plastic seems pretty thick/durable.The switch does seem of a poor quality, but if it did break im sure either send it in and get a new one or put a nicer switch in yourself.As for noise, It doesn't seem to add much, unless you have the gain switch at the end turned up high, and with distortion and what have you.I haven't gotten to blast (play bedroom level, technically) since i've gotten it, but it sounds good through the headphones.I'm using a squire strat, fryette sas distortion, now the fish and chips, boss me-50 all running into, for now, my vox vt20+, which is outputting to my headphones. soooo...Its sounding nicer that way.I cant wait to get it through my other amps.I've also heard of very very short battery life. I've got the standard 9v i think from planet waves and it's powering it just right, so far.Tomorrow's the real test, a few hours at least, "musical_instruments"
I have a Fender T Bucket acoustic guitar and I put heavy guage strings on it. As beginner these strings were not good for me. I tried these and they blow away the heavy guage strings. Good quality. Glad I bought these., "musical_instruments"
N, "musical_instruments"
I love these strings, I've tried others but I always come back to these, great for beginners, the phosphor Bronze provide a lower/deeper tone that I prefer, but still very bright., "musical_instruments"
I read the reviews on Ernie Ball strings. I have to say that I love the strings. They have a rich sound that brings my acoustic alive., "musical_instruments"
Who say's Ernie Ball can't make good Acoustic Strings. This set sounds just fine and for the money forget about itThanks Amazon! :o-), "musical_instruments"
What can I say, they are Ernie Ball Slinky strings. I've been using Slinkys on my acoustics and electrics for 40 years and they have never let me down- (Unlike some of the higher priced strings) I might add. Very responsive and never dull or weak sounding. Crisp highs and smooth lows that don't get &#34;mudded&#34; out. I would recommend these to anyone to at least try a set on your acoustic guitar and Ernie Ball Super Slinkys on your electric guitar. Still, after all of these years and innovations in strings, Ernie Ball still gets my vote hands down!!, "musical_instruments"
I originally purchased these strings because of the 11-52 gauges. I wanted a set of strings that would have slightly lighter tension than a regular set of light gauge which is usually somewhere around 12-54. Upon installing these strings, I can't really see much difference in size from the regular light gauge, but maybe it's too small to notice with the naked eye. I'm not entirely sure that these strings were louder or a marked improvement over the old DAddario strings that they replaced. They might be a little brighter or have more clarity due to being new. The guitar that I'm using them on, is a small body with a nice mellow sound anyway, so everything sounds nice and smooth. Overall, I'm satisfied with the sound and performance of the new strings, but I don't think I'm ready to give up DAddarios yet., "musical_instruments"
Arrive on time and as described.  I have yet to install but do not expect any surprises as have used these strings in the past.  I have read many of reviews on guitar strings as well as talked to many different guitarist.  Pretty well  all have their favorite set of strings.  What is interesting is they do not all agree on a specific type and/or brand.  So I reckon each has to find their own.  So far these strings have worked for me but am still experimenting to find &#34;the ones to love&#34;!, "musical_instruments"
Ernie Ball is really on to something with the Slinky series, offering a nice range of weights. I swear by the Slinky, after being conned into a a set of Mexican-Made Martins., "musical_instruments"
I use these strings on some of my acoustic guitars. good brand and good tone. 5 stars for this one., "musical_instruments"
SLAP THESE PUPPIES ON YOUR TEN DOLLAR SQUIER AND YOU'VE GOT YOURSELF A $2000 GUITAR.I'd describe the sound as a bit &#34;metallic'ish&#34;, definitely a sharper tone., "musical_instruments"
Heard good things about the Ernie Ball Slinky string set and decided to give it try on our son's Taylor GS Mini.  Replaced the worn out strings out of that guitar and he is back in business.  Honestly though, it is hard to really compare strings, these seem fine and currently I see no reason to try another brand.  In conclusion, I see no reason not to buy and install these again.Please click YES if my review have been helpful to you, it will encourage me to continue writing and updating my reviews, and leave a comment if you have any questions, I will be more than happy to answer if I can be of help., "musical_instruments"
I have found the perfect strings and these are not them.I will use these for my lower end stuff I will probably sell anyway.  We all have our preferences but I'm not an Ernie Ball fan.  They're cheap though., "musical_instruments"
Ernie Ball Acoustic strings will bring your tired guitar to life.  My playing sucks - sounds better with these strings.  Bright and warm at the same time.  Great tone.  Easy on the fingers, "musical_instruments"
I installed these on a Silvertone SD10, which is a dreadnought acoustic guitar.  They are so much nicer than the strings that were on my guitar from the factory.  If you are looking for a regular/medium string, these are real nice. Great product., "musical_instruments"
No matter the weight selections, I've found the Ernie Ball Slinky series a worthy pairing for my acoustics.  Theyy're responsive and twangy., "musical_instruments"
I have a cedar topped acoustic and these strings brought it to life without losing the cedar smoothness. No mud, clear mids and highs with clashing. Mounted them with the brass tone pins and this guitar just rings like a bell now. Love it., "musical_instruments"
These guitar strings are nothing special, and based on the amazingly low price nobody should expect them to be. They work well, look good, and are fairly durable at a very low price. I was remodeling an old Behringer and all I wanted was a fresh, shiny set of new strings. For playing, they sound pretty good. Best part, in my opinion, is that they're made in America, as well as the majority of Fender products. If you want to spend the extra money, I'd stil recommend Ernie Ball over these, or perhaps simply a higher quality pair of these Fender strings. You get what you pay for. As far as shipping, Musician's Friend did a great job getting the order out quickly. I'll be ordering from Musician's Friend again., "musical_instruments"
I bought a guitar and for a while used the strings that were provided with it.  After a month of using those strings I decided to replace them since I was having trouble keeping the low E string in tune.  I put these strings on and compared to the &#34;default&#34; strings, it was almost silky and softer by comparison.I'm guessing the guitar came with steel strings and these are nickel. The sound was much nicer to my ears as well.  They were relatively inexpensive and made a great choice for replacing the strings on a new guitar., "musical_instruments"
I have tried nearly every kind of popular strings out there. I've used ernie ball, fender, prs, just all kinds. When I bought my first real fender guitar it came with fender strings and I loved them. So when I needed more strings I just got fenders. I am happy to say that I will prolly never buy different kind of strings again. They are so clean sounding and have a pure vibe to them. GREAT strings., "musical_instruments"
These are the Gold standard for all Strat type electrics, Fender or not.  I put these 150's on all of my Strats regardless of the brand.  They are durable enough to take a pounding and sound great.  I tend to play my Strats a bit rougher than my Gibson's or acoustics so these are well tested in my house.  I get a bit carried away with amp volume and tend to bend the strings a bit.  I will continue using these on all of my Strats until I find something better which I haven't yet.  I do use other strings on other types of guitars and you can see my reviews on those as well.These are bullet proof.  They take a pounding and last as long as you could expect!!!, "musical_instruments"
There are something special about these strings. They ring so bright and beautiful. I absolutely love them for my fenders. I honestly don't use them on all of my fenders but they are on my tele. They're gorgeous sounding, especially when new., "musical_instruments"
Don't know what it is but I love the sound of these strings, placebo? Maybe but IMO these are the best sounding strings I've played with., "musical_instruments"
I use Fender strings and I have used many other brands as well.  I like Nickel for the reduced fret wear and the sound.  I change out my strings about monthly and if a particular guitar is being used quite a bit I can go 2 to 3 weeks for hard playing.I started using Fender strings with the Stratocaster bullet strings as they are specifically designed to fit into the tremolo bridge on the strat.  They sounded great.  I use these for my telecaster in 10 -46 (factory spec) and they are real nice too.I do not recommend using stainless steel strings on guitars because stainless strings are like using stainless steel files on your frets.  I have seen some real damage in some cases in a relatively short time period.  Stick to nickel and you will be glad you did!, "musical_instruments"
We geetarists are a funny bunch: we'll change out pots and caps and pups from our axes and amps all day long, and spend a fortune doing it. But sometimes we could make more tonal difference by just spending five bucks!Case in point: pure nickel strings. Time was when that was all there was...and gee whiz, that was a time when good guitar tone ruled. Coincidence? Nope. These things just sound better, if by better you mean warmer and with a subtle feel that your fingers will convey to your brain in milliseconds. If you're used to wrapped strings, and you like to play blues or classic rock or pretty much anything but metal, these might be all you need to make your rig sound a whole lot sweeter and smoother and just more musical in general. Especially if you use tubes.Tubes and pure nickel are like Gilmour and Strats or Angus and SGs. They just fit.I'm not nuts about Fender acoustic strings, but I like their normal electric strings fine, though Ernie Ball Slinkies have been my go-tos for many years. But these Fender pure nickels are very very nice, and at 4.75, they're a real deal. Most pure nickels run nearer to ten, and these sound pretty much the same, and I don't seem to break many of 'em neither. If you're used to mixed alloy, pure nickels might seem a little \"dull\", but wait a bit and you'll find that the harmonics are still there when the alloys have faded. Plus the feel is just smoother and nicer under the fingertips. Try a set and see what I mean. It's subtle but it's beautiful.But the main reason I love these is for playing at VOLUME! I turned my modded Hot Rod Deluxe up to call-the-cops levels (the neighbors are getting used to it by now), louder than the drummer by a good chunk, and I got: less squealing, warmer tone by far, and full chords, triads and double stops that felt and sounded smoother and grinded with more harmonic warmth than any alloy string I've ever used. I think there's an electrical cohesion between pure nickel and good pups and tubes that is simply sublime. Check out BB's tone on the legendary Live At The Regal to hear what I mean. That's the stuff.So, if you haven't tried pure nickels, spend a buck or two more (or maybe less!) than you normally do and give these bargain-priced nickels a try. You might find that you're a convert within seconds. I know that my ears sure love them when things are really cranked up; those Zep and Jimi riffs just sound and feel so much more right with pure nickel. And digging into some Otis Rush or Billy Gibbons licks is like night and day. The bluesy stuff just begs for pure nickels.Hell of a bargain at less than five bucks., "musical_instruments"
You want a Fender to sound like one, and using these strings helps with that. I have them on a MIA Telecaster and they stay in tune and have good sustain. I'm happy with them., "musical_instruments"
I like these 9-42 Pure Nickel strings ... nice tone, work well on my Stratocaster with Fender locking tuners ... great combo, even with ghost bends, slides, and pounding with Drop D and Open G tuning., "musical_instruments"
You can't beat these, for the price. I use them on 3 of my guitars (2 27&#34; scale baritones in A and B, and a 24.75&#34; standard scale in C#)I got a 12-pack (elsewhere) for under 4 bucks a set. They sound really good. No breakage problems, etc., "musical_instruments"
These came on my American Tele in 2004, and I've been buying them ever since.  Sweet action, durable, and very affordable., "musical_instruments"
Decent strings I used for a beat up strat that I had. Nothing to special but it was good enough for that. I'd recommend these., "musical_instruments"
Same kind that come on all guitars from the Fender factory. Classic sound. I have switched to D'Addarios to capture that Frusciante sound., "musical_instruments"
I've used quite a few strings out there and imo these are the best for feel, sound , "musical_instruments"
I think they did it right splitting the light and medium gauges. What resulted for me was the perfect gauge string. They almost sound as good as mediums but feature the playability of lights. I also think these strings last a decent amount of time, particularly if you wipe your strings after playing (which I need to get better at doing). Bottom line: I highly recommend these; they are the strings that I use and have been using for several years now., "musical_instruments"
I've always played on light gauge strings and really wanted more sound out of my guitar so I found these and just took a gamble on this medium/light set and I was not disappointed. There was an immediate notice in sound difference and also the playablility of my guitar became a little more challenging. They offer a very warm tone with very good bala, "musical_instruments"
I had changed my strings with some new Martins I got recently. They were bloody awful! Luckily, I'd also picked up a package of these Ernie Ball strings. First of all, they were packaged better than the Martins, they went on more easily and after I tuned up, they sound SO much better! Thank you Ernie Ball, for making far superior strings. My guitar thanks you as well (grin)., "musical_instruments"
i was pretty happy with them when i got them and finally used them and will likely pick up more once i need them., "musical_instruments"
I always LOVE THESE!Moreso because I am not getting ripped off by a Brick & Mortar shoppe for a tool of the trade., "musical_instruments"
This set of strings is fantastic. I've been playing for over ten years now, and have tried everything from Elixirs, to D'Addario, to Martin, to John Pearse (you see where I'm going with this?)and many more.I have to say that for the money, these strings are in a class of their own.  When I first started playing I loved the coated strings.  I wouldn't buy anything but Elixirs for years!  Then I got married and money became tight, and for $15 a pop, a set Elixirs wasn't looking as good as they used to.So I tried every other set of strings under the sun for about three years.I finally landed on these Earthwoods by Ernie Ball.  Amazing!They are not coated, but after a while I got used to that, and now actually prefer non-coated strings.These really do bring out the \"earthy\" tones of my dreadnought.  And the Medium Light set is just perfect!  Nice size high E string so I don't feel like I'm going to snap it when I do a pull off, and good bass response.All in all a fantastic set of strings that you can't afford not to try.And at $5, why wouldn't you give them a shot?, "musical_instruments"
Have always liked  Ernie ball products,so I thought I would like to try their strings,to see how they work,I am very pleased !, "musical_instruments"
I've used GHS medium bronze wound strings on my Martin D-18 for several years. I thought I'd give these Ernie Ball strings a shot after reading reviews. They are lighter than I expected. They are closer to \"light\" than medium. I'm not that impressed. They sound too bright and occasionally rattle on the frets. I think the next set I buy will be medium and probably GHS. You never know until you try.Update: I've gotten used to the 'sound' of these strings and I DO like that they are easier on the old fingers when playing. Pure Bluegrass players like to torture their fingers with heavier strings to get that mellow BG sound, though. ;) At my age I need all the help I can get, so I'll have to admit that I like do like these strings., "musical_instruments"
These just sound flat in comparison to Elixir Nanowebs and they don't feel as good either.I guess I just prefer coated acoustic strings., "musical_instruments"
I built a CBG recently and decided to go with these strings as suggested on several websites. The sound I get from the AD&G strings sound great wit the piezo pickup and a tube amp. The strings seem to hold up well. I cannot comment on how well they hold a tune because anyone who knows cigar box guitars knows that keeping them in tone with parts like round head bolts for a nut and an eye bolt for a bridge can be an uphill battle. These strings sound great, I was thinking of stringing my electric acoustic guitar with them also to compare the two styles of playing., "musical_instruments"
I use these strings on my gig guitar because the are light enough I can play a couple hours without shredding my fingers but they are big enough to give it a nice warm sound, "musical_instruments"
I don't like the feel or sound of these strings.  I bought both the .010 and the .011 and they both hurt my fingers and sound like tin foil.  I would not buy these again, "musical_instruments"
put them on my daughter's guitar, and she enjoys them.  anything would be an improvement over the dead strings that she was playing.i'll take ernies over martins, but not over d'addarios on my guitars though., "musical_instruments"
I purchased several of thes Fender Mini stands because I don't have a lot of sapce for my guitars and I fold these up and stick them in my closet when need  I don't need them.For approx. ten bucks you can't go wrong. They work as well as bulkier more expensive stands, "musical_instruments"
I have owned two of these stands. The first one was rendered unusable after the set screw disappeared. The second one must have walked off on its own while I was moving to a new place. Not the greatest stands by any means, but for what they're worth, I didn't mind spending another $10 to get one. Sure there are other stands of much higher quality that are even more compact and portable. But price, ability to collapse, and it's light weight made it the one I bought... again., "musical_instruments"
It is not the size for mini guitar. May be for the big one...Connections are shaky. You will surely notice that the quality is toooo low., "musical_instruments"
Total flimsy junk. It leans WAYYY too far back. I'll be damned if I put my $1000 guitars on these things. On the other hand, ChromaCast makes one that's very close to this price, and I doubt that it could have been more for the money I paid.In summary... DO NOT BUY THIS PIECE OF JUNK., "musical_instruments"
Excellent compact guitar stand. Folds so small that it easily fits in guitar case or gear bag. Not as stable as some stands but for the size and price, can't be beat. Thanks to Amazon for offering such a good product., "musical_instruments"
I love these little guitar stands. They are small enough to go anywhere with you, and they are cheap enough that you can keep a couple of them around. Which is good if you are as clumsy as I am.The last two of these that I have owned met untimely deaths. The first was on stage and since it is so small I tripped over it on the back of the stage. The second one I tripped over and ended up falling off of the stage. I know, I know... but they really are cool little stands, and I just bought another one lol. I am a glutton for punishment!, "musical_instruments"
This stand is designed to work on electric guitars, not acoustic or acoustic/electric guitars.  The arms that support the guitar are short and not adequate for acoustic guitars.  This is however perfect for my LP and SG guitars.  I love its size and portability., "musical_instruments"
...for something, but not a guitar.  Wasn't sure what to do with it so I now use it to mount a large cookbook, or notepad computer, so I can follow a recipe.  It seems to work okay for that.  Just don't use this for guitars.  An electric guitar will slide out and fall because it leans back too far, and the arms have no grip.  This thing was obviously created by a monkey in some closed door creative testing experimental project.  It may even give you AIDS!  But probably not.  However, animals could have been harmed in the making.  But most likely, and in reality, it will not hold your guitar in a safe manner., "musical_instruments"
I needed a small, collapsible stand which would fit in my backpack with my little amp cables and stuff. This is perfect, love it., "musical_instruments"
Fender came up with a fine electric guitar holder - one of two new models, the other for acoustic guitars. Well built, reliable, folds up, takes little room to care around. Ideal for gigs as well as studio and home. Solid performer. - Michael Haller, 'Captain Soul's Sound Circus', "musical_instruments"
I needed some little, easy, and portable guitar stands for the stage.  This does it perfectly, well.  While being light and portable., "musical_instruments"
This stand seems to be made especially with the Fender Stratocaster in mind and might also be a perfect fit for other Fender guitars.  On my Les Paul the cable plug on the guitar is exactly where the bottom holder bar is.  If I adjust the guitar so the plug is not on the bar, the guitar sits at an angle where the guitar might tip over on it's side.Needless to say I will use this stand for my Stratocaster but I am purchasing a different model for the Les Paul., "musical_instruments"
The fender mini electric guitar stand is not made for the fender / Squire mini guitar. the guitar falls through. I will have to buy a differant stand for him, rendering this one useless. The fender stand for standard guitars will not work on the 3/4 size ether., "musical_instruments"
I've bought a half dozen of these to keep in all my cases or gig bags. Sturdy, stable and reliable. Not a big fan of Fender accessories, but they got this one right., "musical_instruments"
I have two of these stands, the electric guitar/bass version and the acoustic version. Back to buy a second electric guitar version as a spare or to keep in my guitar case. Yes -- folded up it WILL fit in my tweed Fender electric guitar case alongside the neck of the guitar (I DO always keep it IN the included stand bag to ensure I don't scratch or bump it against my guitar). Great at this price too, buy several!, "musical_instruments"
This fender mini guitar stand works great.  It has cushin/ padding so my guitar is safe - it's small but stady.  All in all--Good purchase., "musical_instruments"
Easy to pack, easy on the instrument, light weight but sturdy. An excellent value and a great gift idea too!, "musical_instruments"
It holds all my acoustics perfectly.  It's light but stays in place okay.  Rubber pieces are soft enough and seem like they'll last a while.  Two really nice things about this design: 1) it folds up very nicely and becomes pretty small, 2) the all black and slim arms/legs design makes it look nicer in a room.  It pretty much disappears when you put a guitar on it so I'm able to have it out without offending my wife.  :), "musical_instruments"
this thing is sturdy, inexpensive, and does it's job.  no scratches or anything on my taylor.  it falls over now and then but only when i run into it, "musical_instruments"
This stand easily folds, and holds my Mandolin in a scratch-proof stance.  Not good for smaller instruments, like the name may imply to some.  An attempt to hold a smaller ukulele miserably failed, but everything from Tenor uke and up, did just fine! :), "musical_instruments"
This is an good stand for situations where there aren't too many threats to your guitar (running dogs on the porch, reeling drunks at a bar). Get a heavier stand or a wall hanger if you have a fabulous vintage Martin or a handmade Henderson. Overall, well worth the price., "musical_instruments"
Small light and stays out of the way,  it just works.  Folds up if needed for travel.  I use with Stratacoustic., "musical_instruments"
It is so small and cute and totally fits my guitar with and without the bag. So if it is outside the bag of course I can showcase my guitar. The guitar inside the bag fits perfectly too. It stands as it should and it was a snap (literally) to set up it was like three steps or something. Wow. I am very impressed considering the price!!!!, "musical_instruments"
this little stand is great.  I am looking at it right now, across the room, holding my Zager guitar.  it is light, non obtrusive, holds the guitar well, and it is portable when Mr. Guitar and I take a trip together.  I highly recommend it.  keeps that guitar off the bed, floor, table or anywhere else it is not really suposed to be., "musical_instruments"
Not your average Giant Clumsy Guitar Stand, but it works. The only drawback is that it is literally not big enough to provide a very stable base of support. If you have toddlers or rambunctious dogs, or even fairly large cats, a larger stand might be a better choice. If your household is quiet, this is very much a good bargain., "musical_instruments"
I have 7 of these stands for my 7 guitars. I have 4 classical guitars, 2 flamenco guitars and 1 acoustic steel string.  It's very durable and easy to set up and the guitars never tip over.  It's a really great, quality stand for the price.  They don't take up a lot of room and they're very light and portable if you want to take them with you to a gig or if you're traveling.  I highly recommend it.My guitar teacher suggested that I keep my guitar(s) out because he said that if I kept it/them in a visible, easily-accesible place that I would practice more, even if it was just a few minutes and he was absolutely right.  Instead of zipping them up and putting them away in their respective bags/cases after each practice session, I have them all out and displayed and I definitely practice and play more because as soon as I step into the room - there they are, I just pick any one of them up and start playing.  It was a simple tip that sounded like common sense but I hadn't realized that I always had the excuse that I didn't have time to practice -- but really the effort of getting the gig bag and unzipping it and taking out the guitar even though that seems like very little effort and doesn't take up a lot of time, for some reason kept me from practicing.  I guess out of sight, out of mind.  But now I keep my guitars out, and I also bought a music stand and I keep the music I'm working on and the stand out.  Yes, it takes up room and stuff but whatever gets me to practice more and play more is always very helpful., "musical_instruments"
Inexpensive. Light weight yet sturdy while holding a guitar. Folds up and can easily be stored. Highly recommend this for the guitar player., "musical_instruments"
I've got three of these simply because they work and they're easy to carry from place to place...and I insist on a stand for my guitar, none of this &#34;leaning' stuff., "musical_instruments"
I like the size of the stand and the flexibility.  Easy to put together and holds my guitar very well., "musical_instruments"
I haven't really used this guitar stand because I have been keeping my acoustic guitar in the case so I can keep the humidity nice adding water to a sponge I cut and placed into a plastic bag that I poked tiny holes in with a small nail.  The stand works as advertised., "musical_instruments"
I knoew I did not want any holder that took up too much room in my music room, not did I want something that would tip over if I blew air on it. My instructor of the guitar suggested I really read the information about all of the holders and then make my choice of the one that seemed to be light-weight yet sturdy to not fall over, looked professional, and could be the possibility of THE one I would recommend and purchase again. I really like the stability of the one I bought., "musical_instruments"
This little guitar stand works very well.  I like it much better than the larger stands that support a guitar by the neck., "musical_instruments"
This stand folds into a pretty small package, but supports the guitar very solidly. You would almost have to INTENTIONALLY knock it over, I don't think a casual bump would do it. The only complaint I would have is that the guitar leans back a bit far. My other stands are pretty standard, with a vertical riser to support the neck, and I'm used to a more upright stance. Maybe that's just a matter of taste, but otherwise this is a great stand., "musical_instruments"
This item does the job. I don't have any real marks against it but I've seen better stands out there., "musical_instruments"
This little stand collapses and sets up so easy.  Holds my guitar perfectly.  May buy one for my dad next!, "musical_instruments"
Fender's new Mini Acoustic Guitar Stand is one of two new stands, the other is for electric guitars. Sturdy, reliable and easy to take on gigs or use in the studio or at home. - Michael Haller, 'Captain Soul's Sound Circus', "musical_instruments"
If you perform at gigs, you know what a hassle it is transporting all your stuff to and from the venue.  This is a very handy stand for keeping your guitar upright and safe where size and weight are important considerations.  I used to bring along a much heavier stand that wasn't really designed for portability to keep my guitar from being knocked around.  This stand does the trick beautifully.  Nice job, Fender., "musical_instruments"
this stand is small but does the job.and folds up in to a small package.i have one for each guitar, "musical_instruments"
It was cheap to buy but works just fine. I thought it might not be tall enough to hold my guitar securely but it does. The arms are coated with a soft material that prevents scratching. It is small but the arms stretch to hold almost any guitar securely. Perhaps it might be too light for a very heavy guitar. In that case, I would recommend a stand that is taller and heavier., "musical_instruments"
Extremely lightweight, compact and portable, it folds up really small so that you can carry it in your guitar case, gig bag or tuck it in the back of your amp,, "musical_instruments"
I folds down to a very small size but is quite strong. I have a dreadnaught resting on it now, ready for use. It should work very well with any size acoustic guitar. Sitting by itself, the stand is small enough to be out of the way but is able to hold my precious guitar securely when put to use.  When I get another guitar, I will get another Fender stand to go with it., "musical_instruments"
My guitar doesn't fall down anymore.  Looks nice, displayed in the corner of my office.  Very light, but sturdy and is portable.  The only &#34;Fender&#34; I'll ever be able to afford!, "musical_instruments"
This stand feel sturdy and strong.Compact design on stand and folding for travel.Good for acoustic and electric guitars.Thick non scratch foam is a plus.Love it., "musical_instruments"
I take workshop style guitar courses at a local Vo-Tech in a room that could not be any less suited to the purpose. People set their guitars on the desks from which they sometimes fall. Bad scene (sounds like an old \"El Kabong\" cartoon), and not what I want to have happen to my new Seagull Artist series guitar. This little Fender stand easily folds up into a package small enough to fit in the storage pocket of my deluxe TRIC case so I can take it with me to class.It's not the sturdiest, most secure or most stable design out there, but given it's extreme portability and the use I'll put it to, it's going to work great., "musical_instruments"
GREAT strings!  Good quality and very good sound.  These seem a lot more stable than the 10-46 I had been using., "musical_instruments"
i play metal / hard rock and have used many different strings, these give the best tone and depth you need to play hard music, "musical_instruments"
the best idea anyone who strings a bass can decide on. I am a fan of the Slinky guitar strings so I got these for my freetless Schecter 4 string bass. Like they were made for it., "musical_instruments"
The these strings are fantastic. The sound is deep and heavy, which is exactly what I was looking for. Makes the bass sound pretty bad@$$. I cranked up the bass amplifier after putting on these strings and the sound is pure, powerful, and blew me away.Well worth the money., "musical_instruments"
Feels great, sounds great, there's a little bit of magic in these strings. High quality classics add a touch of class to your sound., "musical_instruments"
I bought this to put the new strings on my guitar but the shipping info said it wouldnt be here for a few more days.  I restrung my guitar without it and it showed up in the mail a few hours later.  I can say its built much better than I thought it would be.  Feels like its built to last., "musical_instruments"
Works just fine. Except the little knob that's supposed to take out the parts that hold in the strings (the little pins or whatever) it doesn't grip onto mine (I have an acoustic jasmine takkamine) so I had to get out pliers from my toolbox, but that's okay. One size doesn't always fit all. Good price., "musical_instruments"
It winds well and can cut off excess string thereafter. The design also includes a bridge pin puller that comes in handy. With some acquired technique this tool does a job., "musical_instruments"
bought this on a whim and I am glad of it, I have not used the string winder part yet but the cutter makes short work of both guitar and mandolin strings without the risk of marring the head, just be careful you can pinch yourself if you are not careful., "musical_instruments"
Changed the strings on my Epiphone EB-0 bass today for the first time using this product.Fit the extra large tuning pegs on my bass with room to spare.  Cutter works great, winder makes the job really fast.  10 minutes it took for all 4 strings.  Next time will be much faster now that i know what im doing.  Highly recommended, "musical_instruments"
I won't rant about a string winder..  They aren't that technical of an item but I do like the string cutter.  I do almost prefer the pin puller on the cheaper units but I am not going to be that picky..  This unit works just fine and I am sure that I will lose it before It breaks.., "musical_instruments"
I like this product so much I buy them two at a time but I wish I didn't have to. The problem is that everyone else likes it as much as me! So it's like that guy who asks for a lighter...uses it...and puts it in his pocket every single time, these also seem to grow feet and disappear just like the lighter.I understand people coveting tools that work this well and are so convenient but if it turns them into kletptos maybe it should contain a stain pack to catch them like bank robbers.It's a decent tool at a good price so buy one...Then see how long you can own it!, "musical_instruments"
It works fine for the regular guitars but the bass guitar has these very wide tuning pegs.  This winder has a slot that will sorta fit across this tuning peg but it doesn't feel like it has enough of a grip to make turning it easier.I haven't had a chance to actually use it while changing strings yet, but so far it looks like it'll work as advertised in every other aspect., "musical_instruments"
This is basically the Leatherman Multi tool for guitarist. By Leatherman, I really mean Planet Waves - The go to, sure shot company that will provide solid guitar products and accessories (I buy cables, picks, straps from Planet Waves so.. I guess you could say I'm a fan of their company) And by multi-tool, I really mean this Pro Winder String Winder and Cutter. Everything you need to know is in the title! It helps to wind your guitar strings, the grip is comfortable and durable, and once you've tuned your guitar you can clip off the excess guitar string. Awesome! But wait... there's more (I should be on an infomercial) There's also a nifty little pin puller for when you re-string your acoustic instruments. For the price, this does everything and more... I recommend if you need a winder, just buy this. You'll take out 3 birds with one stone, even if you only needed to take out one bird...... if that makes sense? Cheers!, "musical_instruments"
i always keep these around during string changes. i prefer the bass version to this if you can find it, "musical_instruments"
It works pretty well on my ukulele, however it left several dents and scratches on the tuners of my ukulele., "musical_instruments"
I ordered the product thinking it was going to be the answer to all my dreams, but alas, I was wrong. The winding apparatus works beautifully, but the cutter doesn't allow me to get a short enough cut on the strings for my preference, so I'm back to using metal pliers to snip the strings close to the post. All in all, a good product to have if you don't have pliers on hand or don't mind getting a closer snip.I cannot comment on the peg remover since my acoustic doesn't have pegs - luckily, the strings are fed through the slots on the back of the bridge, which I think is a much better design than guitars with pegs to hold strings in place. Each to their own, I suppose., "musical_instruments"
This is such a lifesaver (or an effort saver). Every guitarist should have this. In my opinion, there is nothing more annoying in the world than changing guitar strings. This makes the process so much easier. It's a 3-in-1 product that clips the old string, pulls the pins out, and winds the new strings in. On top of it all, it's pretty affordable., "musical_instruments"
The winder works well for me, and the cutter is good to have connected to the tool (so I don't have to search out a pair of snips), but a spring loaded cutter would be less awkward.  Also, the bridge pin puller is kinda flimsy, and doesn't work well for reluctant pins.  I actually like my Dunlop winder better; this tool is longer so it comes off of the pegs a little more, but I guess that's the compromise of having a working cutter, so I won't be throwing away my other winder any time soon., "musical_instruments"
I was a bit concerned about this tool after reading some reviews that owners had damaged expensive guitars, but thought I would just be careful with it.  But I have no concerns after using it on two string changes.  In fact, I cannot see how one could nick the guitar while winding, since the tool does not even cover the entire tuning key so it never gets close the guitar head.  The string cutter works great, one squeeze and any size string is cut cleanly.  The pry tool for acoustic guitar pegs works, and though it is a tighter fit than I expected, it does work and means I don't need to find a pliers.  Overall, I am very pleased and saved time on string changes., "musical_instruments"
Use it every time I restring my guitar, works really good. I recommend this to any musician that plays regulary., "musical_instruments"
I found this tool to be convenient and better made than I anticipated, making it a solid value for the money.  No need for a collection of separate tools anymore., "musical_instruments"
This does a fine job of cutting even a thick E bass string. Very pleased. Also works to cut ukulele strings! Hooray hooray hooray., "musical_instruments"
String changes usually take me 10 to 12 minutes each but I restrung all 3 of my guitars in less than 13 minutes (one is a floating tremolo). The spanner is smooth, the cutter is strangely very clean cutting (usually use electrician wire dykes) and the pin puller is nothing fancy, but does the trick quickly. Awesome little tool and very impressed with it. A++++ on every function, would consider maybe putting a few small rubber inserts on the handle for those sweaty hands, but other than that, it's perfectly perfect. VERY HIGHLY RECOMMEND, "musical_instruments"
I probably should buy another one for other guitars, but I carry in my electric case.  I'm sure the day I will need it, I will have acoustic with me!  I use different method for my bass, but this is perfect for 6 strings!, "musical_instruments"
Its a nice pice,, easy to use and necessary when you change the string of your guitar,,, the only matter and its not a big deal,, is that make a squeaking sound besides that works perfect, "musical_instruments"
This tool does exactly what it is supposed to do and is a reasonably priced product.  As with any tool there is a small learning curve just to become familiar with the way it functions.  After using it a couple of times I can only give it high marks., "musical_instruments"
This is an indispensable tool for all guitarists who constantly change strings. It is like the swiss army knife for string winding., "musical_instruments"
My son uses this winder and cutter frequently to change his strings on his acoustic and electric guitar. It hasn't failed him yet. It's easy to use and cuts the strings precisely and cleanly. He says it's a must have if you maintain and change your own guitar strings. Highly recommend., "musical_instruments"
Works well for a multi-tool.  personally you could get away with a little crank winder and a wire cutter, but this is nice to have in your bag just in case.  And for the price you really can't beat it.  3 tools in one handy spot., "musical_instruments"
Makes stringing so much easier with the peg puller, and cutter all in one. Arrived quick and before scheduled. These work perfect for my needs, "musical_instruments"
Great concept....everything rolled into one product.  Winder, String cutter and end pin remover.  The price is fair for all that., "musical_instruments"
Before bying this product, I doubted a little whether or not this gadget wouldd cut the metale strings. I received it and the first thing I did is try it. IT CUTS THE MEDAL STRINGS LIKE BUTTER. I used to use whatever I could find around the house which was a pain because nothing I tried could cut these metal strings. The winder I'm not going to use, but perhaps people with tired fingers would want to use it., "musical_instruments"
I wind long-scale bass strings onto my unusual super-short-scale 26\"-scale, six-stringed bass instrument, so I'm betting I get more use out of this thing than about anybody. This device is much easier on my fingers and hands and much, much faster. The cutter worked great, too. Changing strings is no longer a dreaded chore. Can't ask for more than that., "musical_instruments"
I realy like the cutter. The only thing, for me, was the peg winder was getting in the way.With just a simple screw it comes right off. I much prefer it without the winder. Build quality is awesome. Sturdy and a bit weighty. Definitley worth a buy., "musical_instruments"
I have tried a few and this is the one I settled on if you need a multi-tool.  The cutters rip through bass strings like butter and seem to hold up.  The winder is nicely balanced and the grip is good., "musical_instruments"
It winds! It cuts! You really can't go wrong here. Another really well-made product from Planet Waves that will become an indespensable part of your guitar setup., "musical_instruments"
These things are great. No more twisting for 5 mins per string, no more running around the house looking for a pair of clippers. For the price, its definitely worth it imho., "musical_instruments"
Light weight, compact, and all in one tool, what more could I ask for?This tool does three things very well, turns tuners on stringed instruments quickly, cuts musical instrument strings, and helps pull acoustic guitar string pins. What's not to like? Well the cutter part of the tool is a little hard to open - guess I'm used to side cutters or pliers - and it doesn't cut strings really close to the tuning pin - it leaves about a half inch of string hanging. Oh, if you actually follow the three loops of string theory for stringing your guitar (go to the Elixir Strings website and watch the excellent guitar stringing videos from the Taylor guitar factory) your wrist will get a little tired turning the crank for the tuners. The alternative is a battery operated turner that weighs a ton more.I find it very hard to believe that with normal use on stringed instrument strings, somebody could manage to break this plastic tool. The tool is made of sturdy plastic. If abused, trying to cut copper wire, it might break; but the tool was never designed for that use.I've used this tool now for several months and expect that it will last for a very long time. I use this on three different guitars, an acoustic and two electrics (Les Paul and PRS). The pin puller works just fine, I actually put a rag on the guitar body to prevent any dents in the wood. The tool fits inside my hard shell Gibson guitar case. This is a very nice tool., "musical_instruments"
Easy to use and makes changing out strings easy. The winder is great, but the cutter and pin pull is also part of it making it the only tool needed for changing out strings. The construction is pretty high quality with a mix of metal and plastic parts., "musical_instruments"
Perfect for re-stringing your guitar.  Very portable too and fits in my gig bag with spare strings.  The price was right too.  This is a must have tool and isn't cheap like most of the plastic ones out there.  The nice thing about this one is it  cuts off excess with ease, just looks better trimmed neatly.5 star product, "musical_instruments"
After getting tired of spending a half hour each time changing strings, I finally caved and bought this nifty little gadget. I just wanted a string winder at first but thought this one was kinda cool and reasonably priced too. I didn't expect the string cutter to be as well as it is. I thought my wire cutters would be much better but the cutter on this baby is just as great! It also has a pin puller which I haven't tried yet but I'm sure it's great as well. This would be perfect for the gigging or traveling musician, or if you just want a great all in one tool. But this thing!, "musical_instruments"
Primarily purchased to have a string cutter in the guitar case rather than going to get one from my tool box.Found the pin puller did not really work for me, so put my old string winder from 20 yrs. ago back in the case to use that pin puller which worked just fine. Seemed no matter how I tried, I was almost scratching the saddle tried to get that groove under the head of the pins and could never get it to work on a six string steel acoustic guitar.It seems that &#34;C&#34; shaped opening in the end is for stretching strings, and I find that is better done by hand. So really I just use this for the wire cutter feature.  And the string winder itself also works well., "musical_instruments"
It's so much easy to deal with your guitar using this string winder and cutter! A w e s o m e!, "musical_instruments"
This is a great tool the only issue was it was a little tight and it squeaked loudly as i was attempting to use it..  i had some graphite powder and i put a little around the screw head on the winder part and now it spins freely without noise.  Its so much nicer to not have to wind those tuner heads by hand when changing strings out.  the wire cutters also work really well. Im glad i bought this product., "musical_instruments"
For about $8 you get a string winder, string cutter and an acoustic peg remover all-in-one.What more can you ask for?Mine shows no sign of wear or defects after about a year of use.I have nice wire cutters, etc (I'm an EE) but it is much easier to grab one tool instead of two or three.As for quality, it has an unconditional guarantee, see above.Planet Waves -aka D'Addario- is a well-known name in guitar accessories.To the reviewers complaining about the tool breaking, try using your warranty instead of whining.No manufacturer has a perfect run forever, but at least in this case you have not wasted your money.For the record, I do not work for D'Addario / Planet Waves - but I would not dismiss a job off-hand if they offered it  ;-), "musical_instruments"
I have used this winder now 4 times.  It does what it is supposed to do and adds to speed and efficiency of the task., "musical_instruments"
Works a little better at winding strings than the bare-bones winders. The string cutter is very handy. The pin puller, as is usually the case, is a little clumsy to use, but it works., "musical_instruments"
Finally, a winder that has features and durability designed into it.  The pocket of the winder head appears to be large enough to handle any tuning peg head size and the molded plastic body appears to be thick enough to stand up to a lot of use.  The pivot point doesn't bind when using the winder as has a couple other cheaper models I've purchased (and thrown away) over the years.  The string cutter is a great feature and appreciated, works well regardless of string composition type,...stainless, chromes, core-types, etc.  The price seems fair enough.  I've seen a couple of battery powered models for not much more money, but if you're in that big a hurry to change strings you're living life too fast...... get a 'roadie' to do it for you.... why have to remember to carry spare batteries., "musical_instruments"
Fast shipping and love this handy little tool, it has everything on it that I need to completely change my strings weather I am home or out somewhere and it is small enough to carry in my guitar case, OH and great price thanks., "musical_instruments"
This is exactly what I was hoping for. The string cutter works better than expected. It's nice not having to go hunt down diagonal pliers when it's string changing time. The only little issue is that it's a little tougher to spin really fast than the little string winders because of the grip. No biggie though., "musical_instruments"
I've only used the string winder so far, but it works well so far. I use it on my guitars and my banjo. The other things look like they will work well, but I haven't used them yet so I can't say for sure. If not then I'll update this review (if I can)., "musical_instruments"
What  great idea to put all three tools needed when changing strings into one tool. The cutter even works well., "musical_instruments"
You need nothing else to replace your string, no matter if you have an acoustic or a electric guitar, or both. I have a couple of acoustics and electrics and you can remove the retainers of the acoustic guitars without doing damage. is fast to tight up the string and it has a cutter if you (like me) don't like the extra hanging from the guitar like cat mustache.Recomended!, "musical_instruments"
This product is something every guitar owner needs.  It is well built, performs well and sells at a very reasonable price.  The sting cutter works well., "musical_instruments"
No messing around, fits well in bass tuner knobs, spins well and the cutter is good , this is the one to get., "musical_instruments"
This winder makes changing strings a breeze and I like that there's an integrated cutter to trim off the excess string.  I also love the part on the end that pulls out the pins from the bridge.  So, this item is three tools in one!, "musical_instruments"
I have had other string winders, but this had the string cutter on it too. It is awesome. I broke a string on stage and instead of having a big floppy string, with just a quick squeeze it looked good. HIGHLY reccomended, "musical_instruments"
This guitarist tool is a real gem; it's well designed to pull string pegs, wind strings, and cut the strings - all in a small package. I find it handy, useful, and I recommend it., "musical_instruments"
Not much better than the dollar version of the peg winder.  Thought it would be more ergonomic and having the stringer cutter in one tool would be a plus.... but, not quiet up to par.  You'll be better off with the dollar string winder and a cheap pair of snips., "musical_instruments"
Terrific All-in-One Must-Have Tool for Guitarists!I have been using the older style Planet Waves model of this winder/cutter/bridge pin tool and when it came in I was a little skeptical about the new model.I am happy to see that the changes are relatively minor and if anything it is just a little bit smaller so it will fit inside your case compartment more easily leaving more room for other junk.I have used the Planet Waves tolls for years without any difficulty or problems with breaking, bending, becoming dull or unusable. They keep on keeping on and I have one in every case.Buy, you'll love it, and if not, you can always return it.Hope this helps!, "musical_instruments"
After years of using a diagonal pliers, this small and secure to use around top line guitar/bases, this guys just made my #1 none StewMac tool in my tool set., "musical_instruments"
I've been playing guitar since the late sixties, and have to say, this string winder and cutter is fantastic.  I use it regularly.  It is durable and effective., "musical_instruments"
Not as sturdy as some I've used and seen floating around, but it gets the job done as advertised.  Not a terrible buy.  Construction is a bit on the cheap side, though, as it is mostly plastic and seems a bit fragile around the edges.  The clipper and winder work well, though, even though they are both predominantly made of the same lower grade material.  However, all you really need are the two functions, and they work., "musical_instruments"
It is a string winder, what more can I say. It works as it should and saves time. Very useful when restringing a guitar., "musical_instruments"
I have one of these in every one of my guitar cases. You never know when you have to replace a string and this is a convenient helper. Cutter, winder and pin puller. Gets the job done and it is inexpensive., "musical_instruments"
This bad boy rocks, fits in guitar case, it slices it dices it makes julienne fries. Well no, but  it does slice guitar strings in half and it will pull bridge pins and wind/unwind guitar strings, though.If it had a flashlight, tuner and fingernail trimmer it would be perfect, but engineers are mortal and I couldn't put a tool the size of a watermelon inside my guitar case (at least not without coating it with butter first).Its plastic and steel, it will break eventually as everything does - imperfect world, re &#34;breakfast club&#34; bolts fall out, doors fall off, but til then I'll enjoy using this. The string winder is a little awkward. I have a little fender brand gizmo that looks like a pez dispenser with a swivel head on top, its small so I keep it in the guitar case along with this contraption - winds strings much faster than this device, but if you've got the time this one will work just fine. I also wear two pairs of socks in case one gets a hole in it, I'm prone to redundancies.It may be sheer rumor, but I have it on good sources, that this item is actually based on alien technology recovered at Roswell New Mexico. Your chance to own alien technology at an affordable price not like those I-phones that they took out of the saucers.If it only came in mink it would be perfect., "musical_instruments"
everything you need to make replacing strings nice and easy, add a headstand to hold the headstock up and you are set, "musical_instruments"
nothing fancy, its plastic but the quality is by no means bad. it serves its purpose and is simple which i cannot complain about, "musical_instruments"
I'm not sure how much extra utility you get out of the winder.  Maybe if you change strings a lot, then this could be a key part of you equipment bag.  The cutter part is nice, it is solid and effective without being too heavy, yet it does feel well made.  For the price, keep it around rather than tracking down other wire cutters when you need to change out a set of strings., "musical_instruments"
I own a lot of guitars and have to change strings often enough, I don't really enjoy changing strings but it needs done, this tool makes it such a breeze I don't know how I ever went without it. It takes me a fraction of the time it used to take changing strings, I can have them all loosened and cut in seconds where before I would stand there cranking one tuning peg for what seemed like forever. I am really happy with this purchase and will check out more stuff from Planet Waves., "musical_instruments"
What a great multipurpose guitar tool. It works great. I really like the fact that it is cutter, a winder, and a pin remover, all in one. The quality is really nice. Next time I place an order, I'm going to get another one as a spare. I'd be lost without this tool., "musical_instruments"
Stripped down one of my basses at the weekend, found this very useful, made stripping and replacing strings really easy. Large enough to fit the fender tuners. Have 2 new sets of strings on order so fitting them won't be as daunting a task as without this item., "musical_instruments"
This is a pretty cool item. I bought I thought it was cool and different. Is well worth the price and a good thing to have in your guitar case., "musical_instruments"
Does what it is suppose to do. What can you say about a tool. If it works properly, and it does, what more can you say., "musical_instruments"
Works great for changing guitar strings. Good build and doesn't look cheap. Built-in string cutter and bridge pin remover is a plus., "musical_instruments"
I bought this mainly for the string cutter, although it has a peg winder and a bridge pin puller as well. At first I was skeptical because it's lightweight and the cutting ends are not sharp. I was wondering how well it could cut the loose ends of strings. I'm happy to say that it does an excellent job, much better than the pair of diagonal pliers I was using.  It cuts the ends of strings easily and cleanly.  It's nice not having to carry the pliers around, which are heavier and a little risky to your guitar should you happen to drop it or accidentally mar your headstock. As for the bridge pin puller, I tried it once but it is rather ineffective. I think it was included more as an afterthought as it's just a notched edge and can't really pull stuck pins. For pulling bridge pins without damaging the bridge I would recommend the Dunlop bridge pin puller which is inexpensive.Overall I give this 5 stars for the winder and cutter. I'd recommend this to any acoustic guitarist as an essential tool to keep in their guitar case., "musical_instruments"
This tool definitely comes in handy for anyone who works on a guitar. It gets the job done easily and very fast., "musical_instruments"
A must have for anyone to make changing strings on any guitar especially an acoustic. Really like the clippers and bridge pin puller a lot. Would make a great gift for any musician playing a stringed instrument., "musical_instruments"
Great tool. I used to just coil the string ends at the adjustment keys, but this trims steel and nylon with ease. The quick slack take-up winder is nice also, but requires some adjustment in technique on classical guitars, "musical_instruments"
It cuts the string and winds the pegs much easier than one could do by hand. It is very solid and will last a long time., "musical_instruments"
Really helpful both in live gigs and at home.Great quality and I am looking forward to purchasing more of this brand, "musical_instruments"
Its great for cutting strings but the winder is pretty difficult if you don`t know what your doing. Warning for beginners don't get this!!!!, "musical_instruments"
The winder makes a loud and ear piercing squeaking when winding fast. I tried unscrewing it and putting a little oil on the screw head but it didn't make much difference. I hope it goes away with use.The string cutter works like a champ. I was using a set of flush cut nips but they kept getting bent trying to cut the hard nickel and steel of guitar strings. These work much better. They don't cut the string they shear it off. I've done 3 sets of strings and no noticable wear on the cutter., "musical_instruments"
Nice quality and love the cutter. The winder is a little awkward to use. I guess I need a little practice. But the cutters are great., "musical_instruments"
When i bought this, i didn't think it was going to be as good as it is. It seemed a little plastic-ie from the photos, so i didn't think it was going to hold up very well. It actually really surpassed my expectations however. The winder itself works quite well, and has slots for multiple-sized tuners. It was a little wobbley on my guitar, but still worked well. The wire cutter was able to cut the thickest guitar string with little problem. For 7 dollars, it's a really good deal!, "musical_instruments"
Bought it to replace strings for my Taylor.Does all the job that I need it to perform.Winds the strings fastPulls the pegs smoothlycuts the excess wireDOES NOT SCRATCH MY GUITAR!!!the only issue really is that it squeaks a lot. can be fixed with some oil., "musical_instruments"
A lil awkward for some. But works perfect for me. Like any other tool, it doesn't always fit or please everybody. But I'm a big fan of all-in-ones. So this is a more compact option for me & less clutter inside my guitar case pocket., "musical_instruments"
I have purchased and used many various types of Guitar String Winders and I must admit that the Planet Waves Pro Winder is the very best I have used to date.  It is an all in one and there is no need to carry extra equipment to cut the strings....pull pegs..etc.  It is sturdy and should last  many moons and cut many strings before needing replacement.  Because of the affordable price on Amazon I will be buying some for my friends as Christmas Stocking Stuffers.  The Planet Waves Pro Winder is well worth the cost and I recommend it to anyone.  Also, with the string winder I also purchased accoustic guitar strings and requested regular shipping (free shipping) which promised that the items would be shipped within 5 to 7 days. The items were ordered on the Thursday and received on the Saturday....THREE SHORT DAYS...Treat yourself!  Thank you Amazon!, "musical_instruments"
I purchased this before I have ever changed a string. While waiting for it to come - I had to change one. Youtube videoed how to do it. This tool came and while it is nice and I will be sure to use it, It is not a MUST have. But I had wire snips from my jewelry kit available. Not everyone would have those. This will work great! It is sturdy and small., "musical_instruments"
best tool ever, "musical_instruments"
the winder works really well and same with the cutter, but using the cutter can be a bit cumbersome.  i guess for taking w/ you on gig bag would be great as you only have one tool, but if using at home, then i think is more convenient to have a separate cutter.  that's what i do anyway.  still i think is a good tool to have., "musical_instruments"
Cut the strings like they was made of paper.Really good price. Did what it was suppose, no need to say anymore., "musical_instruments"
An all-in-one guitar tool that is a must-have for any guitar case! Great quality string winder and cutter! Plus, it is extremely low priced! Don't hesitate...get one!, "musical_instruments"
Yes, you really replace your strings very fast with this Winder. And it also cuts the strings. Very helpful. i recommend., "musical_instruments"
I know that you can easily change strings without paying for a tool to help you out, but honestly this thing is worth every penny. It cuts your changing time down drastically. You don't really know how convenient it is to have the peg puller, winder, and wire cutter all in a little tool until you actually have them all in a little tool. Not to mention, it's very rigid and it certainly seems like it'll hold up for years to come!, "musical_instruments"
This is a handy little tool. The winder is nice and the clipper works well. It doesn't pull the bridge pegs out so it doesn't get five stars from me. And don't be too rough when winding or it will break., "musical_instruments"
The peg winder is what it is, it winds pegs and there's not much to it. The string cutter is too bulky to use in most cases so I still need a set of snips when using this thing., "musical_instruments"
for the price of this winder/cutter its awesome, if it were made with a harder plastic would have been perfect!, "musical_instruments"
I thought it would be resin or plastic.Not so: It was made heavier and nicer.The metal must-have will be in the family a while I can tell., "musical_instruments"
winds your strings its durable and will cut your strings as well  you can pull your pins at the bridge with it as well., "musical_instruments"
This combo string winder, peg extractor and string clipper serves all three purposes adequately. It fits easily into a gig bag and is light and easy to handle. It is inexpensive enough that I have one in each of my gig bags and cases. In some ways it's like a bic pen, it's cheap enough that if you leave it someplace or lose it you can replace it., "musical_instruments"
Does the job well enough, "musical_instruments"
Simply one of the best string winders I have ever used to date and I love it because I having large hands it really makes a difference. Not forget the added string cutter and peg puller to boot. Very good., "musical_instruments"
This versatile tool does what it says it does.  Pretty good quality. But, after purchasing, I realized that a tool like this isn't too necessary.  Some scissors and a little bit of elbow grease would accomplish the same tasks. But, it does make it a little easier and slightly more efficient., "musical_instruments"
Every guitar player should own this tool. instead of having half your tool box out just to restring your ax all you need is one tool., "musical_instruments"
This is another useful item from Planet Waves for the guitar player. This winder saves time,especially when you are anxious to get back to playing after breaking a string or replacing every string.This is not bulky & fits into several different guitar cases without taking up much room. Worth the price., "musical_instruments"
This product works well, but I still end up doing it the old fashion way.  Guess I am not a gimmick person.  :-), "musical_instruments"
Very handy, has multiple benefits that are very useful. I just had to loosen the screw that holds the winder a bit and lubricated it with silicone spray and done deal!, "musical_instruments"
This tool has high marks for one reason: It works. This is the best at combining two tools into one. Give it high marks for form and function. Love it., "musical_instruments"
I got this for my daughter, a begining guitarist, she has been playng for 3-4 months. She absolutely loves it. The product works perfectly and is durable. The downsides are it's a bit awkward to turn, but easy to get used to. It is very hard to accurately cut the strings., "musical_instruments"
Makes changing strings a whole lot easier. If you are a guitar player and are changing strings like I was without one of these, stop and get one trust me!, "musical_instruments"
I never had one of these until I had to twist each tuner around 60 times to change a string.  But that's not a problem any more.I used to go through my hardware drawer at home to find wire cutters to trim my string ends.  But that's not a problem any more.And I used to hurt my teeth sometimes pulling tough bridge pins on my acoustic.  But that's not a problem any more either.All solved by one simple tool which is inexpensive and fits easily in my case.  So I'm a fan.  You'll be too., "musical_instruments"
After you have used this tool for the first time, you say to yourself,...&#34;why did I suffer all those years by doing this manually?&#34; I used to devote so much time to sitting there, winding forever by hand. With this winder, you are done in an amazingly short time. It also does such a precise job on installing the string around the posts, that on the bottom &#34;E&#34;, I did a double take -- it is almost invisible. Thank you to the other guitarists who took the time to do their reviews on this one. Re-stringing is now no longer the chore that I used to dread. Not at all., "musical_instruments"
Overall, I like this winder.  It's handy having the wire cutter built into it.  But when I am winding new strings, it often slips off.  Since I am using one hand to hold tension on the new string, I would prefer this to hold on more securely so I don't have to put it back on several times.  But all in all, it's a lot better than winding by hand, and it seems sturdy., "musical_instruments"
It beats doing it the old fashion way and the cutter is sweet, but it could be better.1. It slips off if you go too fast, but I thought that was the purpose of using a gadget like this.2. It didn't come with much of any instructions, so I was using it wrong at first. There is a big and a small slot.3. The cutter is so that I pinched my finger during use. The cutter works great, you just have to be careful.4. The screw that holds it on keeps coming loose. Sure I can tighten it, but it just means the design could be better.All and all it's one of those must have gadgets, but it does require a little discipline to master. I hope the next version comes with a soft, rubber insert so it doesn't scratch the chrome off my turner pegs. That and maybe they could use a long screw and some Loctite to keep it from coming loose. And well, maybe they could offer it in more colors to make it easier to find. Everything I have seems to be jet black., "musical_instruments"
So I bought this to replace the original string winder I had that doesn't have a clipper on the end, and it turned out great. The clipper is strong and works well, and the winder is the same if not better. Thank you planet waves, "musical_instruments"
The wire clipper and winder work O.K., but the pin puller is badly designed and doesn't slip under the ball of the pin in order to lift it out. Bad design by someone who doesn't use it to pull pins out of a bridge. I end up using a Jim Dunlop capo to pull bridge pins out. I've done it successfully for years., "musical_instruments"
The string winder with a string cutter and pin puller is an excellent design. It will be very useful when installing new guitar strings with all of the items needed for the job.My only issue is the shipping charges for such a small item. The shipping cost were almost as high as the cost of the item itself making the purchase of this item an unfavorable purchase price for a single item. If you need an additional item on an order from this seller you need to check the shipping cost or you will not be getting the good price advertised for the item and may consider purchasing it elsewhere., "musical_instruments"
Does the job, i've had this for about 7 months and it hasn't let me down yet...except for that time I couldnt find it. The winder, the cutter and the pin-pull all work well enough. Noted,  I've only used it to cut Elixir Nanoweb strings and nylon strings and they more on the soft side compared to regular steel strings., "musical_instruments"
i use to use my hands to turn the tuning pegs and let me tell you that takes forever to take off strings and put them on. also my wire cutter is getting messed up from cutting strings and now that i have this i can change strings faster and i dont have to look for a wire cutter all the time.its small and can fit in the pouch of a guitar case also for people who are new to guitar you dont use this to tune its to put strings on and be careful not to over tune because you will break strings.hands will always be the best when you have to do precise tuning. this is just to get the tuning in the ball park and then using your hands., "musical_instruments"
I love being able to wind the strings, pull bridge pins and cut excess string with one tool! That frees up space in my hardshell case for other stuff. Seems solid and well built., "musical_instruments"
A string winder and cutter ! This is a tool to carry in your guitar case at all times ! It even has a peg puller for people who have pegs on their acoustic guitars. Great quality product...I will buy another one for my uncle who performs weekly., "musical_instruments"
I've had string winders for years, but never a multifunction one like this. I recently bought it for my niece, and taught her how to change her strings.The different size gaps make it 'grab' the tuning pegs much better than my old one. I was able to use it on an electric, steel string acoustic, and classical, and it grabbed them all rather well. The string cutter works well, and the peg puller does also. So handy!, "musical_instruments"
I used this a couple of days ago to change strings on my electric guitar (Fender Strat). I was suprised in how well the little wire cutters worked. The end that turns the machine tuners is a little loose feeling but it still works well, you just have to be a little carful about not allowing it to slip and to not over tighten the strings. I highly recommend it., "musical_instruments"
It's nice having all of the tools on one device. The pin puller is very slim and works better than the puller on the basic string winders. I like to trim my strings and the cutters also work well., "musical_instruments"
It's a great string winder, and it is so nice being able to wind and cut the string with the same tool. It's a brilliant idea haha. It's very good quality, like all planet waves products., "musical_instruments"
Great quality product. Saves me time winding plus includes a string cutter which is awesome. Highly recommended, "musical_instruments"
This was the first time I've ever used a string winder and cutter. It make the process of replacing the strings so much faster. The tool works great and is sturdy. If you try this you will never go back to stringing by hand Guaranteed., "musical_instruments"
Header says it all. Works well enough as a string winder, but I was really lookin for something to pull my bridge pins with and for me, this did not work well at all. Went back to my trusty rubber tipped pliers and just had to be gentle., "musical_instruments"
I have been asking for this for 3 years now, and someone finally got me one.  Nicely built and very handy to have when changing guitar strings., "musical_instruments"
I purchased this for my guitar lessons studio to teach beginners how to string their guitars properly.To my surprise, I am very impressed with it, now it doesn't compare to a $60 - $100 unit nor is it supposed to, it does it's just quickly and cleanly., "musical_instruments"
I like this string winder, and it is convenient having the wire cutter there too, but the &#34;bridge pin puller&#34; is too small, and doesn't work on my instruments.  That's why I gave it 4 stars instead of five., "musical_instruments"
Just changed strings on my Epi Les Paul and this winder\\cutter performed flawlessly.  The winder fit the winding keys nicely and didn't come anywhere near touching my guitar's finish.  The cutter snips the strings with no effort.  Huge time saver and works as promised.  Very glad I bought the  Planet Waves Pro Winder String Winder and Cutter ., "musical_instruments"
Works perfect for guitar strings. Used it when I restrung my Schecter Hellraiser Solo 6. It has locking tuners, so I was able to use this to cut the strings all the way down., "musical_instruments"
It functions as designed.  It saves time when restringing a guitar.  It's made pretty well for a plastic tool.  Definitely takes less space than a wire cutter and a cordless drill to change strings.  Admittedly, the cordless drill would be used mostly by luthiers, but you get the point., "musical_instruments"
Alright, for the past 5 years I've been changing my strings with only the help of scissors to cut the unused portion of string, and let me tell you, doing this process on 5 guitars sucks! this tool Is AWESOME! It takes about 3-5 minutes to change strings now and it's well made and durable.the built in wire cutter was an awesome idea and works just fine. I'ts not perfect but neither am I So 5 stars, Would recommend to anyone., "musical_instruments"
I love this guitar string winder.  The cutter was a real plus so I didn't have to track down my diagonal cutters., "musical_instruments"
I honestly really didn't find this thing useful at all. First, the wire clipper side is relatively bulky (no flush cutting) and doesn't open easily (very stiff action), so trying to get the clipper onto the wire with the very small opening and at the same time peering over the tool itself as it blocks the view - ick. And as for the winder... I suppose if you are doing some heavy initial winding, it can get rather tiring twisting the tuner. But it is a tad big for tuner pegs on anything I used it on, so no nice &#34;tight&#34; fit, more of a &#34;jiggle&#34; fit. Plus the clearance needed to actually swing the thing around means having the instrument laying flat on a table doesn't help. Didn't even know there was a bridge pin puller on this thing. Just looked at it... guess that notch in the peg winder is it.Each time I have set out to use it, I end up turning my pegs manually and grimacing over the stiff action of the wire cutters while to align it on the string. I just recently ended up buying a set of Crescent Brand Miniature Cutters & Needle-Nose Pliers Set(the pliers are JUST the thing for pulling the strings and keeping tension while winding). When I have to redo my mothers acoustic guitar, I'll try the notch bridge peg puller. But other wise, this thing gets a serious two-star &#34;meh&#34;., "musical_instruments"
A good piece of kit. Except it does have problems removing occasional sticky string pegs. It's also squeakily noisy when string winding. The cutter works perfectly., "musical_instruments"
This winder and cutter...winds and cuts fine...But the pin puller does not fit my guitar pins even though the ad claims that, &#34;...it fits virtually all guitars, banjos and mandolins...&#34;  Oh well...another lessson learned., "musical_instruments"
It works well for guitars and basses, so long as they are the clover style. Other then that it works just like it says it will., "musical_instruments"
great little time saver with all that is needed to restring in one compact device..It works well, pretty good buy., "musical_instruments"
Sometimes it seems more convenient to use my hand to turn the pegs rather than use this, but it does a pretty good job. I really like the string cutter built into the frame, and the peg puller is my favorite feature. Basically, I use this for everything except winding strings., "musical_instruments"
When I first saw this item I wondered:  Why is the regular guitar version $6.99 and the bass version only $4.99?Suddenly an amazing clarity came over me and I realized-- the bass version only has to tune FOUR strings instead of six.  So it costs less because we don't need to use it as much!But then I remembered there are 5 string bass guitars and I thought, okay... shouldn't they have a $5.99 one for 5-string bass guitars?Sadly the universal clarity became even more muddied when I realized with some dismay that there are even 6-string bass guitars.  Will this even work on a 6-string bass?  After all, that's 2 more strings than its intended purpose!These perplexing questions aside, I find this to be an excellent and ideal tool.  Its function is three-fold:1) String winder2) String cutter3) Peg pullerSo no more running for the wire clippers to pull a peg or cut a string.  All the tools you need to change strings are in this one reasonably-priced tool.  Made by D'addario, the quality lives up to the brand.  It's solid, the wire cutter and peg puller well designed.  It does everything it's supposed to do, does it well and is of good construction.PROS:  Good strong well-designed unitCONS: The winder is held on by a single screw and there are numerous reports of that screw coming unscrewed during use.  I would recommend putting a drop of super glue down in the screw thread area to secure the screw and prevent that happening. Because of this design flaw 4 stars instead of 5.I note that there are reviews here as old as four years... and it appears this device has undergone design changes during that time.  Some say the head bowl is so deep it can result in scratching of the guitar head.  Others report it being so shallow it slips off the keys.What I believe is that it is a mistake to sell the BASS and STANDARD GUITAR version on the same page.  From what I can deduce from the reviews, it appears some folks have inadvertently purchased the BASS guitar version, which does indeed have a wide and deep cup, and did not realize it.  Imho, the two products should be listed on two different pages for clarity.  It's obvious from the reviews that some folks have accidentally purchased the wrong unit.Some have reported the peg puller being \"metal\" and scratching the bridge.  The one on mine is vinyl and while it is hard enough to scratch the bridge if one isn't careful-- the same holds true for needle nose pliers.Bottom line is there is some responsibility of the user to pay attention to what they're doing, don't get in a rush, and be aware of the need to protect their instrument while using ANY modification tool. I suspect if one is going to get in a hurry and try to change strings 0 to 60 in 5 seconds... they may wind up damaging their guitar.  Turn on the light, put on reading glasses if necessary to see... and take your time and this device should work fine.  Be aware when reading reviews that many seem to be out of date (dunno why the company didn't simply start a new listing when redesigning the device)., "musical_instruments"
Works as advertised. The cutter makes this thing really worth while. If I lose it, I'm buying another! 2 more words required?, "musical_instruments"
Handy dandy little gadget. So much better than using pliers to remove bridge pins, nail clippers to cut strings and much easier to wind strings with this thing. I've got 10 guitars and 3 basses so i change a lot of strings and this definitely makes it less of a chore. Love Planet Waves stuff!, "musical_instruments"
This product is straight forward and works as it's intended.One side note - there is a pretty loud squeak that occurs when winding the strings. I'm not sure if all of them do this but the one I received does. It doesn't cause any problem with the product's performance... it's just loud., "musical_instruments"
I like Dunlop products but... The push down applicators (Dunlop's Dab-O-Matic Applicator Tops) are horrible idea. One popped right off the other day and oil got all over the place. I will not buy these again or I will remove them and just use a cloth., "musical_instruments"
Everything from the string cleaner to the polish works very well.You have to be very careful with the fretboard cleaner because it will dry out the fretboard but the conditioner is included and can be applied after.The string cleaner does not really leave much residue and really does help with string noise.You wont be let down.Dunlop makes good quality products., "musical_instruments"
I love this system.  Every time I change strings now, I go through every step of this system, and what a difference it has made.  The fretboard cleaner and conditioner are great.  I never realized how dry the wood was.  The string cleaner is nice too.  I feel like I was neglecting my guitars until I got this.  The quantities of product in this kit are good, and the instructions are clear.  The two polishing cloths are adequate size, and washable., "musical_instruments"
This kit has just about everything needed to clean and maintain your guitar or bass.  I would also by the Dunlop lemon oil as well.  Worth the money., "musical_instruments"
The ultimate guitar cleaning tool I love love love this kit...  I've been using the products for years and I've been nothing but happy with their quality, "musical_instruments"
I hate string noise and a dirty acoustic. This kit covers all the bases from the fret board to the body. My favorite acoustic guitar is over 40 years old and it looks like a brand new guitar and no annoying string noise when I am changing chords or fingering the fret-board., "musical_instruments"
Unfortunately, the first one of these I ordered from Amazon arrived with two of the bottles having leaked their contents all over the place. Take two! The second set I received was in great condition, and I'm really surprised with the amount of product you get for the low cost. This kit literally has everything you will need (except new strings of course...) to keep your guitar looking and sounding great., "musical_instruments"
Granted, I'm no expert on what's out there in the world for guitar cleaning materials. This is my first foray into that world.But, I've used it, and it's easy. The polish is great, the cloths are soft and just what they should be; the wax is wonderfully shiny and easy to put on and buff. Everything here is, as far as I can tell, just as advertised - a way to keep one's instruments in good shape.I now have a shine on my guitar that is better than when it arrived from the factory, and there doesn't seem to be any chemicals in the stuff that corrodes or otherwise destroys the guitar, like perhaps some fly-by-night cheapy cheapy product maker might offer.Maybe there are better polishes and waxes out there - and knowing the way the world works, I'm sure there are some, probably made out of rare elephant glandular excretions that sell for $500 a bottle that the pros use and maybe would be worth 6 or 7 stars on the Amazon review. I don't know. But come on; this stuff is just fine., "musical_instruments"
the best thing I've purchase for my guitars this year , I'm not that careful with my guitars maintenance and never though that my fretboard and body finish need that care until i see a video that explain why is important and the live that obviously the instrument get back after cleaning , the 01 and 02 are the best, restore the live of my fretboard, the cleaner and polish make your instrument body shine , the only one that I've just use once is the string conditioner and cannot say because i use this on my brother acoustic guitar and i don't play with it after the cleaning ,but my guitars strings are new right now maybe i update in a few weeks about the strings conditioner.you can buy this with your eyes close, you wont regret the purchase., "musical_instruments"
My son was cleaning all his guitars after opening this gift on Christmas morning.  I am pleased with this product., "musical_instruments"
In general it's OK but when you look at the fine writing on the fingerboard formula it says not to use on Maple; which means I can't use it on either of my Gibsons.  Probably better to just get the lemon oil for that separately., "musical_instruments"
Love this kit...it has everything you need as well as cleaning cloths....make your axe shine and look like a rockstar., "musical_instruments"
The products work great, applied them to my new Les Paul Ukulele for protection. The strings that came with my ukulele were junk so I decided to replace them with aquila strings. Prior to doing so I decided that I would like to prep the fret board. The frets seemed a little rough and the rosewood looked a little dry to me so....I ordered this kit to see what it would do. It comes with both fret board cleaner and even a very fine grit emery cloth for the metal frets. I thought I would try the emery cloth on the frets and was very pleased with the results. The frets are now very smooth and shiny and the rosewood fret board looks like it is much happier after a little drink.The polish for the instrument brought out a deep luster...but remember a little goes a long way so the wax should last a very long time as I am sure the other products will too.The cloths are very soft and should not damage you instrument. Mine came soaked due to the 02 bottle leaking upon arrival. That is the reason I did not give this product a 5 star. It looked like the package was damaged prior to shipment since the out side package was pristine and the product was protected well inside with adequate padding.I am now going to work on my Gibson Les Paul Custom Guitar and I am sure that I will be very happy with the results!Great product which would deserve the full 5 stars if it was packaged a little better., "musical_instruments"
While I'm spectacle on what I want to &#34;clean my baby with (Fender P Bass) and after reading many feed backs on Amazon, I decided to try this kit. My Bass is not that old, but really needed to be cleaned and polished. This kit really make it so clean, it looks better than when I purchased it new. No greasy residue either. My fret board looks so good to. Just don't use it on maple wood (the lighter color), at least that is what the directions states because it my yellow this lighter color. I can tell you that the rose wood is nice and deep colored red. The other cleaners and polishes are great too. I will definitely purchase this kit again when I run out of the supplies., "musical_instruments"
Makes my guitar look great, from the fretboard, strings and body.  Everything conditioned and polished.  Great quality product, highly recommend, "musical_instruments"
This kit cleans strings body and conditions the fretboard. It's got everything you need for your high end guitar maintenance., "musical_instruments"
Everything you need to keep your guitar clean and Polished and sexy! no matter if you are a horrible player like me you will get all the chicks because your guitar looks sexy! the girls will love you and the boys too!, "musical_instruments"
The Dunlop system has everything you need to keep your guitar in good condition, and looking great. It also had two soft cloths that are needed for application, removing excess and polishing. I couldn't be happier!, "musical_instruments"
Take some time but it was well worth it.  I've always cleaned the finger boards with rubbing alcohol then used linseed oil afterwards.  This worked great and the guitars buffed up like never before!, "musical_instruments"
A good value box set of quality products. Use these each time you re string and keep your instrument in top shape. I do guitar set ups for folks and these come in real handy., "musical_instruments"
got a cleaner/polish/wax type ointment for every part of your guitar. comes with a small rag, and fret polishing pad deal....the fret pad is great and I didn't know about this type of thing till getting this kit. also comes with a step by step/stage by stage instruction pamphlet. worth it to get this kit and replace /add to it as needed., "musical_instruments"
The Dunlop Guitar Fingerboard Kit arrived very quickly and was put to the test immediately.  I am pleased with the product.  It makes my guitar look new again.  I will definitly look into their other products.  Thanks to Amazon for the quick service., "musical_instruments"
I wasn't quite sure what to expect but have a few old guitars with pretty weathered looking fingerboards.  I figured I'd give this a try.  I am so glad I did.  I could not believe how much residue was on the rag after I cleaned the fret board, yuk.  Then I used the 02 treatment product to treat it and it really brought out the natural color.  I'd like to say it looks like new, but the guitar is a 1967 so that would be a stretch.But it looks a heck of a lot better, almost new.  I used it on one of my less valuable acoustics, but it's still a '67 USA made Fender.  I have such faith in this that I'm going to do my '77 Gibson acoustic next.Then I have a couple of electrics I will do when I change strings on them.  This stuff is great., "musical_instruments"
Nice little kit. it has 800 grit sandpaper in it, I hadn't noticed that in the listing, maybe I overlooked it. I had just bought some 600 grit at homedepot and used on the neck of a used guitar that had been neglected for nearly a decade. The 600 made it glassy smooth again (wet sanding) - I used this instead of the 800 that came with the package and it worked well for me.I had made the mistake of waxing my fretboard with carnuba wax after reading about it on a chat board. Big mistake it deadened the sound terrible. I was miserable, my guitar sounded like s***.After 20 minutes with this kit and a new set of strings and Bob's your uncle, good as new. I'm going to use this everytime I change strings on all my guitars.Nice little kit, I might even get around to using the 800 grit paper that came with it one of these days. Works a charm on acoustic guitars, haven't tried it on the electric guitars yet., "musical_instruments"
This product is a must for anyone with a rosewood fretboard guitar. My fretboard hasn't been cleaned/oiled in 15 years so it was extremely dry. The cleaner removed visible grime, the polish cloth shined up the frets, but most importantly, the oil returned the fretboard to a deep beautiful color and feel. I am very pleased with the product., "musical_instruments"
Bought this to use on my 1962 Strat Reissue. After a year or so of playing the rosewood fretboard become a little dried out and rough, of course covered with 100+ hours of grime and sweat. This kit has everything you need to make your guitar feel, look, and play like new. I put new strings on after using this and man! Felt just like the day it arrived from the factory. Can slide and play much smoother with this. Serious speed improvement., "musical_instruments"
I bought my new guitar and wanted to keep it in great shape.  I guess this kit works okay, but it's hard to use.  It will probably last my entire lifetime.  I think a smaller kit would have been better.  You really need to remove the strings when you use it, so you have to take off all the strings.  I usually only replace one string at a time when I am changing strings, so I had to change my habits.  If you have a guitar without a truss rod, that may mean you will take a lot more time tuning after you're done changing the strings, since the neck will bend more as you tighten the strings one at a time, and that will change the pitch of the strings you have already tuned.  I'm no expert, but I have a gut feeling that this was not money well spent.  However, since I love my guitar, I use it anyway., "musical_instruments"
I cleaned and oiled the fretboard on my straocaster the day after I received the product. The cleaning product worked very nicely but the oil was hard to get out through the applicator. The fretboard turned out nicely though so I decided to give it a 4 instead of a 3. I have to say though that I believe a big bottle of eye glass cleaner to clean the fretboard with and a good furniture polish would work just as well. Since you only use a small amount the kit will last a long time so it isn't a bad buy. Just remember it isn't recommended for a maple fretboard and could damage it. If you want to use this type of product then I recommend this one., "musical_instruments"
Has everything you need to keep fretboard in condition.Works well,Seems to hold up well also(treatment lasts for awhile...)Emery cloth for polishing frets is nice,worth $20.00,for sure....., "musical_instruments"
This set is not for everyone! In fact, you might have to get the neck adjusted after installing this set.  While I can see rockers laying down overpowering riffs with these my goal is to get the lowest action I can on a jazz box.  No question about the quality, though, these hold up the same fine standards as the other Slinky sets., "musical_instruments"
Awesome strings, did what I needed them to do (Drop A/B). Good tension.Only con is that Ernie Ball strings seem to wear out fast and lose tone. So for now I'm good but in a few weeks I'll need new strings. In which case I'll probably go D'addario or Cobalts.Still, decent strings if you need cheap strings fast., "musical_instruments"
They work great. You can buy more expensive guitar strings, just not better guitar strings. I use these on an old Gibson semi-hollow body., "musical_instruments"
Does the job nicely, I use these for me guitar thats set for slide playing and I've not had any problems with them. Good solid strings, "musical_instruments"
I play Progressive and Thrash metal, and these strings hold out nicely. Tuned them down to A sharp (b flat?) and they sounded sweet. Back up to E (standard) and they provide nice full sounding tone., "musical_instruments"
I have used Ernie Ball strings for along time.  Mostly slinky's or super slinky's.  I read the review on these and thought I would give these a try for the sound they make paired with a LP.I bought these to replace the stockers on the EPI LP 100 I just bought.  Luckily I order two packs.  I was putting on the top E string and had turned the crank less than a few times, not near enough tension on the string yet to even be in tune yet, and \"pop\" it broke. I had ordered two sets, so I put on the one from the new set. No problems until I got to the G string, then \"pop\" another breaker. Very sad quality.After finally getting them on and in tune (you will need to stretch the top 3 strings alot to get them to stay in tune, especially the E) I have to say they have a great sound to them.  Nice tone and sustain.  Great crucnhy sound for metal, but still a good clean tone too.  These are thick strings, but still bendable, just not very far.  I would rate the sound 5 stars.Unfortunately, it takes two packs of strings for one successful stringing to occur because of how brittle the strings are.  So I have to give these three st, "musical_instruments"
I use these in standard tuning on my prs mccarty. The sound is unbelievable. Thick and creamy sound. Lasts slmost 3 weeks before the tone dies. Good price. Good strings., "musical_instruments"
Great highs and lows, but rough on the fingertips, and difficult doing barre chords, slides, and single string progressions. OK with more effort, "musical_instruments"
So these are heavy strings that work well. I did have an issue with the strings messing with my bridge on my guitar but with some more springs it worked well enough., "musical_instruments"
Tried a heavier gauge string for playing slide guitar on my S.G. It worked out perfectly . I am 66 years old and have been playing Guitar for over fifty years. Of course over the years I've tried other strings but always seem to come back to  Ernie Ball strings . There are no surprises. The quality Is always the same. Also, I believe the very best value for the dollar. From extra slinky to heavy gauge Jazz strings , You just can't go wrong. I am a fairly new Amazon customer and am finding out that that all important trust factor is there and have no hesitation on my part in shopping with them., "musical_instruments"
these heavy gauge are the main strings I use. Detune great, good harmonics, great presence, I use them across a whole range of genres, from Death metal to Blues to  Funk and beyond!, "musical_instruments"
I have finally discovered that the &#34;perfect set&#34; is a moving target. As arthritis creeps in I find myself playing heavier strings with a lower action, and these work in that respect. Another advantage of usiung this set is that it beefs up the treble side without making the bass side too boomey. (Telecaster, anyone?), "musical_instruments"
I'm not a metal player in any means but sometimes I do get the urge. If your gonna play metal you need bigger strings than just 46-9. So I got these and they are awesome. They are not too big or too small. Very happy with these strings. If you want GREAT strings get fender strings. They are the best out there. But for metal (big strings) I stick with ernie ball., "musical_instruments"
I use earnie ball strings as my backup strings. They don't have as nice and clear a tone as my d'addario or curt mangan strings, nor do they have the life expectancy, however they are cheaper and really easy to bend. Since I can't afford to restring with the more pricey strings every single time, I go with these when I'm practicing. They do break alot when I play some crazy solos, which blows, and is the main reason why I'm not giving them 5s. (No it's not my technique, I've never broken a string on any other brand strings I've tried.) When I'm in the studio recording, I prefer, like I said before, D'addario or curt mangan strings, however to save money, I practice with these strings and I think it's not a bad method, as I go through strings like doritos (I eat doritos alot)., "musical_instruments"
I read a review saying that there bridge was floating out & the strings were hard to tune aswell as their e string popping. I had the exact same experience but i bought two sets since i know uncoated strings dont last long. so i did get to play em but all my strings (except the A & E) popped on both sets within two weeks i knew it was due to my bridge being made to use a whammy bar (which it came with btw)& the tension it put on my tuning pegs what really got me upset about these strings was that they damaged my tuning pegs and now there harder to turn (have to use pliers sometimes) but the strings sound great & if i get a better guitar i might get these more often but for now im staying w/ medium gauge elixirs., "musical_instruments"
I chose these strings based on reviews I have read on the website. I was definitely not disappointed. This string sound great on solid body electric and hollow body. I have a Dot Studio and the resonance is great for rockabilly. My son loves them for metal. We will continue to use Beefy Slinky strings!, "musical_instruments"
This isn't a review of these strings so much as a warning or caveat for those of you playing guitars with floating bridges (usually for a whammy bar) and not using these heavier strings already.I wanted a little fuller sound than the 10-46 slinky strings (aka regular slinky) and the idea of some driving base appealed to me so ordered the beefy's. I strung them up but had a hard time tuning the guitar. Every time I got the higher strings in tune, the lowers would go down as much as a half note. It took awhile to realize that my floating bridge was coming off the body as I tightened the strings. So I pulled the back plate off my strat and set to off tighten down the the tensions screws. I made about 5 adjustments each time retuning the guitar to check my progress. The final time I tightened them down, the high E string broke. Since these were my only beefy's, my day was done with these strings. However, given how far I tightened the tension screws, I think I would have had to purchase an additional tension spring (not too expensive or difficult to install if you have the inclination to do it) to get the bridge flush with the body.As I said, this isn't a knock of these strings. I never really got a chance to play them. Just a heads up for anyone moving up to these heavier strings. It can be quite a shock the first time your see your bridge sticking out at a 45 degree angle to your guitar and if you aren't careful, you can damage your guitar., "musical_instruments"
I was loking for a particular sound that I jsut couldn't find with lighter strings. This set was perfect and I was able to re-create the sound Iwas looking for., "musical_instruments"
I wouldn't recommend tuning these strings to E however, because the intense amount of tension it takes to tune these to E can cause permanent damage to the neck that not even the truss rod can fix. The highest I feel comfortable tuning these to is E flat. If you are doing anything at or below Drop C sharp, these strings will work out great for you., "musical_instruments"
to much string for my beginner fingers but seemed to be the real brand and a decent price.i would reorder in 9's or maybe even 10's next time, "musical_instruments"
I use these on my acoustic Washburn, and they stay bright for weeks. I have been playing guitar for 30 years, and these are the best., "musical_instruments"
Great EXTRA Light POLYWEB strings for guitar.  Really impressed with the PolyWeb!  These are easy on my fingers and the polyweb don't sqeek., "musical_instruments"
My son plays electric and acoustic guitar. He uses Elixir for both and swears by them. He has had other brands, but they just don't stand up to elixir., "musical_instruments"
What you gain in string life with these strings you loose in tone. I'm not saying the tone is bad, but it's not as good as quality strings with no coat. That having been said, I'm pleased with them as a string for guitar practice. They last for months without a change in tone. I don;t play much in public venues, so it is not a problem for me to change strings when I do., "musical_instruments"
These strings actually save you money because you don't have to change em much. I keep em on a year or so and I play alot, out door indoor. constant abuse. they never rust. When they break I change em.now..I'm not a player who likes new strings to begin with so I like not having to change em..they really hold up. There are better sounding strings yes. But if your plugin in anyway, you can tweak the tone.The tone isn't bad, just not as good as a martin uncoated string.but if you like longevity and less squeak. these are great., "musical_instruments"
These acoustic strings are used on a Laguna acoustic guitar. They are just the right weight, and just the right amount of flex. We've tried D'Addario, brighter sound (D'Addario Acoustic Guitar Strings Set, EXP 80/20 Lite), and Martin, a little stiff (Martin Strings SP Phosphor Bronze 12.5-55 MSP4150). In the end, these Elixirs sound and feel best on this guitar.As has been said, there is no perfect guitar string for everyone. The perfect guitar string is the one that feels and sounds right to you on your guitar. For the combination we have, these are outstanding strings.On the strings lasting longer, that's hard to say. Fresh strings do sound better. It's clear that the wound strings do not corrode like non-coated strings. But I'm not certain these last so much longer. We buy them because they sound good and have the right amount of flex to them - playability. Corrosion or crud on the string isn't the sole factor in changing strings.June 15, 2010 Update: Elixir is a wonderful company. On my third or fourth sets of Elixir strings, the G string snapped as my son was tuning the guitar for the first time. Elixir is outstanding, they will replace any string that doesn't perform up to your standard.The other amazing thing - I've watched tons of videos and watched a lot of guys change strings, and I'm still very confused. The Elixir website (it's pretty simple elixirstring dot com) is outstanding. Ther is a two part video from the Taylor factory on how to change strings. I swear that if you follow those instructions, you will change strings in minutes. It is so simple and so reproducible. I love this technique.I'm a huge fan of these strings now!, "musical_instruments"
Purchased these strings after having tried the Blue Steel strings.  My son much prefers the Elixir strings. They last a lot longer than the Blue Steel strings did and he says the Elixir sound better, too., "musical_instruments"
I've been playing guitar for over twenty years now and I've tried just about every guitar string in existance and even these Elixir coated strings.  I've come to realise that the benefits for a slightly longer life barely makes sense given the much higher price you have to pay for it.  Eventually, all strings corrode and lose their lustre and if you are a professional playing gigs, you change your strings so often anyway that to pay much more for polycoating doesn't make any sense.  If you are the kind that occasionally takes out the axe then maybe this would make a difference but what I do is I get the least expensive ones and make sure I wipe down and clean them, even using products like string cleaners and Fast Fret to reduce finger squeak if necessary and my strings last for quite some time as well except at a much lower cost.Few people know this but only a few guitar stringmakers exist in the U.S. and many of them that are retailed are actually the same strings with different brand names.  Granted Elixir probably isn't one of these as they try to make hay with the time they have left on their patent of this polycoating technology but my thing is why pay so much more for strings when the benefit you get is really not so substantial as to justify the price?  I myself use generic Kyser stings for my classical and acoustic guitars and Memphis Electrics for my electric just because they are the cheapest I could find on the web and my sound has not been detrimentally affected in any way.  In fact, you are much more likely to improve upon your sound by using better amps and guitar cables than you are with strings; at least most people would be able to hear the difference.  Don't get me wrong these Elixir strings are not bad but you are much more likely to get a better sound by improving your technique (practice), getting better cables, pickups, amps, guitars etc than from just using these strings.  For better string life, just wipe down and clean the strings before and after use.  This discipline once a habit is good enough.Peace!, "musical_instruments"
I heard about these from a friend, several years back.I teach and run a mobile recording studio and use my guitars all the time for mobile music recording and for worship services.These strings allow me to keep on keepin' on for several weeks at a time, even with constant usage.I wipe the strings after use and they still sound bright and crisp after many sessions.[...], "musical_instruments"
There's NO SUCH THING as a \"best string\".  From experimenting over the years, I've found that, while I have \"old standbys\" that will be the first thing I try, often there is a string that is just right for a particular guitar and it varies from guitar to guitar.Coated strings have become all the rage over the last few years.  They're expensive, but they last a lot longer, especially if you have the kind of body chemistry that causes them to corrode quickly.  Also, they minimize the amount of finger noise you get if you slide on the strings.Elixir Polywebs were the first coated string.  The coating is much heavier than that of other strings.  This produces a much less bright, more muted sound.  I have an old koa guitar that is so bright I can't stand it with standard strings.  The Elixir Polywebs tone it down to the point where it's perfect.If you're looking for a darker sound, then Elixir Polywebs are definitely worth a shot.  If you want a coated string but prefer the brighter sound of uncoated strings, then you definitely don't want Polywebs.The 4 stars applies if you want this particular type of sound.  If you don't want this sound, you could end up awarding them 1 star., "musical_instruments"
Im a huge fan of Elixir's!!!  This, however, is my first go with the polyweb, but there is no disappointment here!!, "musical_instruments"
These are the best strings you can buy, IMHO. There is hardly any noise whilst your fingers slide over the strings when you change chords. I tried other strings but I always come back to Elixir., "musical_instruments"
great strings, deep rich tones from both highs and lows, a very good value for the dollar and customer service is second to none, "musical_instruments"
This installed easily. A nice feature is ability to unclip the shoulder pad from the mounts on the instrument.  When the pad is installed the strap is very comfortable and eased any shoulder pain I might have had with earlier straps.  A keeper for sure., "musical_instruments"
I used this strap for the first time during a rehearsal last night. I typically practice sitting down without a strap when I am alone, but stand up when rehearsing or performing with a band. I had previously used a very expensive 2\" padded leather cradle type strap, which I really liked. I sold that banjo and the strap with it, but recently re-acquired another banjo and wanted a good strap, but was not willing to pay the $80 again for a premium padded leather strap. I saw all of the great reviews for this strap and the affordable price and took a chance. I am glad I did.This strap may not be as elegant as fine leather, but it is made extremely well and feels very durable and substantial in its construction. What blew me away is that my full tone ring banjo, which weighs about 14 pounds, literally felt half as heavy. It is no joke. At first, the feeling was unnerving, because the strap has some elastic give to it. You get this dual sensation of a) the banjo feeling super light and b) as if the banjo is going to sink to the floor. Paradoxical I know, but that's where the magic of this strap is. It is almost as if the banjo is floating in front of you, but in reality it remains very stable when playing.Like I said, the build quality is outstanding. My only critique of the design is that it is very modern and non-traditional, so you also have to get used to the contrast of a traditional instrument, like a 5-string bluegrass banjo and the newer style and design of this strap.This is not just a good strap for the money rather it is a great strap at any price point. I think I might try these on my electrics (though I already have literally hundreds of dollars invested in a stable of those high end padded leather straps)., "musical_instruments"
Comfortable and easy to adjust for length.Additionally, it easily snaps off the banjo when you want to put the banjo in a tight case...My case is tight around the head, so I unsnap the strap and store it in the case by the neck of the banjo., "musical_instruments"
Padded portion of strap is quite soft and comfortable.Both ends are a loop.  You disonnect the quick release buckles and loop ends through banjo head retainer rods. Easy to do, and you can vary locationGood Product - I would from this manufacturer again., "musical_instruments"
I have bought and used about every banjo strap known to man, the Neotech is by far superior to anything else I have hooked up to my Gibson ESS.  The straps are easy to hook and unhook, I have two sets on my banjo, one set for the Neo and another for the harness I use when the back needs a rest.  It's easy to uphook one and hook the other.  Well done and I like the bounce feature, softens out the jolts., "musical_instruments"
This is the most comfortable strap I have ever used.  I have been a guitarist and bassist for over 40 years and although I have only been playing banjo for a short time, this IS the most comfortable strap I have ever used.  The clips look solid and so far they are solid., "musical_instruments"
The strap arrived ontime and the package was in great condition.  The strap was easy to attach to my banjo and is very comfortable.  I would recommend this strap to anyone looking for a cost effective banjo strap., "musical_instruments"
Fantastic strap.  Nope, it isn't leather or tooled or all that kind of stuff...  But it is really comfortable and fitted with ease even my CC-OT banjo that has a *really* tight spacing (all the others I tried were a bit of work to fit through the brackets).  Had it on my heavy weight resonator bluegrass, once again extremely comfortable and sturdy, so had to buy another so I can just have one on each., "musical_instruments"
Amazing strings, they last longer feel better on the bends than any other. They have a smoother feel and a nice bright sound., "musical_instruments"
I ordered the polyweb strings on the advice of some friends.  They didn't care at all for nanowebs which are widely available, but swore by the quality of the polywebs.  By some sort of mixup I got nanowebs by mistake.  I requested a return to get the proper item, and the seller offered to send me the polywebs and told me to keep the nanowebs for the trouble.  I haven't had a chance to test either set of strings out but I'm sure they'll be great.It's my understanding that the polywebs could practically be the last set of strings you ever buy (with some proper care).  I've been told that while nanowebs last longer than normal strings, they don't measure up to the polywebs., "musical_instruments"
I got these because I hate changing strings on a floating tremolo any more than I absolutely have to.... at first I thought I may have made a mistake because the tone was all off (super bright sounding on first installation).... played for a half hour and retuned, sounded better. Played for another half hour and retuned, sounded even better. Played for another few hours and they sound fantastic. Will update after I get a hundred hours on them (about 50 days from now). Will say that they handle bends very well and dive bombing deep on the trem hasn't hurt them yet.... VERY IMPRESSED, "musical_instruments"
A bit more expensive then other strings,  But theire worth it,  the tone is outstanding,  They last a long time,  they never rally come out of tune..... and they do last 3x5times longer then any other string I've tryed.  The sustain is great they give a nice soth blusey thone, Not to dark not to bright Just perfect.These string's are worth it!, "musical_instruments"
elixir makes the best guitar strings, electric and acoustic.  they last forever and don't rust.  they sound awesome.  get them., "musical_instruments"
My new go-to strings. These things last forever for someone who only plays casually. They sound great too. Absolutely recommend it., "musical_instruments"
I purchased Elixir strings after hearing them repeatedly recommended at the music store.  Put them on my Eko Ranger XII acoustic 12 string.  Have 2 problems with the strings.  First, the bass E (11th string) broke while tuning it up.  Had to go to music store and buy a single replacement string (not Elixir).  I have changed strings many, many times, so I am convinced it was not my stringing, but a weakness in the E string itself.  Second, the high D (8th string) seems \"dead\"; it does not \"ring\" as it should and as the other high strings do (though none as much as other 12 string sets I've used).  Considering these strings cost much more than others, I certainly am disappointed in them.  Hardly matters if they last longer if they don't sound as good., "musical_instruments"
I've used these Elixir strings for years and I would never change.  These have an excellent tone and last four times as long as the others., "musical_instruments"
I really like the strings they sound very bright and go well with my guitar I do hope they last quite a while I put them on a bout a month ago but that guitar is only lightly played so I will try to update when I change them, "musical_instruments"
These strings are performance value and always give me a great sound.  I have been using Elixir's for 5 years now and they last longer (even in this salty air environment by the beach) and sound better than anything else I have ever used., "musical_instruments"
Taylor ships this guitar with these strings - and for a good reason!  They sound wonderful - right out of the box! Like with most/all 12-string guitars, lights or extra lights are most often appropriate - the feel of these Nanowbs is smoth and easy and the tome they generate, in tandum with the instrument, bring out it's best resonance and sustainability.Give 'em a try!, "musical_instruments"
I buy Elixirs with all my acoustic guitars now. They last the longest and hold the brightest and clearest tone of any string I've ever used. The nanoweb coating really does make a huge difference. They take several months to wear out (as opposed to the weeks other major brands last). They may cost a bit more than the competition, but if you try them and love them as much as I do, you'll never use anything else again., "musical_instruments"
I've had these on my Yamaha APX500 for a while now and they sound really good.  A tad brighter than I like, but that's just the nature of the lightness of the strings.  It's real smooth when playing and they seem to be lasting longer than most strings I try.  In fact, I've had these strings on for over 4 months now and they still feel and sound good., "musical_instruments"
These are my favorite strings.  They last a long time and my fingers don't hurt when I play.  I tried Martin strings once and hated them., "musical_instruments"
These are my favorite guitar strings! They are very long-lasting and sound great!I would recommend these for anyone, beginners or even people who play seriously or perform. They are very good strings, worth the cost! :], "musical_instruments"
The Elixir brand acoustic guitar strings keep their brand-new 'sound' a lot longer than any other brand.  I am very happy with the Elixir brand strings., "musical_instruments"
I have had them on my Loar Guitar for a few weeks and they seem to work fine.  We will see how long they last.  I have used Elixir for electric and while they do last longer I wish it was a bit longer., "musical_instruments"
I've used these strings longer than any other strings I've tried (about 7 years).  Last year I switched to D'Addario EXP16's because they sounded better on the guitar I have now, but still keep a pack of Nanowebs as a backup.  Here are my pros and cons of this string:Pros:+Easier to fret and play than other strings.  I don't know why; I looked up the tension stats on these strings and they seem to be equivalent or higher than other strings.  But they certainly are easier to fret (press down) and play than any other string I've tried, including other coated ones.  The coating on the Nanoweb strings is thinner than the Elixir Polyweb series, but still feel very smooth and even 'slippery', as some people remarked.  They have very little string squeak.+Last longer than any other strings I've tried - maybe because of their brightness, these strings mellow with age (as all strings do) but never really sound dull.  The only reason I saw to change them was when they became overly dirty or broke, usually every few months of regular playing.+Very bright sound, which cuts through well playing live with a full band, and livens up the sound of cheaper guitars.  However, this can also be a con (see below)Cons:-Cost more than most strings, including other coated strings.-Can sound overly bright, especially on some higher end guitars.  They tend to dominate the sound of the guitar, which is good for cheaper guitars without quality woods or construction, but not so good for a guitar that already resonates well.  For this reason I switched to the EXP16 phosphor bronze string for my current guitar. The EXP16 is coated but has a more natural/dark sound that complements the 'woodiness' of the guitar better than the Elixirs (although not as easy to play).-Not available for export outside the U.S.  When I was working abroad, I used to buy these from a U.S. company who would ship them to me.  Elixir changed their policy to prevent this, so I ended up switching strings because the cost of Elixirs abroad was so high., "musical_instruments"
I kinda strayed away from the Elixir brand for a little while just \"To See\" if another brand would sound \"better\" and in doing so, I wasted time and money.(but I did get some EXPERIENCE) I'm back with the Elixirs now and have no intentions to \"Experiment\" any more.Simply put............Elixir makes the best Strings for an Acoustic Guitar that I've tried and I \"Will Stick with them\" because they have Great Sound, last a long time, easy to clean and prevent rust and/or corrosion., "musical_instruments"
I use mediums but bought these for my nephews Takamine and they sound awesome on that guitar.  Always love these strings.  This kid has not changed his strings in years so I thought I would give hem the best chance of keeping his guitar sounding good for as long as possible., "musical_instruments"
These strings are a little more money than the average strings, but they last longer. Great for the dedicated guitar player., "musical_instruments"
5 stars, arrived on time and in good condition. Price is excellent. Will install to one of my acoustical guitars within the next few day., "musical_instruments"
All I can say is,,, You should try a set of these Elixir Nanoweb 80/20 Bronze Acoustic Guitar Strings for yourself. You will not want to go back to any other set of strings. I've been using Elixir strings for many years. They have better feel, sound, and last longer than all other brands I've used playing Guitar. Elixir has excellent quality control too. I've never had a problem., "musical_instruments"
Lately I have been experimenting with various make of acoustic guitar strings.....to the less and also most expensive strings.  I find the Elixir excellent. My testing is ongoing and cannot give the Elixir a top rating yet. That may change along the way.However, I believe that guitar strings are a bit like food and wine.  What may appeal to my palate may not appeal to someone else's palate.  Therefore, strings that may sound good to my ear may not sound good to someone else's ear.My ears remain attentive to future string sounds.  I also love the d'Addario make.  Which I purchase through Amazon...always., "musical_instruments"
I love, love, love these strings. Super great sound and super long life. I've had these on my acoustic for over 6 months before, and the sound is still awesome. I'll definitely only buy these from now on., "musical_instruments"
Elixir strings are great for me.  They hold their tones longer.  They aren't rough textured so they are easier on the fingers., "musical_instruments"
I have a Taylor 514 ce acoustic guitar and Elixir Strings are what this very nice guitar came with from Taylor when new.  I figure they have done the research on what works best and I see no reason for a change other than going fro the extra light strings to the light weight strings.  The sound you get with the Nanoweb strings are amazing and they enhance the results from an already great guitar.  They also last a long time before they go dead., "musical_instruments"
I've written a review before. They are excellent. Never broke a string, but I only play at home as a hobby. therefore they not abused., "musical_instruments"
I'll never use another string on acoustics. The reduced finer squeak, the long lasting coating, and the great tone of these strings is wonderful. I've tried a couple cheaper brands recently, both coated and uncoated... but come back to these every time., "musical_instruments"
Great set of strings. Cant go wrong with elixirs a little over priced but I am hoping to get long life out of them to make up for it., "musical_instruments"
I've been using Nanoweb and Polyweb (no idea what the difference is) Elixirs consistently for years now on my Martin Jumbo Cutaway.I periodically try out other brands whenever I see something that might compete, especially when another \"extended life\" or \"coated\" string is released. I would happily bail on Elixir at $13 a set if someone offered a cheaper option that worked as well. In fact, I was quite optimistic about the $9 D'Addario EXPs until I heard their tone begin to evaporate after a few days like any other string. Nothing that I've used up to this point has gotten close to challenging the quality of the mighty purple box.The sound you get from these on Day 1 is crisp and beautiful as expected. That's not where Elixirs kill the competition though. It's after 20 hours of play that they show their strength. You will still hear fresh, bright tones from them when any other set would have already crossed into the dead zone. In fact, I typically start breaking them before they begin to sound too dull. I play relatively aggressively and use palm-muting constantly, allowing skin oils to eat right through the strings at the bridge.Saying that the tone lasts 3.5x longer (as stated on the box) might be a stretch but there is no question that you get at least double the life out of these at less than twice the cost of alternatives.If you are an occasional player or a music shop owner, these are a no-brainer. The coating is extremely effective at combating the effects of time and oxygen exposure. For the everyday, aggressive player you will simply get better tone and longer life.One nit-picky point of criticism: the packaging is an issue for me. WHY would any manufacturer still utilize tree-killing paper envelopes that allow strings to get stale? I'm seriously asking! I've got to be missing something here. A shred of plastic sealed around all 6 strings is greener, more cost-efficient, and it keeps the strings fresh (thank YOU D'Addario, I'll never leave your electric strings). I would happily buy Elixirs in bulk if I had faith in their shelf-life. Complaints about these snapping prematurely are probably valid, happening when someone gets a set that's been sitting around for a while. Think of them as a perishable and buy them from places that move a lot of units (like Amazon :), "musical_instruments"
I only use elixirs on my taylor now 1, because they last months on end while maintaining that new string zing, and 2 because they are soooooo smooth. It's like playing a silk guitar. Get these strings., "musical_instruments"
These are expensive, they seem to last longer, but when they start to wear, they develop a 'fuzz' where - I assume - the nanoweb is wearing off.  It doesn't seem to affect the playability., "musical_instruments"
These are great guitar strings and are all that guitarists say they are. They are so tuneful, they make an ordinary acoustic guitar sound beautiful. My only concern is that if the strings aren't wound properly they seem brittle and break. e.g. Low E and A strings and the vulnerable G string.The LIGHT version I find, are particularly suited to finger picking., "musical_instruments"
After about a month and a half I have noticed some corrision on the A and D strings at the 4th fret.  That is a little disapointing because these are suppost to last 3 to 5 times longer than \"regular\" strings.  I like the way they sound.  They are a little harder to play than the D' Addario strings that I am used to on my other guitar, and the Martins that I have used in the past.  If I still have to change them every 2 or 3 months they are not really worth the extra cost., "musical_instruments"
They costed twice as much as my usual D'Addarios but after 2 weeks of use, I couldn't be any happier. I've heard only positive reviews about these Elixir strings and now understand why. They are smooth as butter thanks to the coating and sound bright, clean, and crisp. They also make my guitar look much nicer and shinier. A great , "musical_instruments"
Regardless of the string itself, I insist on honesty in advertising and marketing.  So when I was earnestly considering ordering this string I read the summary, in which it was stated:\"Elixir Strings are coated in a unique way to protect wound strings from your DNA and other contaminants.\"Ohhhh... protects my string from DNA!  Yeah, that DNA really messes up guitar strings all right.  In fact it's the worst contaminant EVER... worse even than the oils and acids on our skin... worse than the cells themselves that contain and hold the DNA from exposure because the DNA is the blueprint of those cells, contained deep within protective walls.  But somehow that nasty ol' DNA leaks out and contaminates our guitar strings!Honestly.  It's like none of us have ever attended a biology class because we're musicians?As I read the reviews, I noted review after review after review that seemed like some sort of marketing promo.  I noticed not one of those reviews indicated they had actually purchased the product from Amazon.  Hmmmm.The first honest review I found was one which said, \"These strings sound somewhat artificial.\"  Ah finally, one of the REAL reviews.Look, the product may be good or not.  It may be the best string ever or not.  But am I going to spend time and money testing a string that apparently can't stand on its own quality without bogus marketing hype?We're musicians, not morons.  If you want us to buy a string, be totally honest in the marketing.  A quality string will sell itself by performance, sound and long life.  No matter how heavy the marketing hype, if the string is bad you'll only sell one set.  If it's good... you don't need the hype.EDIT FOLLOW-UP:  After reading numerous reviews, this does actually seem to be a good set of strings.  Which means the product can stand on customer testimony alone and shouldn't need spin to sell.  Just sayin'.  ;), "musical_instruments"
I read several reviews before purchasing these strings. I've never bought any strings with any sort of coating on them but after putting these on my Yamaha acoustic, it sounded great! They have very good high and low tones and give a more resonating tone to the whole guitar. My Yamaha is not a very expensive model but these strings make it sound like it is. If you're wanting to upgrade to a thicker set of strings, definitely give these a try. The coating is supposed to make them last longer and resist corrosion and what not, but they are also a little smoother on the fingertips when changing chord positions and sliding up and down the fret board., "musical_instruments"
Time will tell if they last longer than strings 1/3rd the price. Visually, they don't appear any different than cheaper Bronze wound strings. I was expecting something different, but as far as sound goes, the strings tuned well and only required some stretching 3 times to get them to stay in tune, even after playing &#34;smear notes&#34; on several songs. My problem with cheaper strings (De'Angelo) was they would tarnish or rust quickly, the winding would come lose and bare the inner string over the fret marks on the guitar. The company claims these are treated to prevent corrosion and should last 3 to 5 times longer. I'll know in a few weeks if that statement is true or not. Since these are literally triple the cost, I'll know if it was worth the extra expense. Hopefully these are made in the USA instead of China like most other things we buy in America. Good or bad, once I see the longevity of this set, I'll add to this review at that time., "musical_instruments"
The Nanoweb strings do stay clean and they stand up but, on the negative side...I replaced one string in my set with a nanoweb and noticed right away the feel was slippery. When picking my fingers would slip on the nano string rather than pluck.  I will stick to cleaning my good old standard strings., "musical_instruments"
I've been playing guitar for about 15 years - and within the last year bought my first Taylor guitar (Taylor Guitars 414CE-LTD Grand Auditorium Acoustic Electric Guitar). It came with these Elixir strings on it from the factory. I am blown away by the brightness and purity of the tone these strings produce. What's even better is how long they last.I'm pretty hard on my strings. I useDunlop Standard Tortex Picks, 12 Pack, Purple, 1.14mmwhich are very stiff, and chew up strings very quickly. The nanoweb wrap that they put on these string makes them last several MONTHS instead of weeks. They're a little bit more expensive then other major string brands. But after about a year of listening to these (only gone through 3 sets so far), they're worth the extra few bucks., "musical_instruments"
They feel great, last longer than any other string I ever used and most importantly, they sound terrific. The medium weight also has a better tone than thinner gauges. My Taylor is much louder now that I use these.However, you may have to adjust your truss rod if you change from lite or extra light., "musical_instruments"
These are pricey but keep the fresh sparkly tone much longer.  When they start sounding a little dull it wipe them down with Fast Fret, loosen off the tension a bit and wipe 'em down firmly and they sound new again., "musical_instruments"
Great great great great great great great great great.  Been uning them for years.  Love the sound and playability and durability.  matin coated are good too., "musical_instruments"
These strings are very nice and sound great. Elixer is a fantastic brand and these strings are definitely worth the price., "musical_instruments"
I hesitate to write this review simply because it's pretty obvious nearly everyone else loves these strings. To be honest, I was very, very impressed with their feel and handling. I do think they're the best playing strings I've used when it comes to pure playability. Hands down, none better. They were butter-smooth and great for flat picking. But for me it was a trade-off, because I simply wasn't impressed with the tone. I even took the time to try them on three different guitars (all dreadnoughts): a classic maple sides/spruce top, a mahogany back/sides with spruce top, and a maple backs/sides with a nato top. On all three, I didn't like the tone as much as the strings I was using. I really wanted to like them, but they simply didn't have the tone of the medium gauge Martin SPs I normally use.This isn't to say they're not great strings that sound different on other peoples' guitars, but I simply didn't like them on mine. I love good projection with rich bass tones and ringing treble for the folk and traditional music I play in our jam group. The Elixirs just lacked the punchy high tones of the Martin strings I use, and the treble sounds tinny vs. the clear ring of the Martins I normally use. To be fair, the bass strings sound great, and aren't much different. I would have to say choose your strings carefully based upon how you're going to use them. I play in acoustic groups, and the Elixir strings just don't have what I need to be heard, in spite of how great they feel under your fingers. If playability is more important than great tonal range, then by all means buy these strings...you won't be disappointed. I'm guessing these would be fine on an acoustic electric, where the electronics could compensate for the weaker treble tones., "musical_instruments"
I've been using Elixir strings since Gore first made prototypes over 10 years ago. I use both electric and acoustic. The product performs exactly as they guarantee it will.  Every once in a while I'll get a &#34;dead&#34; string. I'll just call the customer service number and they will replace it free of charge. Same thing with strings that break while tuning them up., "musical_instruments"
Compared these all in Medium .013's on a Taylor 210 dreadnought .... Martin SP Bronze & Phosphor Bronze, Martins Lifespan SP, Dr, D'addario EJ17 Phosphor Bronze, and Elixir Nanoweb 80/20 Bronze and Phospher Bronze. I tried them back to back. Switching back and forth. Narrowing it down to D'addario and Elixirs. I did the same with these 3 sets. One day I'd try all 3 playing along with a cd. Then I'd try a different set every 3 days. The Elixir 80/20 comes out on top. Best sounding of all, smooth on my fingers. Second, Elixir Phospher bronze, last was D'addario. I'd be satisfied with the D'addario they do sound good. But the Elixir sounds & feels better., "musical_instruments"
I always go with Elixirs. Great, long-lasting sound! I would recommend these to anyone, both experienced players and amateurs alike., "musical_instruments"
These are perfect. Hard to beat strings. They last, keep in tune, and keep their tone. They don't need any string cleaners either. So you can save money on that. An obvious noticeable difference between the Medium gauge and the Light is that these Medium gauge are not recommended if you like to finger-pick a lot.  But boy.... Are they bright! Enough to blow the spruce tops from pine trees!, "musical_instruments"
I bought a set as they were recommended to get the tone I was looking for on my 7 week old guitar. Installed as usual and tuned them. They sounded good when played open but compressing them was nearly impossible. My capo could not even hold them. I set the guitar aside for a few minutes and heard the wood creaking. When I looked the face of the guitar was bowing up and the bridge was pulling up and back as if they were trying to pry it off. I released the tension on all the strings as fast as I could and left it. I returned them and got some lighter ones but to no avail. The body is cracked around the bridge and it is useless now. Use at your own risk!!!!!!! I personally wouldn't give a nickel for them., "musical_instruments"
These strings sound amazing. They also last for a really long time and keep sounding amazing. I get better harmonics with these strings as well., "musical_instruments"
I tend to sweat when I play, so coated strings are a necessity for me.  These are as good as any coated string on the market, I prefer the thinner coating and super light strings.  Everyone has their preferences so you should try a few different gauges and manufacturers until you find your favorite string. These provide an nice smooth feel while providing excellent tone and they last reasonably well.  Of course that depends on your playing style and how much your fingers sweat when you play!  Oh, and do yourself a favor and store your guitars in their cases when you are not playing them.  The guitar and the strings will last longer and thank you for it., "musical_instruments"
These do not last as long as they say they do but they do last longer than most strings.  I like them., "musical_instruments"
sorry i noticed no difference i believe the price was really good for all the hype they put into these strings, "musical_instruments"
I tried these not knowing what to expect, and have been very pleasantly surprised. I tend to have sweaty hands, and my guitar strings get a lot of crud on them and then eventually rust. Although I have learned now to wipe them down each time I play, they still deteriorate pretty quickly, and it's a pain. When I wipe them down with a cloth, they leave black streaks of crud on the cloth.The Elixirs are not as bright as other strings when you first put them on -- that is true. However, other strings lose their brightness after just a few hours of playing, so I don't see this as a major disadvantage. The advantage is that these strings get very little crud on them. When I wipe them down, there's nothing on the cloth! I've even stopped wiping my strings down as carefully.So for a player like me, these are a godsend. I don't detect any loss of tone. They are a bit slippery, and some people have reported having trouble because of this, but it's fine for me.Definitely they're worth a try. Although they're twice as expensive as regular strings, they'll last longer, so they're worth checking out! Ernie Ball makes titanium coated strings that I'm interested in trying out, and there are some other brands, too., "musical_instruments"
These strings have great tone and feel.  They seem to maintain the tone and quality for a long period of time., "musical_instruments"
if you like this guage you'd like these.. I just tried them, just to try.. but I've confirmed I like heavier gauges., "musical_instruments"
Love these strings. I use them exclusively on my Gibson LP Studio Deluxe because it seems to corrode ordinary strings quickly. I have a washburn with a glossy, sealed looking fretboard, that doesn't have that problem, but still prefer these strings for it as well. They tend to be a little stiffer than ernie ball's, but I like the way they sound and they feel great when bending and sliding. I can keep these on my guitar for weeks of daily playing without the corrosion and deadness that I get with other brands., "musical_instruments"
My favorite brand of strings right now. 8 guitars now are fitted. They bend easy, last longer, feel smoother and a shot of Finger Grease Spray just adds the icing to the cake, "musical_instruments"
I haven't owned my electric guitar for over a year, but I've only replaced its strings once. I've been playing almost every day for an hour or two and it still looks and feels very new. At this rate, it seems that the current strings I have installed would last forever. Would recommend to anybody looking for a long lasting set., "musical_instruments"
I get everything on Amazon now.  Need some strings and was ordering other stuff so bought to piggy back on shipping.  Elixir is what Tom Anderson uses and I trust his judgment.  He makes one of the finest guitars in the world if not the finest depending on what you like of course. Have a lot of them and used all kinds of other strings, I do Not like changing strings so these seem to last a decent amount of time.  Stretch them bend them and they don't break.  If your bending a couple steps or more then I would love to know what string holds up consistently.  Thanks much., "musical_instruments"
not two weeks after I put these on the A string broke close to the ball on the string.  I break high e strings on occasion.  but something as thick as an A string?? maybe it was a defective string as I thankfully bought two sets and I was able to pull the A out of the other set and it has been fine since.  now however I have the dilemma of should I just buy more strings and just use the second set as I need them.  Further more do I stick with the same brand.  that is supposed to last longer than average strings.  At this point I am going to keep playing this set until its time to change then go from there.  I will update once I decide if I should stick with this brand or go back to super slinky'supdate 3/25well another month went by(a week ago) and the D string broke in the same fashion leaving me to believe I either got defective strings are these strings are not as good as they are said to be. either way its losing another star.  if it happens with a different set of strings I will reevaluate my guitar/review and change accordingly, "musical_instruments"
Yes, these strings are amazing.  I discovered these on my new Taylor and now I've put them on all my gits.  They really are the better string.  I was a fan of Ernie Ball on my electrifieds and D'Addario on my acoustics, but no more, I'm only using these.  They are brighter in tone to me and that really brightens up my acoustics.  They bend easy so they are nice on the electrics.  They do, however, seem to take a little more breaking in than other strings...but it's worth it., "musical_instruments"
Been a fan of these for years now. I occasionally use other strings for fun, but these will always be my go to strings every time. They feel great on the fingers for such a long period of time, sliding is easy, and they keep their tone forever it seems like. I recommend these to everyone I talk to who plays guitar, and they always stick with em. GET EM! You wont be sorry., "musical_instruments"
They will always sound the same as the very first day, I love this strings, currently on all my guitars, "musical_instruments"
I have been using these strings for the last 7 years.  The tone last longer than any other string and they don't break on me.  In those 7 years I haven't broke a single string.  That being said I don't play heavy at all.  I will buy these strings until the day I die. especially the acoustic version of these..., "musical_instruments"
I have used Elixir's on all my guitars for the past 3 years and never been disappointed. Their tone is great and the nanoweb's feel nice when you're playing.Disclaimer, I would only recommend the nanoweb, NOT the polyweb., "musical_instruments"
Always the best string I buy.  I like the Martin coated as well but I prefer the elixer.  This is the first set I baught for my electrics but so far so good., "musical_instruments"
I bought these strings after buying some Elixir strings for my acoustic, which I was pretty happy with.  For my strat, however, these strings did not sound right from the start. After about a week I really started wondering if it was just in my head or if I really didn't have sustain that I thought I usually got from a new pair of strings.  I convinced myself that it was these strings that were causing all my problems, and I was right.  I put a pair of D'Addario XL 9.5 (highly recommended for those players who can't decide between 9s or 10s) and was amazed at how much tone and sustain I was losing with these Elixir strings.  I did feel like I could move up and down the fretboard easily with these strings, but the lack of sustain and tone have forced me to stay way from these electric strings permanently.  Don't let the higher price on these strings entice you, go with a good set of D'Addario or Ernie Ball strings for consistent long-lasting strings., "musical_instruments"
I really like these strings, because I have sweaty hands that tend to make the strings on my guitars corrode and rust very fast. I can play a guitar once, and leave it there for 2-3 weeks, and the strings will be rusty and nasty when I return to it. I now rub down the strings thoroughly after each session playing them, but this stil happens.Then I happened across these Elixir nanowebs. They are great. I no longer need to rub down my strings so thoroughly, and they stay rust and gunk-free for 2+ weeks (of regular playing). However, I did encounter one strange thing. While playing at a rehearsal, my E-string just popped and broke, hurting my finger a bit. I was surprised, because outwardly the string didn't look that bad.So that is the downside. With regular strings, you can tell the string is near the end of its life b/c it looks really bad. With these, they may still look okay but be close to breaking. Made me a little cautious.I still prefer these 100% over other strings, though., "musical_instruments"
While the Nanowebs are coated and then coiled, the Polywebs are first coiled and then completely coated.  They both feel very, very smooth to play and the sound is amazing, I mean really amazing.  The Nano's sound is not quite as smooth and rich and heavy as the Poly's.  I would recommend trying both types for your electric guitars.  The Nanos may sound better for you on a hollow-body electric, and the Polys may sound better for you on a solid body electric; it's a personal preference like anything else.  The Polywebs though feel and are really smooth and give you a really fat, mellow, sweet sound., "musical_instruments"
These are the best strings ever.  I've tried almost every string on the market, and these are by far my favorite.  They sound great and last forever.  Believe the hype...they really DO last FAR longer than any other strings, and they sound great while doing it.Many other strings will sound great for a short while, but as soon as they get \"gunked up\", they lose any brilliance and tone, and become dead sounding.  Not these.  They will sound great for the life of the string.  In fact, the only way I know to change them eventually is not because they stop sounding good (which they don't), but because I'll start having intonation problems and I know the strings need to be changed.  Normal wear and tear does that, but these strings last SO long.I've tried the polyweb strings from Elixir as well, but I didn't like those at all.  To me, they didn't FEEL right.  Sticky or something (not like your fingers stick to the strings, but like you could tell they were coated).  With the Nanowebs, they sound AND feel like regular strings, but last forever.  The only string I'll use., "musical_instruments"
Pricey as far as strings go.  A lot of people swear by them but I get just as much tone and life out of strings that cost a whole lot less., "musical_instruments"
Elixir strings are my favorite choice of strings for all 8 of my Guitars. They are smooth and bending is a breeze. They last longer than most other brands I've used. I use a little Finger Grease Spray and I would recommend them to anyone., "musical_instruments"
Without changing my pickups or polishing my frets, I thought I'd try to get a little more sustain switching up strings. At first I thought I had got a bum buy because the I had to bring the action up a bit to account for the over brightness of the strings. Had my tone all off and I was ready to dig my other set back out of the trash..... played on it for a half hour (went through the exact same thing with the Polywebs I put on the RG655) then retuned, sounded pretty good. Played for another half hour and retuned and it actually sounds great now. Dropped the action back down and it's smooth as silk in an hour's time. VERY HIGHLY RECOMMEND, "musical_instruments"
The title says it all. They're Elixirs, you just can't go wrong with Elixirs. Trust me, I've played for 13 years., "musical_instruments"
I liked my Elixir strings on my acoustic, so I knew that the ones for electric would be worth the extra money (as compared to non-coated brands).  They seem to create less noise from unintentional slide friction--it's sort of like the difference between flatwound and regular strings--these feel like super-flatwound strings, meaning they feel smooth.  I have some nice callusses built up, but I imagine that I'd like these strings even more if I was just starting out (or restarting) because I imagine they tear up your fingertips much less than non-coated strings., "musical_instruments"
I put these on one of my Gibson Les Pauls' and so far so good.  Great sound and no wear after one session, unlike the D'Addario strings.I will update in a few weeks as I see how long they last., "musical_instruments"
Good strings for my electric guitar.I liked the product a lotClean sound, easy to change and much more., "musical_instruments"
Bought these for my son's electric guitar.  He loves this brand!  They sound great and seem to last longer than other brands.  Price is great!, "musical_instruments"
Elixir strings are very nice.  so slick and last forever compared to standard strings..But i will admit D addario strings are just as good but have to be replaced more often. So if you have the money and want to try these technology advanced strings i dont think you will be disappointed. Some people say they are too slick.. and i can see that when you put new strings on you expect them to feel a certain way..  But you will get over that once you see how long they last., "musical_instruments"
Been using these for years. They feel great, last longer than any other string and most importantly, they sound GREAT.They cost a little more than other strings but they're worth it., "musical_instruments"
Totally awesome strings. I've heard other strings are great too, but I highly recommend everyone try these if you haven't. Outstanding string life, superior sound, ease of sliding, I get these strings every time. Elixirs for life! I'd pay double for these strings all day., "musical_instruments"
As a professional guitar player, I am always nervous playing a show with &#34;old&#34; strings. However, I've been using Elixir for over 2 years now, and the strings really do last a long time. I would usually replace my strings every month, but I've started leaving them on for up to 6 months., "musical_instruments"
These guitar strings are very nice and I love them. I always buy this brand. They work well and sound amazing., "musical_instruments"
After all these reviews I expected the Greatest Strings Ever, golden strands of Glory that would last for a year with sparkling tonal perfection!Instead, I got a decent set of .10's that lasted a whole hour before the D snapped at the neck pickup. I use a PRS with a Wilkinson bridge that rarely breaks strings, and I pre-stretch them gently but completely. Plus I tune down to Eb for vocal and breakage reasons, so I break very few of my normal strings, Slinky .10's. Ergo, a break in one hour from a thick string under minimal tension, tuned down, is unacceptable, especially when these strings cost three times as much as most all other electric strings.As for the tone, it's definitely bright and almost too edgy, but nicely zingy all told. Yet one negative I've noticed after about 8 hours' loud playing with a drummer is that these things seem to vibrate more widely than most strings, making them harder to tune. Sounds odd, I know, but when I replaced the D with a Slinky D (replacing singles ain't cheap either at triple the price, please note), I've since noticed that it tunes faster and in a tighter range than the Elixir strings.So, I must say I'm summarily unimpressed so far with Elixir electric strings.What's the good of string lasting a long time if it breaks fast?Especially when it costs three times more?And what's up with the tuning thing?And why do these cost so much more, anyhow? Is a micro-thin coating of siliconish stuff really worth two bucks extra each string? Not when that string is toast in 50 minutes, zero doubt there.Anyhow, I've got five Elixirs and one Slinky on my main ax now, so as they age I'll get a good feel for how the Elixirs stay in tune and hold their tone, and I'll report back here in a while. And by the way, that Slinky D sounds almost exactly the same as the Elixirs, tonally. So much for Magic Elixir Tone.Don't get me wrong, I really do want to love these, as I hate changing strings, but geez guys, how about some quality control?If I'm going to pay triple the price, then is it crazy to expect triple the quality? Or heck, even just a little better...PS If you look at the D'Addario reviews (I love their acoustic strings), they respond to many of the reviews and questions. I hope that Elixir will do the same here and address my questions.[Edit: And now, after only six hours' of playing on that guitar, the B string popped at the same place as the D, neck pickup. Once again I ask: what good are strings that \"sound good three times longer\" if they break three times faster?][Edit: 10/31/12. Come on! After four more hours, the A string went. I only play that ax one or two sessions a week, and the next time I joked to the drummer, \"Which one will go today?\" He said he's amazed the G is still on, as he plays too and knows the G takes the most tension. An hour later, guess what? Yep. So that's four broken strings in less than 20 hours' play. Seriously?Not only are these not a good deal for 9 bucks, I'd be bummed if they cost 3 bucks. The only plus I can think of at this point is they sounded good when new, but dang, unless you play totally smooth jazz or some such, I'd stick with Slinkies or D'Addarios. Unless I got a \"bad set\", which seems kinda lame for triple the normal price. In any case, these Elixirs were just not worth the money.][Edit, 3/3/13: I called Elixir and told them about the multiple breakage, and they sent me another set. That set has taken a few four hour hard rock sessions with no breaks yet, thought the tuning issue remains. I'll add a star for good customer service and the hope that perhaps my first set was a dud. But honestly, at this price, there should be no duds at all.], "musical_instruments"
These are my favorite brand of strings.When i was a beginner a few years back these were the 1st strings i bought on my electric (since i used them on my acoustic) And i have to say, elixir is my favorite brand of strings. They last long, are easy to tune, & have a nice bright sound & if you take proper care of them (wipe them down when your done playing, keep the guitar in your gig bag when your not using it, ETC.) that bright sound can last about 6 MONTHS OR MORE!! i usually just buy about two sets a year & im a HEAVY player i play about 2-7 hours EVERYDAY. I love the coating aswell but the medium gauge & up usually don't have that other coating you can get on the light gauge strings, , "musical_instruments"
great set of strings I will stick with elixir strings whether it be electric or acoustic great brand and they know what they are doing., "musical_instruments"
Sound great, last much longer than any other string I have tried.Worth the extra $$. Give them a try., "musical_instruments"
These strings sound great, play great, and the coating really does keep down the squeaking. Some purists don't like the coating movement when it comes to strings, and it does take a micron off the treble, but they last a loooong time. I usually only have to change my strings once a month. I use them on my Washburn acoustic guitar, and play rock, folk, and country strumming. They rock, and I feel they are the best strings around today, period.  These strings are very small, and are great for playing for long periods of time, without brutalizing the fingertips. Some people say the real light strings are not good for recording, and you probably have less of a bass boom, but I like 'em., "musical_instruments"
I've been using elixers on my Godin Multiac Steel SA for many years now. They have a great, not-too-bright sound and you don't get the string noise when you move your hands across the neck like you do with traditional strings. These tend to last me about 3 months! So, I am very happy with them. They also track pretty well with my roland synth, so no gripes there. All in all I really like these strings and think they sound great., "musical_instruments"
These Elixir Nanoweb acoustic guitar strings are amazing because they sound like new strings for a long time (months) unlike other guitar strings.  Great product.  These Extra Light strings are not light enough for my playing enjoyment, so instead I buy Elixir Nanoweb strings in singles so I can select the gauges that I like even better.  A great product no matter what gauge string you choose., "musical_instruments"
I put a set of Elixir Nanoweb custom light strings on my main acoustic guitar maybe a couple of months ago.  Although I don't play gigs on it, I play the guitar just about every day, or maybe every other day.  The custom lights are wonderful:  great durability, nice tone and projection, easy on the fingers.  I bought a set of the Elixir extra lights for a Laguna 3/4 size travel guitar I have.  The reasoning was that the lighter body guitar with a shorter scale could use lighter strings, thereby putting less stress on the body.  Compared with the light D'Addario strings that came with the guitar, these have a more muffled low E string.  The A string, too, doesn't project as much as the standard strings.  Although I've not tried the extra lights on my full-sized acoustic, I suspect that there, too, the lower strings would not have the presence or ring of other brands.  Even with the custom light set--where the lower strings are a heavier gauge than a normal light set--the bass notes have a slight hint of that muffled quality.  The thing that most players of Elixirs seem to talk about is the playability and the durability.  They are smoother feeling than non-coated strings, and certainly don't degrade because of perspiration nearly as quickly as regular strings.  The other thing that's important to know, though, is that the Elixirs are excellent at holding a tune, once they're stretched and broken in.  That being said, I'm not sure that I would put the extra lights on the Laguna again because of the bass projection issue:  a small guitar has little enough bass to begin with and these strings don't help.  As you might have guessed, though, I'm thoroughly convinced about the custom lights on the full-sized acoustic., "musical_instruments"
I have written other reviews about elixir. High quality strings. Great for acoustic and electric. No complaints on these strings., "musical_instruments"
It was time for a change after many years of using the same strings and I am really glad I tried Elixir. They feel really nice and sound awesome, I will be sticking with these now, thanks for the good and prompt service as well Cheers !!!, "musical_instruments"
these strings sound really great and have that special nanoweb coating that is resistant to corrosion and rusting like other strings tend to get as they age.  the extra light gauge sound so bright and happy on my acoustic- which is very old and tired looking.. but sounds brand new when i throw these strings on it.  very much recommended.. acoustic and elixir electric strings as well., "musical_instruments"
Love Elixir strings! I bought my first pack, over 7 years ago and I've been hooked. They last, at least, twice as long as traditional copper wound strings, and sound even better. GET THESE! These make my cheap $50 acoustic guitar, sound almost as good as my Martin...no kidding., "musical_instruments"
I first discovered Elixir strings when I purchased my Taylor and I've been a convert ever since.  They cost roughly two or three times as much as uncoated strings but are well worth it.  If your hands perspire when you play, this product will keep your strings sounding new and fresh.  They sound great on my Martin too !, "musical_instruments"
I have used these strings for years and this was a great price. Shipping time was good., "musical_instruments"
Purchased these strings after having tried Blue Steel strings on my son's acoustic guitar.  He prefers the Elixir strings over the Blue Steel strings. He says they last a lot longer and sound better, too., "musical_instruments"
I started using these at the suggestion of a friend a couple of years ago.They sound great and hold their tone for a long time.I jam with friends a couple of times a week and these strings hold up for a long time!!, "musical_instruments"
My husband got these and they don't get dirty as quickly, which is a plus.  Initially the sounds aren't as clear as the uncoated ones, but it wears off after a couple of hours of play and you wouldn't know the difference.  He'll buy them again.  No difference in putting the new strings on from the regular kind., "musical_instruments"
I have been using these strings for 7 years.  At first I used the Elixir Polywebs, but those things broke all the time.  I switched to these and haven't broke a string since.  If you play a Gibson or Martin I would buy a heavier string, but these match well with my 414ce Taylor.  Because of the price I don't use these on my cheap Fender Acoustic, for that I suggest Earthwoods.  I even use the Electric version of these strings on my American Srat, very pleased there as well., "musical_instruments"
Elixir is my favorite brand of strings. I bought these seeking strings with longer life (after a bad experience w/  D'Addario strings only lasted a week or 2) and boy i'll tell you these babies LAST! i only change these strings twice a year & the coating makes it more comfortable & easier to slide on the strings. I love the bright sound you get and they are easy to tune & they also keep in tune goo, "musical_instruments"
By far the best acoustic strings, period. They sound great, and last forever. TheElixir Nanoweb Electric Custom Light Guitar Stringsare the best electric strings ever, and these are the best acoustic strings. Fantastic., "musical_instruments"
What can I say, I am a string snob! Ive tried MANY different kinds of strings for my acoustics and the Elixir Nanowebs are by far the best strings I have ever played.I had a set of another major brand on a cheap Washburn I bought, and I changed them out with these strings and WOW what a HUGE difference. The guitar has such a great ring to it.Also use these on my Taylors. These will give any quitar a beautiful voice!Pros:LifeSoundPlayabilityQuality and DurabilityCons:Price, "musical_instruments"
I have tried many types of steel strings.  My Taylor 355 came delivered with these - and though I have tried several others, I have returned to them.  Their ease of play (smoothness to fret and finger) and light but rich tonality makes them a good choice for your 12-string.  Haven't tried 'em yet?  Pick up a set - they ARE different and, in many ways, better than the more standard Phosphor Bronze strings that were the best before these came along., "musical_instruments"
I own aTaylor Guitars 355-CE Jumbo 12 String Acoustic Electric Guitarand it came with these strings on it. 12 string guitars are generally hard to play for long periods of time, so they might not get as much use as a regular 6 string. The tone from these strings is just as bright and clear 8 months later, and they still hold their tuning like they after the first 2 days. Elixir strings are in general more expensive than other major brands - but the extra few bucks are worth it because the sounds stays so clear and consistent after extensive use. They are great strings on any guitar., "musical_instruments"
Changing strings on a 12 string less often? Fantastic!!  And the sound is good. I didn't expect this much volume from light strings. The tone of the strings lasts about 4 months, in my experience, but that will depend on how much playing you get in., "musical_instruments"
WOW, is putting it mildly when you here the quality sound that these strings produce on a 12 string.Endless beauty when you here the tones produced by Elixer. Elixer strings are more expensive than other strings but well worth the higher price tag. You can not go go with a set or two of Elixers., "musical_instruments"
These strings are great for a 12 string. I started using coated strings on all of my guitars last year and have gotten use to the smooth feel. A 12 string is a little harder on the fingers so the coating is nice to have. They sound as bright and clean as any uncoated string I have used on this guitar. And I think they will last longer. Which is nice because the guitar is really not much fun to restring!, "musical_instruments"
I'm not a pro by any means.  I am enjoying this guitar.  It has all I expected it to have in terms of playability and range.  It _may_ tend to overdrive a little bit.  More than my other guitars (again not a pro).  One of the screws by the jack was loose, nearly stripped, when I got it.  A drop of wood glue fixed it.  Had I paid $300 or more for the guitar I'd have been upset, but as is that was an easy fix.My biggest complaint is that the finish on the body is thicker and less &#34;natural&#34; that the image appears to be.  It's pretty enough, and fine for a $100 guitar.  But I really wanted &#34;natural wood&#34; and it isn't.  Otherwise it would be a 5 star.  I play it every day., "musical_instruments"
I'd first like to say that I bought this guitar on Amazon for about $65, a lot cheaper than it's being sold now (currently $111). It's a wonderful guitar for an inexpensive solidbody, but it looks a little different than the picture would lead you to believe. For one, the guitar doesn't have a \"finish,\" not even a glossy clearcoat -- it's solidbody wood, sanded smooth and given a deep wood stain. Secondly, the guitar is pictured as being much lighter in color than it actually is. The photo shows it looking almost like a red colored wood; in reality, it's a much darker, deep brown, akin to coffee.This does not, however, affect its playability, which is wonderful. I have a bit of buzzing on one fret, but that can easily be fixed with a good sanding and polish. The guitar can also be strung and tuned easily, though with any guitar of this body style you'll have to continually tune-and-retune until the strings will keep a tuning. It's a very heavy, sturdy guitar, and for a solidbody with two humbuckers you'll likely not find one that sounds as meaty and smooth., "musical_instruments"
Being from Tampa, I wanted my first guitar to be a Dean. Sure, there are plenty of other options out there, but I just had it in my head thats what I wanted. Well, I must say I am very happy with the purchase. Guitar arrived in its triangular shelf box, inside another Dean shipping box, which was wrapped in bubble sheet packed inside yet another, larger, Amazon box. Was essentially ready to play right out of the box, with a few quick turns of the tuning pegs. One knock on it I have seen online before buying was that the tuners don't hold tight, I have not yet had this problem after a week of playing it, including some drastic bends. Checked with a steel straightedge and a light, the neck was dead flat and straight. The edges of the frets could use some more finishing, they are still a bit edgy. I have seen others mention filing them down a bit, same thing that would be done on a more expensive guitar at the factory. I will probably get some diamond files and do this as well, I keep hanging up my hand on them on the bottom of the neck. I'm no expert on tone, but this has a nice even sound and responds well to pretty much any pedals or effects I've thrown at it. I did restring mine with the DR Neon Multi-Color strings for using with Rocksmith, which required adjusting the intonation. The low E and A strings ended up at the very end of their range, and the A is actually still a tiny bit flat. This could well be a factor of those particular strings though, so I wont knock the guitar for it. As others have noted, the finish can vary drastically. Mine is much darker than the stock photo and the grain is much less noticeable. Overall, looks a nice piece, especially for the cost. I could not ask for better for this price. From what I hear from more experienced players, as I progress I could easily upgrade the tuners and pickups, though I think I will leave this one alone and just get a higher end guitar when its time.OVERALL:Nice looking, feeling guitar for a beginner.PROS:Excellent value.Good quality construction.Feels and looks good right out of the box.Can be upgraded in time if you choose.CONS:Tuners may or may not slip when playing hard.Finish is variable, be willing to accept whatever shade you get., "musical_instruments"
I was a little reluctant to try the EVO XM as I have a Vendetta and the tuners are junk.  Fortunately this guitar does not inherit this issue.It's a beautiful looking guitar with very nice setup.  Action is incredible.  Almost too low for those that do a lot of stretching but great for those that are into fast riffs.  The difference in tone between the neck and bridge pickups is great and the pickups are very responsive.Hardware is slightly better than expected for this price point., "musical_instruments"
I had bought one a few years ago when i was a little short on cash, I was very skeptical that this would work for me, After my guy set it up it played flawlessly to say the least, Once i got my tele back and my acoustic Gibson back, (the life of a out of work guitar player, always the pawn shops best customer) but i was able to incorporate the Dean in with both of them, And it gave me another electric to play, This cheap little Dean guitar has turned into a favorite for me, Plug it in and sit back and enjoy what comes out of it, Very crisp with no noise, So if your looking for a good cheap guitar to either learn on or just something that you can pick up and play, And i have never had anyone tell me that it sounded horrible, And it got me through some tough times, That is why i just bought another one for practice, I hope that you will be able to use this review for your decision, Bottom line you can't go wrong with this guitar.......................PEACE, "musical_instruments"
In the past I've always just guessed at how tight to make each lug on my drums. This takes the guess work out of tuning your hides. Each setting doesn't correspond to any particular octave but once you get the sound you want at least you know all of the lugs on that hide are pretty close to the same torque. It's also easy to use.B, "musical_instruments"
It can be confusing during the first time i used it. But it becomes more easier as you go to the next drum. Very handy and gets the job done quickly!!, "musical_instruments"
I love the idea of this but I wish I had spent more for a better quality version. I had seen them used by others and chose this one but it is not well made. The number dial is not accurate and is loose so as you are using it you have to keep checking that it has not moved. It works but I'll probably end up getting a better one., "musical_instruments"
If you understand what this is for, I think it's a great idea. Maybe not a perfect tool but I believe it does what it is supposed to and does it well.Keeping in mind, I'm a guitar player who just bought a drum kit... My assumptions when using this are that drum tuning is &#34;relative&#34; meaning that 99% of drum pitch is established by ear, based on what you want each drum to sound like, unlike a stringed instrument which is tuned against an absolute reference frequency and each string has a distinct relation to the others.The concept with this torque key is that it assists you with applying equal tension on each of the tension rods therefore presumably having an equal tune all the way around the circumference of the head. It by no means will help you establish as specific pitch on any drum; it simply helps you achieve an even tension and &#8220;relative&#8221; pitch all around the head. The tension numbers on the torque key are for reference only, 2 is tighter than 1, 3 is tighter than 2... and so on. Yet these numbers are only relevant to each head; I find that you don't necessarily pick a number such as 2 and tune all the drums to that.The way I use this, right or wrong, is that I tune an approximate tune on any given head using the traditional method of tapping around the perimeter and tightening apposing rods as necessary until the pitch is the same all the way around and at an audible frequency that I like for the drum I&#8217;m tuning. Now theoretically you&#8217;re pretty well tuned anyway but this is when I grab my torque key and I set it to a number a bit lower than were I expect the torque is (this only comes from experience of using it a few times) then I check a tension rod and I increase the setting on the torque key until it no longer &#34;breaks over&#34;. Now, whatever number I'm on is the reference number for that drum. My process from here is to move around the head in the same crisscross pattern as you would tuning traditionally but I loosen each rod a bit first and then bring it back up to torque with the torque key. After this process, my drum head should both be at a pitch that I have chosen by ear and have equal pitch all around the drum head.I believe it is a common practice to use a slightly different tension on the bottom side head ether a little tighter or looser than the top side (typically a little lower pitch on the bottom?). Once you&#8217;ve tuned the top head, and you know what number you&#8217;ve used you can quickly tune the bottom by reducing or increasing a click or two on your torque key.Sure there are a few other variable that can come in to play like, did you seat the head adequately when installing it which in essence means did you apply some light pressure to the center of the head while drawing down the tension rods in small equal amounts in a crisscross pattern. Also, how are the rims of your shells, are they well machined and smooth? These may impact the ability for a torque based tune to work. How about your tension rods, are the threads clean, are they lubricated? Any variability in resistance of the threads on your torque rods will directly translate to pitch in that location. Again, I'm just a rookie and I may be off with some of these assumptions or they may have an essentially unmeasurable impact so take it for what it's worth.Once you find a tuning you like, you could write down what number it took to achieve the pitch you like on each head, that would make it easy to quickly get back to the same pitch if/when your drums need to be tuned again., "musical_instruments"
i would use this again, the plastic around the ball scraped away and the ball flew out making it useless, "musical_instruments"
I purchased this key on a whim.  When it arrived the instructions were not clear, but I sat the dial to #2, loosened all of the lugs on my floor tom and went around my lugs using opposing lug patterns, and tested the first cut of tuning. Too loose and deep, so I increased the setting to #3 and repeated.  Almost the sound I wanted, so I used a regular key and went an eighth turn using the same pattern.  Perfect.  I then started on the next largest tom, working back to the smallest.  Using the #3 setting plus an eighth turn I got my toms 1/2 octave apart.Next I worked on my snare drum, starting with the snare side, then the batter side. I used #4 on the batter side and #5 on the snare side, and managed to get the crisp, yet warm, sound I wanted. The bass drum came next - I set the batter side tension 1 notch below the resonant side and achieve a great tuning. From there I went back and set the resonant sides of each of my four toms one notch higher than the batter side and marveled at the perfect tuning I attained.This is an easy device to use - with the lever facing you move it to the left, loosen all of your lugs, then tighten each starting with one or two. When the lever clicks and moves to the right position you have reached the torque setting.  Test, increase a notch if necessary, and repeat until you get the sound you want. Set the resonant heads either one notch higher or lower to make sure the batter and resonant heads do not cancel each other (and to your desired sound), and you will have a perfectly tuned set.I'll never go back to tuning by ear!  You'll be amazed by the results if you tune with this key, and don't forget to write down your optimum settings., "musical_instruments"
This is my second 4 way switch and it won't be the last. The four way gives you an added combination of neck and bridge in series, which gives a fatter tone than position 2 and more output than positions 1,2,or 3. I am very pleased with the &#34;new sound&#34; of my tele. The wiring diagram is very easy to understand and the install is pretty easy if you have a soldering gun. (don't forget to lay down some newspaper to protect your guitar finish from solder)., "musical_instruments"
This switch does work, but you should look before you leap. The switch travel is greater than it is for a standard 3-way switch, and if you use the common Fender replacement control plate (or one that was only intended for a 3-way switch, it may not fit. You could fairly easily alter the plate, but if you want the cleanest look possible you may want to investigate a new control plate., "musical_instruments"
Recently, I was building a Telecaster project.  A friend recommended using the 4 way switch instead of the stock 3 way switch.  This allows you to have the three positions normally found on a Telecaster,  bridge only,  bridge + neck in parallel, and neck only.  It also adds the ability for you to add a setting with the bridge and neck pickups in series.The result of this added position is that you get a higher volume output from the guitar than in the regular bridge + neck position and  a slightly higher top end output.  This is clearly a case of &#34;your mileage may vary.&#34;  I've been used to the traditional 3-position switch on my other Telecasters.  I'm a bit indifferent to this mod.  If I was building another guitar, I would probably use this switch again.  It does what it is supposed to do and it is within a couple dollars of the 3-way.  However, I would not change out a working 3-way switch for this.  For me, the added benefit just isn't worth the effort., "musical_instruments"
The four-way diagram that comes with the switch does not tell you which side to use. Both sides have five tabs and look the same from the above diagram given no matter which way you turn it. I figured it would go the same way as the three-way - wrong. You think Fender would have the sense to figure this out, and give us a proper diagram, but guess again. Just another example of the incompetence at Fender., "musical_instruments"
Great solid switch. Works well for giving your Telecaster the option to run your pickups in both series and parallel.  As for those who have questioned if the travel is too much for some switch plates all I can say is that I have this in several of my Teles and I have never had a problem with the switch travel being too much for the plate., "musical_instruments"
I got these for a parts-tele I built and I'm really happy with them.  Like all vintage tuners you may need conversion bushings to make them fit modern peg holes which are usually larger.  But they look great, work great, stay in tune and are completely vintage spec.  I have a '57 reissue strat and I can't tell the difference.  One thing I've always loved about vintage tuners is that you tuck the strings in the center of the shaft so it keeps the headstock looking neat., "musical_instruments"
These are nice,and this was easily the best price around. These are made in Japan, and I believe they're made for Fender by Gotoh, so they're good quality. But I was annoyed that they ( the bushings) didn't fit the \"standard,vintage-sized\" .340\" holes in my All-parts neck ( they're a little large).So be aware of that., "musical_instruments"
Looks good but disappointed that they aren't made in the USA. Oh well just shows me little by little more and more things aren't anymore., "musical_instruments"
First of all, don't expect any new tuner to work as a \"drop-in\" replacement.  Drop-in replacements for tuners basically don't exist unless you have the exact type of tuner, and in that case, you aren't doing an \"upgrade\".  You'll likely need to bore out additional diameter for the peg hole with a drill press or tapered reamer.  Or, if there's a Guitar Center or guitar shop nearby, have a tech do the work for you.These tuners arrived quickly and are very attractive, with a nice vintage look.  They would look great on a either a Strat or Tele.  Unfortunately, my Squier Bullet had a slightly smaller headstock, which meant that the low E string's tuner was too large - the wing for the screw hung over the edge.  Therefore, I will not be installing these on my guitar, but that is not the fault of the tuner.Functionally, these are one of the easiest tuning keys to rotate, and I've heard the hold tune just fine.  Check the back of your headstock for fit, but if that's a \"go\", these are a great option!, "musical_instruments"
I didnt have my research done correctly and ordered these because i wanted &#34;vintage&#34; for my &#34;relic'd&#34; build. Clearly my mistake that these do not fit the cheap necks sold here on Amazon. But no worries, Amazon sells adapters to make the &#34;large&#34; holes in the neck fit the &#34;smaller&#34; vintage tuning key posts.1 star off for not looking like the higest quality. I'm happy though and this was a good purchase at the right price., "musical_instruments"
Looked like the chrome was cheesey and they ended up breaking but they worked while they were used in a guitar with the proper pinhole next to the screw position, "musical_instruments"
Another easy modification for my Indonesian Telecaster Squier. Better looks and function. Tuning is easier and holds longer than with stock sheet metal guides., "musical_instruments"
I am upgrading my Chinese Fender Strat with American Hardware.  I own an American Strat too and plan on making the best of the Chinese one.  Going to upgrade electronics and everything else too.These are exactly what's on my American Strat5 stars, "musical_instruments"
Had the old stamped one and was upgrading all the chrome some I put one of these on.  They work perfect and look good.  You get 2 in package (with screws) so I have a spare.Update I only had one on E/B but went ahead and added one for G/D.  Works and look great!!!  google \"stratocaster string tree placement\" if you are unsure of where and how to install., "musical_instruments"
These Fender string guides are replacing the old style string guide(tree). Installed on a Tele I built. Much less surface of the string touching. Very smooth action when using the vibrato. Took no more than 10 minutes to install.. Reasonably priced, super upgrade. I recommend this product to anyone with string guides on their guitar. These look like rollers, but are not rollers. They do work well. and I will purchase more for other Tele's and StratsPros: Well made  Cons; None I can think ofSleek, well designedQuick installImproved soundInexpensive upgrade, "musical_instruments"
They upgraded my 72 Tele Deluxe, they fit perfectly yet you have to push really hard on the finish at the headstock for it to go in without opening any holes on the wood., "musical_instruments"
All the parts I buy an Amazon  have  been checks out before I buy them and they  have been compared with other companies, and I found these parts are the best price and quality compared to other outlets I repair and rebuild guitars as a hobby and I am satisfied with these parts johnJ ., "musical_instruments"
Used on an old tiesco 3/4 size guitar i refurbished for one of my grandsons. Guitar tuned easy and holds tune well. He plays it for hours at a time, "musical_instruments"
Not a drop in replacment for many Fenders. I installed these on a Fender Marauder and needed to drill holes in the head stock. You can't see it really well in the picture but there is a metal plug on the bottom next to the screw hole that needs a hole to fit into.I sweat some bullets and used the smallest drill bit I own, and stuck a piece of tape 1mm from the tip so I wouldn't drill too deep. It is important to make the hole STRAIGHT in line from the screw hole so they don't go on crooked. I also had to drill the screw holes about 2mm deeper because the screws that come with this go deeper into the headstock.Now that they're installed I can attest that the guitar holds it's tune better and it's easier to tune. Before it would not respond for many pegs until twisted too far then it would suddenly break lose and be too sharp/flat. That happens far less now., "musical_instruments"
definitely recommend these over any other string trees. I used both, one for DG and BE, required some minor drilling so I had a guitar tech do it for me just to be safe..., "musical_instruments"
I'm using the guides to replace factory guides on my Strat and Tele. They will require that I drill a shallow hole to seat the guide properly. I hate drilling holes in guitars but it has to be done.  The quality of these guides is not what I expected. They are cast and plated and have some rough edges to them. If you want a very clean looking finish I would look for a higher quality guide. At this point I'm not even sure that I will use them., "musical_instruments"
Meh, these things are what they are. They didn't solve any problems or make anything better.  Oh well, sometimes you just gotta do stuff for no reason., "musical_instruments"
People complain that these aren't really rolling string trees, despite the fact that the description *never* says or even implies they are, in fact, \"rolling\" string trees.  Honestly, they don't need to be, at least for most guitars.  These small, round guides are superior to the flat, wider styles of most string trees because they have way less actual contact with the strings.  Less contact means less friction, less friction means greater tuning stability since your strings don't have as much chance to get caught up on anything when they move.I put them on a cheap Telecaster copy I have and noticed the results immediately, and I did not replace either the tuners or the nut, those are still the cheap stock parts.If you have a whammy bar and you bend a lot, rollers might be a little better, but for five bucks this is an easy upgrade (anyone can change them, all you need is a screwdriver), it was a no brainer for my Telecaster., "musical_instruments"
A great, clean look for the otherwise ugly string guide clamps. The guides on these are not rollers, but are the next best thing visually and performance wise in my opinon.  The only guides that I like better are the round 50's guides for Tele's, but then I like those asthetically only on Tele's.  An inexpensive mode that looks and works great.  To the inexperienced eye this simple, clean looking mod can make a Mexican or Chinese instrument look more like the made in America models., "musical_instruments"
I had a hard time lineing them up to install .the little knob on them made it very hard to install.so good luck .., "musical_instruments"
These work much better than standard stamped trees. No problem with Ernie Ball strings going out of tune quickly.I did notice in Guitar Center, some of those spendy &#34;American Strats&#34; have the cheap stamped out trees, and non-locking tuners., "musical_instruments"
If you are replacing your old butterfly trees, you can use the same holesclip and sand off the alignment pins, as they are not really needed, and justadd another hole to your headstock.Good trees for the price., "musical_instruments"
Arrived quick. These are good replacements or upgrades. Work much better then the other style of string trees.  I would recommend this., "musical_instruments"
String trees are a great inexpensive way to upgrade your standard tele or strat with accessories found on more expensive or custom shop instruments. Just remember you will have to drill for the guide posts., "musical_instruments"
I put this in my Fender MIM Stratocaster. I want to change that &#34;poor&#34; string guides that came in MIM by the American Series string guide. So nice..., "musical_instruments"
Mounted and this looks like a solid product. I was working on a new replacement neck and had no mounting holes. I just looked at pics on the net and got them close. I like them., "musical_instruments"
These trees came in Fender packaging and fit just as the old ones did and look the same. They have the same locating pin in front of the screw and are the finishing touch in refurbishing my guitar., "musical_instruments"
The lil suckers are all about tuning  stability. Those other style string guides just aren't the same because the string binds too much. Gave them 4 stars because I don 't like the little nibs in the underside. I filed them off., "musical_instruments"
Pretty basic capo, goes on and comes off easily. Fits quickly and tightly, I expected a firmer grip but it works well anyway. Good price!, "musical_instruments"
I works as advertised.  What can I say?  It's inexpensive and does what it's supposed to.  Just buy it and move on., "musical_instruments"
I already had the nickel finished version (which I paid a few dollars more for),and wanted a spare. I like the Dunlop design and price. It should last a lifetime.Glad I got it.  This one is finished nicer than the nickel finish one I have which is rough looking in comparison.The black Dunlop has a nice smooth finish., "musical_instruments"
This Capo is one of the best made I've seen.  It fits the neck of my electric guitar perfectly and stays securely at any position.Very well constructed. Easy to attach/detach., "musical_instruments"
I may be a guitar newbie, but as far as I can tell - this capo is not a fake-o piece of crapo!, "musical_instruments"
I really like this over the capo that came in my guitar bundle from Austin Bazaar, so after some research online and talking to friends, I bought this capo.It goes on easily,comes off easily and does not mar the finish of my guitar. Downside, seems like it does not put enough pressure on all the strings. I will play with it some more and see how I like it over this weekend.Let me know if I am missing something about this capo that I should know. Thanks!, "musical_instruments"
Dunlop capos are functional and inexpensive.  Come on, capos don't have &#34;tone.&#34;  Just get one that doesn't get in your way.  Also, the people who work at Dunlop seem like nice guys.  Thank you, Dunlop, for keeping it real up in Benicia., "musical_instruments"
I used it to hold down the strings on my bass while I adjusted the truss rod. Worked perfectly for that purpose., "musical_instruments"
Did not hold the strings down very well for me... I love the feel of it, but the spring needs more power., "musical_instruments"
Very Well finished, everything except rubber, is made of aluminum, with little bit of metal i guessnot like other reviewer said, it fits in your hand comfortable, does not need lot of strength to openit may, be hard for old man, or kidalso, rubber doesnt smell that bad!, i mean it does but its not seriousthey also used glue to stick rubber, "musical_instruments"
I use this primarily when setting up guitar and measuring strings by locking down on 1st fret and taking measurements from there., "musical_instruments"
I was impressed by the quality of this product. It is simple and does its job well. Easy to release and will work with a fat neck acoustic or Les Paul or with a thin neck on most metal Guitars. Holds strings tight and is easy to place with no fret noise. Was a great value., "musical_instruments"
I love these Dunlop capos.  They are quick to put on, grip nicely, and above all they don't get in the way of your hand.  I bought 5 of them from Amazon because they were such a good price., "musical_instruments"
Wasn't expecting much for this price. But I was surprised. Have been using mine now for about 3 months with no problems. Workmanship seems good. Does a good job not great of putting equal pressure on the strings , "musical_instruments"
great stuff to have for a great price&#8230;i like it! highly recommend to everyone must have for those who loves to play guitar., "musical_instruments"
In 40+ years of using many Jim Dunlop products Made in America or to his standards of quality, I've never broken or worn out the capo. I use mine on both 6 and 12 string guitars. The spring tension remains strong after several years, which keeps the sound nice without the strings being muted or buzzing. The only problem I have with them, they seem to disappear when I'm not looking. I have used other brands where the rubber leaves marks or sticks to the neck with prolonged use. Other than smudges from getting the capo dirty, it cleans easily., "musical_instruments"
I have a guitar and several ukes of all sizes. This works very well for all of them. It's very easy to take on and off, and it stays right where you put it. The rubber is tough but molds to the instrument, I haven't seen and marks or damage from using it., "musical_instruments"
I used to use a Schubb Capo, but started using the Dunlop Trigger a few years ago and never looked back. The fit can be a little tight, especially higher up on the fretboard, but I personally like this, mostly for the fact there are less moving parts (compared to a Schubb) and the fit is nice and secure., "musical_instruments"
Works as described.  For the price I have no complaints at all. Clamps firmly and easily, doesn't move or slide around on either of my electric and acoustic., "musical_instruments"
This Capo is inexpensive and works well.  Clips on easily and hold strings down nicely.  What more can I say.  Gotta keep it simple on this review because it's a simple item.  Simply, it does what it's supposed to do for a low price.  I think it will last a while too but I'll probable misplace it before it breaks anyway so I have a few of these floating around.  You should have one of these in each gig bag., "musical_instruments"
I purchased this for my son to use on his acoustic guitar.  I had previously purchased a fabric capo for him to use until I could get him a better one.  That did not last long. I ordered this one and he loves it.  It's durable and works perfectly., "musical_instruments"
The only negative to this well made capo is I wish the tension was slightly less.  I find that once placed, notes played closer to it are slightly sharp even using light pressure.  It will work out just fine though and I will just have to make a few adjustments in tuning to correct for this., "musical_instruments"
For years I have used a different type of capo, this one is so much easier to use and does an excellent job!, "musical_instruments"
I haven't used it a lot yet, but I really like it so far.. Much easier to put on than the 30 year old capo I was using, and it works for my guitars and my banjo, without putting them out of tune. It seems to be solidly made as well, and not too much pressure as others said.. My old capo put a lot more pressure than this does :P, and was much heavier. I'd assume it was made out of Cast-Iron or something instead of Aluminum., "musical_instruments"
When I first learned guitar, my buddies kept telling me I'd want a capo but I held out until just recently. The Dunlop is secure, doesn't scratch the guitar at all, and holds the strings down as it should. Instead of taking the time to adjust my tuning, I can use this to achieve the tone I want. Good item for the price., "musical_instruments"
Be careful about using capos like this, because if you're using a fine guitar, it may damage the finish.  Try it, and double check regularly, and I wouldn't leave it clamped on the guitar, overnight or for weeks on the guitar stand., "musical_instruments"
This is a fine product. Any guitar player has hands strong enough  to use it. Looks great on the guitar and works really well. Recomended., "musical_instruments"
How you feel about a capo has almost as much to do with the guitar you're using it on... What works great on one guitar might not be so marvelous on another... I can say with confidence that this capo works flawlessly on an American Standard Strat... Fits great, easy on/off, easy adjustments. The padding on the capo is such that you would really have to go out of your way to mar the finish on your neck with it... All relevant areas of the capo are well padded. It seems very well constructed, after two weeks of heavy use, I don't see why it wouldn't last for years., "musical_instruments"
This product does what you want and is easy to take on and off.  Definitely a great value for the money!, "musical_instruments"
I was using a Kyser capo, until the spring action loosened up to the point it wouldn't hold all the strings down.  I thought I'd try something else out and settled on this one.  It's easy to take on and off. It's tight enough.  The main positive is that the part that lays against your strings is longer than a kyser so I think it will fit even the widest fretboards.  I don't know about a 7 or 8 string though., "musical_instruments"
Liked this capo it worked fine. You can double this as a hand exercise device since it has a great amount of tension., "musical_instruments"
This capo is small, looks good, and works very well.  It is well protected to not scratch or nick your guitar., "musical_instruments"
I've used the classic Kyser capos for years with my acoustic guitars.  They definitely look great, but they tend to lose their tension and allow for string buzz after a year or so.  That's my experience at least.  These trigger capos may look and feel awkward to a lot of people, but they are wonderful.  I get a perfect barr at every fret and it feels like this will never wear out.  I've had one for a couple years now and the only problem I find with them is that your friends tend to take them for themselves and it's easiest just to buy a new one.  Highly recommended for acoustic guitar players!, "musical_instruments"
It's nice to have this gadget nearby you when you play. A lot of songs say capo preferred. It helps you have a bar of strings down all the time in a row to keep your finger free and easy to grab some chords like b major and so on. I recommend this product., "musical_instruments"
this is not the greatest product they make - but it works quickly and makes the 12 string spread when needed to do so more easily than most., "musical_instruments"
I am a beginner guitarist, I am happy with this capo. It works good and that is all I need. The fit and finish seems like quality also., "musical_instruments"
I've had a few of these my life time because people always steal capos.  What the hell.  Anyway, this capo works well.  I've only used it on Gibson and Fender electrics, and it does a fine job.  Some of the rubber padding will eventually come off as glue wears off, but it does not affect the capo-abilities.  I'm sure there are better ones, but for me, this works well., "musical_instruments"
This capo is lightweight and really tough, it is stiff and takes some strength to open but it stays in place and doesn't damage the necks of my guitars. I've used this on acoustic, electric, 7 string, 12 string, and a lot of 6 string guitars and it always works perfectly. I think it's a really nice tool and it does the job flawlessly., "musical_instruments"
Simple to use, works well on the Squier Strat. I'm not much of a guitarist so this is my first capo and I don't have anything to compare with but the quality is way up there., "musical_instruments"
I was not a fan of this particular capo. It was good quality and the price was ok but just not my style., "musical_instruments"
Sturdy, well-designed and frets the strings well.  Ships quickly.  The back clamps firmly to the guitar without maring the finish. Great value., "musical_instruments"
Simple, strong but easy to apply, comes in a variety of colors.  Haven't used it a great deal, but it seems to be great and non-damaging to the finish on the guitar.  The handle sticks out farther than a simple elastic strap capo, but this is a good choice at a great price., "musical_instruments"
As capos go, this gets the job done at a good price. Easy to use. Doesn't seem to put undue pressure on the guitar., "musical_instruments"
You know when a good quality item arrives, everything looks and works just as it is intended.  I love it ..., "musical_instruments"
I have two of these. High quality build. Out of personal preference...this capo design works best for me. Tension is perfect for my Washburns. One has light strings & the other has medium. I thought this was worth mentioning since the diameter of the strings might affect the clamping tension. Both of them sound like there was no capo on. Overall, I'm happy with this brand. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
I have a Electric Bass Guitar and needed to Capo. After looking at &#34;reviews&#34; I like this one the best. I'm very happy with it and it works great without any problems. The size is &#34;Just Right&#34;, not too small or Big ..., "musical_instruments"
Nice cushion on both sides,  on-string and the back of the arm. Stays very firm on the arm. It'll stay still even if you accidentally bump on it while playing.The 4-star is just to alert that it may be a problem for people with not so strong hands, like kids,  as the spring is very tough., "musical_instruments"
It's a little harder to open than other capos I've used, but it works perfectly once you get used to the toughness of it. It's not cheap and flimsy, though! I don't see this one wearing down anytime soon! Now stop reading this review and buy this capo! You wont regret it!, "musical_instruments"
This is an update to my original review because I have now fully tested two of these capos.  I'm truly surprised by all the good reviews here.  I'm not sure how it's possible.  I've already outlined below in my original review that these are not Jim Dunlop capos.  I had purchased two, which I have now given away to student players as I cannot use them.  I tested the capos on a standard acoustic and also an electric guitar.  The E string buzzes when the capo is applied and no amount of adjusting the capo would stop the buzz from occurring. Both capos had this very same problem.When I received these capos, I noticed right away that they were not the same excellent quality as actual Jim Dunlop capos.  The craftsmanship was visibly lower quality and the materials used are a lesser quality than official Jim Dunlop capos.  The rubber has a strong odor and there is no brand-name printed anywhere on the product.  As a professional musician, I need to purchase reputable brand-name products because I can't afford to have my gear failing during performances.  I have no idea about the future performance of these capos because they have no apparent brand, and no measurable reputation.  When I contacted the seller, they were not honest with me., "musical_instruments"
A quality, low-cost capo that is so easy to use that does a perfect job and claps on the guitar strap out of the way when not in use, "musical_instruments"
This Capo is solid and well made. I use it on my seagull acoustic, and Fender Stratocaster. No problems at all., "musical_instruments"
The Jim Dunlop 83CB capo has a powerful spring and works on both 6 and 12 string guitars.  Just squeeze and slide it where you need it.  Available in several finishes to match your taste., "musical_instruments"
Its nice and easy to use.  Secures the strings very good and works for all types of guitars with no issues., "musical_instruments"
Does what it is supposed to do. It is pretty good quality and durable too. Quick, simple and efficient.  I would definitely buy again. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
I really like the one-handed operation, and I really do prefer that the access to it is behind the fret board instead of out front. That makes it easier to reach for a quick change, and for easy on/off. I've been a Jim Dunlop fan for more than 40 years, and this product just reinforces that!, "musical_instruments"
What a great device.  This is the first 'quick-change' capo I've owned.  I used to use those old stretchy things.  Since I play at some jams, it's important that I can change quickly and accurately.  Move it from fret to fret and the guitar stays in tune., "musical_instruments"
Great capo! I've tried a lot of other capos, including some pretty expensive brand name capos, and these are still unbeatable at keeping just the right pressure on the strings., "musical_instruments"
Although it is touted for acoustic guitars, it works well with my Ibanez Electric as well as my dreadnaught and acoustic/electric. The spring is tough and it holds securely. On and off is a quick process if you have the hand/finger strength to operate it. I rate it 4 stars only because I just received it and haven't had a chance to use it much. But, I like it so far. It was delivered quickly. It does the job. I'll update after I've had it for awhile., "musical_instruments"
Thought I'd try this but there's another brand that I prefer.  Needed to re-shift this capo a lot to get it to hold down strings evenly and not mute some., "musical_instruments"
I have owned other capos, but this one is simply the best. I doesn't take up a lot of room on the fret, yet the springs are strong and will hold properly for a long time., "musical_instruments"
I've used mine on my electric and acoustic guitars and it is easy to use, quick to reposition, frets the strings properly. It is cost effective and looks good. Nice to have a color option, not the usual black that everyone else seems to have.I need a wider one for my 52mm classic guitar's neck that is also flat. This capo cannot work with it.If I lost it, I would definitely get another just like it., "musical_instruments"
This is actually the first capo I have ever owned, as I am pretty new to playing the guitar. That being said, I paid close to $14 with free shipping for this capo, and I feel it is a good value. It feels well constructed, like it won't break if I drop it. The capo fits nice and tight on all six strings. Ample padding mitigates any marring of the guitar's neck. The spring mechanism is plenty tight, but not too tight to easily move or remove the capo single handed, even while playing. The capo is sleek looking, and a bit smaller than I was expecting at 3&#34; x 3&#34;, but I have no frame of reference for comparison.Item was shipped on time, and packaged in the original Dunlop packaging. Part number: 83CB, Made in USA! No counterfeit here. If you have any questions, feel free to ask and I will answer as best I can. Thanks for reading.SPO, "musical_instruments"
Not that it's a huge deal - but I quite prefer this capo over any other capo I've used.  It just has the most solid build quality and the simple pull style of loosening and tightening works better and more quickly than the type that \"snap\" into place.I own several of these now and whenever I mis-place one (which happens too often!) I come back to purchase another.If you're looking for a capo I highly recommend using this Dunlop model., "musical_instruments"
...but for a small woman with small hands, it's difficult to operate.  It also exerts a whole lot of pressure on the strings, which can't be good for them.  I ordered a Schubb brand capo that's much easier to operate and doesn't smash the strings like a brute because the pressure is adjustable.  The only drawback to the Schubb is you can't clip it to the headstock, a convenience that's important to a lot of professional musicians.  I'm keeping both, if I need the convenience of this clip on style I'll use it.  When playing at home I'll use the more gentle Schubb., "musical_instruments"
I had always used the Kyser clip-on-the-top capos (and still do), but I liked the look on this Dunlop clip-on-the-bottom model. It works great and looks better., "musical_instruments"
I've been learning for a little over a year and have had this capo for about that long . Though my playing still isn't very strong , the capo still is. I don't use it hardly at all but when I do I usually end up playing around with it quite a bit. My point being it gets tested more than the amount of times I use it. It's simply engineered of fairly heavy duty design so I don't expect any issue at anytime soon., "musical_instruments"
This acessorie is well builded and don't change the guitar's pitch. No damages guitars neck. It's so easy to use, "musical_instruments"
Grips the neck well and keeps the strings immobile even when strumming real hard. Feels a little awkward trying to put the capo on with one hand, but I guess that's how all of them are. Works very well on acoustic guitars, "musical_instruments"
White thin picks by fender, what else can I say? They are very good looking, the only downside with thin picks is that you tend to keep buying thin picks because they keep breaking BECAUSE YOU ARE PLAYING FAST AND WILD WITH THEM!, "musical_instruments"
I've always been a fan of these Fender Classic picks. They just feel right, wear very well, and make a nice sound in conjunction with a good set of strings on my Telecaster. I also think the price is pretty fair., "musical_instruments"
These are guitar picks and I don't play guitar so I can't say much more than the fact that they came and they were what they said they were, "musical_instruments"
These picks are perfect.  They are just the right feel for medium and look awesome.  What more can you say about picks other than they are perfect., "musical_instruments"
If you haven't used these picks, get some. They are the perfect size and shape. Your really can't beat them., "musical_instruments"
Other picks usually let me down when I riff and melt faces playing the blues jazz or gospel etc., Fender heavies are made to make the notes sound like l they have been hit for real. I prefer no cheap imitations. Only Fender Heavies. That's what I smoke., "musical_instruments"
Like other reviewer wrote previously, I received less picks than advertised (I received a total of 7 picks). I don't know if the people at customs \"borrowed\" some from me, but I find very strange that more than one person is having the same problem. Other than that, the picks are good, seem to be durable and produce a nice sound., "musical_instruments"
I have a bass guitar and sometimes us a pick. Seen these and they work great when needed. Looks good too :), "musical_instruments"
I have used Fender Medium picks since the late 60's.  Yes, they are made in China now (!!) but they are still the same pick as far as I can tell.  The picks arrived fully sealed in an outer envelope and contained within a nice little mini zip-lock baggie.  All 12 were in there, all of them Fender Mediums.  (purchased from B&G; Music Associates)  Shipped from Illinois to California in 3 days with normal shipping.The picks are great and I couldn't be happier with the order. Whatever issues occurred with missing picks and poor shipping no longer exist from where I stand.  Recommended if you want/need a nice little bag of Fender Mediums., "musical_instruments"
This is my guitar pick of choice.  I  fits well in my hand and is well balanced.  Have tons of picks , but seem to use this one all the time., "musical_instruments"
This is the first guitar pick I ever played with and to this day is my favorite type.  Nice and thin and flexible, but not so flexible that you can't bend it for single picking.  I'm torn between this style, out of nostalgia, and the blue version-because I love blue., "musical_instruments"
Best guitar picks. Great shape, sturdy. No fancy expensive flashy grip features. Guitar pics as the God's of Rock intended., "musical_instruments"
The Fender medium is my second choice for picks.My first is the 'Just Strings' pick that is the exact same shapewith a softer (less scrape) feel on the strings at half the price.Pick choice is like guitars and amps; everyone has a different opinion., "musical_instruments"
Fender Medium, my favorite guitar pick, a dozen should last a while right?  When these slip away I'll order more., "musical_instruments"
Even though the title says \"Acoustic Guitar Case\", it's obvious that this is a case for A-style mandolins. I chose it because the lining looked a little deeper in the photo, and the reviews were good. Sure enough, the lining is soft and well-padded. The hardware works as it should, and the build quality is almost perfect. However, when closing the case, a small amount of jiggling is required to make the top seat on the bottom properly. Just a slight push-pull motion will allow the top to snap in place, then everything is as it should be. The case fits my A-type mandolin perfectly, and provides the protection needed to safely transport it in a car trunk or other place where it will be bumped around. The slight mis-fit of the top and bottom is not a big enough concern to warrant returning the case. It serves its purpose well, at a reasonable price., "musical_instruments"
I am VERY satisfied with my hard shell A-style mandolin case; I received prompt delivery, it was reasonably priced, and a quality product; thanks!, "musical_instruments"
I bought this case for my Rogue A-style electric mandolin.The inside is nicely lined; the hardware is solid.It came at a great low price but it does not feel cheap.I recommend this to anyone with an A-style mandolin.jafmusicmix, "musical_instruments"
Great case very well made and has great padding construction seems to be good and I have no complaints about this product!!!!!, "musical_instruments"
I gave this 3 stars simply because the review has to conatin a star rating. I have nothing to say against the product or the company, only that this is NOT a GUITAR CASE! It is a MANDOLIN case! Amazon should correct this.Stagg STB-10W  Acoustic Guitar BagEpiphone Case for Epiphone Dot, Sheraton, 335, "musical_instruments"
I just received the case today, the soonest delivery day on the estimation range (a plus there!).  Now having spent a long time pricing hard cases from all around internet, this price is extremely reasonable and a wonderful case.  Nothing fancy and differs slightly from the pictured item in that the outside rim-threading and basic locks (keys included) are gold toned (instead of silver toned pictured), but that doesn't mean diddly-squat to me.  Plush interior with a small, yet roomy, compartment located under the neck.  I am primarily a 5-string banjo player, but decided to casually play around with the mandolin, and so I figured I had better get a hard case for possible \"long-time\" storage (my first banjo lived in a padded gig bag for a few years before I started getting serious with it... and boy, not the best thing for it in small enclosed storage spaces).  This case will definitely do the trick.  Excellent value!- Additional note, there is a bit of extra play around the peg-head (I have an Rover mandolin)... I can see if someone traveled with this case and dropped it hard it enough, some peg snapping may occur.  But again, for simple storage/protection, its a non-issue., "musical_instruments"
Good quality one. I like the big size type. Would like to have a thinner one. So far so good., "musical_instruments"
These are a little larger than a traditionally sized, what you normally see used picks.  Thus, just a heads-up.  Having said that, they are top quality and are excellent picks.  I use all types and all brands and Fender's are always predictably great quality., "musical_instruments"
This shape give the strumming hand a better grip on the pick. I sand a bit from one of the points to give it a shape more like the classic heart-shaped Fender pick. The stock rounded point dulls the attack on the string. Good for strumming rhythm, not so hot for lead., "musical_instruments"
So glad I found these,  three sides,  much easier for me to hold,  thin is in!  As a beginner these make much more comfortable., "musical_instruments"
Maybe a little bigger than I'm comfortable with, but my guy friends with the huge hands love these things. They keep disappearing., "musical_instruments"
pretty....seems to work fine...purchased a pack for my playing buddy...he loves fender...only way to go...will order another set soon. very happy with service, "musical_instruments"
The picks came before the estimated delivery date in a clearly marked package. All 12 picks were there. Saves me a trip into town therefore wear and tear on my car. They feel good in my hand while strumming the strings. Good deal and I will purchase again., "musical_instruments"
They work as expected; my problem is they blend in with my rug and if I drop them, it's a major effort to find them again!  Next time, I'll go for a vibrant color., "musical_instruments"
I'm working on new strumming patterns and these were exactly what I needed to 'soften' things up just a bit., "musical_instruments"
When I bought my first guitar about 6 months ago I just chose a pack of picks on Amazon's list of \"other buyers also bought this\" and those were these Fender 351 picks.At the time I figured all picks were created equal.Since then I've tried various sizes and brands - Dunlop, Planet Waves, etc.But I keep coming back to this Fender 351 Medium pick for both my electric and acoustic guitar.The sound it makes is nice and sharp without being too trebly.The Planet Waves picks all seem to be a little muddy-sounding.I've found a winner with these Fender picks and will definitely be ordering more., "musical_instruments"
I love these picks. They arrived well packaged and NOT loose. They feel great in my hand and the Mediums are the perfect thickness for my playing style. Not too thick/not too thin.The abalone looks cool and is easy to spot when I drop them on the carpet. I have tried other brands (Dunlop, totex, etc) and the fender are by far my favorite.You will not be disappointed!, "musical_instruments"
Ordered these guitar picks for my son. The picks were exactly as described. We ordered the blue color, which is dark blue with a lighter, shiner, blue design on top of it. It is a \"heavy duty\" grade and it is very sturdy. He is very pleased with these picks. The appearence is pleasing and it is made well - very pleased with the quality. We will be purchasing more picks in the future. Highly recommend!, "musical_instruments"
I bought these picks because I liked the color of the picks.These picks surprised me with how good quality they actually are. I play guitar everyday for around 3-5 hours a day and I have yet to break one of these picks. Very nice quality and very cool color to them. They are also priced very good.Much cheaper buying them here at amazon instead of a quarter a piece at the guitar store. Recommend these picks to anyone that plays guitar. Additionally, they are very fast at shipping them to your door. Three days after ordering them they were sitting on my door step., "musical_instruments"
These Fender Medium picks are simple basic good picks that just work well. Color and appearance is a personal thing, I think these abalone picks just look cool. The color mix is random (no two picks are exactly the same); some have a bit more blue and reflective colors in them. Overall, the effect is not bad compared to real abalone.Fender makes a nice standard pick. The three weights are pretty easy to figure out (light, medium, and heavy). These mediums work well for playing electric guitar. I have some light red ones that have a lot of flex. Those work well for acoustic. I've used Dunlop with the little bumps for grip, and the Dava rubber coated picks. They are all nice, but sometimes you just want a regular old smooth pick. The gray Dunlop's don't look anywhere near as cool as these.At $3 for a dozen, they're worth a try. It they don't work out for playing, they sure look darn nice (the Fender logo is in gold).Dava 6024 Grip TipDunlop Nylon Standard Picks, Grey .73mm, "musical_instruments"
I wish I could say that they let me play more like Frank Zappa, but only practice can make that happen.These are solid picks, they don't break apart, they're easy to hold, and they work exactly as a pick should work, and at a good price., "musical_instruments"
These picks far exceed my expectations, I mean how good could a pick be anyway?  These are the classiest, nicest looking picks I own.  They look great, feel great and play great.  Call me a snob, but I wanted these to match my Fender Stratocaster.  Kind of like using a GM part on my 68 Chevelle..If you own a Fender and want to spend just a few bucks for a &#34;feel good&#34; gift to yourself, buy these.I love the color and texture too, they don't slip or move around as you play., "musical_instruments"
I almost always play finger style without a pick, but on the occasion I need a pick I like these.Easier to strum sounds good to me.If you're doing a lot of picking out individual strings, you'll probably want something thicker, but these make it really easy to strum chords and sound good, plus pick out a few strings here and there., "musical_instruments"
I bought these as spares (and they look really cool too!). I think everyone has used Fender Mediums at some point; these are no different. Reliable, last a while and more important they're inexpensive!, "musical_instruments"
Perfect, perfect size, weight, shape. I like the medium playing electric because it gives you the best of both worlds.Recommended!, "musical_instruments"
I got the Ocean Turqouise and they are stunning.  $4 for these 12 beautiful, premium quality picks is a steal., "musical_instruments"
Hey i got this and an \"OVATION IDEA\" from GO-DPS. I couldnt be happier with these items, especially the \"OVATION IDEA\" !!!!!!I have to brag on \"GO-DPS\" some, they are wonderfull dealers; I look forward to buying from GO-DPS again., "musical_instruments"
To everyone who plays flat-picking guitar, I'm sure you all have your own choice of pick....do you even remember why you picked the style you use!? Somehow, I started out with Fender thins and here I remain!, "musical_instruments"
I used to play with celluloid picks back in the 70's before they came out with Delrin. I like the sound and feel of these picks. They add a nice round sound that works well with jazz, and funk. They are a little expensive, but I think they are worth it if you need the sound and feel of the real thing.I bought the abalone ones because they look cool...***UPDATE***I am still using these picks but they tend to break along the colored lines, and usually during a performance. I have since gone back to Delrin and Nylon., "musical_instruments"
Love these picks, pretty much the only ones I buy now, nice and flexible,great for picking, great for strumming. Recommend you try them., "musical_instruments"
I love these picks. Medium is the perfect size for me, as well as the majority of people. This is a great looking pic and you get 12 of them at such a great price. I wouldn't buy anything else., "musical_instruments"
Everyone here seems to be complaining about the same thing- packageing and shipping. Well i bought all my picks from the music store so im rating the picks only. Ive been playing a few years and own a takamine acoustic and a fender strat. I mostly play my acoustic and use light strings so i dont need a heavy pick. I started using med fender tortose shell celluloid picks and really liked the look but as a beginner i dropped them more. My friend left a thin pick and i tried it. Since i mostly strum on light strings this was nice. The pick had a little more give so i dropped them less. Ive only broken 1 pick and it was cracked when i got it. I started reading all these great reviews how the dunlop tortex was great so i ran down an bought some thins. The tip is a little more rounded. I tried them and they feel alright but the fenders were louder and brighter sounding no doubt about it. So its back to the fenders. Also something i learned is when i play a guitar that has a dark pickguard i use a light colored pick (pearloid) and a red pick for a white pickguard. The contrast helps you see what your doing. These are good picks and you have a good selection of colors instead of the dunlop that are color coded and your stuck with no choice. These are a little more slippery but you will get used to them the more you play. I dont drop em anymore. Personally i dont see any need for a heavy pick unless you play bass. The med is pretty stiff., "musical_instruments"
I'm a little surprised at this one. Just today I was emailed confirmation that the picks were shipped, and I found them in my mail box the same day. I like fender mediums because I use them on both bass and guitar. Good picks! Clean edges, good feel, good duribility, nice tone., "musical_instruments"
Originally received the wrong item, but I contacted customer service and they returned my email that night (on a Sunday) and said they would ship out the correct product the next morning.  I received the correct item in one day as well as a postage paid envelope to return the incorrect picks.  Great customer service, and love the pics...the color in the pictures doesn't do it justice!, "musical_instruments"
These pics are perfect for a jazz guitarist, and I actually like the coloration too.  The Ocean Turquoise wasn't nearly as nice a color and I expected a bluish color.  These are about .7mm and that's just right., "musical_instruments"
PERFECT picks!  very pretty and nice quality!  They are not too stiff nor are they too soft.  I would order these again!, "musical_instruments"
Bought these picks for the impending Strat I'll buy, already have 3 sets of Fender strings, I will be ready!, "musical_instruments"
It's a Fender Heavy so there's not much else to say about that.  Good price and selection here.  Go for it., "musical_instruments"
I always played with the brown colored 351s growing up, but I love the blue finish on these.  I'd recommend the 351 Fender picks over any others personally but I'm very partial to blue as well, so these are perfect., "musical_instruments"
I have played guitar for most of 40 years and have used about any type of plectrum made. I have used coins and washers at times.My favorite pick for years was a Fender heavy and then I went for the really heavy brands like Dunlop or Clayton but found they are way too heavy and were eating my tone. I went back to Fenders and then found I like the medium best.Fender makes these in the coolest colors now so I went with them. Price them at a store and you will come back here.These came from GO-DPS which is no big deal as I shop on AMZ enough to know they use secondary sellers a lot of the time.However, I ordered a lot of stuff the day I ordered these and the full exhaust system was in my house 5 days later. These didn't show up so I contacted AMZ which goes back to GO-DPS. it took nearly a month to receive an envelope containing 12 picks. It didn't kill me not to have them - I have a million picks, I just wanted to see these in my hand.That said, I will definitely buy these again in the future and go for the different colors.Great price, great picks., "musical_instruments"
Great grip.Lasts a good long while.Terrific trippy pearl tones and azures.My all time fave. Hip hip hooray., "musical_instruments"
I read the reviews for the bad shipping in the box & decided to take a risk since i really wanted to try fender picks & really wanted heavy picks & the shipping definitely improved it comes in a little plastic baggy & has the fender logo on it. but the picks takes a little getting used too there VERY slippery at 1st i thought it was just me but i lended a couple to a few friends and they had the same problem but overtime you develop a better grip on them and can alternate pick, sweep pick, tremelo pick, tap with the pick better. Also my pitch harmonics (better known as squealies) come out clearer to me. Overall the product is not an disappointment & im only using these pick (just in different colors) from now on ^.^, "musical_instruments"
After all the whining I saw about these picks, was a little hesitant but bought them anyway. It doesn't help that Amazon puts \"Most popular\" posters above \"Most recent\" so unfortunately the review many of you read no long applies to the product. I got all 12 of my picks in a plastic bag divided in half with 6 picks each. So I got my full order. In addition, I like these picks a lot more than the plastic ones I buy at the local music shop. They feel thicker or more stable or something without being hard. I am very happy and will be reordering when the time comes. These are by far my favorite picks. The feedback is good and they're stiff enough to strike clear tones. A winner to me., "musical_instruments"
A guitar player can never have enough of these things around. These picks hold up well & that says alot because I am not easy on picks if any kind., "musical_instruments"
Perfect thickness and action.What else can I say?  You won't be sorry you got these, they are all I'll get from now on., "musical_instruments"
I have found that sometimes these cheapy ones tend to break fairly easily but these ones have lasted me a very long time.  Hardly any breaks considering I get the thin ones., "musical_instruments"
I use these with Ernie Ball regular slinkies.  I find that if you stay right in the middle then you can play a very wide variety of styles.  It's also cheaper., "musical_instruments"
i love abalone.  these picks look really pretty, like seashells and they last pretty well.  the thin picks are pretty thin which make them nice for acoustic strumming and whatnot- but i would recommend mediums at least for the electric guitar., "musical_instruments"
I received all twelve picks, which came in a small ziploc bag with an attached Fender tag. The color is great. I needed a thin pick for some softer picking on acoustic. These work great, though do not offer as warm a sound as rubber or felt picks. I find them to be the perfect compromise between heavy and rubber. The picks were reasonably priced and shipped via \"prime\", so I found them to be a great value as someone who only plays casually. Thanks.SPO, "musical_instruments"
These picks are exactly the right thickness and they play well. Look cool to I will buy more when the time comes, "musical_instruments"
Hard to believe that I need to review a Pick but I really like these picks.  I got a half dozen for Christmas and was thrilled.  I also got one of those Pick Punches (Super cool item if you ever get a chance to get one- it is the 351 style and a standard credit card is dang close to the Medium Fender Pick)  Only thing I don't like about these picks is that they seem to wander away on their own so keep an eye on them., "musical_instruments"
Fender 351 Picks are some of the best picks money can buy.I have used these picks for years now and I just love them., "musical_instruments"
I needed picks, so I ordered an assortment. I have been trying different ones. I seem to like them all., "musical_instruments"
I wanted to experiment with a thin pick. I like the action but thinner picks tend to \"click\" over the strings and I don't care much for that. These are certainly pretty though, and the feel is typical Fender celluloid, smooth and a little slippery. Might be hard to hold with sweaty fingers. Celluloid is highly flammable, so be aware of that if you smoke (I don't)., "musical_instruments"
I&#8217;m not sure exactly how to rate these picks except to say they&#8217;re what they are. Guitar picks. However, the price was good., "musical_instruments"
classic fender heavy picks.  i love the fender heavy pick and now my picks,knobs and inlays are all shiny abalone, "musical_instruments"
I love being able to adjust the tension. Does not go sharp like some other capos that really clamp down.Just wish there was an easy way to keep it handy on my guitar., "musical_instruments"
I know many people love the design, but I find it much too frustrating. You have to be very careful putting it on the fret correctly, then snap it in, then turn and turn the screw, oops don't let it snap off again and fall off while trying to turn the screw. Then you have to go through the whole routine again to take it off and move it to another fret and put it on again. What a farce. This is the worst capo I've owned, and I've tried nearly every brand and type. Yeah, I've had people show me how to do it right, and I know to do it right. It's just wrong to have to spend so much time slipping it on, snapping it, screwing it in, screwing it off, having it fall off, forget it, it's garbage to me. Also, while I'm getting my callouses worked out playing for two hours every day, the last thing I want is to pinch my fingers against metal trying to turn a screw. It's actually slightly painful to the fingers (momentarily, but why have to deal with that??) to work with. This design seems like it was a non guitar player who came up with it. The only good thing I can say about it is looks durable.No thanks., "musical_instruments"
If you are familiar with Shubb's, they are by far the best capo you can get.  Some people do like the big close pin, but if you don't, buy a Shubb, "musical_instruments"
Simple, compact, well constructed, easy to use, and sounds good; all things you would look for in a capo.This is the original Shubb capo, designed for most acoustic guitars with metal strings. The Shubb website describes the huge range of specific capos they make, each with their own specialized use. The C1 is probably the most universal of all the models. This fits a Les Paul Traditional 08 (Gibson Les Paul Traditional Plus Electric Guitar, Heritage Cherry Sunburst), aPRS SE Custom 22 Guitar, Grey Black with Tremolo Bridge, andEpiphone LP Special II Les Paul Collection Electric Guitar, Vintage Sunburstelectrics. The primary use is for a Laguna acoustic.Follow the simple instruction card included with the capo to adjust the tension. It's key to not get too much tension.We've had trouble figuring out where to park this capo. Mostly it goes in a pocket. Once the capo is adjusted to fit the neck, it doesn't clamp tight on the headstock. Not a huge deal, but a consideration., "musical_instruments"
This is the best capo I've ever owned.  It's a little awkward in that it doesn't just clip to the headstock with one hand, and it takes me two hands also to put it on, but not having to retune my 12-string makes it all worthwhile! I like the choice of colors too., "musical_instruments"
Some folk don't like these because sometimes they come off when knocked; but I like them; have few of them.They don't squeeze the strings tight and importantly; they look cool., "musical_instruments"
Researched around for a highly recommended capo and the result is the Shubb.  This is a capo that while is not easily adjustable to slide up and down like other spring types, it's a great capo and very durable in construction and material.  Like a good guitar that is well cared for, this is something that's great to hand down to the next generation.Please click YES if my review have been helpful to you, it will encourage me to continue writing and updating my reviews, and leave a comment if you have any questions, I will be more than happy to answer if I can be of help., "musical_instruments"
I already owned a stainless version of this capo with a roller instead of the plastic tip on the adjuster screw. I like that one more , "musical_instruments"
Easily the best quality capo for it's price. Looks great on any guitar. I came across SHUBB a few months back, when my capo finally gave out after 12 years. I bought the C1 stainless steel version of this same capo which made a good transition between several of my guitars, but I had to adjust it any time I went to use it on my Les Paul which has a 50s neck and fretboard.Ordered off of Amazon and it shipped the same day.I just got it in the mail yesterday, and it snapped right on the LP with a firm click. I didn't even have to adjust it. It looks amazing in use... and is just the best and simplest design.You know when you feel it lock into place that it is staying there no matter what. Don't forget to remove it when you guitar is resting. It's easy to forget it's there. Forget the oversized medieval torture device style capos... this never effects my fret thumb or forefinger--exactly what I was looking for in a capo.I will have these 2 for a long time, and I'm a Shubb guy from this day forward., "musical_instruments"
This strap looks really great and fits just as advertised........it's just that it gets in the way (for Me and my chording skills) mounted as designed and shown. I altered the mounting manner to accomodate MY style and it functions fine.(Looks great, too) High quality and compliments the Martin Name and reputation really well. I feel that it's a good deal and  recommend it!, "musical_instruments"
For those of you going for the folk singer look, or if you're afraid of drilling holes in your guitar, this is definitely the thing to buy to strap your guitar., "musical_instruments"
I love this guitar strap button. It's a great alternative to the invasive buttons that have to be screwed in. I actually purchased it for my newMahalo U-35PK Sparkling Soprano Ukulele Outfit in Pink. It works well for it's stated purpose and appears to be of high quality. The leather is nice and soft and the button fits snuggly into the leather hole. Check out my user name stinkylungs on Youtube to see a video I made of me installing it on my new uke if you want to see it up close., "musical_instruments"
Quick delivery and item is good quality of genuine leather. Does exactly what it's says it is a good  piece of kit for a very good price., "musical_instruments"
I got this for my Ibanez acoustic and found it was a real challenge to get it attached at the neck.  It took a few trys before I could get it buttoned so the strap would stay put.  Even so it was a good quality button.  The leather is tough and will last for years.  It will probably outlast the guitar.If you're looking for a good way to attach a strap to the guitar neck is a possible option.  Maybe if you have a Martin it might be a better fit.  But it's really worth the hassle., "musical_instruments"
Simple product, easy to use that works exactly as it's supposed to without costing too much. I got one for a banjo, Ubass & mandolin but of course you can use this on anything., "musical_instruments"
I bought this hoping to use as intended, angled into guitar & straight into mixer, wrong, have to use it the other way around ... sad!, "musical_instruments"
Only Lasted 2yr.  I have a lot of cheaper cables that get more use/abuse than this one that have outlasted it., "musical_instruments"
Plenty of cord to move around with.  Makes it less likely that I am going to clip the cord on a down stroke.  Just what the guitar doctor ordered., "musical_instruments"
excellent, "musical_instruments"
I love this cable, they look good and are well made too. An incre&iacute;ble guitar cable, i really recomended it, i have the 12ft and this one 21ft. Try one., "musical_instruments"
So good that I bought another one.  Love the heavy cord and gold connectors.  Guitar sounds great.  I just learned last night how to coil them up.  I guess I should read instructions more carefully.  But no harm done, still works great!, "musical_instruments"
These aren't my first set, I can't count the amount of Monster 1/4 cables I bought and own. None has ever failed me so far. Highly recommend these! I love how they sound and they are built well., "musical_instruments"
Don't buy cheap cables. They just rob your tone. These are the best cables for the money. sure you'll spend a few more bucks but they sound great hold up and are guaranteed for life.  What else could you ask for. All I will use are these cables, "musical_instruments"
The biggest question I ask about these cables, are they worth the premium charged above more normal cables? The key to me is the lower end 100 series Monster cables,Monster S100-I-12 Standard 100 1/4-Inch Instrument Cable (12 Feet). The answer is mixed, and depends on what you are looking for.The cable ends are very heavy, they are metal and do unscrew. In some ways this is probably good, they feel good in your hand plugging and unplugging. The jacks are gold plated and look like they would last a lifetime. On the other hand, the series 100 plugs are a molded plastic end, with a good bit of flex to them, and they are lighter weight. So the choice is, heavy, shiny gold; or light weight, gray/black? For me, I like the heft of these cables.Construction-wise these are likely lifetime cables. Check out the pictures I've posted. The metal housing screws into the jack. There is an O-ring to seal the top portion of the threads. Inside the wires are soldered solidly to the jack, and then the whole thing is cast in solid acrylic or plastic. Unless you run over this end with a truck or pulled really really hard like tug of war, the wire is never separating from the jack. I don't think the actual 1/4 inch jack is any sturdier than other jacks.Sound is excellent. They are clear clean cables. Are they better than the 100's? Oh maybe a tiny bit. Maybe a little clearer, cleaner sound. But it isn't a huge difference.Bottom line, for gigging, probably go with the 100's. The jack ends will get stepped on at some point and they are cheap enough to replace. For practice or in your house, these are probably the way to go. They do look particularly good plugged into a Marshall half stack.These cables are not outrageously over priced like everything else Monster Cable. Study different one quarter inch jack cables and you'll see these are priced very close to everyone else. This is not the case of the HDMI cables at the big box store for fifty times what you should pay for them., "musical_instruments"
These cables work very well at transmitting sound. So why only three stars? Well, these are far from the most well thought out instrument cables you will find. These are stiff, thick, and heavy. While that's good for most analog cables, these cables are so stiff and heavy that, for instance, a portable tuner or a small stomp box might easily be moved around just by having one end of this cable in there.With so many amps having plastic jacks these days, you have to wonder what kind of stress these cables might be putting your amp jacks and pickguard-mounted output jacks under if these cables can fling a tuner around just by being plugged into one. I mean, let's face it. You never know what will happen at a gig. Sometimes you're playing with a 12 foot cable when you should have a 18 foot cable. A cable shouldn't come out because of a gentle pull, but if it's between the cable falling out and it moving a bass head around or you tripping on it, you want the cable to fall out. If everything you have is heavy or Velcro'd to the ground, this isn't a problem, but it is for me. I feel like when you're playing with these cables, you're worried about stepping on the cable not because you want to pull it out, but because it's seriously like a trip wire out there.Lastly, these plugs are huge. That's not really a problem if you play a Strat or a Tele, but what about a P-Bass or a J-Bass where the plug comes out at a right angle from the body? This is going to stick out a lot, and to loop it around your strap, it's going to be a huge, stiff, cumbersome loop. I know people often buy 90 degree plugs for those kinds of instruments, but most normal straight plugs do just fine. So yeah, if you like to move around on stage, get more flexible cables. You'll thank me.These cables are just poorly thought out. They'd work great as patch cords, or keyboards, drum machines, from pedal board to amp (as long as you have a metal jack). Monster has a cable that costs half as much but works twice as well for actual instrument use, and at that price, Pro Co cables are also excellent, and they have brand name plugs, as well., "musical_instruments"
The last thing I would think to upgrade to improve the quality of my music is the cable. I did not know that these cables actually made a difference. My guitar sounds cleaner when I use this cable versus another generic cable that I've had for a while. It was a pleasant surprise. I also heard about the wonderful warranty that Monster has. The cable has so many good things going for it, I now know what to buy the next time I need one., "musical_instruments"
I wasn't sure about all the hype folks were giving this cable, but I am now - it really improved the sound of my acoustic guitar through the amp.I did a little experiment.  I plugged in my old cable, played the guitar as I adjusted the amp until I got a pleasant sound from the speakers.  Then, I turned the amp off, unplugged the old cable and plugged in this new Monster Rock cable.  Next,  I simply turned the amp back on (the sound levels were already set and I did not touch them) and played my guitar again.  The volume was louder and I think nicer with the new Monster cable.I'm buying a few more Monster Rock cables to replace all my old cables., "musical_instruments"
You should find another review from me, but suffice it to say I just won't skimp on my cables when I spend 1000's on amps and cabinets for good sound., "musical_instruments"
These aren't my first set, I can't count the amount of Monster 1/4 cables I bought and own. None has ever failed me so far. Highly recommend these!, "musical_instruments"
It's hard to beat the quality of Monster Cables!There is absolutely No discernible loss of tone through this cable - I Love It!, "musical_instruments"
I compared this cable to the monster studio pro 1000 cable i also own. I prefer this more as i play live and it does a good job in handling noise snd also has a no questions asked lifetime warranty. Just take your broken cable to your local guitar center and they will replace it. I got 4 replacememts over 3 years. Worth the higher price because of the warranty. The 100 dollar studio pro doesnt do well live compared to this rock cable as the studio pro sucks up tone snd only sounds good for recording. note, this cable has high mid range so if thats what you like go for it, "musical_instruments"
Nice cables.  So far I've not had any problems with them, but haven't put them through a lot of use just yet.  Also have the Planet Waves Custom Series cables that work just as well for less money!  I'll have to see over time which brand out lasts the other., "musical_instruments"
I've had one of these for about 20 years, have gigged with it extensively, and I've only had to replace it once. (more on that later).I'm not really a cork-sniffer re: guitar tone.  I think most of our tone comes from our fingers, and so the trend in the last several years toward high dollar guitar cables is lost on me.  I think this Monster cable sounds fine.  Better?  Well, better than what?  I don't really notice a difference when I use different cables.  Maybe a slight difference in the high frequencies, but it's so slight as to be negligible.I look for guitar cables that will last.  That's what I really care about, and so far this Monster cable does the trick.  I use other brands, too - this is my most expensive cable but I think it was worth the $40 I spent all those years ago.Oh, and the return process.  This was maybe 10 years ago.  I called Monster, they gave me their address and I had to pay about $3 to ship it back to them.  About 2 weeks later I had a new cable.  I consider that to be excellent customer service., "musical_instruments"
I thought I was using good guitar cables but I kept getting intermittence with one.So I tried this Monster cable. It eliminated the problem.My only minor complaint is that it is very stiff. This is minor but no matter what I do it curls up unless you have it fully extended.I would still recommend it though., "musical_instruments"
This cable is extra heavy, not like the cheaper ones.  The plugs are of excellent quality also.  The sound that transfers through this cable is REMARKABLY IMPROVED over my old cable.  I urge you to purchase if you are looking...you won't be disappointed. BTW, I am a verified purchaser, just can't say enough good about this cable...I'm really impressed!, "musical_instruments"
Monster Cable is one of the things on earth we can count on!Seriously speaking all my cables are Monsters, yes they are pricy and sometimes very much, true.But they last really lifetime and I never ever had to complain or heard a friend complaining on Monster products.PEACE, "musical_instruments"
I should've just got this cable the first time. I have been using Monster for years. I recently tried a coiled guitar cable and learned the hard way., "musical_instruments"
I bought this Monster cable (12 feet, angled) and plugged it into my Create Amp.  WOW.  Clear and no static.  I can also wrap this monster up easily because it is not stiff, but very plyable.  Heavy duty and rugged, it should last forever.  Thinking about buying another one.  Great stuff., "musical_instruments"
These cables are perfect... The quality of this cables are incredible and the sound is excellent.. I really love Monster cables..., "musical_instruments"
The monster chord is great looking, but for me, they are too stiff. I play an acoustic guitar, so I don't run around a lot. The cord must be made to be able to take some abuse, but I don't need that., "musical_instruments"
It is a great option, if not simply the best. Monster knows it all in quality. Gob bless monster everyway, "musical_instruments"
These cables are sturdy and sound clean. Using cheaply made cables could affect your sound - you can loose top end. I use Monster on all my mics (XLR) and all my instrument cables (1/4) with no issues. Great product... Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
Quality is there in construction and signal passing.  We never have problems with our Monster gold cables.  Conversely, we have other cables crap out on us periodically., "musical_instruments"
These cables give you a pure sound unhindered and uncut. I have several other \"good\" cables but when compared to this they cut highs and even the level. I have grown as a musician to the point that I Know it's worth it to pay a little more for these quality cables. Yes you can get many cables way cheaper (and I'm all for getting things at a good price - publishers clearing house has Not visited me yet!) but this is a case of you get what you pay for!, "musical_instruments"
For me thia is the best cables ever.. i mean they give the original and natural tone of ur instrument, doesnt lose signal strenth and a very important thing, they do help to avoid most noise.. :), "musical_instruments"
Hands down the best cables for electric guitar. Ive tried other brands that cost almost, if not similar to these and none can match in the quality that prolink presents. These are not only the best in delivering tone but they're durable. I bought mine back in 2004 and they're still working as well as the day I got them today on September of 2012. I bought some planetwaves cables for $40 that didn't even last me 2 years., "musical_instruments"
I would def recommend this to anyone but for electric only. If you are going to be playing acoustic I would get their specific acoustic cable. This is a very heavy guage. Sounds great!, "musical_instruments"
My review is on par with all the others concerning the quality of the cable compared to cheaper ones. I bought this locally and have been happy using it with a few bass guitars. The cable is solid and definately seems to hold up after a few weeks of heavy usage.One complaint I have is that the right angle does not lock into the jack on my Spector bass securely, but works with the others flawlessly. I use it with a jazz bass all the time and there are no issues.I also use Spectraflex fatso flex cables and Mogami and think that this one is worth it's price. To me, the warranty is worth it because of the price. I reead all over the web about the opinions of monster's patents and marketing techniques written by musicians and can see their points about the price and build quality, but there are more expensive cables out there made by Mogami and countless others which are not any better than this one in my opinion., "musical_instruments"
This is definitely a high quality cable. However, my experience with this model and the less expensiveMonster Standard 100 Instrument Cable 21 ft. - straight 1/4 plugs S100-I-21model has shown me that the only difference is one is \"prettier\" with its gold colored, bling fittings. Sonically I found them to be the same - or to my ears anyway.As you can see by the tag above this review Amazon has verified that I purchased this cable (as well as Amazon verifying my purchase of the less pricey model on my review on that product page.)I initially purchased a pair of these cables for my keyboards because I had invested a significant sum into those instruments and wanted nothing but the best cables. I purchased the standard cables for some low end instruments including an old Squier Jazz Bass and a new, but very inexpensiveEpiphone LP Special II Les Paul Electric Guitar, Vintage Sunburst, neither of which to my mind warranted top of the line cables.Much to my surprise, when I started testing each cable on each instrument (all through the same amp to keep things equal), I could not discern any sonic difference between both Monster cable models. Same manufacturer, but different models. To be sure, this more expensive model looked \"cooler\", but when it came to sound - no discernible difference (that I could detect anyway.)  More perplexing is the molded stress relief ends on the less expensive model seem to make that one more reliable!My recommendation is test both this one and the standard model side-by-side before plunking down extra money for no added value beyond looks (which, I have to admit, may be a selling point on stage for some folks - no shame as long as you know what you are paying extra for and why.), "musical_instruments"
Very well made.  No problems.  Should be able to stand up to any use or abuse., "musical_instruments"
Really nice cable! I've had mine for over a year now. And it has worked flawlessly. No problems with distortion or noise. Build quality is as solid as they come. Nice gold tips and polished finish for great connectivity! Keep it professional. And become a Monster! I did!, "musical_instruments"
I haven't had an issue with this cable yet, and the guage of the wire connecting the plugs is very thick and high quality, but it takes a while for them to stop coiling up. Like the title says, the timeless combo of Neutrik & Mogami is better. If you're wondering how to get Neutrik/Mogami cables cheap, make them yourself. It saves you so much money!, "musical_instruments"
I don't know what I would do without this little shelf on my music stand.  I works on my non-Manhasset sold-shelf stand, holds my pencil/highlighter/flute swab & even occasionally a small speaker set that I have for my phone.  It easily slides over the lip of my music stand and is reasonably secure.  Very well worth the $$., "musical_instruments"
The plastic is pretty lightweight, but it is a big help.  I keep various guitar picks, clips, pencils, etc. on it which kept falling off when I just set them in front of the music.  Glad I bought it., "musical_instruments"
I am using it with a Musician's Gear music stand.  The shelf fits, but moves easily when moving stuff on the shelf of the stand.  It is made out of plastic which flexes fairly easily and doesn't feel as sturdy as the metal shelf of the stand.  There aren't any other options though unless you know some one who can do metal fabrication. It is a good thing it does not cost a lot., "musical_instruments"
This shelf is so convenient and so often used that you would think that it should come on every music stand. It just slips on to the lower shelf and creates a smaller shelf for pencils, pens, clip on tuners, capos, etc. It pays dividens in not cluttering up your book shelf so that items go spilling to the floor every time you adjust a book or turn a page. I love how a pen, capo, or tuner clipped to the top lip of the shelf serve to keep pages firmly in place until your book is &#34;trained&#34; to stay in place. A must have, five star item., "musical_instruments"
Piece of plastic with no bracing. Due to design, will not attach to stands that have a turned lip on the shelf (which is most quality stands). I used double-sided sticky tape -- problem solved. Gives me a place to stow my guitar picks, tuner, capo and pencil and as such, is an invaluable accessory. Worth the 6 bucks, just be aware you may have to improvise when it comes to attaching it to your stand!, "musical_instruments"
This acoustic pickup is the most amazing thing ever. It has a very warm and soft tone and picks up notes very well. I couldn't be happier with the purchase. It's a very good investment if you play guitar but don't have an electric acoustic. I don't think I'll ever even buy an electric acoustic now since I have this thing. Prolly sounds better anyway!!, "musical_instruments"
I bought this for my daughters acoustic guitar so she could play through an amp. It fits very well and sounds great!, "musical_instruments"
This mic is fine. One should know that it has quite low gain and requires the use of a boost/preamp for the guitar sound to be heard., "musical_instruments"
quiet, almost hum free - clear respose - no volume control doesn't befront me because i use it to record & to play thru a PA where either I or someone else keeps the volume under control. It tends to be bass heavy, but a slight eq revisit more than compensates for that. I had used one in the past, this is a more solid unit & fits movement free in the soundhole of my guitar & also in two others i use here and there. great job. great value. got herre quick in a nice little carry bag & I will update if problems come later - don't see why or how tho, "musical_instruments"
Could not get to fit small sound hole. Once in sound hole pickup did not work at all. Would not buy it., "musical_instruments"
I've owned a Seymour Duncan Woody for several months now, and have had a chance to try it out with various amps, with the pickup tipped for a stronger low end or high end, and so on.  This is an excellent value and is basically as feedback free as you're likely to get from an acoustic guitar pickup.  The one thing I've found is that I get a significantly more natural acoustic guitar sound playing the Woody through my Ampeg bass amp than through my Peavey guitar amp.  The high ends are too grating through an electric guitar amp and there's a tendency for distortion to creep in, even with the clean setting.  Through the bass amp, though, the tone is absolutely clean and clear.  The pickup is easy enough to install and remove and it's easy to get it to sit low enough that it doesn't interfere with finger picking any more than any other sound hole pickup would.  The other great feature of this pickup is the look; the natural wood finish actually enhances the look of the guitar.  If you are looking for an acoustic guitar pickup, this is the one to buy!, "musical_instruments"
I bought this for my 1974 Martin D-18 for recording on my PC. So far it is working great. I have a Behringer 802 mixer already and I just plugged the guitar into that. It works perfectly. This guitar is very loud without a pickup, but to get the sound into my PC for recording I either needed to use a mike or a pickup. I chose the pickup. I got too much background noise with the mike.Update: I started to get a loud buzz in my sound system and scratched my head a bit trying to figure it out. I had played my guitar about an hour before without that \"buzz\" being a problem. I discovered that if I turn the guitar a certain way the buzz went away. Then I remembered that the only thing I was doing differently was that I had turned on another overhead light since it was dark outside. I turned that light off and the buzz went away. My pickup was picking up interference from the new type florescent bulbs in the light. I'm glad there is nothing really wrong with the pickup. ;)After using the pickup for awhile I have noticed that the 5th and 6th strings aren't as loud as I would expect; also the 2nd string is louder than all of the strings. I'm not sure why. It's not a big deal., "musical_instruments"
The pickup itself is very nice and pretty easy to use but the plastic thing wrapped around the cable really annoyed me. How the heck were you supposed to take those off without damaging the cable? Anyway, the pickup sounds very nice and i'm happy., "musical_instruments"
This is an excellent-sounding pickup.  I've had it for about six years.  Good sound throughout the spectrum - full lows and bright highs, without too much emphasis on either.  At the price it sells for, I consider it a bargain.The drawbacks:1) You need to be pay attention when installing and removing - you can damage the sound hole on your guitar if you're not careful.2) No volume control.If you're looking to occasionally amplify an acoustic guitar, this is a great, cost-effective way to go., "musical_instruments"
I've used this on a variety of 6 strings and a few 12 strings and it really does give a good sound for the price. And if you've got a variety of acoustics and don't want to get pickups installed in ALL if them this is a great solution. It tends to work slightly better for finger picking than strumming because occasionally your hand will hit the chord coming out if you're not careful.Remember that it must be used with a preamp and hopefully something (most likely a tuner) with stomp on/off bypass so that you can turn it off more easily., "musical_instruments"
Easy to use. No metallic hiss you'd normally expect. The only real drawback is the lack of presence when it comes to the bassier strings. It takes some skill to EQ things to the point of normalcy. If you're uncomfortable dealing with EQ, this might not be your best bet. Otherwise, a wonderful product at a great price., "musical_instruments"
I'm impressed with these EXP16 guitar strings.* What I ExpectedA more dead sound than the non-coated strings they replaced. Coated strings usually lack the bright high-end brilliance that uncoated light strings have.* What I GotA very bright, yet not to twangy sound.  When I put Light strings on my acoustic, I'm going for easy playability and, most of all, a very bright and airy sound.  These deliver on both counts.* DurabilityThe coating on these strings are supposed to prolong the time between changes.  So far they are holding their tone and brightness.  I will report back after three months.  My last set started to sound dull, and exhibit more tone variation after six months (when viewed with a very sensitive tuner, it seems that my dirtier strings detune sharp a bit more on attack, the harder you strum them.  This is confirmed by the fact that they just sound out of tune to me when they get dirty).* ConclusionI will be ordering more of these.  I think they perform very well for the price. Love the bright light gauge sound and playability., "musical_instruments"
I've used D'Addario strings for many, many years without problems - both acoustic & electric.  I've tried these coated strings in the past, and I actually prefer them to Elixir because they feel more like regular strings - the wrap is coated, rather than a sheathe being placed over the entire string, like on Elixirs.Do they last longer?  Probably.  Even when I'm in situations where I'm gigging regularly I rarely change strings more than every few months, just because I don't see the need.  I think the main benefit to coated strings is if you have guitars that you can't play regularly the strings won't corrode.  But these sound great and feel fine, and the're the least expensive coated strings I've found.  I've always found D'Addario quality to be great., "musical_instruments"
But unless you are new to guitar, you know that. These strings are more expensive because they are supposed to last longer. Really, I can't tell that they do. Or that they don't. They sound great, and play great and I usually purchase D'Addario or Martin strings. Not sure if I would pay more for these in future, I play an average of daily to every other day depending on what gets in the way.  Change the strings every couple of months. Just me at home so no big deal, if I were performing I would go through them faster.I'm giving 5 stars because D'addario makes great strings. 'Nuff said., "musical_instruments"
Good strings, though in 1 use I didnt notice any significant improvement over the standard Diaddario phosphor bronze strings., "musical_instruments"
this are probably the best sounding guitar strings without breaking the bank.  I have made them last up to 2 months...still obtaining decent sound., "musical_instruments"
These are great strings. They are the right length and go on easy enough. They are color coded which helps a bunch in getting the right string in the right hole as long as you aren't color blind. They go on, sound bright, and keep that new string sound a bit longer than uncoated strings. Had a salesman tell me once about these coated strings that they last forever, you only have to change them every 3 months or so. I had to reply that forever just doesn't last as long as it used to. Changing strings is no fun so if over the lifetime of your guitar you have to do so 1/3 less, that is a good deal even if they don't last forever. That means more guitar playing and less guitar stringing which is a no brainer in my book. Worth the extra pesos., "musical_instruments"
I have been using the EXPs for some time now on electic-acoustics and they have become my go-to string.  I find the coating to be less noticeable than on El***rs and tonal variations to be less from string to string and set-to-set.  Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
I've been using these strings for about eight years, and I also use them on my two Taylor's (814-CE & I use the mediums on my 710) I agree with the other reviewer in saying they are the best sounding coated string out there. I still use Martin strings once in awhile, but these strings last and improve in sound as they get a few hours of play on them.Actually I own three other acoustics other than my two Taylor's and right now they're all strung with EXP's. I know people want different sounds from their strings, but I find these to be bright with a great bottom on them, unlike the Elixirs which I find to be unbearably bright with a weak bottom end. These strings sound great with great dynamics on them. Even on my Laguna Grand Symphony (slightly larger than a Grand Concert) they pump out the lows and sparkle on the highs. These on my Grand Auditorium do the same thing, they produce the sound I demand and make a real positive improvement over the other coated strings I've used.The Mediums on my 710 have an endless bottom end and still have great range on the mid's and treble.As I said I still use Martin Phosphor Bronze strings once in awhile, but honestly these strings hold up extremely well and sound great. Darn near as near to an uncoated string that you're going to find., "musical_instruments"
These D'Addario \"EXP16 Phosphor Bronze Light\" strings for acoustic guitars produce decent sound and are designed to last longer than \"normal\" strings. We have two beginner guitar players in the house and we are very hard on strings, so these are a good choice for us.We are very pleased with the way they sound, feel, and last, so will likely pick up these again the next time we need to replace the strings.Recommended!CFH, "musical_instruments"
Elixir coated strings were by far my favorite strings for my acoustic guitar. D'Addario has finally made a string that is comparable to and maybe a little tiny bit better than the Elixir's.These are very nice bright strings. The coating is incredibly subtle, almost impossible to feel on the strings. I like that. Compared to Elixir's these are a bit brighter, with good feel.Call me old school, I hate the packaging. These strings are packaged in three two string loops inside a single plastic bag. Ah, you know I'm just so used to strings that are individually looped. Two strings looped together makes a mess while I'm restringing a guitar - when I unwrap that pair, I've got a string that has to sit out unwrapped on the bench. The neat freak in me hates that. I also dislike that the strings are in one plastic bag. Yeah I get it; they are trying to be more environmentally responsible. But darn it, 6 paper envelopes? It feels to me like they are just trying to cheapen up the packaging materials, not some environmental cause. 100% post-consumer recycled paper adds very little to the environmental load.I know D'Addario loves the color coded ends. On my acoustic guitar that's irrelevant, the ends are hidden inside the guitar behind the pegs. On my electric guitars, I don't like the look at all. I prefer gold or silver rings at the end. If the strings are in individual labeled packages, there's no need for the colors.D'Addario loves the color coded end rings so much, they do a horrible job color coding and simplifying their packaging. I have yet to decode their colors or naming system.I normally use 10 gauge strings in my acoustic guitar. I tested these at 12 gauge and am surprised how much I like them. The slightly thicker string is not bad.Oddly these strings are priced almost the same as Elixir's. My reason for using the original D'Addario strings is low price - if somebody is doing gigs nightly, those uncoated strings are the only way to go. Strings end up being changed long before corrosion becomes an issue for the gigging musician. For the home enthusiast, coated strings make a ton of sense, they do last longer. I think they are worth the premium price. Now there are two choices for excellent coated strings.In the end, the packaging, the color coded end rings, the crazy package coding, and the double looped strings all mean nothing once the strings are on the guitar. What they sound like and play like is the most important thing. And in that regard these are excellent strings., "musical_instruments"
Play very mello. easy on my fingers too.  Can't come close to understanding the differences of all the different style strings but these work great on My Taylor acoustic, "musical_instruments"
I am an acoustic guitar addict. With five six-string and one-twelve, I play every day and, in a year's time, I go through a lot of strings. Over the years, I have come to favor the phosphor-bronze type as they seem to add something to the rich and warm tones of a good instrument. For a long time, I believed that brands of them were interchangeable so I bought whatever was available at the best price. No more. These D'Addarios are the sweetest, easiest to play and, not that this is the most important variable to me - the longest lasting - of any of the phosphor bronze strings I have used.There is a shelf of unopened sets of unopened Martins, Gibsons, GHS, Adamas and Elixirs (as well as other varieties of D'Addario strings.) I think it's time to sell them off. These EXP16s are superior to them all.I have small hands and my fingers are not terribly strong. To play as well as I am able, I require strings that respond to my touch and do not tear my fingers up. Sound-wise, I look for a blend of 'brightness' and 'warmth' on my strings thst enrich and punctuate the innate qualities of a good guitar. These D'Addarios do both things and do them well.Other reviewers have been somewhat critical about the 'slickness' of these strings - I simple did not experience that at all. As with ALL guitar strings, they should be wiped with a dry, lint-free cloth after each and every playing. Not doing so will quickly compromise the accurate resonance and vibrations of ANY string. As a bonus, the price of these strings is quite reasonable. I bought 6 sets and plan to use them all, both Mediums and Lights, for my stringed friends., "musical_instruments"
The benefit of coated strings is, as the box says, longer life.  This is due to your natural finger oils not corroding the strings and sapping them of their natural \"life\", i.e. that brightness that new strings have.  The drawbacks to coated strings is that they can feel unnatural or slippery depending on the coating - they are also the latest rage in guitar strings and allow string manufacturers to charge more than basic commodity strings.So are these any good?  Yes, they feel great, not overly slippery or coated, and sound great, though they appear to have a more muted tone than some strings.  I'm excited to have them on my acoustic because as a mostly electric player I change my acoustic string less and am hoping that the coating will fight the grime that build on them and allow me to enjoy them longer.About gauge.  These light strings go from .012 to .053 as compared to my old Martin's which went from 0.012 to 0.054.In summary, D'addario makes good strings and these are no exception. If you're looking for coated acoustic strings with a muted (as opposed to aggresive) tone with lighter low E, then you should check these out., "musical_instruments"
I recently sent two of my Ovations back to the factory in Connecticut for re-work (I just plain wore them out), and they came back to me with these strings on them.  As soon as I took them out of their case and strummed them, I immediately called the factory and said \"thanks for the fantastic job on these guitars, and by the way, these are the best sounding strings I've ever played, what exactly are they?\"  I might experiment with the EXP15s, but by and large, these EXPs are my new strings., "musical_instruments"
I love this company. D'addario makes a grab product and it lasts a long time. Ever since I switched to this brand of strings, they seem to last longer and make a grab tone. I don't know if it's my guitar (Taylor 214CE) or the strings, but I can not get over how great the quality is even after months of use. I definitely recommend this product to anyone who plays the acoustic guitar., "musical_instruments"
I tried the EXPs on my Gibson L4 archtop because I play jazz single lines, small chord comping, and full chords more than I do on a Martin OM-1 and figured I'd get a bet, "musical_instruments"
I love these customs...inbetween the lights and mediums...you get the bright booming sound...nice bends and of course, the longer playing life...I've used these on my guitars that have alittle darker sound because of the wood used in them...to brigthen the sound a tad.  I would recommend these for cedar or mahagony body guitars in a blink of an eye., "musical_instruments"
These strings last a good long time and are rather inexpensive. the tone is clear and bright. I have used D'Addario for years, "musical_instruments"
Personally I just love the D'Addario strings. They sute my needs just right for the Takamine acoustic. Great quality and price., "musical_instruments"
After playing for years with Elixir Nanoweb 80/20's, I decided to experiment with a few different coated strings. I tried the Elixir Nanoweb Phosphor Bronze, Dean Markley Alchemy Gold Phosphor (now discontinued) and these EXP16s. Ultimately, I preferred the Nanoweb Phosphor Bronze the best, but the EXP16 are cheaper and the difference didn't warrant the extra cost, so I decided to stick with these for now.  I wasn't a fan of the Alchemys because of their rough texture and high tension. The EXP16s are smooth and have a very playable tension, although not as smooth and easy as the Elixir 80/20's.  As far as longevity, these seem to last me about 2 months, which is on par with other coated strings I've tried, except for the Elixir 80/20's which average about 3 months. Uncoated strings last me about a month.Depending on the style of play, I prefer brighter or warmer strings, but I'd rank the EXP16s somewhere in the middle. It's a good balance for both strumming and fingerstyle. Even though they don't project as well as the Elixir 80/20s, they have a very agreeable tone without some of the harsh overtones. For live use with a pickup I'd be more inclined to use the Elixirs, but for unplugged or mic'ed use I like the tone of these., "musical_instruments"
Not sure if these are more on the brass side or the bronze? Not really to my liking compared to the phospher bronze. The EXPs are nice strings. They have a nice feel to them along with less string noise. And they last. My two acoustic  guitars, a Takamine Mini jumbo and a Gretsch jumbo, both made from mahogany are both nice sounding guitars. I figured i would try these 80/20 strings after using phospher bronze. Only real problem i noticed is the 80/20s seem brighter and they ring longer. I prefer the warmer tone. And since my guitars have alot of \"boom\" already, i dont need the extra ring to complicate the sound with overtones when strumming fast. I imagine these strings may work in some instances, but i am going back to the phospher bronze for my guitars., "musical_instruments"
I like Elixir.  I had to try this one because of another friend said it's ok and cheaper.I tried it and the quality is low end.The sound is not as crisp.The gauge is too heavy for my fingers (not their problem)All 6 strings are wrapped inside one single bag.I'd go back to Elixir next time., "musical_instruments"
We have an old acoustic around the house, but I rarely play it, opting instead for the electric. This is going to be hard to believe, but the strings on the acoustic were last changed more than two decades ago.When we put these new strings on the guitar (Lotus), the sound, as you might imagine, was incredible--bright and clear.These are fairly pricey, but I am very impressed with the quality., "musical_instruments"
good deep tone for my acoustic guitars. easily stretched and tuned with no problems. You can not go wrong with D'Addario strings., "musical_instruments"
D'Addario guitar strings are favourite strings.  They last a little longer and always sound good on my Ovation guitars and also or my other acoustic guitars.  I usually buy them for and recommend them to others also.  You can not go very wrong with these strings if you play often.  You will notice a longer life and your guitar will certainly remained tuned., "musical_instruments"
There are two ways guitar strings go bad. If you leave them on long enough, the steel cores and bronze windings will actually corrode- but that takes months, if not more. Before that happens, grease from your fingers, dust, bits of skin, and other detritus from the environment gets into the strings, between the windings. This interferes with the free vibration of the strings and deadens the sound. Back when strings were a lot more expensive, some guys used to take their strings off the guitar and regularly clean or even boil them; some bass players still do. Coated strings are a simpler alternative.These strings and similar ones like Elixirs have a thin polytetrafluoroethylene coating bonded to the wrappings, which accomplishes two things: First, it creates a barrier between the atmosphere and the metal wrap, which prevents rust and corrosion. Second, it provides a physical barrier that prevents contamination from getting in between the windings. The strings stay fresher sounding two or three times as long as standard strings. They do sound just a bit less bright than the equivalent uncoated strings, but it's not a huge difference, and after a month or two they still sound the same.They also cost about twice as much as equivalent non-coated D'Addarios. Are they worth it? That depends. If you're an active performer, maybe. You're probably changing strings for every performance to make sure you're getting a bright sound. You're probably also buying your strings by the box. There's no real benefit to these strings. Where they really pay off is for the casual player who may not have a few dozen spare sets handy. These days I'm strictly a hobbyist who might play publicly once or twice a year. I have four acoustic guitars, and some of them may go go for a month or more without being played. With coated strings, I can leave a set on a guitar, and a month or two later I can pull it out of the case and it's ready to play. I still change strings if I'm going to be playing in public, but for guitars that spend most of the time sitting around the house, these are great., "musical_instruments"
These strings are the bomb!  I have used D'Addario's since my earliest playing days.  Over the years I have experimented with several different brands and eventually found myself at home with Elixir Polyweb lights.  After having the frets on my guitar (a Fender grand concert) redressed I noticed it had been restrung with EXP's (which I used eight years ago and loved). Since they were on the guitar, I decided to give them another try.  I am glad I did, the tone is great.  They speak with a natural, bright and lively voice that is sweet to the ears. EXP's make my guitar sound like it should. Individual notes speak with warmth, definition and depth.  They blend together beautifully when paying chords.  They have more punch to them than Elixir's do and the coating doesn't fray after a year like Elixirs either. D'Addario EXP'16s are probably the most musical strings I have ever used.  They respond well to dynamics and the bass response is excellent when finger picking.  I was able to get eight months out of them before I noticed deterioration in tone.  I think I have found my strings and I don't see myself using anything else for a while., "musical_instruments"
While I love and trust D'Addario strings, i am subtracting one star because, I really like the packaging for other strings when they have individual packets.  For my acoustics, I do not always change out all the strings at once.  I think the bass strings get changed more when they start falling off on sound.Anyway, these are classic strings that I grew up with, but as I get more involved with playing, having the flexibility of individual envelopes for each string becomes more an d more appreciated.  Especially if you like to save your single strings for use., "musical_instruments"
D'addario is a company I've been using since I first started playing guitar and these strings live up to their title. They DO have a warm, bright and balanced tone and they last 3-6 months for me even after playing hours a day. For people who finger style on the acoustic, it is very comfortable on your fingertips. These strings can produce very good sound with little effort, I almost always use light/light medium picks with these strings and it can get to the volume I want., "musical_instruments"
I had for years been using Elixir Strings on myWashburn D10simply because I was accustomed to them and saw no sense in making a switch. I'm glad I tried out these D'Addario strings. These strings are an excellent complement to my Washburn, which has mellowed out over the years. They are a fair bit cheaper but has a tonal quality that rivals that of the Elixir strings. I can't speak to the manufacturers claim of \"4 times more life,\" but as of now, I'd have to say these strings are a fantastic value for your money. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
I like them, but these strings are probably not for everyone. The EXP16s do provide a crisp, bright sound almost leaning towards metallic. This tone is actually refreshing on my old shallow-bodied Ovation. However, I have to imagine that on a dreadnought or jumbo this sound might be quite different.While I was not expecting it, my favorite aspect of the EXP16s is the playability. The play is a little more elastic than I thought it would be, and they are amazingly easy on the fingers.The only downside that I experienced with the EXP16s is the fact that, while giving once on the guitar, they are a little brittle off the guitar (I almost snapped my E getting it set up). Other than that, the strings are just a little squeaky. I personally like a little squeak, but at the current price point, I don't think that it would be a deal breaker even for those who don't., "musical_instruments"
I've been playing guitar for years and personally I would prefer Cleartone or Elixir strings. I bought these for my little sister and she loves them. They have a really nice sound to them. I feel like you could probably get some pretty equivalent strings for less money but my sister is very happy with these., "musical_instruments"
I've long been partial to D'Addario strings--I don't have a guitar without them. These phosphor bronze models have found a home on my Epiphone flat-top.  As the package says, they're warm and bright--leaning just a little toward the brassy side.  They project without sounding harsh or tinny.  Playing feel is fairly smooth for round-wound strings and they last for ages.  This is a good intermediate gauge: light enough for lead work, but substantial enough to provide good backing.Guitarists tend to stay loyal to a maker and model of string.  My loyalty is certainly not shaken.  For any guitarist on another string whose loyalty might be wavering, these will reward an audition., "musical_instruments"
doesn't last as long or sound as bright as Elixirs but these are half the price. Good bargain though for $6.99.sounds all right to me, bright and well balanced sound.My little brother can't tell the difference since he's new, but it works well on his guitar., "musical_instruments"
I like D'Addario strings, but these did not impress me. They are not worth the extra cost, in my opinion., "musical_instruments"
I've been playing guitar for more than 20 years. I've played 6 strings, 12 strings, bass acoustics and electrics. When it comes to acoustic sound, these strings produce the brightest, clearest sound of any string I've ever used. Some strings have a \"bright\" sound and some have a clear, distinct tone - not muted or dull. Still, other strings have a rich, full resonance that carries through a room. This is the only string I've ever used that has all of those qualities. In fact, the first time I put these on my acoustic and went to lead worship at my church, several of the church members commented that my guitar sounded \"better than usual\" or \"really good\" that day. I've tried some other brands since I found these and always end up coming back to them., "musical_instruments"
These strings last and they moderated some of the booming I get from other strings. I use the  EXP Phosphor bronze on my other dreads., "musical_instruments"
These strings sound great. I Love the sustained bright tone. They work well with my cedar top guitar.  Easy on the fingers too., "musical_instruments"
i've used many brand for my guitars for years. this one is very good, long lasting guitar strings. balanced tone as it says on the box and special coating system makes strings last longer than non-coated ones from lusting. easy to install and use, and very reasonable price. thanks amazon for this product sale., "musical_instruments"
not worth the price or matched the hype that you hear and read about. GHS strings are much cheaper and much better strings than these. I think they lasted a week on my guitar until I could get some more GHS or Slinky Acoustics on it., "musical_instruments"
These guitar strings sound about the same after a month of playing as they do right after I change them. I use to get a real kick out of changing strings because the new strings sounded so much different and better, but now the thrill is gone because these strings sound good for a couple of months although I change once a month anyway. I don't notice much difference at all though.But the best part is that these strings are over $17 bucks a set at my local music store and I get 'em for about $9.48 through Amazon's subscription service delivered to my mailbox every month with free shipping! Beat that!, "musical_instruments"
One doesn't get much better than D'Addario strings.  In my opinion they're twice as clear as Martin strings and the EXPs just last forever.  I like the standard Phosphor Bronze just as well and use those as a less-expensive alternative.I certainly recommend D'Addario nylon strings on classical guitars.  I've heard no other string that has the crisp, clean, rich sound of this brand of strings.  I've used them for years and once in a while give in to the temptation to try another brand... but always come back to this one.Different diameter strings will sound significantly different, depending on the guitar you use.  I prefer this mid-range string set , "musical_instruments"
Okay mine has just arrived.. So first of all I want to say packaging is great!!..I have just put it on my guitar and I have to say that I am impressed!!... the sound is so warm and bright. I have a nanoweb before, and so far the EXP16 is better...  I will stay on with the EXP16 right now!!..Great quality string..., "musical_instruments"
I did not care for the tone or feel. Took them off within an hour and put back on EJ16. They had a rough feel and were stiff. Lots of folks like them but not for me., "musical_instruments"
I bought this to bring my fender strat with me on airplane trips.  I check the guitar in baggage with this case and it seems to protect it just fine.  the it is very good for a Stratocaster and there is a little extra room inside for tuner, picks, tuning forks, capo, etc.  and..........the price was very good.  best I could find for this time of hard case.  The only thing that is sort of weird is that most employees at the airport are constantly asking me if I have a gun in case.  If you need basic protection of your guitar, this will do very well.  I do not know if it will fit other guitars.  I have heard that some are too long for it.  but.......for the Fender stat, it works just great., "musical_instruments"
I ordered this for my Jackson DKMG. This is my 1st Gator case, and I'm very pleased with it. It is similar to SKB and fits my guitar very nicely. Being lightweight is a big plus as well, and also the secure feeling of having a HSC. I will definitely buy this again for other guitars and highly recommend it. Just remember that this model is for standard type axes; Strats, Teles and such., "musical_instruments"
are hard to beat when it comes to durability. (except the steel ones).  I use it when I travel on a plane especially, "musical_instruments"
This Gator Case is very good, I'm use with a fender stratto and it is fit perfectly on this one., "musical_instruments"
This is the best case ever for the money!  I have purchased four other cases and none are as well constructed as the Gator Deluxe.  I like this case so much, I plan to purchase two more this week., "musical_instruments"
A friend and I have run across a luthier who makes some cool stuff as well as repairing/restoring older guitars. My friend had a Tele custom made for him and needed a case so I ordered this one and it hits the spot. The neck is cradled in there nice and the guitar doesn't move at all. My buddy likes the case so I am happy.Nothing gets 5 stars - there are no generals present., "musical_instruments"
I recently traveled across country carrying 2 similar guitars. One was in the SKB Fender case ($99.95 on Amazon), the other in this Gator case purchased locally.  I was told it was just as good as the Fender case. Both ended up in checked luggage.  After 1 flight from Florida to LAX and back (non-stop, minimal handling) the glue on the top section gave up.  The padding is now loose and the strap to keep the top from flopping completely open is dangling inside the case.  Neither guitar was damaged and the cases appear in fine shape, but after having the padding fall out, I just ordered another SKB Fender case.  The Gator will be re-glued and used only for local trips.  The SKB Fenders will be my airline cases from now on., "musical_instruments"
These stands are just what I wanted for my studio. I like them so much, that I own five. I like the easy access to my guitars for recording sessions, and I like being able to look at them too. The multiple guitar stands are probably safer for the stage and more economical with space, but these stands are perfect for me as I don't gig much anymore. I'm very happy with the solid build. Good, solid guitar stand., "musical_instruments"
Works perfectly for both my Martin dreadnought and my Fender Stratocaster.  Solid unit, good material and construction, though it is made in China apparently--but hey thats why its such a bargain!, "musical_instruments"
Sturdy guitar stand that works equally well for electric or acoustic guitars.  The stands are well padded where they will touch the guitar, and while the back support wouldn't scratch a guitar anyway, it's nice that it lines up perfectly with a strat scratch plate.  These stands are a lot sturdier than you would think by the picture - mainly because the guitar sits very low.  This low center of gravity makes it less likely tip when knocked.  The guitar is at a little more of an angle than I am used to with other stands, , "musical_instruments"
I don't know who designed the leg feature of this thing, but they need to go back to engineering school. When you unlock the legs to put them into their useable position, they're quite difficult to pop open, and once opened into place, you can see distinct spots where the paint has worn off, because the fit is too tight inside the upper body of the stand.It'd truly be nice to come across a good stand like this that used button locks to hold the legs in place, and that had more of an upright angle for the guitar. I just don't like the features of this stand at all., "musical_instruments"
I read the reviews of the few similar options. I went with this one because reviews of the competition talked about how far back the guitars lean. Not much of that complaint here. But this definitely has that problem.My guitar is quite stable leaning back less than a third of what this stand causes. So this can't go in several out-of-the-way places I had hoped would work. Also, I was hoping to use two of these close together for a compact 2-guitar rack. However, the angle makes that very awkward.I hope to modify it to work, but I'm not super hopeful at this point. Will probably have to manufacture something to replace it.., "musical_instruments"
These stands are truly amazing.  They function perfectly for both acoustic and electric guitars and take up very little real estate in a room.  They are incredibly stable and have a nice thick cushion at the top so the guitar won't get scratched., "musical_instruments"
Well built and solid stand.  It keeps the guitar well protected and looks nice too.  Some stands hold the guitar with only a hallowed little tube on the bottom, which breaks easily from the weight of the guitar.  This stand holds the guitar with two solid metal bars, which should last a long time.  It can hold both acoustic and electric guitars.  Highly recommend it., "musical_instruments"
This is a pretty good stand and is relatively robust for its compact size.  Opens easily and folds up to a fairly small footprint for storage/transport, and it cradles the guitar nicely.Two minor issues:1) Personal gripe - the git leans back a bit more than I would like.  Makes it more difficult to hug a wall and ends up taking more 3D space than it really needs.2) Product gripe - the two footer bars are not quite level with each other, so it rocks just a little bit.  However, with a solid body electric on it, even a little rocking can be a really bad thing.I like OnStage and own several of their products.  They are well constructed and a good value so I have no doubt I was just unlucky with this one.  I've been applying a little persuasion to even it out and it's getting better, but with the relatively robust construction it just doesn't want to give much.  Kinda sucks that it's not level out of the box, so 4 stars., "musical_instruments"
Very sturdy stand suitable for stage use. This stand even accommodates a double neck. Its not very compact when folded but I'm still giving it 5 stars., "musical_instruments"
very well made of heavy metal framework.  has a very solid base.  the neoprene sleeve is thick and soft enough to protect your guitar.  the top neck clasp keeps the guitar from tipping forward and the quick release really works.  probably the best stand., "musical_instruments"
After 35 years of buying stands all I can say is that I should have invented it myself. I have many expensive guitars and I wouldn't use a inexpensive stand before I found this design. So if you're shopping and wonder if it's really good, you can trust me, because I'm way over qualified to pass judgement on this and I care about guitars and about Amazon shoppers., "musical_instruments"
Have had one for years.  Has survived many gigs and rehearsals, and many months in the trunk of my car.  Harsh environment!, "musical_instruments"
After trying out a few other styles and brands, I settled on this stand, wanting something that would keep my 50s Telecaster from taking an unexpected fall. , "musical_instruments"
I use this stand to hold my yamaha electric guitar.It works perfectly.Super stable and doesnt take up much space.For the price I don't think it can be beat., "musical_instruments"
This does what you expect, it stands up a guitar. What can else can be said? It has a swing lever that keeps the instrument an an unfortunate accidents. It is portable, folds up easily for storage. I usually have a guitar on it all the time., "musical_instruments"
I've bought 4 of these over the past couple of years.  I wanted a stand that is pretty solid but also had a clamp to hold the guitar that I could use one handed.  It gives me piece of mind that somone won't just brush up against a guitar and damage it.  I've noticed that it has been backordered on several sites, so I expect that there are a lot of other people who really like it too., "musical_instruments"
Totally perfect for holding my guitar!  Super sturdy, easy to put in/take out!  Wide enough stance that you don't have to worry about it falling over on carpet!, "musical_instruments"
This is a good stand that can be used for both electric and acoustic guitars. The upper brace has an interesting way of securing the guitar neck making it unlikely your instrument will topple over. The stand can be used with or without the upper brace. On mine, the wheel that locks the upper brace in place is not as locking as I'd like it to be. Also, the &#34;feet&#34; don't spread as wide apart as I'd hoped. A few more inches would have been appreciated. All in all, a good but not &#34;perfect&#34; stand., "musical_instruments"
I don't like that I have to continually tighten the knob at the back of the stand to keep the neck rest from tilting or moving and eventually falling down. The solution? Tighten the crap out of it with a wrench until you get it very snug and it won't budge., "musical_instruments"
I've used three pop filters in my experiences with home recording and podcasting.  This one is the worst.  The plastic screw (yes, plastic) that is meant to grip the pole that you attach the pop filter to, is completely incapable of supporting it's own weight at nearly any angle.  Bad...just bad.Secondly, there is a metal piece that secures the flex arm to the clamp.  It seemed loose after I got it out of the packaging and the flex arm would wobble and rotate in that spot causing a major problem when it came to proper placement.  After twisting on it twice I stripped it out.  Now the thing is worthless.  I'm returning it ASAP.I would rather go to a lady's bag flea market sale with a crazy woman for a day than continue to put up with this thing.  Do yourself a huge favor and buy the Nady 6\" pop filter.  If you don't, you'll wish you did., "musical_instruments"
I use this everyday.  It has prolonged the life of my equipment and improved the quality of my vocal productions, "musical_instruments"
As stated it's a bit heavy which causes problems when used on a stand with a boom, but it's a decent product at a fair price., "musical_instruments"
Not easy to set up, hard to tighten down. Works well enough as a filter once you get it placed., "musical_instruments"
It's a good product, works well and does what it's meant to do.  I'm glad I bought it over the other main pop filter, as that one has bad reviews., "musical_instruments"
Frankly, I'd never heard of a \"pop filter\" until my popping p's and b's came into consciousness at the same time that this device popped into my field of view on an Amazon web page.  I'll bet that a couple of layers of women's nylon stockings would be just as effective, but this contraption pretty much purges your elocution of the offensive phonemes (they're called \"plosives\").  I'm still hearing the \"s\" phonemes (sibilants) along with some guttural artifacts (\"back\" vowels prefaced by an \"h\" that ignite a momentary gargling effect), but this filter doesn't purport to be able to do anything about those buggers.As for the price, after seeing the gooseneck, the base, the generous-sized screws, etc., I'm prepared to say that  this one is fairly valued (I doubt that the Shure or Blue pop filters, at almost double the price, offer anything more than brand-name status).  The hardware and build-quality are about as solid and heavy-duty as you could wish for.  (I know I'll never be able to blow it away.)  Unfortunately, the clamp seems designed to fit on a mic stand rather than a computer screen, which is almost a half-inch too thick., "musical_instruments"
You may wat to reconsider buying ANY filter.On this model, the top (filter) part is essentially pantyhose wrapped around a cardboard tube.Despite this, the clamp and adjuster parts are relatively good.In all honesty, Buy a nicer filter, or none at all. They do NOT make a huge difference on recording quality unless you're using Top-of-the-line microphones. If this is the case, spend the money to get a nicer filter.One nice thing- these keep artists from getting too close to the mic and essentially making out with them. I found that quality nice when dealing with... passionate vocalists., "musical_instruments"
Not much to it, does what it should, holds a standard mic. Pivots in 1 direction only. Not the best build quality in the world (actually fairly thin plastic) but for $5 what else can you ask for? Should last a few months at least., "musical_instruments"
I got this for my wireless mics but they don't fit in this holder. I got the wrong size holder. Other then that it is a good holder, "musical_instruments"
Not happy with the sellers description or the product. The description says \"Heavy Duty\" which makes you assume that it's a regular hard plastic Mic Clip, but it's not. IT'S RUBBER!!! It sucks. Used it a couple times and it's hard to slide the mic in and I can see after a couple more uses how it's probably going to need to be taped because the swivel will become very loos cause the rubber will wear down quickly, and flex. IT'S FLEXIBLE!!! Who uses Flexible Mic Clips?!!! Make sure you don't buy this and get a hard plastic clip instead., "musical_instruments"
Its poorly made with attention to detail. I ordered them to fit on my dual mic clamp purchased here at Amazon. But they will not screw down all the way and are losse. It is useless!!! Other mic holders from different manufacturers work fine., "musical_instruments"
What do you expect for two dollars. I use this on a mic stand i got for my rockband mics. It took a little bit to shove the mic in and its just plastic, but seriously what do you want for two dollars. Its solid and it holds a mic, the seller had it to me in a few days  before amazon got me my mic stand  if your not a serious on stage rockin mother ...... you cant go wrong here., "musical_instruments"
I've been buying gear from Alto Music since 1980. I've trusted them with my guitars, and they've helped me make the right decisions for my needs and budget. Last year, I bought a set of Fender Custom Shop Texas Specials directly from Alto's web site. Over the past year, I received a bunch of Amazon gift certificates and wanted to get myself a Shure SM7b. When I saw that I could get the mic from Alto Music, it was a no brainer. I was purchasing from my local music store through Amazon. As for the mic, it's an SM7b, and it's everything I was looking for, despite it being a low output mic. It's smooth, has a sexy low end color, has no harshness, brittleness, or high frequency unpleasantness that can occur with some condensers. I'm recording in an untreated basement, and this mic is perfect for when I'm singing loud rock stuff; it only picks up what's right in front of it and none of the room. I'm using a Focusrite 2i2, which is great for loud singing, but I'm picking up a Cloudlifter for some more clean quiet gain to use this mic on acoustic guitars and softer vocals as well. For me the mic has been all it's cracked up to be., "musical_instruments"
I use my Shure SM7B mainly for podcasting and voice work and it performs extremely well in those applications.  I also use aHeil PR-40 Dynamic Studio Recording Microphoneand you can check out that link for my review on that item. Both microphones are dynamic microphones and both give my voice a very warm, natural feel.One thing, well actually two things, the Shure SM7B has that the Heil PR40 does not is a set of two switches.  One for bass rolloff and one for mid-range emphasis / presence boost.  While both of these switches can be useful, I prefer to keep the mic flat and let any outboard processing / EQ handle adjustments that need to be done.  If you don't have outboard processing, both of these could be helpful to you as the bass rolloff really does help keep low frequency noises (for example, someone bumping the table) to a minimum and the presence boost does help certain voice ranges cut through the mix a bit better.When I reviewed the Heil PR-40 I said that it was the best bang for the buck out there and the Shure SM7B may be changing my mind a bit.  While the PR40 is about $70.00 cheaper than the SM7B here on Amazon at the time of this review considerations must be made to the fact that most PR-40 users will want to use a shockmount (about $100) and pop filter / windscreen ($15 - $60) to get the best results out of the microphone.  With the SM7B the shockmount is built into the microphone and does a surprisingly good job and Shure includes two different foam windscreens (one for normal use and one for ultra-close up use) with the microphone.  So the bottom line is the Shure SM7B with all the accessories is probably going to be less than the Heil.Another thing worth mentioning is that like the Heil PR-40 the Shure SM7B is built like a tank.  It is a heavy microphone and in my opinion just looks very cool whether it is mounted on a boom or on a desk stand.  Both microphones perform about the same as far as rejecting any off-axis sounds and both are excellent microphones for voice and podcasting applications.The SM7B takes a little more to drive it than the Heil PR-40, so you'll want to make sure that you have a decent mixer / pre-amp that can handle the microphone.The bottom line is the Shure SM7B is a very high quality microphone and I would highly recommend it.  If you're comparing it to the Heil PR-40 most likely the thing that will make the difference to you will be the aesthetic differences and the price because the performance of these two is very, very close., "musical_instruments"
You are looking at what I consider to be the best friend a voice ever had.  During a 40 year broadcast and voiceover career I have used (or been forced to use) every other large diaphragm studio mic on the planet along with the Shure SM7B and it's predecessors the SM7 and SM5.Large diaphragm dynamics have some notable advantages over condenser microphones for voiceover work and solo vocalists in multi-track studio work.  I've used over the years the Sennheiser MD421, EV RE20, EV RE27N/D, Shure SM7B, Shure SM7, Shure SM5 and most recently tried a Heil PR-40.  Sometimes this was not of my own selection, but I just used what was available.  Of the lot the Shure SM7B is my favorite of the ones still available.  The SM7B is a better shielded SM7 and the SM7B of today has a better shock mount than the old SM7 or earlier SM7B.  The shielding in the B model minimizes RFI from computer monitors, florescent lighting, radio transmitter proximity, etc.  The SM7 was a redesign of the SM5.  I consider the SM5 to have been the very best vocal dynamic microphone ever created but it hasn't been in production in ages.  I have used a few ribbon microphones that were also pretty good such as the RCA 77DX and RCA 44 but they were not as good as the SM5 or SM7 or SM7B.Today's SM7B is the best non-condenser vocal microphone still in production.  Stop looking and buy one.  You will not find a better microphone for voice work whether singing or spoken word.  It has a very controllable proximity effect, something that is missing from the EV's.  I can play a SM7B like a violin, the others I just don't seem to have nearly as much proximity effect to toy with for dramatic impact.Everything that is good about condensers for voice work is in an SM7B while everything that is bad about condensers for voice work isn't.DJ's change jobs a lot and I got tired of finding the EV RE20 & RE27N/D mics or the Sennheiser everywhere I went, so I bought my own SM7B.  I never liked the EV's or Sennheiser much and didn't ever feel like they were much of a tool.  The Heil PR-40 is pretty good but doesn't have any on-board EQ options.  For recording not having the EQ is probably no big deal as you can tweak it in post production but for live radio you can't do much of that.The SM7B is a tool for skilled vocal talent, so if you are trying to make a novice sound good you might do better with an RE27N/D but for someone who actually knows how to really work a microphone over then the SM7B is only dynamic large diaphragm mic I know of that can deliver everything a real voice artist has to give.  The reason is that this microphone is designed for one thing, voice work.  The others are more versatile, but the SM7B is \"THE VOICE\" microphone and that was all it was intended to be. It has however found secondary duty as a bass cab microphone and it is pretty good at recording some very loud and boomy sound effects, but it is primarily a vocal microphone.Of all the instruments that have ever been recorded or broadcast, the human voice is the most complex and difficult to capture reliably.  That is one reason vocals sound good on a $4,000 tube condenser microphone, since it can capture all the complexity, inflection and multi-frequency overtones of the human voice.  Unfortunately even these very best condensers also pick up lots of things you didn't intend and also have at least a trace of self generated noise.  If you are doing a dry voiceover you can't hide the hiss of a condenser under something else.  With the SM7B you don't have to.Even for singing this microphone is sort of a secret weapon that kids calling themselves \"Recording Engineers\" today are usually totally ignorant about.  They figure anything short of a multi-thousand dollar tube condenser microphone is inferior for studio vocals and this microphone proves them wrong.If you want a good all around microphone, this is NOT it.  If you want the best dynamic vocal microphone, here it is.  As others have mentioned the output needs a decent preamp but works with all the pro studio gear I've ever connected to it.  I think if you have some cheap USB interface then you will want to put another preamp in front of it and that will make it far more usable for recording whispers.  Most real studio preamps are a good match for it. I've plugged it into some real junky mixers and had it work too.  You need at least 60 dB of gain, the spec sheet actually says 59.  70 dB would be better. Lots is made of the \"LOW OUTPUT\" of -59 dB but it isn't all that much less than the Shure SM58 which is -54.5 dB! -4.5 dB isn't much at all for any decent mic preamp.  But again most of the \"one-box-solution\" USB interfaces with built-in mic preamps is probably going to need some help as they were designed with the hotter output of a condenser in mind.The Shure SM7B comes with the built in shock mount in the stand mounting and yoke attachments.  Every other large diaphragm dynamic has a shock mount made for it but it costs extra.  They all need an external windscreen but only the SM7B comes with one! I got mine 10 years ago when it still came with two windscreens.  It has a nice metal case for storage/travel.  I think now they just come with one windscreen which is the bigger one Shure calls the A7WS but still come in the metal case.  I use the smaller windscreen mostly and Shure calls them the RK345 and their distributors still carry them. The smaller windscreen makes the microphone more open and airy for me and I'd suggest getting one of the RK345's, but that is the only accessory you'll need to add.  The windscreens are held on by some little Velcro tabs but easily interchanged.  They are also very durable for foam screens.On the back end of the tube is a round plate you remove with a hex key and under the plate are multiple EQ adjustments for Flat/Bass Rolloff/Presence Boost settings that you can fiddle with to get the sound you like best. You can just leave the plate off if you want. This is easily the most EQ flexibility of any large diaphragm dynamic.So I'm just adding my two cents worth here and joining the others who pretty much all agree this thing rules for voice work.  I should have written this review earlier but wanted to try the new Heil PR-40 first to make sure I was still an SM7B guy and it took a while for the Heil tryout to happen since I didn't want to actually buy one.  I still am an SM7B guy.  I would give it 4.5 stars but it won't let me do that, since there is nothing better right now in the class I rounded it up to 5 stars, but the SM5 was actually a bit closer to a 5 star vocal mic., "musical_instruments"
So I am a big fan of the SM57 Microphone as a vocal mic due to its ease of recording and good sound quality.I have a bunch of the Large Style Condenser Microphones (Rode NT1-A, AT2020, SP C-1) and they are clear, but so sensitive that it's difficult to get a solid performance and mix without them either clipping or picking up everything in the room. So if you're like me andlike to let go a bit when you sing, you should try a Dynamic Mic for the wide range and forgiveness they can giveyou when you belt a little.I did an A / B test against the SM7B I just bought and the SM57 (I love) for vocals - with the exact same processing chain, cable, settings, etc. and just switched the mics out. I sung the same passage as well, and I have to say - the SM57 sounds muddy in comparison to the SM7B. If I didn't have this new microphone I would still like the SM57, but the Genni is out of the bottle now... so not going back. The SM7B is clear and sounds sweet in comparison and still handles the vocal sound dynamics very well.DYNAMIC SINGERS ( Rock, Jazz, GOSPEL, OPERA )= If you have the budget get this SM7B and if you don't, buy the SM57 until you do have the budget.QUIET SINGERS (ACOUSTIC , FOLK ) = If you sing softly all of the time you really don't need one of these dynamic mics, and would be better off with the standard Large Condenser mics as listed above. Of those type, I like the Studio Projects C-1 Best I think, but they are close., "musical_instruments"
I can't do more than underscore the endorsement of this mic by the previous reviewer (FOX).  If you haven't started in the mic-collecting business, trying every trendy dynamic and condenser mic in the hundred dollar range and below, you might actually save some bucks by cutting directly to the chase and going for this one.  I've always wondered why I can't reproduce the sounds of our local NPR outlet, and I finally realize it's because they have the Shure SM7B and I don't.It enhances the voice with depth and richness and filters out the pops and unwanted percussives (face it, those separate pop filters are cumbersome to use).  It's very directional and \"selective\" (rejecting room ambience and background noise), so it's perhaps not the ideal mic for all applications.  But for announcing, broadcasting, vocal performance and vocal recording, I don't see how anything could possibly equal let alone surpass it., "musical_instruments"
What you need to know about this mic:1) This mic is very directional. You must keep your mouth in the sweet spot at all times for best results. Pulling back an inch gets into tinny muddy territory, and an inch too close makes for a strong proximity effect. I found that a palm's width from the tip of the mic works best. As long as I keep my mouth there, the results are predictable and good regardless of the room I'm in. Also if the mic is aimed too low on your face (like at the lower lip or chin) you'll sound like you have a stuffy nose. Aimed too high (like at the bridge of the nose) sounds sneering and nasal. Right at the upper lip works well for me.2) The bass cut and presence boost are convenient. Use a plastic thing like a guitar pick to switch them, as metal will scratch it. I've played around with the switches and in the end both set to flat was best. Initially I thought the presence boost was a good idea, but in a mix it made my vocals too honky in the upper mids. Flat's where it's at. Flat sounds most natural.3) Being a dynamic, it won't sound as open and airy as a condenser might. Though it takes EQ well, and you can EQ that in. If you remove the foam and use a pop filter, you do get more highs, but after working with that for a while I realized it doesn't always sound right, seems to unbalance the highs above 5k toward sibilance a little too much, but it might work for you. After using it for a few years, I learned that starting with a bad mix that is too bright or blaring and then adding in the SM7B on vocals causes the mic to appear dull and muffled, but really it's the mix that's the problem. Whereas if I start with the vocal sound and make it clear and natural, and build the mix around it, the mix turns out to have a natural sound that's not too bright or dull either.4) Yes, it rejects room sounds more than a condenser, but not gobsmacked amazingly so. It rejects what's behind and to the side, but in front it's pretty sensitive. So if you're singing with an echoey room behind you, it will pick that up. So don't think this will make you sound like you're in a dead control room, unless you actually are in one. Hang some blankets or acoustic foam behind you and you're set. Being that it records about twice as dry as a condenser, it takes reverb pretty well in a mix, meaning you can add reverb and delay without having your vocals drop too far away and undefined in the mix.5) So what does it sound like? The sound is *very* natural and true to my voice. It truly is a vocal mic first and foremost. That plus the dry/up-close characteristic are this mic's top selling points. It works fantastically on death metal growls and clean singing atop sparse/acoustic/clean backgrounds. It does have slight color in the mids; I agree with the frequency response chart indicating it has a slight scoop 400-900Hz, slight boost 1000-2000Hz, but it's still natural sounding despite that. The color is tailored to the voice: reduce the honky boxy mids, accentuate the main vocal intelligibility range. That's one reason why this mic is considered \"flattering\" on vocals. It still has body though, definitely not a thin sounding mic.6) This thing is heavy and rugged. The capsule is surrounded by this truncated cone-like metal screen enclosed on all sides. The screen is like the kind you see behind microwave oven doors. What I like about this mic is that I can throw it inside a bubble mailer or wrap it in a scarf for storage and not have to worry about crushing or damaging it, and it doesn't need a big case like some condensers and especially tube mics do. So it's actually compact in practice and quick to set up with one of those detachable mic adapter mounts. Even without the adapter, it has a convenient free rotating collar to screw it onto a mount/stand so that you can hold the mic in place while screwing it down.7) This mic needs 50 dB gain for loud singing, 55-60dB for quiet singing, 65-70dB for whispering. Make sure your preamp is designed for at least 60dB of clean gain. Some cheaper USB interfaces only go up to 35dB. If your interface lacks the juice, no worries, get yourself a CloudLifter and it'll add 25dB of nice clean gain and it's phantom powered too.Overall, I would prefer a condenser in a good room since it allows me to move a little more without coloring the sound, and because it has a more openness and air compared to this one. But since my room isn't perfect, this will do. The biggest pros are that it's natural sounding and that even with reverb and delay it stands out in a mix. It's especially good on spoken voice, as it was designed for, since unlike a condenser the SM7B does a very good job of not picking up as many mouth clicks, mouth noises, and background hissing.In the end, if I had to get rid of all my mics and keep only one for vocals for the rest of my life, it would be the SM7B. Mainly because I know I can conveniently use it anywhere, anytime, and get reliable good results.EDIT 2014:  Forgot to say, when you listen to mic shoot-outs on the net, often times the tip of the SM7B will be positioned the same distance as the condenser. This is a problem because the SM7B's diaphragm is actually back a few inches. So the condensers will be closer to the talent (or lack of talent) than the SM7B in such cases, causing the latter to sound more duck-ish, honky, un-detailed, or thin due solely to distance factors, and is thus not characteristic of the intrinsic mic color. In shoot-outs where the proper distance was used, you'd be surprised how much the SM7B sounds like a good condenser. It really does. Of course it may be missing air (or conversely, be less prone to sibilance) but as I said below you can *easily* EQ that in, since this mic takes EQ very well. Seriously, a 2dB shelf in the highs. Another thing I wanted to add, is that the gentle bump in the 1k to 2k region (for vocal definition) that his mic has, can sound slightly honky or strident or blaring depending on some sources, but again you can EQ that down a bit. And finally, when Shure says this mic has a flat response, that's not true, it has color and the frequency response charts show it. Yet, the color gives it a larger than life natural sound on voice, so it sounds natural even though it's not completely transparent and honest., "musical_instruments"
I bought this compression pedal to give my leads a little extra oomph and it does just that. When playing hammer-ons and pull-offs, sometimes it can be difficult to get them to sound as loud as the rest of your picking, but not when using this pedal. It amplifies your quieter sounds and levels off the louder ones to give a smoothe sound. Works great if used correctly. Not to be used with dynamic picking sounds because you will lose that louder/softer sound.I use this with a Gibson Les Paul, and Washburn Hollowbody through a Fender Super Champ amp along with other pedals.  It can cause some major feedback if using heavy distortion., "musical_instruments"
This is a great pedal to have in your setup, for those times you want a clean sound that will cut through the mix, yet will not just sound blaringly loud and undefined. I used a Boss compression pedal for many years, and the Dyna Comp was definitely a refreshing step in the right direction. It just sounds more organic, and less sterile than the Boss Pedal. I also think in this case, less is more, as far as the controls are concerned., "musical_instruments"
I don't know if its me, but i cant get any clean sound when this pedal is on, i use this for booster, really sounds good! use it too when i want to get feedback from my amp.also it comes with an anti slip sticker that you can put underneath the pedal.i recomend this one., "musical_instruments"
I like MXR products however I am always Leary of the metal button on pedals because of the possibility of the pop factor. The dyna comp does still equal out my sound from clean to overdrive. A must for pedal boards., "musical_instruments"
This compressor is a must have for my bass guitar rig and is used often in my other musicians' electric guitar rigs. It's very basic - two controls and one toggle - but gives quite a bit of punch and allows for a much stronger signal. Both my jazz bass and my Precision Bass sound great through this pedal., "musical_instruments"
I bought this pedal at a local shop and use it with both guitar and Bass. I usually put it before a distortion pedal and my original Phase 90, or use it as a standalone with an old amplifier to even out the signal. I do notice it is more effective with the guitar than bass, but that is typical. I usually do not turn the compression knob past 12 o'clock, but when using a chain of pedals, the compressor helps even out the lows and highs. The pedal seems to interact with a wah in good ways also. For the price, it seems like the best economical choice for compressor pedal out there and the MXR pedals are built like tanks. I have had this one and the Bass model for years and they hold up great while showing their age well., "musical_instruments"
Its OK, the adjust ability is not what i would like but it does have some uses and its built like a tank. i got this for free from my girlfriend who had it given to her from some old guy who told her it was a broken distortion pedal so i can't complain about it not being worth what i paid for it. i currently have this on my pedal board along with a Digitech MainSqueeze which is less expensive, more adjustable and just more versatile. would i buy this, yes if i didn't try anything else first. nuff said., "musical_instruments"
This stand is solid built, and for the price you cant beat it. The only minor problem I have it with it is that it begins to get a little wobbly once you start to bring it near it's max height., "musical_instruments"
I needed a couple of extra boom stands instead of a regular stand for a couple of my cymbalsand set these up and I am pretty happy with them.. They could have been a litte taller, howeverthere pretty good duty and do a good job for the money.  You could do better however you willpay quite a bit extra.  I would buy more if I needed them., "musical_instruments"
Durable, yet lightweight and sturdy. And, the price is right. Pacific hardware is excellent, right up there with Tama. I would buy this again., "musical_instruments"
Decent stand as long as you aren't abusing it. With any discount item, a few shortcuts were taken to keep the price in line. I don't plan on moving it so it works for me., "musical_instruments"
This is a great cymbal stand sturdy, tight, well made, using it with a 18&#34; crash and does not move or rattle, amazingly well constructed stand for the price, going to replace my other flimsy stands with a few of these, great product. I am not a giging drummer and do not take apart and dismantle the stand at all, but it is a great stand for my studio/practice kit. Being honest don't know how it would be for a gigging drummer, but for what I am using it for, more than does the job., "musical_instruments"
You can compare this to a pearl or any other popular stand ,your just not going to have the pay that hi price try it you'll like it !, "musical_instruments"
All of the PD/DW products I've bought have been amazing (from stands, to thrones, etc). This stand is an amazing value and provides a lot of flexibility when mounting your cymbals. Solid too., "musical_instruments"
Nice padded seat, well constructed. good padding for comfort, I go 190lbs.  Heavy duty base, lots of adjustment if needed. love Amazon, why shop anywhere else?, "musical_instruments"
I've seen Joey Jordison from Slipknot playing on a metal folding chair before, so i'm going to say right off the bat that you can play sitting on just about anything. It's pretty hard to make a crappy product when it comes to Drum Thrones, so with that I'm going to say you're either going to get a great product or something that you can't even use. In this case, you can look forward to getting a great product here! The stool is very sturdy, no rocking, no swaying, no moving at all. Very comfortable... in fact, my girlfriend grabs it to sit on every time she comes into my studio to hang out with me. Worth the money, great product!, "musical_instruments"
I needed a solid throne to replace my IKEA computer stool I've been saddled with for the past year. The stool is heavy, easy to assemble, and works as it should. I don't have any long term usage to report but I've seen reviews complaining the stool eventually loosens and will rotate which would be annoying if true. But at this fairly low price point you can't complain about much, and it's better than the real cheap thrones., "musical_instruments"
I sit. I drum. It works.  There's not much to say except that it get the job done very well., "musical_instruments"
I have found this throne to be comfortable for studio use and it seems to be solid enough for everyday use.  It is sturdy and heavy enough for the average player and the price is definitely right.  The padding is just about right and feels good and comfortable for the session times for which I have used it.  I don't know how it would hold up for touring or constant use, but it is perfect for my needs, as I am a guitarist who plays drums for demos in the studio., "musical_instruments"
This is actually a very sturdy yet light weight drum throne. The only issue I have is that the seat can swivel if not tightened properly, allowing the bolt to scratch the metal post (not a big deal)., "musical_instruments"
First of all, I use this as more of a 6 band EQ using the lower and highest more for LP and HP filters.  The middle four have the most dramatic effect on the tone.  You can also use this as boost box, using the gain and volume sliders.  The box is solid and fairly easy to manipulate on stage, but I tend to set and forget.In reviewing other posts maybe these bullets may be helpful.-If you turn your gain way up, you will have hiss.  Period, this holds true for any effect box or amp that has a gain on it that I have been exposed to.  Have a reason for upping your gain, if it is to add volume consider doing this on your guitar or amp.-EQ is to ENHANCE your tone, not create it!  A Strat cannot be made to sound like a Les Paul and vice versa.  Your tone is made up of many, many variables.  The resulting tone can be SHAPED or COLORED by adding or subtracting certain frequencies.  That is the function of an EQ, nothing more.  IT can range from dramatic to very subtle.  Very small changes can have large effects.  Small bumps in the higher range really enhance the harmonics I am able to produce.-I tend to put the EQ in much later in my effect chain, but feel free to experiment., "musical_instruments"
This pedal works well, and lets you sculpt a pleasing sound to suit the situation.  A little goes a long way with the sliders, and the gain and level functions are occasionally useful.  Nice accessory for a tube amp or an amp lacking good onboard eq.  It makes it much easier to dial in the exact sound you want, easier than messing with eq knobs that can interact with each other.Ten bands is a little overkill for guitar.  Three of them are outside the range of the instrument, but I bought this one because I like that it blinks if clipping, it has the extra volume and gain sliders, and comes with the AC adaptor.  This adds no noise that I can tell, except if the sliders are up it amplifies noise already there.It's an all around quality product that I imagine I'll still have twenty years from now., "musical_instruments"
as another guy said &#34;how could i live without this pedal before?&#34; i agree with that, i got two of these, one for my base guitar, one for my guitar.simply outstanding, simply the best. thank u mxr!, "musical_instruments"
I have a Fender Hod Rod Deluxe, and though it's got the Formel Electronics Mod... still needed a nice touch.This guy filled the need! Using the Effects Loop, no need of Volume or Gain, the sound is way much richer and definition for different types of guitars is beautiful., "musical_instruments"
Comes with Adapter.This thing controls your tone so well!!!!!Everything about it is just so much worth the money im starting to fall in love with MXR!, "musical_instruments"
I had never considered using an EQ pedal before seeing and buying this, but man....I was missing out! The ten bands are truly incredible in shaping a precise sound and is especially impressive when using distortion. Each band is hyper sensitive....five for tone (high/mid/low) and five for gain. Aside from providing exact sound control, it also boosts your volume a little and functions as an overdrive as well. If you dont use distortion though, you can still benefit highly from this pedal, as even the clean channels become more crisp and effects more pronounced. This is especially highlighted when using delay or chorus, but distinctly noticeable regardless. By far the most versatile pedal I have ever used. I cant imagine not using it now that I have it. One further note....you can run this through an adapter chain if you dont want to dedicate an outlet to this one pedal....but, it is really cool that the power supply is included with the purchase. Just ups the value even further. I really cant recommend this highly enough. I think every guitarist and bass player should own one.Enjoy!, "musical_instruments"
This is an always on pedal for me.It's at the end of my pedal board right before the BBE.It really allowed me to wake up the board - and I like the fact that I can adjust it on the fly if I don't totally agree with my tone that night.Very nice - built like a brick - every guitarist and bassist needs one of these whether you run a pedal board or not., "musical_instruments"
I like the sound and sensitivity these heads produce for the snare side of my snare drum. A work of caution though, like all snare resonant heads, these are very thin! They must be to produce the sensitivity in the snare wires required. But you must be careful. I tore a small hole in one of mine with the snare wires because the end of the snare wires were too close to the bearing edge. Not Remo's fault but it is something to pay attention to., "musical_instruments"
I put this on my Cheapo $300 drumset's snare, with a Remo CS on top, and my snare when from sounding like junk, to sounding great, for a cheap drum., "musical_instruments"
I bought it for my church and the drum sounds great... I love The quality and the sound... Buy it without doubts, "musical_instruments"
Just assembly for a try, only few rolls with music, it's had some hole on head, that's mean bad quality. buyer beware for this kind of., "musical_instruments"
We've been using Remo heads for years on our kits for our band that plays everything from Classic rock to Speed Metal.Great quality, very durable.You can buy Remo heads with your eyes closed., "musical_instruments"
all joking aside, these heads really are great. tune em right and you'll get a nice, warm tone from them that's unmatched with other brands, "musical_instruments"
I ran across this thing a few weeks ago and decided to give it a try.  I'd been looking for a boom attachment for a non-boom stand because I play guitar and sing.  This seemed perfect, and it is.  Regular booms have always been a necessary evil, in my book.  They can be helpful, but also take up too much \"air space\" on cramped stages or in small rehearsal spaces.  This thing gives you plenty of room to get the stand out of the way without making an annoyance of itself.  The other thing I like is that the elbow where it adjusts has teeth that interlock, so you're not just tightening a joint and relying on friction - as those are the kind of things that eventually fail once the tightening bolt gets tired.Anyway - no reservations about this one.  A dead-simple idea that works great., "musical_instruments"
This item works well for keeping the mic away from the stand allowing room for guitars. I tried a flexible goose neck but it was way too loose and would not hold the mic steady. The locking teeth on the adjuster firmly hold the stand in 1 position. The short extension in the picture is not on the unit I received but it really is not needed it works fine as delivered. I would purchase this unit again and again. It is a good piece and a good deal!, "musical_instruments"
This is a tough unit, easy to set and locks tight.  The materials are robust.In a home studio there is never a lot of room and I didn't want a big boom hanging off the other side of my mic stand.  This fit the bill perfectly.  On the package there is an illustration of this being used at the end of a long boom to hang a mic in the perfect possition, and yeah, one could totally do that with this.This is a simple device and no corners were cut in its manufacture., "musical_instruments"
This little gadget is perfect if you want to stand back from your mic stand just far enough to make it comfortable to play your guitar while you sing into the mic.  The usual solution is to get a boom to attach to your stand but this works and it's simpler, less expensive and takes up less space.  The pivot is controlled by a friction joint which you can adjust.  I wouldn't try to use it if I were a singing drummer, but for a guitarist, it's great., "musical_instruments"
Well built.  The adjuster end is deeply notched so it can be set for a wide range of angles in about 8 or 9 degree increments.  (10 possible positions between upright and horizontal)  Best for setting up drum mics as it would hold position better than a gooseneck. I'm using it in a vocal mic application as it pushes the mic a tad further away from the  stand to give  me a bit more room.  But there is no counter-weight here so its best used at shallow angles.  If I was playing a thicker instrument like an acoustic guitar, or if on-stage energy has you moving a lot more, I would opt for a boom stand instead., "musical_instruments"
One of my conventional booms just broke because of cheap plastic parts that couldn't handle the stress of being tightened repeatedly.  I came across these and after reading the reviews figured I didn't have much to lose with a $7 price tag.  I was very glad I made the purchase and I'm going to order a couple more of this model and the 13\" model.  It's steel construction except for the oversized nylon knob used to adjust the angle and hold the boom in place.  It's solidly built and I don't imagine it will break easily.  The two pieces that move against each other have teeth, so once the angle is set and the knob tightened, it will not slip.  Get the 13\" if you want to reach amps sitting on the floor from a conventional stand.  7\" is great because it allows you to sing with an acoustic guitar without the extra length., "musical_instruments"
I play guitar and it's necessary to have the mic angled toward me to sing. Long boom mics make small stages a bit hazardous to negotiate. This little boom gives me a way to get close to my mic without having a long boom cluttering up the stage. Great product!, "musical_instruments"
I bought this when I was doing sound for a party where we had acoustic musicians that wanted to be mic'd.  It really came in handy to mic a guitar and a mandolin..  I will be buying more of these!, "musical_instruments"
I'm quite happy with any of the \"On Stage\" brand stuff I have.  Like I said, this thing is solid, well built, good quality, and they thought of all the little features you need ... jamb nut at the top, little nylon tip on the thumb wheel so you don't scratch up your post ... just good stuff., "musical_instruments"
I use is this mount to support a Samson meteor mic. It works great. I would definitely buy this again. The mounting is designed to work on any diameter microphone stand. It has good positive adjustments even with a heavy mic on the end., "musical_instruments"
One thing I love about this extension bar is it will fit over the relatively large diameter down tubes on my hi-hat stands. I use anOn Stage Microphone 13-inch Gooseneckto connect to the bar, then I attach either aNady DM70 Drum and Instrument Microphoneor DM80 microphone. The bar-gooseneck arrangement is sturdy enough for that mic model.This also works well for mounting on microphone stands. I use it and a shorter gooseneck to mount the DM70 for tenor and alto saxophones, or a DM80 for baritones. Again, it works perfectly for my situations.I always keep a few of these, plus various size goosenecks, just in case I need to mount an additional microphone and I am short on stands. It's one more tool to make set up less stressful.Trust me, when you need one (and chances are you will if you're a drummer or a sound tech) you will thank yourself for having the foresight to purchase it for situations I cited above and those that I have not foreseen., "musical_instruments"
Really great clamp, fastens to a vertical pipe very securely, great quality. A very nice addition to my collection. I highly recommend., "musical_instruments"
I'm used to the mic extension that uses a short gooseneck.  Occassionally there are problems with this set up.  Then I saw these.  No more bendable problems, I really love these extensions., "musical_instruments"
Ive had good success with this piece.  I use it with a straight mic stand topped with a Shure Super 55 for vocals.  I put a Heil Fin on the boom arm to mic my tenor sax.  The arm allows for a variety of positions, and serves to eliminate a second stand just for the horn mic.  My only (small) &#34;concern&#34; is the length of the arm itself.  If it was a bit shorter, or adjustable, it would help offset the (potential) balance issue created from having a mic hang that far off the stand.  In my case,  I am using a heavy microphone, so I didn't rate down the product for this reason (as I know Im pushing the issue).  I doubt that if someone was attaching a lighter microphone to the arm, it would be a issue.  That said, it's a great way to get rid of a second unnecessary stand cluttering up your stage.  We ended up buying a total 4 for our stage and freed up a ton of floor space.  A highly recommended piece., "musical_instruments"
Haven't had this long, but so far, it's just about perfect. I had bought another On-Stage side boom earlier and was greatly disappointed by its flimsiness (On-Stage MY550 - see review). This one on the other hand is rock solid and much more adjustable, AND only costs a few bucks more (fourteen buckos at present). I've got a 13\" gooseneck and a light-ish condenser mic with a shock-mount on it, and it's as steady as can be. I'm convinced even heavier loads will be no problem. If you're in need of a side boom, look no further., "musical_instruments"
I use this to position my iPad a way so that it's out of the sight-line of the audience, but it's also great for mic-ing drums. Sturdy, flexible and well designed. Lots of metal where there needs to be metal. Buy a few, you'll be glad you did., "musical_instruments"
I was very skeptical to buy a Wuhan china because ive had bad experiences before and their quality control is almost non-existent.That being said, the china I received is amazing its a nice thick little cymbal and has a great sharp tone and fast decay.My opinion of Wuhan has been raised quite a bit., "musical_instruments"
If looking for that oriental sound, this is it.  Nicely made.  Some folks expect something different, I suspect.  It is not a cymbal that you use like a crash or ride, it is more like a splash and at that it is for use for a particular sound.  Highly recommend,  And when I bought it was very well priced - like half what I could find used  (and this was NEW!)., "musical_instruments"
Think it sounds like a trash can lid? No, it doesn't. It sounds like a crappy china which has it's place (in the rehersal studio for one...). Want a really good china? Spend more money. That's how it works. Great for practicing. Small diameter gives it a shrill overtone. Poor on recordings (unless you're looking for that... there's always an application). For $20 though, c'mon. What do you want? Anyone giving it less than 3 stars is a pretentious wad. It's $20. It was made in the remote hills of Wuhan China where they've been making cymbals of sorts for more than 3,500 years and you got one for $20. Or go buy a K Kustum and quit your sniveling. I say get one! get them all in all sizes and you still spent less than an actual professional china. boyah., "musical_instruments"
Any size Wuhan china sounds great. This little 12-inch model is high-pitched, but has that trashy Wuhan sound. I prefer Wuhan to any Zildjian, Paiste, or Sabian china., "musical_instruments"
I was in a local music store the other day and noticed a huge stack of these cymbals, with a few examples mounted on stands to try. While they're not as rich as Zildjians or Paistes or other more expensive cymbals, they do have that trashy sound that you look for in a China. And at the asking price, who can resist?, "musical_instruments"
wow haha!! this china...really packs a punch haha!! I got this china and was blown away by it. my band loves it, the crowds love it, and most importantly it is very loud and trashy. great for hardcore drummers, "musical_instruments"
What can I say that has not been said before about this excellent cymbal?.... great choice to add some trashy color to my cymbal set up (all Wuhans because they are cheap and blow away most of the big boy companies). One thing that surprised me was how BIG the sound was and how nice it cut right thru my other cymbals. You cannot beat this price or quality of this cymbal. Placed it on top of my 18' crash and it looks great!!!, "musical_instruments"
We live in an age of endless boutique guitar effect pedals.  One could make a very expensive hobby of collecting only high dollar dirt pedals.  It's not unusual to see an online review and think a pedal sounds good then find out that it costs $150, $200, $250, $350...whatever.  There are a LOT of really expensive distortion/OD pedals out there.I've had my Bad Monkey for about 7 years, after hearing good things I took a chance and gigged with it for many years.  I rarely use a lot of gain on most pedals, just because those fuzzier tones can easily get lost in the mix.  I generally use the Bad Monkey for mid-gain crunch tones, and for that it's just fantastic.Having two tone controls makes all the difference.  This pedal is Tubescreamer-esque, but not as midrange-heavy as a TS.  Anyway, this thing sounds great.  Excellent classic rock and lead tones.The things it WON'T do: 1) a clean boost.  It has plenty of output, but there's always a little bit of dirt in the signal, so it can't be used as a pure clean boost.  2)  it won't clean up when you turn your guitar down...or at least not much.  No dialing in a crunch tone then turning down your guitar volume for a clean rhythm tone.  I have a Barber LTD which does that beautifully.But, despite those limitations, the Bad Monkey is awesome.  At the very least it can be a great \"throw in your case to take to a jam\" pedal, but it's worth having on your pedalboard, as well., "musical_instruments"
This is a very good TS type pedal at a great price.  The ability to adjust treb and bass is nice.  The enclosure is metal, the knobs feel sturdy, and the switch has a durable feel.  This is an analog pedal an the only Digitech pedal I've ever contemplated keeping.  I ordered this pedal through Amazon and had it for a few days but ultimately sent it back because it was redundant in my arsenal.  If you don't have a TS type pedal this is a good, cheap choice. Personally, I didn't think it sounded any better (or worse) than my other TS type pedals (Behringer TO800,Joyo Vintage Overdrive,Deltalab TO-1,TS808 and TS7).  As I indicated, I have the tubescreamer sound well covered lol.  I opted instead for the Dano Cool Cat transparent overdrive and I am very happy.  If you don't have a TS type overdrive and are thinking about dropping a bunch of cash on a TS808, you may want to check this out first., "musical_instruments"
I've had this pedal for about five years.  I own a bunch of other overdrive pedals, including the Boss SD-1, TS-9, a Klon clone, and a bunch of DIY pedals.  The Bad Monkey is cool for a couple of reasons.  First is the bass and treble controls.  Most overdrive pedals only have one tone control, the Bad Monkey lets you sculpt both the highs and lows.  Second is the mixer out.  Not everyone will appreciate this feature but it allows you to jack the pedal into a mixer or audio interface with a \"speaker sim\".The gain sound is ok, but what I do is use it as a boost by diming the output and turning the gain all the way down which slams my tube amp giving me a natural tube overdrive.  This pedal will work best with a tube amp but some people may dig the gain tone on a solid state.It's built like a tank.  Can't go wrong for the price, IMO., "musical_instruments"
This is purely an overdrive pedal, not a distortion pedal.  It increases the gain and dirties your tone, but it does not actually distort your sound.If you're a metal or hard rock player, don't buy this.  It's better suited for country, soul, R&B;, blues, or even jazz players who want to boost their volume and umph when they're doing a solo.  For that it's excellent, especially considering its very low price.And despite its very low price, it's very solidly built.  It's like a brick.This update is to point out that I've only used the Bad Monkey pedal with tube amps: A Fender Blues DeVille 4x10 and a Line 6 Spider Valve HD100 MK II running into an Ampeg 4x12.  I have no idea how it'll sound with a solid state amp.  But it sounds great with a tube amp.This update is to point out that I finally tried it with a solid state amp and it sounds pretty darn good.  I recently bought a 100 watt Fender Mustang III combo to use as a practice amp.  It perfectly compliments my Fender Blues DeVille 410/Fender Mustang floorboard combination.  As I've said, I use the Bad Monkey as a boost for soloing.  Whether I'm playing clean or dirty, the Bad Monkey gives my guitar a rich/deep/great sounding boost.This update is to reiterate how awesome this pedal is.  I rarely play directly through any of my amps, e.g., Fender Hot Rod Deluxe, Blues Deville, Super Champ x2 or Ampeg B25, I'll turn down the gain on the Bad Monkey and use it for a much fatter \"clean\" sound.  It's just so thick, like texas chili with lots of umph.  You've got to get this pedal., "musical_instruments"
I love this pedal. I bought one used at GC the other day for $30 and never looked back. Before it I was using a Joyo Vintage OD that is also an excellent 808 Clone but this pedal is able to tweak the highs and lows better. I have it set so the level is set to 9:00, Low is set to 1:00, High is set to 9:00 and the Gain is set to next tuesday. I prefer a beefier tone with a little less highs and it does that. It also is a nice smooth OD not too crunchy.For a cheap 808 clone this is the best I have used hands down.Maxon 808 - $150Ibanez TS9 - $100Digitech Bad Monkey - $60Joyo Vintage OD - $50All great pedals for the money but not really sold that the Maxon is 2 1/2 times better., "musical_instruments"
This pedal makes my Les Paul sing.  Better than I imagined, even with all the good reviews.  Such a wide range of sounds; warm jazzy boost, great blues overdrive, and almost some Black Sabbath distortion.  Makes my crappy Behringer amp sound... almost good., "musical_instruments"
I think that this pedal is a good value as an overdrive pedal but its speaker simulated 2nd output makes it a great value as a stand alone guitar preamp!I plugged it into my DAW and listened on my KRKs and was impressed by its sound.  The overdrive is quite good.  No, it can't hold a candle to my J. Rockett Pedals Alan Holdsworth Signature Overdrive but at $48.00, it's an absurdly good buy., "musical_instruments"
While I don't have a ton of experience with pedals, I really love this one. Keeps your guitars tone but you can add some fatness and a mild to fairly substantial crunch and adds some nice sustain. Although this is a tube-overdrive I actually think it sounds better with my solid state amp. It is nothing real drastic but that is exactly what I was looking for, a nice robust boost while keeping your guitar tones integrity. For the price I don't see how you can beat this pedal. I also have a Digitech Jam Man and it is awesome. No complaints with this outfit., "musical_instruments"
More knobs are not always better.  In the case of this pedal, the controls are really sensitive, there's a pretty big mid hump that's hard to dial out, and the low end control can make things really boomy, or add a little chunk to the sound.  You can do a lot with it, but I struggle to find what it does best, because it doesn't really do edge of distortion well (it doesn't clean up), and it's not a really high gain distortion pedal, but it can just add a bit of tightness, hair metal mids, or thump to a standard OD sound.  Basically, if you have your amp set for 70s rock, you can stomp on this and get Motley Crue or maybe Bark at the Moon era Ozzy.Like a tubescreamer, this thing lets a little bit of the clean signal through so you hear the distorted guitar mixed with clean signal.  The circuit design is nothing like a tube screamer, but it can work as a substitute ( I think if you wanted the tube screamer sound, theJoyo JF-01 \"Vintage Overdrive\" Pedalwould be better just for simplicity sake and being more of a clone).So it's not bad, but its just not on the level of boutique pedals and their clones.  If you get tired of it, give it to your bass player or try it with a bass for an interesting tone., "musical_instruments"
If you listen or read what many pro guitarists and techies have to say about DigiTech effects pedals, they'll tell you to stay away from them...except for this one.  That's because the DigiTech Bad Monkey Tube Overdrive is an incredible value that could go head to head with any pedal made by BOSS or the $100 TS-9 Tubescreamer.In fact the TS-9 Tubescreamer is the pedal the Bad Monkey is best compared to.  This is not meant to be a heavy distortion pedal with endless game - it simulates and overloaded tube amp that adds crunch and a little gain to an otherwise clean tone.  Notes will sing and chords will really crunch, especially in blues and classic rock.  But since the pedal works well as a level/gain boost, I've heard of guitarists turning on the Bad Monkey in conjunction with other distortion effects, to really push them to new levels.But the best feature of the Bad Monkey by far is the two-band EQ.  Virtually any distortion pedal has a \"Tone\" control that will make the tone darker or brighter.  But since one band EQ basically takes away bass to add treble (or vice versa), you may not find the sound you want.  That's what's so great about the Bad Monkey - if you feel like your tone is too weak, you can fatten it up.  If it's too muddy, you can add treble.  And you can make those changes without compromising the parts of the tone that you like.Construction is extremely durable - die cast metal, and probably heavier than a BOSS pedal.  The switch is more similar to a BOSS than an Ibanez pedal, but I find that easier to use.If you're a beginning player or a player on a budget, this would be an outstanding pedal to own, along with a more traditional high gain distortion pedal.  There's really no need to spend the extra money on a Tubescreamer, if that will prevent you from buying something else you need for your gear.  But even for player where money is not an object, don't overlook the Bad Monkey.  It might just be the only tube overdrive pedal you'll need., "musical_instruments"
This pedal is beyond loud. It's to the point where if you crank this pedal with a 15 watt amp with an 8&#34; speaker, you will get noise complaints from the end of your neighborhood. To match it up with the clean tone that I get out of my amp, I have to set the level in between 1 and 2., "musical_instruments"
I have a Boss OD which I realize now matches well with my little Vox tube amp, so I use this Bad Monkey pedal when I go direct for low level or headphone playing. Good price, good tone, pretty versatile, but I like the mid boost and harmonics I get from the Boss. The BM might work better with solid state., "musical_instruments"
it is not a replacement for a TS 808 or 09 but it has its own tone and overdrive which works good enough., "musical_instruments"
The BAD MONKEY overdrive pedal does not produce \"Crazy Train\" metal distortion. It isn't made to, and thus if you buy it for that sound you're off target. (If that's the sound you want, I recommend: DigiTech TL-2 HardWire Metal Distortion Extreme-Performance Pedal.) What the BAD MONKEY produces is delicious, bluesy overdrive at a highly competitive price (it currently sells for $49.95 here at Amazon). Unlike so many overdrive/distortion pedals, the BAD MONKEY has independent (and sensitive) dials for treble (\"high\") and bass (\"low\"), and using them can greatly affect the resulting sound; they are by no means token dials. In particular, the bass dial can be used to increase bass to an amazing degree (especially when using double-coil pickups); it's easy to achieve a \"fat\" sound with this pedal. The pedal does not come with, but does accept, an external power supply (i.e., an adapter). It can also be powered with a 9V battery, which is installed under what's literally the pedal portion (just as in BOSS pedals). The BAD MONKEY is made of metal and can be used as a weapon if so needed. It seems extremely rugged, again like BOSS pedals. I have several overdrive/distortion pedals, but I find myself turning to this one again and again. My impression of the BAD MONKEY is based on using it with [i] an Ibanez guitar with good double-coil pickups, [ii] an Ibanez guitar with good single-coil pickups (similar to \"soapbar\" style, or P-90, pickups), and [iii] a Fender Mustang II amp. It works well with both single- and double-coil pickups. If I lost my pedal, I would order another right away. I've been playing for over 30 years and can say with confidence that this is a great pedal., "musical_instruments"
I like the sound of this pedal and the ability to get the right over drive sound I want. I've used it with my reissue 70's Fender Strat plugged into my 1968 vintage Marshal 50 watt head and a slanted 4 cab. Love the sound. I am also using this pedal with my Ibanez GB 10 arch top jazz guitar and I am amazed with how good of an over drive I can get!! I've also owned a tube screamer, but I like this one better!!, "musical_instruments"
I've tried to like this pedal, I really have.  Maybe it's my signal chain (?)  My experience with the DigiTech series is that they suck the tone out from your guitar.  Sure, the OD is there, but it isn't worth losing your tone, is it?  Again, I reiterate maybe it's just me.  I have been messing around with signal chains for almost 3 decades now.  And the blue pedal isn't any different, either IMO.  Grunge was OK, but not my kind of style., "musical_instruments"
Virtually eliminates all outside sound, allowing you to dial in a comfortable volume during rehersal and recording sessions.  Nice, flat response., "musical_instruments"
Mixed my band's album with these headphones - the sound quality is impressive in all ranges, and they have a very respectable bass response. They're also great for drum practice, as they block out the loudness of the drums so I can hear my metronome perfectly. They're also awesome for live recording use as a monitor. I will definitely be purchasing several more of these in the future., "musical_instruments"
They cancel out sound just like they say they do and are comfortable. I have to take my glasses off when I use them, but other than that exactly what I thought they'd be when I ordered them., "musical_instruments"
These do a great job at passively eliminating noise while allowing you to hear your metronome (or a mix from a soundboard) perfectly.  They are certainly worth the price., "musical_instruments"
Price:Very reasonable price for what they do.Comfort:These stay on your head very well and are comfortable, I have not noticed ear irritation yet.Noise reduction:These are absolutely stellar at noise reduction. These block so much sound, you no longer have to blast your music to hear over your drums. They also don't distort out side sound. Some over ear headphones distort outside sound horribly.Sound quality:Crisp mid and high range. When it comes to the low end, these are lacking. And if you blast your music the low end distorts. But they block sound so well you don't have to blast them.Why not just buy in ear head phones, and over ear muffs?I have tried this many times due to not being able to find good head phones. It is very annoying, doesn't work very well, and looks pretty dumb too. These head phones are a much better solution., "musical_instruments"
I got these for noise reduction, barking dogs, loud trucks etc. They work well for that. The only drawback is that they fit very tight on my head. After a time the pinch is bit much. I have a small (7-1/4) hat size too. However, the price was great, and the sound is good. I'm no audiophile, but do play guitar, mando and dulcimer, and for me these phones deliver a good, well rounded sound.One other thing, these headphones are made for the studio, not for outdoor use.So, if you can deal with the pinch, I highly recommend these headphones for noise reduction and sound quality., "musical_instruments"
UPDATE 12/6/2013: The very latest Vic Firth phones have a MUCH-improved headband and less-bulky earcups. While I now prefer the latest Direct Sound EX-29s (a vast improvement over my original DS cans, mentioned below), the Firth's are still VERY good and, as a bonus, cost half as much. I still use both brands.Please remember to carefully monitor your SLP (volume) level with ANY isolation phones. Without background noise for reference, one can easily play them too loudly which, in turn, can lead to hearing loss over time.UPDATE 4/23/2010: I now own three pairs of Vic Firth isolation headphones and I'm happy to report the original pair is still going strong. Meanwhile, my office setup now consists of two ART Tube MP units...carefully adjusted to add little/no volume to the signal path (unity gain)...as a vacuum tube buffer stage between a Behringer U-Control UCA-202 DAC and a small Behringer Eurorack UB-502 mixer to provide silky-smooth state-of-the-art amplification for the Vic Firth isolation headphones. The resulting sound is absolutely top-drawer and completely belies the incredibly low price....about $150 total...I paid for the entire system. Affordable technology in the service of great art!UPDATE 2/3/2009: These bullet proof headphones have definitely stood the test of time. I now own two pairs of Vic Firth headphones. The newest pair live in my gym bag. Both pairs have survived abuse that would make lesser instruments crumble (e.g. getting tangled in the crank of a spin trainer or knocked onto a cement floor by my cat).BONUS TIP: Because these are full-sized headphones with large ear cups, I frequently use them in conjunction with the new Hearos High Fidelity \"full audio spectrum\" ear plugs (&lt;$15). The combo works in much the same the way Dolby noise reduction does. I play my MP3 player (or other signal source) 12 decibels louder and the ear plugs then attenuate 12 decibels...leaving me with the same music and way less background noise. This stuff may not fit your head/ears as well as it fits mine, but you might try it if you're so inclined.ORIGINAL REVIEW: How does an ADHD adult maintain focus in a busy, high-tech work environment? Soothing music is part of the fix. Active noise canceling headphones? I've tried and replaced several...but they either sound badly, are prone to electrical/mechanical problems, or both. What to do? Vic Firth and Direct Sound have effective and durable answers. Isolation headphones. I own and use them both. The Direct Sound phones block a bit more noise...the Vic Firth are more comfortable for extended wearing. Both have excellent sound quality. Enjoy!, "musical_instruments"
these do a good job of isolating out the sound.  They work very well.  Would recommend it to other people, "musical_instruments"
these things muffle sound great.  they have good sound quality.  perfect for recording loud drums. perfect for drowning out people, "musical_instruments"
Works perfectly.  Nice feel to it and seems sturdy.  You just have to remember not to turn on the keyboard with your foot down otherwise it switches polarity and does the opposite of what you want it to., "musical_instruments"
This is an inexpensive, sturdy sustain pedal that I immediately buy every time I get a new Yamaha keyboard - This pedal feels very similar to the damper pedal on an acoustic piano - much better than any footswitch. Only issue is that due to the way different manufacturers configure plug polarity, it may or may not work properly with non-Yamaha keyboards..., "musical_instruments"
Great accessary for Yamaha keyboards. Fits and works well. Very adequate construction, should last for many hours of playing at home or out!, "musical_instruments"
I bought this pedal to replace one that was not working with my Yamaha Motif, simple and easy set up, just plugged it in and it worked fine, no complaints. It's great to have sustain again on my keyboard again. Well constructed pedal, a nice addition to my recording studio. This pedal works with the Yamaha Motif, that was my main concern when ordering. No other review stated that, so I figured I would mention for the next guy or gal who orders as that caused my some anxiety when ordering ( I hate returning things...LOL),, "musical_instruments"
I am a professional musician, keyboard player, and keyboard collector (mostly vintage poly analog, but also a ton of mono phonics, modulars, and built your own kit units (shrugging, ambik-) etc - not that that has a lot to do with a pedal, however, I do live the life of a person surrounded by keyboard instruments that I use to make my living.  have purchased every brand and style of pedal (for the purpose of this, we'll stick with sustain.).Compared to other units, it is heavier than most and I find the point where sustain engages to be just about right comparing electronic to acoustic.  It is just an on/off switch, so no half modeling here,The only reason I gave this unit 4 stars instead of 5 is because Yamaha decided not to include a polarity switch and alienate perhaps 20% of the market who will get home and , if they hadn't thought to check, may be stuck wi a pedal that sustains when not being used and stops sustaining when pressed.  A backward sustain pedal is not fun.  Many manufacturers include a simple polarity reverse  switch that would eliminate that potential headache.These days, most keyboards have the option to switch polarity internally either thru a global bemusement or by sensing whether the pedal is engaged at startup and adjusting accordingly (never press the sustain pedal while turning your keyboard on, you may very well cause an issue you don't expect and are confused by - turning on and off again without the pedal depressed will clear everything up in those cases.)So - build quality, excellent.  Durability - excellent (I've had a bunch of cheaper pedals - used on stage - break  at the switch point or at the jack), this Yamaha endures.  Design - some older pedals used to have a flip out rubber footrest that was supposed to make the pedal more secure- I don't see that much anymore, but, so long as you aren't on glossy hardwood, this will stay I place with no issue.I've read a few reviews that give this pedal a bad rating because of what appears to be a change in a global setting on a keyboard, or something similar,  All a sustain pedal consist of is a momentary contact switch, engaged when contact is made by depressing and completing the circuit, and disengaged when the pedal is released.  There are no electronics - so - if it doesn't work, there are three points to look at 1) unscrew the jack and be sure that the wires coming from the pedal are all  connected to the metal posts inside the housing. There are usually two wires of differing color.  if one is disconnected, the pedal will cease to function (and, in rare instances, cause the keyboard to sustain all notes indefinitely.  This is easily corrected with a soldering iron and a bit if solder - jacks are points of strain so it isn't inconceivable that a wire could come disconnected. 2) The switch itself it either out if adjustment or is damaged.  The switches in the Yamaha pedals are of good quality and unless you received a faulty part, would be unlikely to wear out with normal use. I have, however, needed to take the pedal apart and made an adjustment.  this was easy and a quick fix, even with limited tools.  The third option is 3) the keyboard has had a change in a global setting causing the pedal t operate in reverse.  This can be corrected by consulting your owners manual and reading whether your keyboard has a software polarity &#34;switch&#34;, if it senses on startup, or if you pedal simply stopped working altogether - doing nothing At all - it is #1 or 2 or a problem with the jack on the keyboard (HIGHLY unlikely,,but I've seen it happen.). Hopefully this helps some who have posted questions.To conclude - a nice pedal for the money, much better build than the m-audio (decent, just not as nice as the Yamaha - certainly not a bad unit)/on stage (if they can't get most of their mic stands right, I don't trust them with even basic electronics...) or generics., "musical_instruments"
Does what it should and Yamaha quality.  The price seems very good for what you get out of this pedal.  I am using on a Yamaha board., "musical_instruments"
My first guitar ever, I am happy with it. I read great reviews here and the price seemed good. It is a slightly darker color than the picture, as others have mentioned. And the top part isn't pink like the pic, also as others have mentioned. It still looks pretty. I did as another reviewer suggested and replaced the strings with extra light ones (to minimize finger pain) I ordered \"d'addario EJ15-3D phosphor bronze acoustic guitar strings, extra light\" in a package of three sets. And I like those strings better. The color is nicer (though the originals weren't rusty, they looked new-- others have said their strings were rusty but mine weren't) but most importantly it's easier for a beginner like me to play with lighter (thinner) strings.I might also do what someone else said and lower the string height by filing down that one part (I am a female and it's already hard enough to press down the strings cause my fingers are shorter than a man's, especially bar chords), but for now this is fine.I also ordered \"dava 6024 grip tip\" guitar picks, they are nice. And I got a \"kyser 6-string capo\" in gold and that works well. And I got a \"planet waves acoustic guitar quick release system\" add-on for my guitar strap to provide more security than the just tying a string to the neck. The strap I got was a Levy's with pretty floral pattern which is comfortable. And I got a \"planet waves pro winder\" string winder/cutter which came in handy for re-stringing. And I bought an acoustic guitar gig bag which I haven't tried yet. And I keep the guitar sitting on an \"on stage xcg4\" guitar stand. And I got a string cleaner by fender.So I write all this in case you were a beginner like me and had no idea what to buy along with your new guitar. I'll be using mine to sing with, so that's why I needed a capo cause many songs I sing need a capo. I use a lot of youtube tutorials to learn how to play, and also find tabs/chords on \"ultimate-guitar\" website. I can tune my guitar for free from using the program on garageband (a music recording program that comes on mac computers) and on garageband there is also a great guitar tutorial video lesson series which has been helpful. I am very satisfied with my purchase. It came in a big rectangular box and inside that box was another one that looked like a coffin! Haha it made me laugh. And inside that was my lovely new guitar., "musical_instruments"
I bought this guitar about 2 years ago and I have played tons of different acoustic guitars from Taylor to Fender and more. This is by far the nicest acoustic guitar I have played. The action is very low and the guitar stays in tune very well. I love the chrome tuners and this guitar stays in tune for far longer then any of my other guitars. Additionally, this is my favorite guitar and I would recommend this guitar to anyone wanting to play acoustic. This guitar could very easily pass as one of the 1000 dollar guitars. The guitar has no finish which I prefer because when you are done playing your guitar is not covered with oil smears from your hands. I love Takamine for producing such a beautiful guitar at such a great value. This guitar will last forever because it was made so nice. Recommend to anyone whether pro player or armature I promise you won't be disappointed and I have been playing for 6 years so I know what guitar players are looking for in a good guitar. Thanks Takamine!!!!!, "musical_instruments"
This is not a toy.  It's a well crafted instrument.  Material is wood.  Decent quality.  Plain wood but with a nice tone colors to it.  Good refinements.  Rings around the hole and stripe on the back.  Strings had some oxidation.  Understandable as it was made and shipped from Indonesia.  Metal strings.  So that's a consideration if you're a beginner.  Sounds good too.  I prefer the sound of a metal guitar anyway.  So if you're a beginner or an intermediate player who just needs a nice instrument hanging around home for an occasional strum this is it.  It is a pleasant addition to my home guitars.  It's for my wife who is learning guitar.  She loves it.  And it costs 10% of what mine costs, and I don't mind playing it at all.  The only plastic is the plate on the front that protects during strumming.  I don't even have that.  It's a feel good guitar.  Highly recommended for the occasional strummer., "musical_instruments"
After going to various guitar/music stores and trying out many guitars (Yamaha,Ibanez, Fender and others) I researched on the internet and stumbled upon this make/model and saw the MANY positive reviews it had. I was reluctant to purchase an instrument without playing it first, so I purchased the best sounding guitar locally (costing me $129). After 1 day I realized I was unhappy with it still and took a chance and purchased this guitar online. The many reviews were absolutely correct. THIS guitar is wonderful and sounds great. I replaced the strings yet the original strings were just as good as the LIGHT strings I bought. Even though it is only an $89 guitar, I will treasure this one as if it was $300. Perfect intonation all the way up to the octave. Low action and stays in tune for days!, "musical_instruments"
not so pleased with the sound quality..sorta disappointed with it over all...but ya get what ya pay for ....so i'll keep it anyway, "musical_instruments"
I bought it just so I could learn a little bit of guitar. It sounds good and looks really nice. I get compliments on it., "musical_instruments"
I have learned out of experience that when you first pick up guitar, it is a bad idea to practice on a cheap instrument. Cheap $50-100 instruments do not play accurately, and you would be more likely give up. This, on the other hand, is NOT a low-quality instrument. Takamine makes many excellent instruments, this included. It plays very loud and clear, zero buzzing. If you are looking for a practice guitar for either yourself or someone else, look no further. I can guarantee that you will not find a guitar this magnificent for such an affordable price. Note: the package does not include a gig back or case, So I bought this one here, that fits the guitar perfectly:Musician's Gear Deluxe Dreadnought Case Black (Black), "musical_instruments"
Yeah, the strings that it came with were terrible, but it's an amazing guitar. I'll admit I bought it because it was cheap so I could practice playing on it and not have to worry about it becoming damaged, but it sounds great and plays really well. I like how the wood finish isn't all slick, has a nice natural feel to it., "musical_instruments"
This is a great guitar for the money. I paid $69.34 for my guitar and bought it through Amazon.com from Streamline Audio Video. It arrived ahead of schedule in great shape, ready to play right out of the box (after tuning it of course). If you want a better guitar than this, you will need to spend a whole lot more. The sound is great and it is easy to play. Only about 41&#34; long and may weigh a bit over the 6 lbs. stated in the description. My strings arrived is fine condition and the action was very close to what I will need., "musical_instruments"
This beginner level guitar is very good quality for the price. It's lightweight and has attractive but basic finishes. The biggest drawback is that the one I received required the action to be adjusted. The bridge needed lowered slightly and the nut held the strings way too high above the frets. The result was very sore fingers. These are easy fixes if you have the proper tools. Otherwise you'll have to pay a guitar shop to do a proper setup. Stock strings have a warm tone., "musical_instruments"
I've paid hundreds of dollars more for guitars that didn't sound anywhere near as nice and natural as this one does. And, mind you, I have yet to even change the facory strings out! So if you're looking for a quality guitar at a price that's more than fair, there simply isn't a better deal around., "musical_instruments"
I am a beginner but I played this guitar non stop since I have bought it and I can honestly say from what I hear from my friends guitars they use ,it sounds better I did have to tune it tho because it was out of tune and my playing sounded different than the people on Youtube I was learning from so I used the snark sn1 tuner and it sounds great now no complaints here., "musical_instruments"
I didn't know what to expect given the price, but am happy to say this is a very nice guitar for the money. I am impressed by the quality of materials, components, and construction. For example, the tuning machines are substantial and heavily chromed; they work smoothly, and firmly hold the strings in tune. The instrument came relatively well set up right out of the box; the action didn't seem inordinately high, but I couldn't resist taking a little off the bottom of the compensated saddle even so, and now the guitar plays even better. I might tinker some more at some point, probably when it comes time to replace the strings, but for now I am quite happy with the playability and sound of this full-bodied dreadnought, which is rich and resonant and very impressive. I still can hardly believe it is possible to deliver such a fine instrument at such a low price, but the proof is indisputably before me., "musical_instruments"
I purchased this for my 10 year old daughter.  She is learning to play guitar and the classical guitar I gave her was just too wide for her little fingers to reach.  The action on this guitar is perfect and required no set up..was ready to go out of the box.  I almost kept it for myself as a knock around guitar it is that nice.  I have been playing for about 30 years and was really impressed with the quality of this guitar and the sweet, full, rich sound.  If you are looking at this guitar, buy it!  You will not be disappointed!, "musical_instruments"
This was my first guitar.  I've had it for about 5 or 6 years now.  My wife bought it at a local \"center\" from the recommendation of one of the teachers.  I taught myself to play on this.  First the good:  This instrument is a good beginner piece. It has a nice full sound and does not take steel fingers to make acceptable sounds.  The tone is very rich and will having even simple chords sounding great.  The fit and finish of the piece is amazing for the price. It looks great and had no rough or unfinished areas.  The frets are smooth and finished and the fingerboard feels good.  Tuning is a breeze and this will hold tune very well.  Often only a tweak or 2 before a practice session is all that is needed.  I have never had it go out of tune while playing (even when stringbending!)  As you get better the true beauty of this guitar starts to shine.  It is amazingly playable.  From simple melodies to serious chord jams this instrument handles it all!  The only real compliant I had (and the reason for the 4 stars) is the stock strings aren't the best (IMHO) for a beginner.  I'm pretty sure they use heavy strings as stock and sure they produce a nice deep rich sound, and WON'T break, they are BRUTAL on new fingers!  I would invest in a lighter set and switch them out pretty early on.  The only other minor quibble is the bridge seems a bit light duty and their is a tendency to get some string slap on the lower strings.  All in all this is a great deal for the beginner- or even advanced players that just want an extra guitar around to jam on when they don't feel like dragging out the expensive units (like playing around a campfire, or outdoors)  If your a beginner just starting out- this is a great route to go as the guitar will continue to give great sounds as you advance!, "musical_instruments"
I recived this guitar today(2/8/13)and its perfect. After I tuned it it sounded great,it plays well,and it does not hurt my fingers like my old guitar. This guitar is amazing!, "musical_instruments"
I have many expensive cases for my guitars and recently started playing bass,  but not too serious just wanted a nice little case for it. Boy was i surprised, this case is awesome, great quality, fits bass without any problems and the storage inside is great. Definetly reccomend this case, "musical_instruments"
Bought bass case for strat,wanted extra space.as the lining is q memory foam and holds the instrument gently in place it also acts as the lid for the open space.I keep several music/note. Books under the head stock.other reveiwer complained of the excess space but that's what I wanted. It did have chemical smell but as I open items in garage,near trash can for the packaging.it aired in a few minutes. Totally happy with service and product., "musical_instruments"
This is my second case from them. Build good for carry and balance. Brass color lock that comes with it., "musical_instruments"
This is nearly identical to theGuardian Cases CG-020-B Bass Guitar Caseat about half the cost. However, there are some issues with this case as well as limitations.First the issues: while the covering appears to be stitched on, it is - for the most part - glued on, and if the case is left in a hot, unventilated space like a car for prolonged periods the covering will start to life at the edges. On the other hand, someone who takes care of their gear is probably not going to leave their instrument in a hot car (or garage or other storage space) for prolonged periods. However, you should be aware of the issue, if for no other reason than to remind you that if they case suffers, imagine the effect on your bass.The limitations are simple: the case, while a hard shell design, is not as strong as one made from ABS plastic. The top is relatively flimsy as are the sides. This is not a show stopper if you use the case for home storage and occasional gigs, but if you have a heavy road schedule, and especially of you are not personally loading and unloading the band's gear, this case will not afford you the protection of an ATA-style case.Also note that I have only used this case for a Fender Jazz Bass, so any long-scale J- or P-style basses will fit. I cannot be sure about other brands and models.I mentioned an ATA-style case as a better solution, and it is essential for protecting your instrument if you have heavy road or even local gig schedules. For less demanding protection I recommend that you also consider this case (which I purchased as an upgrade when I became aware of the issues and limitations of the Musician's Gear model:SKB Electric Bass Rectangular Hardshell, standard latches, handle.If you still opt for the Musician's Gear case, you are still getting relatively good value and are certainly making a large step up from a soft gig bag., "musical_instruments"
When I was looking for a Bass Case I just wanted something that was not too expensive and would protect my bass. This fits the bill perfectly. It's not really a case that is meant for heavy travel (like checking it a the airport) but it definitely will take good care of your bass during normal travel. And the internal compartment is really nice for storing straps, cables, strings, etc. For the price this is an excellent case., "musical_instruments"
These are by no means touring cases. They're inexpensively made, which is a good thing because I hate to pay for a case that cost half of what the guitar cost and I don't tour. That said, they do a great job at protecting guitars that aren't out on a stand. I've got about a dozen guitars and when they're not gonna be played anytime soon I want to put them away in something more substantial than a gig bag. These do very nicely for that purpose. They are certainly more than capable of taking an instrument to a gig, but I wouldn't put a pricey guitar into this case if I new baggage handlers or shipping gorillas were going to be handling it. So, I recommend them, but be aware of its limitations., "musical_instruments"
I had a Cannon brand clutch and I bought this one to replace it. What I like about this one is how the release lever works. On the Cannon the lever was vertical. This made actuating it a less natural motion. With this one you hit it with a down stroke of your stick and it releases. That motion is much more natural and this makes it easier to use. An argument could be made that this one coule be easier to actuate accidentally but I have had no issue with it.Aside from the actuation of the release it is also well made and works very well., "musical_instruments"
It works well as a standard clutch, as a drop clutch its very iffy.  the top part spins around when you hit the lever so you have to grab it and move it back so you can hit it again., "musical_instruments"
Honestly it took a few adjustments to get it right, but now it works great.The black handle is a quick release to be used with a drum stick while playing. After a few tries I got it a good angle so it can be hit while being played.Height adjustment was also important. If the latch is to high, it will not grab the hi hat and bring it back up. Too low and it does not sound right.This replaced horrible Pulse Hi Hat hardware that shook loose every few songs, so I am completely pleased with it.definitely worth $13.00, "musical_instruments"
It's great if you need to quickly drop your hats, but not the other way around. I bought this drop clutch because it was cheap, and I was on a budget. Overall its build is solid, the only problem I have with it is having the clutch lock back into place., "musical_instruments"
good product  great price  works well so far  bought 2 for the price of one of the others  free ship  one for the road  one for pratice, "musical_instruments"
This drop clutch is just fantastic..  I have used them for years and always buy the same model.  Nothing on the market works as well as this.  Simple installation,  and it allows you to use your double bass pedals or double kick with a closed hi hat all from tapping it with your drumstick.. It couldn't be easier..  Best Buy on the Market., "musical_instruments"
it's amazingly helpful during double pedal licks haha!! while you're goin all out on pedals, you can just use the drop-clutch to make it sound like the hat is open OR closed...depends on what you want. it's really useful and I recommend it if you double pedal a lot, "musical_instruments"
This is an ingenious clutch that engages when you step on your hi-hat pedal, but will drop to the closed position when you hit the lever on the top. This allows you to either ride closed hi-hats when using both bass pedals, yet return to normal hi-hat playing when the music calls for it.Be aware that this clutch has only two positions - open and fully closed. However, there is a way to work around this if you like partially open hi-hats in the closed position for a sizzle sound.  I did a work around by placing a spring on the hi-hat stem, with metal and felt washers on the top of the spring, which gives me that opening when I drop the cymbal to closed.  There was a lot of trial and error finding the right spring because each cymbal pair has a different height when mated together, and I was looking for a tiny fraction of an inch opening.  Too small or low a tension a spring and stickwork chokes the sound. Too large or stiff and you will not get the sound.  However, this is all personal preference, and many drummers ride a fully closed hi-hat anyway, which makes this clutch perfect out of the box.Regardless of your hi-hat style, if you are using a double bass, this is a \"must have\" accessory. Gibraltar's model is solid, heavy duty, and engages and disengages perfectly every time., "musical_instruments"
I like to hit things. I use drums so nobody else gets hurt. I need the sticks to most effectively channel my aggression into the drums and not, say, local wildlife. These have the sweetest tone for battery-based abuse. Thanks Vic! Also, flammable!, "musical_instruments"
My 8th graders are literally beating the crap out of these sticks. They are good and reasonably priced.  The principal is mad at me because I told them that a real drummer plays constantly, so the walls in the halls, cafeteria tables, and classroom desks are getting pounded constantly., "musical_instruments"
They are some of the best drum sticks i've played. They lasted me about two weeks before I had to move on to another before., "musical_instruments"
sad right?i do play instruments (guitar & piano) some drums but it's not why i bought these drum sticks.My old roommmate stole my drum sticks so this was the next cheapest thingthey play well on the pads.i'm sure they'd have nice action off a snare drum and high hat in real life..., "musical_instruments"
I have always liked these sticks. They are solid, look good and feel good. You will always get quality from vic firth. Only downer is they seem to break faster then some sticks such as Vaders., "musical_instruments"
These are great for all around playing. I've never received a bad stick from Amazon. These are reasonably priced and so much more convenient than going to Guitar Center and having to deal with the idiot in the drum room.I have a wide variety of Vic sticks that I bought here on Amazon. Another favorite is the 2BN, it's a log with a nylon tip, great for heavy metal thrashing, very articulate.Good music to all, "musical_instruments"
These sticks are solid hickory, which is insanely durable, and sounds great for classic rock, and punk rock drums. These sticks are weight, and sound matched, so each pair will sound and feel almost identical., "musical_instruments"
Nice feeling to them, they get the job done and that about sums it all up, can't expect to much more from them., "musical_instruments"
That guitar sounds magically beautiful for guitar of that level and cost. It is a great pleasure to jam on it around. Sound is like it's real big brother. Very very familiar.I suppose, it is the best choise for your kid! All hardware is Ok. Just give some days to tuners to get used to..., "musical_instruments"
I've been interested in learning how to play the guitar for a long time, but the huge problem for me was finding something that was both affordable and made for smaller hands, as I'm rather petite.  Luckily for me, we found one of these secondhand (it needed minimal repairs)and it's just great.  I don't know anything about purchasing it new, but I can tell you that this is a great beginner's instrument for someone who has small hands.  I'll also note that it's even affordable while it's brand new.The notes are surprisingly clean-sounding coming from a guitar that's so low-priced. I'd definitely recommend this guitar to anyone who is interested in learning how to play but not interested enough to pay an arm and a leg for an instrument., "musical_instruments"
I was very impressed by this little guitar. The build quality seemed good and toggle and pods were noiseless.The only complaints I have is E string breaks often, which is a direct result of constant tuning fatiguing the strings.I feel the tuners are just not strong enough and the ratio is no adequate to keep in tune.Still a great guitar for a 5 to 10 year old., "musical_instruments"
The build quality could be better - ideally the nut needs to be replaced (the cut is a rush job) and the neck needs to be reset (there's a gap that indicates that the pocket wasn't completely cleaned out when it was put on) - but what do you expect for this price. It is however a playable instrument right out of the box and if you're willing to invest another $50 or so it can be a great starter guitar for a.young (smaller) player or a.nice travel instrument., "musical_instruments"
I bought this to replace my son's previous guitar that had broken from hard use. From initial unboxing it is clear that this has been made to a much better standard. The wood looks beautiful. All the metal parts look sturdy and durable.It sounds good, although as my son is a beginner I cannot judge just how good.Note that there is no guitar cable.For now I am very happy with this purchase as it looks better made than I expected., "musical_instruments"
ORIGINAL POSTING:My first Mini, purchased over a decade ago, was a bad investment. The four neck bolts continually came loose, no amount of tweaking could get the intonation right (Note: adults should probably play the Mini-Strat \"tuned- up\"...I play mine at F - Bb - Eb - G# - C - F...or, if they have large fingers, they should probably use a capo with standard tuning and heavier strings) so the string tension is similar to their full-sized guitars), the pick-up pole pieces didn't align with the strings, and the finish was uneven. It cost $99 and I figured I got less than what I paid for. It was clearly a toy and I sold it for $25 without regret.Three or four years ago I extensively played a \"Hello Kitty\" Mini owned by a friend. It cost her $149 and, after I tweaked the intonation and the string height a bit, it was a playable instrument. I figured she pretty much got what she paid for. A decent little 3/4-sized traveler.Recently, after reading that Fender had upped the build quality of their oriental Squier guitars, I again purchased a Mini. I couldn't be more pleased. Right out of the box, everything about the instrument was spot-on. The construction was rock solid, the neck was straight, the strings were correctly positioned, the intonation was exact, and the finish was flawless. It was, in two words, masterfully made. I figure I got at least $249 worth of guitar for $99. How cool is that?The sound of the current Mini is \"classic Fender single-coil\"...shimmering with bell-like overtones. The pickups are functional, if a bit thin sounding compared to the Seymour Duncans I have on my full-size Strat. The six-in-line enclosed tuners hold the light gauge strings without slipping. The neck is perfectly finished and fast. Because it's a 3/4-sized guitar, the first and second-fret string spacing might be too tight for adult players with large fingers. But for everyone else, including fortunate children, the current Mini is a sweet ride. And at its present \"give away\" street value, this has to be one of the most fantastic bargains in the musical kingdom! Bravo Fender!June, 2014 UPDATE:The mini has become my preferred, go-to electric. I now have one for jazz with a single Lace Hot Gold in the middle position with a custom pick guard from Chandler Music's Pickguard Heaven (see attached photo) and a very versatile one with a Lace Red, Silver, and Blue pickup set. Why? For the same reason John Lennon once owned a 3/4-sized guitar, I suppose. Obscure chords and finger patterns are easier on the hands because fingers have to span less distance. I believe the slight tonal inaccuracy of the 3/4 scale is offset by increased finger-placement accuracy. Try it and I think you'll like it!, "musical_instruments"
I very recently bought this guitar for my young daughter based on the previous reviews.  She's joined the jazz band at her school and since she is smaller than the average 12 year old, she needed a smaller sized guitar.  It was packaged very well and it took a while just to get the guitar out of the packaging.  The only thing I have found so far that sort of disappointed me was that there were some dark stain blemishes on the white pick guard. Trying to get the stains off with a damp paper towel didn't work so I took a special soft, damp sponge made to remove stains and gently rubbed it over the spots.  They came off but the finish on the plastic pick guard is dulled where I had rubbed the stains off.  That sort of irked me.  However, it didn't seem to bother my daughter nearly as much as it did me.Despite the blemish episode, it fits her perfectly.  I tried to tune it using a clamp-on Snark tuner.  That didn't work at all for some reason so we went to Guitar Center and bought an electric guitar tuner which you plug the cord into from the guitar.  That really worked well to tune the guitar.  The tuning pegs (gears) were stiff and a bit hard to turn.  When I change the strings I will adjust them to make them easier to turn.  The strings the guitar comes with are very cheap so I'll need to change those out soon for a much better set, but they'll have to do for now.I plugged the guitar to my old Crate amp and it sounded pretty good.  The knobs on the front of the guitar turn well an did what they are supposed to do.  It's easy to control the tone and volume from the guitar without having to dicker much with the amp.  My daughter had a great time getting used to it.  She's a great classical guitarist (I teach classical guitar) so playing an electric guitar was a new experience for her.  My old Strat is just too big and heavy for her and this black one looks good (despite the dullness that only I can see) on her and she was awesome playing jazz guitar in her school concert the other night.  Since this guitar is so inexpensive and is just right for a smaller person, I really can't find anything major wrong to say about it.  I'm glad I bought it, just wish it didn't come with the stains.  It feels solid, well-constructed, and not very heavy.  I like playing it too!I've ordered a really good gig bag, new cord, a Pignose amp just for her and of course, a bunch of new electric guitar strings.  She'll find the small stuff in her stocking this Christmas!  I can't wait for us to do some mother and daughter electric guitar duets!!, "musical_instruments"
I've been playing over 30 years and got one of these for my 7-year-old because he wants to play guitar like daddy does.  For $100 it's an OK starter guitar for a kid (and I guess really short people who can't play a regular Fender), but not something I'd recommend to anyone else.  And my kid thinks it looks cool, so he'll be more likely to stick with it.Even though it has a laminated body, the headstock and unfinished neck are decent wood.  The frets are crowned OK but have some sharp ends to them, and I feel silly investing the cash to have them fixed.  It's light and easy to handle.  The hardware isn't bad, with a stable bridge (good idea not to put a floating trem in this), 5-way blade switch, solid jack and strap anchors, and smooth knobs.  The pickups are not top notch but work well enough (a decent replacement set would cost more than the whole guitar does, so I'm not complaining).  It has a nice red paint job.On the down side, besides some sharp fret ends, it required a few truss rod and bridge adjustments to bring the action close to where it should be.  The fretboard uses cheap rosewood and in one spot has some extra glue showing around a fret.  The nut on the one I got is sunk lower on the treble side than on the bass side, so the low E string is farther from the fretboard than the other strings.  It has one small pit in the red finish.  It has no paperwork or owner's manual.  The tuners are kind of choppy.  And the body/neck flexes so if you put too much pressure on it the whole thing will go out of tune.It comes strung with Fender 9's, which combined with the short scale makes the strings loose and easy to press down, so it's good for a kid just starting out.  I actually enjoy messing around with it because the pickups have a punkish scratchy sound.  But as soon as he gets bigger we'll ditch this for something better., "musical_instruments"
I got this guitar for my 9 year old son, He loves it. This is a buitifull clasic guitar with a good clear sound (when he is not messing with the knobs). I would definatly purchase this again., "musical_instruments"
Thank you Fender for a really fun instrument that fits my size...and thanks to all of you that recommended it for just that reason : ), "musical_instruments"
I had a lot of questions and concerns when I ordered this. Well, it arrived today, I've been playing it for the past few hours, and here's the answers to those questions:1. Is it worth the money?Absolutely yes. This is an amazing bargain. There are better guitars out there, but not for $170. This really is a great deal.2. How does it sound?Fantastic. It's definitely \"bright\", which a few of the other reviews pointed out, but it also has new strings on it, so it might be a little too early to judge. That said, it's got a nice full sound and if you play up closer to the neck you get more bass in the mix.3. How's the action?Just right. Low enough that it's easy to play (for a 12 string) but no buzzing strings.4. How about the neck?Wider than a 6 string, but not much. Probably a centimeter or so wider. I have small hands and had no problem playing it. The main thing is the added pressure it takes to push down twice as many strings as normal.5. How does it play?Great.6. How does it look?Great. Nice natural finish, all shiny and new. What's not to love? (Note: the picture shows a more whitish finish, but it's a normal natural finish like you'd see on most acoustic guitars. Natural wood color.So if any of you guitarists have been thinking of buying an acoustic 12 string, take a look at this one for sure. I wish I'd bought it long ago. There are just some songs that need to be played on a 12 string., "musical_instruments"
To start with, I didn't buy this guitar because it was cheap, but because of the unbelievable reviews.  I don't know if they all come out of the box like this one but in the past I have owned and sold my Gretch 12, my Yamaha 12, my ovation 12, but I won't be selling this one.  I've had it for 3 months now and haven't adjusted anything, only played this $169 12 string from American Musical Supply / amazon.  It is the best playing best sounding 12 string I have ever played period...  This guitar set off a couple of other Epiphone purchases (2, one for my son) AJ220SCE's and ES-339, Also great guitars.  Most of my life Epiphones were dull over coated junk, not anymore, and it seems that Epiphone is selling cheap to get people to try them. I own Gibson Studio Les Paul, SG, '87 American Strat, Martin D35, Washburn Rogue, all nice guitars most for a LOT more money. This guitar is a NOBRAINER cannot believe the value.  American Musical Supply is also great, the first AJ220SCE came in with a bad neck and AMS emailed a return FedEx lable in an hour and after I dropped it off and it was logged in at a UPS outlet around the corner I got an email that the replacement guitar was on the way. When it arrived 3 days later it was a good one! :))  5+ star service., "musical_instruments"
With all the other great reviews noted here, I decided to buy this guitar. Had a Rogue 12 string a few years ago and sold it as I was not that impressed with it. What a difference with the Epiphone.  The fit & finish speaks quality. Playabilty is very good with low action and good tone. Really is a great buy!, "musical_instruments"
I wanted a 12 string, but did not want to spend a lot of money, this guitar fits the bill. The finish is much darker then the pictures online show. GREAT SOUND from this bad boy. This is a BIG GUITAR, once I figured out how to tune the 12 string, it really DOES NOT GO OUT OF TUNE.. After I few hours of play, I retune it and its marginally out of tune, I thought at this price the tuners would be of poor quality, while they are not grover tuners, they get it done.The downside for me is, not the guitar's fault.. this is an inexpensive guitar and a FANTASTIC entry into 12 string playing, this Guitar is hard to play below the 15th fret as there is no cut away, but that is true of all guitars using this body type. Now that I have had it awhile I would love for it to be acoustic/electric but again.. for the price, I was expecting an inferior guitar this tool plays great low action. Im keeping it., "musical_instruments"
I knew I did right by buying the DR-212. It's great and stands up to much more expensive of it's kind.I have lots of Gibsons as well as Epiphones and frankly I don't see any difference to speak of. If anybody wants a durable acoustic 12 string with fine sound you'll find it in the DR-212.Best of Luck to allRegards,Roger  Epiphone DR-212 Acoustic Guitar, 12-String, Natural, "musical_instruments"
First off, let's get the dimensions out of the way; for some reason, finding these basic dimensions on a lot of guitars and cases is close to impossible; just try to find the dimensions of the DR-212 on the Epiphone web site.Length: 43\",  Bout length: 19-7/8\",  Lower bout thickness: 4-3/4\",  Lower bout width: 15-1/2\"So now you can look for a gig bag with the full knowlage of what size guitar you are trying to squeeze into it.The only thing that is out of the norm with these dimensions, is the 43\" length (Most bags are 39\"-41\").You can always opt for the Epiphone hard case: EDREAD, or World Tour RWG20D, or GBA100 (the bag I got).Now that the hard part is out of the way (finding a case), on to the review.As my title says, the guitar reminds me of my Samick ST92 which is a VERY well made 3/4 Spruce top acoustic which is also made in Indonesia.I have played guitar for over 40 years, so I  have a collection of over 100 guitars, and 11 of them are acoustics, but this is the first12 string, and I bought it just to have it around for songs like Hotel California, Etc., and was not willing to drop a lot of money on a guitar I would rarely use.I am very impressed with the build quality of this guitar for the under $170.00 asking price. It tuned up with no problems, even though the tuning process is arduous compared to a six string, and it takes about three tunings to get the strings stretched out. You constantly think you will pull the bridge out due to all that string pressure. The bridge plate on these 12 strings must be huge!I found that when tuning, you should up stroke the small strings so that you don't hit the large one right next to it.I have no fret buzz, finger rash, or problem areas with the fretboard on my guitar, and the strings sit low which I like.The nut is a bit sharp on the edges, but a file or sanding will take care of that.The strings are not that bad, and will do until the first change out.I have seen a wide range of reviews on this guitar, from terrible to fantastic, but the one I have is the later., "musical_instruments"
Very playable right out of the Box and very beautiful. I have a Epiphone Swingster, Nighthawk and Violin Bass and they are all great products! I decided to give it a good set up. After the Strings were off I sanded down the Bridge 1-2 mm and adjusted the neck just a little. Then I want to really recommend Martin Bronze Strings light or extra light (green box) for an awesome sound and easy playability which is important on 12 Strings. Instructional videos can be viewed on YouTube before you go for it or you get a Guitar Tech to do it.Ps Matching Epiphone cases are available and so are inexpensive clip on pickups if you want to go thru an Amp or line in recording.Ps The Tuners are a bit to close to each other in my opinion. When you tune one string your fingers can rub against next tuner., "musical_instruments"
If you're looking for a 12-string acoustic, then what more could you want than the Epiphone DR-212?  The craftsmanship is excellent, the sound is fantastic and it's easy to tune and play right out of the box.  Add the limited lifetime warranty and Gibson support and this guitar can't be beat.  The price is amazing for what you get, and to top this all off, it has been chosen as a Guitar Players Magazine Editors Pick.  You don't have this guitar?  What are you waiting for?  Order it now while the price is this low!  Go ahead! Go for it!  You won't be sorry..., "musical_instruments"
I was really torn about getting this because of its price but decided to take the plunge and have no regrets. The action is better than my six string Epiphone acoustic. It sounds so sweet, looks so sweet, and plays so sweet. I keep it tuned down a half step and use a capo to protect the neck. I would definitely recommend this especially if your on a budget. It stays in tune and don't let the laminated top scare you, its great., "musical_instruments"
Still using it today, 2 years later., "musical_instruments"
For years I've used the super-cheap \"rake hangers\" you can get at hardware stores - the metal \"U\" coated in rubber, with the heavy-duty screw end.  These are fine, except that some guitars don't want to fit, and recently when trying to widen the mouth of one the weld failed and so the \"U\" detached from the screw part.Well, that got me to thinking that I should find a better solution for hanging my guitars.  The thing is, I hate overpaying for things.  To me, $15-20 is way too much for a guitar hanger.  Sure, it's important to have something solid to hold our \"babies\", but I want to feel like I'm getting some value.I bought 2 of these hangers, and they're rock-solid.  As others have said - put some good screws into a stud, don't bother with the hassle of the drywall anchors provided.  I just used some 2\" drywall screws.  I like the simplicity of the metal plate that the yoke is attached to.  The U is easy to adjust for width, the retainer rings slide on very easily, and I've tried both acoustic and electric guitars and all hang away from the wall.No complaints - these are great, the quality seems excellent and $9 seems just about right to me., "musical_instruments"
I have an older version of this model, but it works great.  I opted to use more heavy weight wall anchors that I got from Home depot.  2 hangers rated to hold up to 75 lbs each equals 150 lbs worth of peace of mind!  The hanger itself that I bought was used, so it was already assembled, so I can't comment too much on the assembly process.  I bought 2 of them, and each holds my precious basses with tender care and worry-free security!  And no, I don't own stock in the company!  :-), "musical_instruments"
I actually have five of these for the various instruments, mostly bass guitars but also an acoustic and a solid-body electric.When mounted properly to studs - the only way I have mounted these - they are very, very solid. While in a nice package with instructions and hardware for wall board fasteners, I used longish brass wood screws to studs for appearance and strength. You do see the ends of the screws used after install is complete, and to me a brass screw looks great with this &#34;flat black&#34; model.The CC11 model -- this one -- works well with any kind of guitar including bass or acoustic. There are variants for other instruments, but a relatively wide range will be held securely by this unit. The yoke width is adjustable, and a combination of slope and two keeper rings prevent the instrument from coming off the holder.Recommended...but do consider you means of mounting carefully., "musical_instruments"
easy to install, holds the guitar away from the wall somewhat, and keeps it off of the floor away from the animals when I have it out of the case. great find, well worth the purchase price. :), "musical_instruments"
I decided I wanted to hang my guitars on my walls instead of having them take up space via floor stands. Just find a stud and drill in the screws they'll hold just fine. I'm really bad when it comes to stuff like this so I had my brother help me. Just make sure you know what you're doing because I thought I did when I really didn't at all.The wall hangers look really nice in person, and they keep the guitars held in place very nicely/safely. The only thing you should have to do extra after purchasing and installing these is creating a makeshift wallpad for behind where the guitar is hung; if something happens that makes it hit the wall, it won't damage the guitar or the wall.This is as legit as it gets if done right, though; I've had my guitars hung via String Swing for months and I've had no problems or concerns. I am very pleased with the cheap alternative to floor stands. It saves room and makes the room look cooler., "musical_instruments"
its cheap and the quality its great cant complain. i will be buying more of this in the future for other guitars., "musical_instruments"
I used this on the side of a wooden bookshelf for my ukulele.  It's attractive.  It's well made. It's fork is a tad large for the ukulele  It has rubber o-rings that slide, so I can bring them in and the uke does fit then.  But then, even the three inch deep uke is close to the bookcase (or wall, if you use it there).  The uke hits when I put it in the hanger, so I put a felt pad where the uke body hits the bookcase.Many uke players simply nail a single nail in the wall and use a loop off string from it around the uke head and tuners.  This is much less expensive, holds very well, is even more low profile than this hanger, and never drops a uke. Consider it for your needs.I'd not buy another of these for a ukulele.  It likely works fine for a guitar, though.I deducted one point for the fact that, even though it's adjustable (the o-rings), and advertised for ukes, it doesn't work well for them.  And it's heavy and not stylish, in my opinion.  I have the Hercules wall hanger (mechanical gripper) for my electric guitars, and it's fabulous (for guitars; overkill for lightweight ukuleles, maybe).Hercules Stands Wallmount Guitar Hanger GSP39WBUpdate 9/7/11: the more I use it, the less I like it.  I find that friction tuner ukuleles do not fit on it well at all, and the tuners hit the fork and it can make your uke out of tune.  So, for small instruments (you'd have to try it yourself with mandolins and banjos), this is atrocious.  For guitars, it's not as good as Hercules., "musical_instruments"
Easy to mount, solid grip on guitar. Only detractor would be that, with my guitar at least, it hangs kind of far from the wall. This obviously is a factor of what you hang from it though. An acoustic would clear the wall nicely, my solid body electric sits a few inches away from the wall.Silicone coating on forks and retaining bands get a good grip on the guitar, without marring even soft wood.I very much prefer this to having it on one of the 'accident waiting to happen' stands on the floor., "musical_instruments"
Very nice product great quality.  I ordered three to start was not sure if I wanted to trust my Guitars to them.  Arrived installed in minutes they come with plastic toggles to screw into drywall I chose to hit studs.  Rubber washers come with to size for different necks.  If you are going to mount off a stud I strongly suggest using an aftermarket high quality toggle  made from steel.  Very happy going to order more., "musical_instruments"
very good item if you are a musician you need it! cool for any bass, guitar and any instrument that fit into the hanger, "musical_instruments"
Will hold any guitar that I've seen. It holds the guitar on the wall safely without having to worry about it falling. It's also very easy to install. It's a great price; and it's definitely worth the investment. Not only do you not have to have your guitars on the ground, but you save space putting them on the walls, and not only that, but it make any room look even better., "musical_instruments"
This thing works great and it looks very stylish with the guitar hanging on the wall.  This also keeps it away from the kids who always seem to want to play it.  Very good idea and holds it perfectly., "musical_instruments"
Purchased two of these to hang up guitars at home.  I saw them used in a guitar shop so I assumed they were more than sufficient for use at home. I'm using them with both acoustic and electric guitars. They appear to be designed to hang the guitar away from the wall to avoid abrasions on the back and they do just that. The hooks can be stretched apart or squeezed together to fit the headstock of the guitar.  Overall, they are attractive, well-made hangars., "musical_instruments"
I love these string swings!  My guitars are now out of their cases and up for display.  I have 3 in my home:  2 for guitars and 1 for a ukulele...and I'm planning on buying 25 of them for my school ukulele program.  They look great up on the wall., "musical_instruments"
I love these things. They hold your guitars in place and make this storage solution a nice decoration in the process!, "musical_instruments"
Holds my acoustic 6 string great. Up and out of the reach of a baby just learning to walk, wife also things it looks attractive on the wall as an art piece. Quality product at a good price., "musical_instruments"
This a very clever idea. It helps save floor space in your rooms, and it helps cover empty wall space. Very easy to take off/put on. High recommend this to any stringed-instrument players., "musical_instruments"
The mounting process was simple.Recommendation:  Buy a cheap magnetic stud finder if you don't already have one.  You don't want your instrument plummeting to the floor!I got a stud finder off Amazon and mounted two of these hangers.  They're holding up very well. The backs of the guitars are practically flush with the wall.  Whether that's a good thing...is up to you.  I guess I don't have to worry about it potentially swinging into the wall as much if it were bumped.  So maybe it is a good thing.Be careful when you hang it though.  It could definitely hit the wall if you don't place it on the hanger carefully., "musical_instruments"
it can hold the weight of any of my guitars. its easy to install and i guess its cheap. it doesnt always come with the screw covers but that doesnt really matter, "musical_instruments"
I bought 2 of these and hung 2 fender strats on my wall.  Comes with all the mounting screws and anchors needed to mount properly.  Couldn't be happier with this product., "musical_instruments"
Solid music stand made of heavy metal poles and solid metal music holder. The joints that you tighten are made of a heav plastic material. If anything were to give out from use it would be the plastic parts. Right now in brand new condition everything fits well and grips solidly to hold poles in place. Arrived a day eRly., "musical_instruments"
it is a good purchase.  I expected a bit more heftiness but it does the job.  I would like the plate to be heavier, seems a little flexy, "musical_instruments"
I was surprised of how well this stand is made. It's worth $45 easily. I;ve used stands for over 27 years and this is the best I;ve owned!, "musical_instruments"
Wanted to buy a better stand than the cheap metal folding one that I'd had in high school.  This was a great compromise between portability/storage and sturdiness.  I did want collapsible legs, which this has, and the solid coated metal shelf is wonderful after my old metal folding stand.  Works well with the Manhasset second shelf accessory, and has been in constant use for months now.  I've had absolutely no problems with it.  The height is easily adjustable, and the shelf tilt is easy too.  Am very happy with what I got for the price I paid!, "musical_instruments"
This has the largest top of any of my stands, and it is the one I use when traveling / gigs. The top doesn't fold like some of the more expensive Stagg  Hercules stands, so if you're using it for gigging, that may be something to consider. I have to lug an 88key weighted piano around, so don't mind lugging this., "musical_instruments"
This is a great music stand, I like how it's adjustable in various ways to customize it to the exact position you need it in.  It's very sturdy and well built.  I don't ever worry that it'll tip over.  I love it.  I would recommend it., "musical_instruments"
Solid constructions with enough room for my sheet music.  Very portable, though the holder can be a challenge at times.  I have another stand that collapses into a very compact unit, but if you have heavy tomes that you wish to use or several sheets that you want to string ...  this unit is superior., "musical_instruments"
This music stand is og great quality and of a great price.I have been very pleased with it. I have bought On-Stage stands in the past before, so i was sure that I wouldn't be disaapointed and I was right.Very sturdy-well built-good price., "musical_instruments"
I purchased this model for home use--not for a kid's backpack. It's solid and sturdy, easily holding a song book open--not just a few pieces of sheet music. It adjusts tall enough for standing as well as low enough to sit next to my easy chair in the evening. I often clip on a digital recorder for practice and have no threat of the top flipping down. Works for me!, "musical_instruments"
I'm very happy with this stand.  It is heavy, which I knew going in.  But for my purposes, that is a plus.  The weight makes it more sturdy.  It folds up compactly, so it is quite portable, despite the weight.  Adjusts easily and holds its position., "musical_instruments"
Purchased after another folding stand which cost the same $$$ literally fell apart.  This one is much better although not quite as portable.  On the plus side, music stays put on this one, it's very stable and the height is fully adjustable.  You can buy with confidence., "musical_instruments"
This was very easy to put together! Top just slips on the folding bottom part of stand and is very adjustable. Love it!, "musical_instruments"
I am very pleased with this music stand.  It is working well for me and it holds my very heavy music binders so far .  I would recommend it to others to try., "musical_instruments"
On-Stage makes decent products, but this one would have been awesome if the actual table of the stand would fold one or more times. That would have been perfect! Otherwise, it works fine., "musical_instruments"
This is a great music stand.  Very solid  feel.  No need to over tighten the adjusters.  It holds my heaviest books without tipping over., "musical_instruments"
I left my trusty Manhasset behind on a job and was about to replace it when I came upon this alternative offered by Amazon.  As banged up as a Manhasset can get from week-end warriors like me who simply throw it on top of everything else in the backseat before the long ride home, I've never had one fail on me over the past 40+ years.  There's nothing on the stand that the user can even adjust, yet all of the moving parts always seem to retain just the right amount of tension, preventing 5-10 pound folders from lowering the top half or causing it to dip forward.  But the \"rub\" is their non-adaptability.  The feet on the base are permanently attached as is the upper tray holding the music.  Consequently, these ubiquitous, well-proven stands can sometimes be a challenge to pack in a crowded van or sedan, especially with a couple of keyboards, amps, instrument stands, and other requisite gear on board.This is where Amazon's On-Stage Music Stand becomes attractive (of course, it doesn't hurt that it costs less than a Manhasset).  It permits you to fold up the legs to a position parallel with the shaft as well as to completely remove the upper shelf that holds the music.  Consequently, it's much easier to find a convenient place--whether in the trunk or on the floor of the back seat--for packing the stand.  Simply \"slide\" it into position.The drawback--apart from durability issues that some reviewers have warned about (be careful not to over-tighten those set-screws!)--is that this thing is heavy.  Frankly, I was expecting a lightweight stand, at least compared to my old Manhasset, but if you've owned or been around the latter, the first thing you're likely to notice with the stand pictured here is a palpable, substantial addition in weight. At the same time, with the moving parts and the set screws (topped by plastic, rotating, serrated wheels), the On-Stage stand doesn't give me the same amount of confidence in its durability as did the Manhasset--in other words, I'm very less likely to become careless with it and simply toss it on top of the gear-pile after a long, exhausting 4-hour gig.Bottom line: the On-Stage appears to be a good value--a truly heavy-duty stand (in most respects) that'll do extremely well as a practice stand in a studio or living room and that packs up conveniently for traveling jobs.  But don't expect it to lighten your load or, simply because it's heavier, to last longer than a Manhasset.If you do a lot of traveling and don't plan to put one of those 1000-page piano folders on the stand, there's at least one truly lightweight (albeit plastic) stand that's worked out really well for me (perhaps needless to say, some haven't--they fall apart or they're so ingeniously designed that it takes 15 minutes simply to disassemble them and put them back in their unforgiving, pint-sized cases).  But the Peak stand is made to hold up (in turn, it holds up relatively heavy music books) and has served me well for several years (just as I was about to condemn the stand, I called the company, they responded immediately by sending out a critical plastic piece that had become warped, and the Peak stand has been problem-free ever since).  It'll cost you a bit more, but not as much as some folks are willing to spend in exchange for losing a few unwanted pounds., "musical_instruments"
I've purchased other types, but I keep coming back to this one. For the $$ it's the best buy in my opinion., "musical_instruments"
On Stage makes some very nice products.  This music stand has all the adjustments as one of our favorite older units.  Well made and the price doesn't put it out of range for the everyday musician.  Really am liking On Stage products, also bought 2 of their boom mic stands and they are excellent., "musical_instruments"
CRAP these strings are bad do not buy them if you play any kind of harder music or do a lot of string bends unless you like having strings almost take out your eyes then by all means buy em errrrr i always buy Ernie balls but i got cheap and tryed to save a few buck and buy 2 3 packs of these hunks of crap for under 18 bucks i should have spent the extra 7 bucks and got the 6 pack of Ernies I didn't even get a week out of them and they were rusted and poppin off left and right....................never again, "musical_instruments"
I was using slinkys for several years but decided to give these a shot because the slinkys kept corroding so quickly. Anyway, these seem to hold up a little better. Both sound good, but these last a couple weeks longer. So stock up!, "musical_instruments"
These sound good on my electrics.  The best sound I got was on my strat.  Good sustain and strings are holding up well., "musical_instruments"
These are great strings! Break in quickly and hold their tune, work for all styles of playing. My go to strings from now on., "musical_instruments"
These strings are okay, but nothing special except for the price, which is a factor when changing twice a week. I don't play enough to need changes that often anymore.So I've become more particular about trying to match the string to the guitar. This doesn't mean that these strings are bad, it just means I might prefer Brand X Pure Nickel on one guitar because they're darker and Brand Y Steels on another because they're brighter and Brand Z on yet another.So give these a try and if you prefer them it will be best to check on price by the case of this or any string that you prefer because they should be changed twice a month at least, if you want your instrument in top shape. A bad guitar can make a great artist sound only good., "musical_instruments"
I love D'Adarrio strings. Great tone and it last long, feels great on your fingers. D'Adarrio strings rule.  See ya!, "musical_instruments"
Hey jerks, do you play guitar?  Well, if you do, you need strings.  Well, you could be an experimental guitarist playing a stringless guitar.  If so, you can stop reading.  If you use strings, you should buy them your damn self.  While you're at it, buy ten sets.  Seriously, are you a child?  Always have extra strings.  D'Addarios last a long time for me, and they sound good.  Also, they're on the bottom end of the price range.  Buy some strings, douchnozzle., "musical_instruments"
I'm not a string nazi and will play pretty much any major brand of strings with few exceptions.  D'Addarios are good quality and combined with Amazon Prime a no brainer bargain, under $3 per set delivered.  Unless you just don't like D'Addario I would recommend these strings highly., "musical_instruments"
I don't know a lot about guitars and strings. I bought these for my daughters guitar and they sound very nice on there., "musical_instruments"
I've been using these strings for years. Tried a bunch of others as well, but these suckers keep coming out on top. Probably will never stop buying them., "musical_instruments"
Keeping in mind the difference types of guitars and pickups, these D'Addario strings are good strings for all around use. They are suitable for rock, punk, country, and funk. Sure, you could spend more on \"boutique\" specialty strings to give you that exact \"vintage\" sound, but these strings are just fine whether you play in the bedroom, garage or club.I like the light guage .010's because they are easy on the fingers, but are still beefy sounding compared to thin sounding .009's and .008's., "musical_instruments"
These are my go-to strings. They are perfect for gig use and are inexpensive as well as awesome sounding. What more do you need?, "musical_instruments"
I love these strings. They are bright and feel really good on my hands.I have a Gretsch and use 11's D'addario on it, best strings I've found so far. I also bought a pack of half wound 11's to TRY. I'll decide which to use (round or half wound) after my experiment., "musical_instruments"
I bought these strings to try on my guitars. They sound good on a variety of models, like SG,Les Paul, Rickenbacker. They have a melodic tone and good intonation, and they seem to be lasting and staying in good shape., "musical_instruments"
I've been trying out different gauges to experiment with different fretboard feels. These strings I have to say, stretched out and stayed in tune much faster than slinkys. They have great sustain and sound nice and chunky. I love the luster and shine of new strings, feels nice ans springy. Since this is my first time with this brand, I don't know how long they will stay good, but we'll see., "musical_instruments"
Put my Schecter C-1 Custom FR in Drop Bb, these strings sound great and have a great low end. Highly reccomend., "musical_instruments"
I started buying these strings for my guitar playing son back in December of 2012 and continue to do so to this very day. He absolutely swears by them. He does go through them fairly quickly being that the humidity here in Hawaii makes them prone to rusting. Other than that, the strings are strong and durable and gives off a nice sound quality. He highly recommends these strings to his fellow guitar players out there., "musical_instruments"
I have used these strings since they first came out. D'Addario make the best strings out there. I am sure there are others who do a good job, but you can actually hear the difference. It doesn't really matter which you buy - they all sound different - as in better!!, "musical_instruments"
Obviously these aren't top of the line strings but I used them to record a track in drop C and it sounded awesome. After about a week they started losing tone and started collecting skin.D'addario is awesome if you keep in mind that they're on the cheaper side., "musical_instruments"
I've purchased these locally several times over the past three years at a music store. Mainly due to the low cost. They work okay, but are difficult to keep in tune. The guitars have to be re-tuned often when temperature, humidity, or playing more than ten minutes occurs. My biggest complaint is tarnish and corrosion. Add that to the winding separating over the fret bars exposing the inner solid string, then the strings go \"flat\" sounding. These are not quality strings at all, just cheap Chinese Made quality. They are okay for someone that doesn't play often, but if you play daily or as a performer, avoid these strings. Better strings are worth the extra cost. You actually save money by not having to replace them often as you do with these cheap strings. I've had this problem with all the D'Addario brand strings, both for electric or acoustic, 6 or 12 string guitars. The thinner gauge strings will break during tuning or playing. The tarnish and corrosion often ends up contaminating the fret bars and keeping the neck dirty all the time. Cleaning after each playing session only makes the strings corrode faster., "musical_instruments"
I have been using D'adario strings for 30 years. They sound great. They stay in tune. Excellent sustain. I can get better string control compared to other strings. I have never experienced a string break in 30 years., "musical_instruments"
I swear by these strings. These are the only strings I will use on my Les Paul. Their bright tone sounds great and full, while the color coded ball ends makes restringing a breeze. Don't buy these strings just because I like them, buy them because they suit you. Because you like the tone they provide. Because they feel good against your fingers. Cons?? What cons...?? Try them., "musical_instruments"
Excellent guitar strings - they last a long time, sound great and are pretty cheap., "musical_instruments"
I absolutely love using these strings (10-46) on my Telecaster and Stratocaster. They just lend to that awesome Vintage tone and seepage that people like me go nuts over. If you're looking for a replacement set of strings, you simply cannot go wrong with the EXL sets here on Amazon., "musical_instruments"
These are excellent, inexpensive guitar strings. They are perfect for somebody that plays gigs and changes strings frequently. For the more casual player, these might not be the best choice.For the gigging musician, there is nothing better than these D'Addario strings. They are light weight, have great sound, and are inexpensive. These might take a very slight nod over Ernie Ball strings.For the more casual musician, somebody that isn't changing their strings once a week, these are probably not a great choice. Personally, I use Elixir strings on my electric guitars, a Les Paul 2008 Standard and a 1982 Gibson Lucille. I do not play gigs, so a set of strings doesn't see an hour or two of really hard playing per night. The coating on Elixir's helps keep corrosion down and is easier on my fingers; I like their feel a bit better than these strings. I get about a month of playing from those strings. Sadly, these D'Addario strings are really only good for about one or two weeks of playing.I've tried a variety of strings, Ernie Ball, Elixir, and D'Addario, on my guitars and the way I play, the Elixir's just sound and play the best to me. Of course, your mileage may vary. If I did start to play gigs, I would probably switch to a more affordable string like these.A silly cosmetic thing, I hate the packaging of these strings. D'Addario makes a huge deal out of reduced packaging and being environmentally responsible with their products. The strings come in a cardstock outer box, with a single plastic package inside. Each string size has a different colored ball on the end to help a person figure out the string gauge. I change strings myself, and I really prefer the individual paper envelopes for the strings, with the gauge clearly printed on the package. If you are new to changing strings, or only change them infrequently, this all in one package will confuse the heck out of you. Especially at first, I preferred to work with one string at a time.D'Addario also makes a major deal out of the serial number on their package to help fight fake strings. Their website has a place to enter the serial number to verify the package of stings is authentic. I kind of disliked the fact that you have to enter an email address to even get started. They could have very simply left a spot to enter the serial number with no other information necessary.In the end, the silly colored balls at the end of the strings, well they look goofy on my guitars. I wouldn't mind the colors on an acoustic (the ball gets hidden by the peg anyway), but those balls are visible on my electric guitar. I just prefer the simple gold balls on the ends of other strings., "musical_instruments"
I have always used D'Addario strings. Since the early 70's when I first found out they were manufactured right here on Long Island. I've never been disappointed by the quality., "musical_instruments"
What can you say about the best of the best.  I wouldn't use anything else on my guitar to get the best tonal quality from it.  These strings seem to last longer than the others I've used.  I highly recommend them., "musical_instruments"
My Strat has bigger frets than any guitar I have ever owned, and I have a tendency to sharp notes played on thinner gauges, particularly on the 3rd string. This 11 to 49 set feels more like my acoustic guitars and minimizes the problem of sharp notes from too much finger pressure, while still feeling \"faster\" than an acoustic guitar. They sound great, last a long time, stay in tune and are a good compromise between very light gauges and the really heavy sets., "musical_instruments"
I read all of the reviews and bought 6 pairs of these based on the reviews.So, I put these on my Gibson Les Paul last night and played for a few hours.  I didn't hammer the strings, just played easy, mostly the Eagles.As I was hanging the guitar on the wall afterward, I took a quick look at the strings.  I was shocked to see the high E and B strings were already flattened.  I never would have expected wear after just a few hours of light playing.The strings sounded great, but by the time I had them stretched enough that they would hold tune, they were already worn.I guess I'm going to HAVE to go to heavier strings so I'm not changing strings every few days.  These just did not perform as expected.Giving these 3 stars is being generous.  I have 5 sets to use up now, damn.  I was using light gauge and thought these mediums would hold up, but they lasted for only two hours......my Fender 3250L bullets at least lasted a few weeks.  Going to try the Fender on my Gibson and see how they sound.  I'm still in search of the \"perfect\" set of strings.  I'm open to suggestions, "musical_instruments"
I decided to give these a try after buying just earnie balls. Wow! Just wow! My inexperienced ear was able to tell a difference in the sound. It was just... Right. I can't explain it exactly. The .10 gauge is great for standard and eb tuning, although can be tuned lower. I would recommend something thicker for that though. But these are great and you should get em!, "musical_instruments"
I have played on D'addario Before,  actually the first string I started out on.Super light's are ok,  but can wear out real fast,  So, It's importent not to put to much stess on  them.....espescially if You do alot of tricks, pinched hormonic's vibrato's, extreme bend's,  etc  they will break.  Any skilled guitarist know's  to use  extream  caution when tuning....any strings,I did try extra light (while they do soud nice,and have a nice feel to them)  I would not recamend these for beginer's,  cause beginer's tend to press hard, when they first stat out.Personally,  I don't like D'addario's at all,  I find the tone to bright., "musical_instruments"
These strings are just prefect and feel awesome.  As you can tell from the amount of reviews on this product they are extremely popular.. and all those people cannot be wrong, "musical_instruments"
Some say \"daw-dare-e-o\", \"de-ah-dare-e-o\", \"dad-ar-ee-oh\", or \"dee-ah-dare-e-o\"Others shorten it to \"D-adds\" or even \"Daddy-O's\".  Took me a while to figure that last one out.I was trying to find out info about \"Daddy-O strings\" and why people thought they were so great.  Duh.While people may disagree on how to say the name, few debate the idea that these are great strings.* Less expensive that most string sets out there, especially if you buy multi-packs* Color-coded to make string changes easy* Easy to find from most any vendor or music store* Made in the USA* You can collect \"players points\" for SWAG* They are sealed in a special \"environmentally friendly\" package to keep them fresh and corrosion-free* They have one of the widest range of string-size combinations availableIf you are just starting out and do not know what to put on your new guitar then the phrase \"set it up with EXL-120s\" or \"put on some Da-Dairy-O\" nines\" is a good choice, at least for a strat or tele-like guitar.I personally like them better than Ernie Ball Super Slinkys aka \"EB Pinks\", but I cannot quite put my finger on \"why\".You can pay more for coated strings, cryogenic frozen strings, boutique strings, and all that but if you do not know what any of those are then you probably haven't been playing long enough to find value in them.Almost every guitarist has a set of strings they \"swear by\" because they work wonders that no other string can - they make them play smoother or faster, their last set of strings lasted for 6 years, or whatever.I just appreciate a great value, and D'Addario strings are just that.BTW, for the record the official pronunciation is \"Da-Dairy-O\":>> \"We receive letters each week regarding the correct pronunciation of the D'Addario name. Some years back, we even ran an ad that illustrated an easy way to pronounce the D'Addario name. The name is pronounced phonetically as follows: Da-Dairy-O. A simple way to pronounce the most difficult name in musical accessories!\", "musical_instruments"
I enjoy this very much! Very good strings! It's a good brand too! I recommend it for any acoustic that you have or will have!, "musical_instruments"
Hold a tune very well, and sound good. The seem to have a bit less tension than other brands strings of the same gauge, but thats ok.If you dont wipe them off after playing, they wont last long. But I always do, and I change strings often, so that isnt an issue for me.Overall, some of the best strings available., "musical_instruments"
I'm just starting out on the electric guitar and was told these were the best.  I like the light strings because they are kinder to my fingers and they still have a decent sound.  The price is right., "musical_instruments"
Not much to say, these are your basic hex core, nickel plated round wound strings.  They are the equivalent ofErnie Ball Slinkys (Yellow)They play nice, and feel pretty much the same in my humble (non-touring musician's) opinion.Also, it's nice that strings are now coming in air tight packaging to keep the fresher and rust free longer.  As a note these come packed together in a single bag, with color coded washers, (as opposed to the EB sets that are packed individually in paper sleeves or DR sets that come two to a sleeve.)In summary, if you're searching for the subtle sonic differences between the brands then you probably aren't reading this review, you're out experimenting.  For others, the lowdown is that these seem like good strings and are definitely worth checking out to see which ones you prefer more., "musical_instruments"
I have been using this brand in several different gauges for many years and continueto do so. I get long life and very good clarity from D'Addarios., "musical_instruments"
These aren't usually my go-to strings, but D'Addarios are a good, solid sounding string. They last fairly long when taken care of, and don't usually break too often. I DO like that they sound kind of bright without being overbearing. They will continue to be my 2nd string of choice, as they've not failed me any time I've purchased them. Definitely recommended., "musical_instruments"
These are a great alternative to phosphor bronze transatlantic cables for acoustic guitar! I would rather concentrate on making music. Why fight your guitar?, "musical_instruments"
My son has been a guitarist for seven years and loves these strings. Not a single one has broken since he started using these three weeks ago. These strings tend to repel the dirt and dust even with heavy play the strings look very good. He has been getting less callous on his fingers. The tone produced by these stings is very good especially considering the low price. My son has a very heavy hand but these strings are well made and withstand play from any style., "musical_instruments"
The gauges are identical to Ernie Ball Regulars (yellow label) but the D'Addario's string tension feels stiffer, which is nice for slide playing. I like my action medium-low, comfortable for straight playing and bending, solid intonation for chords, yet not too much fret rattle for slide.I usually stretch the heck out of Ernie Ball's after putting them on because they have so much spring in them. I deliberately left the D'Addarios unstretched overnight and found they settled in nicely without much stretching at all. Their new sound is quite bright as advertised, but has far less of what I call `new string jangle', which is fine by me. As a kid, I'd sweat that off in an hour but these days, playing a number of instruments, it can last awhile.There's a string tension chart, handy for designing a custom set and each pack has a serial number.  I'll admit I'd never considered the possibility guitar strings were worthwhile targets for counterfeiting, but apparently that's the case and D'Addario provides a web site lookup to verify your set. If you do come across fakes, if you're willing to report it, they'll provide you with a genuine replacement for free.I've used D'Addario phosphor-bronze acoustic strings on guitars and mandolins for over 25 years and swear by their quality and consistency. I've used Ernie Ball's on electrics for even longer. Habits can be tough to break but, as my playing has broadened out from my rock roots, I find it interesting to experiment with different gauges and windings. Finally nailing a sound and feel you've been chasing after for years makes it all worth it., "musical_instruments"
I ended up settling on these as being my favorite strings years ago.  Ultimately, they're simply the best for the money.  You can get them for less than $3 per pack, if you shop around., "musical_instruments"
These are perfect strings for a gig or a long practice session. The strings keep their tone for a long time. Can easily last upto a month on daily practice for 2-3 hours., "musical_instruments"
I have used d'addario for a number of years.  I'm not hot about their acoustic, but electric...they're a whole new world.  I like these nickel on my tele...they give them that extra twang., "musical_instruments"
I have used D'Addario strings for years on my Gibson Les Paul and they sound GREAT. Had a stint where I tried coated strings on the Paul but they just didn't have the ringing bright tone that D'Addarios have. I've never been one to have strings break on me that often, guess I just don't play that heavy-handed, but I have many friends who do and who still use these and find them very reliable. They are comparible in tone to Dean Markely's and Slinky's IMHO. I very much recommend these strings to anyone who plays electric guitar of all styles - I have used them on rock, country, jazz, fusion and christian contemporary gigs. Very dependable. The set usually lasts me a couple of shows before I change them out - like any string they will lose brightness after a couple of gigs. Strings claiming to last longer than that in tone are, in my opinion, usually somewhat lifeless to begin with. Anyway... these are great threads for the ole geetar - if you have never used them you should try them out... good stuff., "musical_instruments"
As I stated about some other guitar strings I purchased here, these D'Addarios for my electric guitar give me the sound, service and price point I need!, "musical_instruments"
great strings, and they last well! i've never had a problem with these and i'm glad i can get them on here for a decent price., "musical_instruments"
I've been using D'Addario XL strings since the 80s.  I love 'em.  The 10 pack price is amazing., "musical_instruments"
The best strings I ever bought and I've bought them all. I got these for my electric and the EJ26-10P acoustic electric for my acoustic. They have a really full sound, bright highs, and they bend like crazy., "musical_instruments"
Folks, I've tried them all from Dean Markley to Ernie Ball.  All have their good and bad points.  But after 22 years of guitar playing, D'Addario still makes the best electric guitar strings for my money.  Although I prefer the super light top, regular bottom version, I have always loved the feel, tone and durability of D'Addario strings., "musical_instruments"
I have been purchasing these strings for over 15 years now. Only string that I allow to touch my electric guitars., "musical_instruments"
Been using these for years.  I like the Regular Slinkies, too, but it seems these tend to last longer.  Or, it could just be in my head.  Either way, I am happy with them., "musical_instruments"
I've been playing for nearly ten years and I've used all sorts of strings on many different guitars, I've had ball ends pop off for no reason, ball ends rolling around in the bottoms of containers when I've bought them new, and a lot of unnecessary string breakage and fast corrosion, (all top brands) I have also overpaid for fancy gimmicks on strings that are supposed give you magic tones ect. Then I tried D'addario, they just work and work well, I'm not asking for anything magical I just need what I need when I need it and these string have never failed to deliver, I've been using them for over three years now I don't know why I didn't give them a shot sooner, I could have saved a lot of money trying them first. Bottom line is these strings do the job without any drama, giving me more time to just play!, "musical_instruments"
These bright sounding strings are easy to play, hold up well and rarely break.  One of my favorite strings for my Les Paul.  I tend to go with Ernie Ball Super Slinky's on my Strat, but these would probably sound nice on a Strat as well., "musical_instruments"
The price was most definately the main draw,I am very glad that I placed the order,these people are pleasant to work with!!!!!, "musical_instruments"
This is my second order of the 10 pack. A local store wants 29.99 for one set of these. The feel is really good in my opinion as opposed to all the other brands I've tried; including, and especially the most commonly used eb's. I have however had a slight issue with certain D strings. On occasion, it looks as if the winding is chipping off, but not at the frets. I change strings quite often so it really doesn't matter. Not sure what that's about but it doesn't affect anything and like I said this IS my second order of these so I gave them 5 stars. Any less and I'd look dumb., "musical_instruments"
I've been using these strings on my guitars for the last 30+ years.  They always give me consistent results.  I consider them one of the greatest bargains out there., "musical_instruments"
I love these strings, been using them forever and via Amazon Subscribe and Save I get them for a really good price., "musical_instruments"
I didn't give 5 stars just because I know there are better strings out there, but these strings are a great value and wouldn't hesitate to buy them again. In fact, I have already bought them several times. One little thing I appreciate about these strings is the different colored ends that makes them easy to identify., "musical_instruments"
For a good, basic set of regular light gauge electric guitar strings, it's difficult to go wrong with D'Addario's EXL110s.  The range of thicknesses generally works well, and D'Addarios tend to be pretty consistent.  Some other brands may offer special features that go beyond what you get with the EXL110s (e.g. coating, super brightness, and so on), and some players prefer a slightly heavier or slightly lighter gauge string (e.g. sets that start with 9s or 11s), but for most purposes these work great, hold their tuning well, and seem to last pretty well, too., "musical_instruments"
The D'Addario sets are good stuff. I got turned onto them about a decade ago by a coworker. The color coded ends are great whether you are new at changing strings or just want it more automated if you are an old veteran. With stretching, they stay in tune fine. The unknown truth about non-nylon strings (and maybe even them, too) is that there are only a handful of string makers, and D'Addario actually makes them for other companies (Gore uses them for their Elixir series, and just adds the polyweb coating). I also use the GHS standard .010 sets, and they are good too. My faves are the Ernie Ball sets, but they rarely go on sale. I don't remember who makes what strings for what companies, though. With offshore production a standard thing now, it's no telling where they actually come from anyways. I DOUBT that GFS strings are domestic production, for instance., "musical_instruments"
In my opinion, D'Addario is the standard by which all other strings are measured. I keep trying different brands from the cheap to the boutique, and I always keep coming back to D'Addario. Extremely versatile, stable and they last as long as can be reasonably expected of any non coated string., "musical_instruments"
These strings are good. Nice tone, last a decent amount of time, and they're cheap. Color coded ball-ends make it easy to string without having to pay much attention. I use these on all my electric guitars now, where before I used Dean Markley 11-52 (mostly Les Paul scale) - I moved to these when I got a strat-scale guitar. I don't remember why I picked these, other than they are cheap and readily available everywhere, where Dean Markley can be hit or miss., "musical_instruments"
These strings aren't for everyone, and probably not what you want for everyday, normal playing. But if you're looking for a fast-playing string with a bright sound, this is the string. In addition to putting them on my guitar, I also have a six-string banjo (guitar tuning) and just couldn't get the sound I wanted from regular guitar strings. Light guage nickel strings were recommended to me, and they were exactly what I was looking for. They have a clear, bright sound that great for picking and strumming. I play a lot of bluegrass and Irish music, and I feel these strings are ideal for that purpose. I use a lot of D'Addario strings on my various instruments, and I think they offer the most bang-for-the-buck in terms of quality and tone. You can pay more, but I don't think you get that much more. Although these were intended for electric guitar, they also work well on resonator guitars., "musical_instruments"
D'Addario Are The Best Strings That I Have Tried, I Used To Use Ernie Ball Super Slinky's But Found That These Last Longer, The Ernie's Bend and Play Well But They Tend To  Go Dull Faster Not To Mention The Ernie's Start Corroding Within A Week, These D'Addario Strings Stay Brighter Longer, I Usually Change Them About Every 4 Weeks, The Ernie's Only Last Me A Week, 2 Weeks At The Most, That Can Get Expensive Fast, All Around The D'Addario Strings Are The Strings 4 Me, Retraction, when I originally wrote this review I thought they were the best, Turns out they are in fact way better than Ernie Ball Strings, but they are no longer my preference, A friend of mine told me about DR strings and they are much better than these D'Addarios. DR's last three times as long as D'Addario. the DR's cost a lil more but they are way better, for the money Addarios are good but I would recommend spending a few dollars more for DR strings, "musical_instruments"
An opinion on guitar strings is fairly subjective.  With that said, I've been stringing my jackson soloist w/ floyd rose with these strings for years.  I've never had a problem, and I wouldn't buy anything else., "musical_instruments"
They are ok not a big fan tho they have a odd metal sound when you play them. I had earnie ball on previously and I might switch back or go to dunlop witch I put on my 7 sting and love.  But I probably won't get these again..... Ever., "musical_instruments"
To be clear: I am quite the newbie guitar player.After i managed to break a string on my electric guitar, i decided to try and tackle replacing the strings myself, as most guitarists do. Things went alright, but on trying to tune the thinnest string, it broke. I just figured it was something I did, and wasn't the products fault, so i grabbed another string from another pack and that one went on fine. Overall, i've played quite abit with these strings, and have yet to break another one. Pretty good sound quality, and i like the idea that they pack the strings in a moisture-resistant package to prevent corrosion., "musical_instruments"
como siempre esta marca con sus productos de calidad es un producto 100% recomendado por mi! es superrr bueno!! OK, "musical_instruments"
These strings have made me a D'Addario customer for life.  The sound and feel are perfect, and I find that they last much longer than more expensive coated strings.  I have no desire to buy any other brand.These strings are NOT over-hyped., "musical_instruments"
d,addario makes great strings, this just where not the gages I was lookin for.other than that I like this brand of strings, "musical_instruments"
I've almost exclusively used Earnie Balls and D'addarios since I was a kid,and have always been satisfied. I've taken advantage of Amazon deals on both strings lately. The D'addarios are excellent strings, and this price on the 10-pack was unbeaten,anywhere., "musical_instruments"
These have good tone, but I can't see much of a difference over other brands at the same price point. I initially experienced buzzing after the string change with these but I needed to adjust the truss rod. Came in a timely manner from Sam Ash. Thanks!, "musical_instruments"
These D'Addario  strings are great!  I am currently using them on my Epiphone Sheraton and compared to the Fender Bullets I had been using, these stay more uniform in tone throughout their life.  Intonation is good and I've noticed less breakage as well.These strings are a bit bright but have plenty of 'good' sparkle too and really sound good on my Strat, even more so than my Sheraton.  Being from the 'old school' I still much prefer strings to be packaged individually in paper, but what can ya do? Besides that, I am totally stoked and happy with these.  I think I might try 9's on the Sheraton but even as is they play (and sound) very good., "musical_instruments"
They sound great, and I'd purchase them again. With ten packs, it will likely be a while before I do so., "musical_instruments"
I bought these strings at a local shop for a Fender Telecaster on reccomendation from the guitar tech. These work well with the Telecaster tone and string through design. I like the tones I get from these and the price is very good. I do know that Ibanez uses XL's with all of their new guitars and I have used these srtrings with an older strat and they last a long time and stay in tune without issue mostly due to their basic fundamental design.I am not loyal to any string company, but I find that different companies work well on different guitars. I am a big DR string user with my other guitars which require thicker strings, so using 9 guage is new to me.Originally, I went to the shop for some EB super Slinky's after snapping the high E string which were sold out and went with these and could not be happier. I may buy the same strings next time, but I see Telecaster players using GHS Boomers in 9's, so that is also an option for the future., "musical_instruments"
I've tried just about every make of round wound electric guitar strings in the last 30-40 years, and I've settled on D'Addarios for all my guitars. Their strings are of uniformly high quality and excellent consistency, the price is right, they're color coded to make string changing easier, and they come in an air tight plastic package that keeps them from corroding even after sitting in a guitar case or a year or more. The 10s are my choice for rock and blues., "musical_instruments"
I've used these since I fist started playing, always trying the latest and greatest along the way, but I keep on coming back to these. They have a great feel to them, sound twangy and great, have decent durability, are cheap as all get out, and have the best multi pack deals out there(especially on Amazon)....I simply don't see any reason to switch atm. Try 'em out, you'll like 'em :), "musical_instruments"
I bought these to put on my Epiphone Sheraton II. I really like the thickness of the strings and the full tone they offer. Rhythm and lead styles both sound great. Definitely recommend these strings and will buy more in the future., "musical_instruments"
D'Addario strings are awesome!  These strings speak with a bold,defined and POWERFUL voice.  The bass strings boom with thunderous lows and the treble strings glisten with sparkling highs without being too harsh.  They are very sweet to the ears and tonally balanced across the board without one frequency overpowering the other. I have tried a lot of different strings, DR's, Ernie Ball, Dean Markley, Elixir, GHS, you name it.  After putting a set of EXL110's (10-46 gauge) on my Gibson SG special faded and comparing them to Ernie Ball I noticed a huge difference, not only were they brighter but they lasted longer.  I used to change a set of Regular Slinkys every two months but with EXL's I was changing strings every five to six months. They work in a variety of applications, metal, hard rock, jazz, blues, reggae, etc. and respond great at any dynamic level.  D'Addario is \"The Player's Choice\" for a reason after using these I can't see myself using anything else!  They feel good,sound great and are exceptionally consistent from set to set. If you haven't used them yet, give 'em a try and see what you're missing., "musical_instruments"
I have been playing guitar for three decades and It seems to me that D'Addario has been around.I use light strings when I want more control and easier bends for blues songs on my electric guitar.  Light strings in my hands do seem to wear out sooner, probably because I used them in this manner.  It is great that Amazon stocks these, making ordering convenient.  These come in a stay fresh vacuum pack, so ordering more than one and keeping an extra set around is prudent., "musical_instruments"
Daddy's never let you down. I like their longevity too. I don't switch til one cuts, so they last as cheap as I actually am., "musical_instruments"
Fits very well on my les Paul 100, "musical_instruments"
I replaced the factory strings on myDean Playmate Avalanche Junior Solid Body Electric Guitar, Metallic Silver, 3/4 Sizeand what a difference in sound.  These strings seriously rock.  I also use D'Addario strings on my ukulele and I've had great luck with those. They withstand a lot of play and I don't have to replace them often. The best part is, the sound is so much brighter and louder.  Definitely recommended., "musical_instruments"
If you're a Froosh fan like me, than look no further. These are the strings used by John Frusciante (formerly of the Red Hot Chili Peppers). These strings really are special. They help nail his tone and are slick, light, feel and handle bends perfectly. I use these on my 1962 Strat Reissue and they really compliment the stratocaster well. Highly recommended for those playing blues/funk/rock.Plus, I mean, come on, John mother *&%$#$% Frusciante uses them! :p, "musical_instruments"
The best strings i've ever had so far miles above ernie ball strings, "musical_instruments"
One this is a Long Island Company located in Farmingdale New York. They are the leader in new technology of strings..., "musical_instruments"
I've been using these for years. Tried others but I prefer these. I'd allways come back to D'addario's. They just sound good. I'm satisfied., "musical_instruments"
For this review, I used the services of my super-musician friend, Mike. Thanks for the very thorough review, Mike!******************D'Addario XL Nickel WoundRegular Light Gauge EXL110Bright Round Wound.010-.046I installed these strings on a Schecter Diamond Serier Acoustic - Electric HybridC-1 E/A in order to test the sound using both acoustic and electric settings. The strings were easy to work with on installation.In particular, I liked the color coding of the strings vs the traditional individuallywrapped strings. The color coding makes it hard to accidentally mix similar strings and ismore environmentally friendly in terms of packaging. Also, the sealed packet wouldappear to keep the strings from oxidizing longer.The strings tuned up quickly and reached stable tuning within a very short time frame.After only about an hour they needed only slight tuning adjustment and were ready to go.First, I tried the Hybrid using a clean acoustic setting and the string produced a surprisingly nice range of sound, especially in the lower registers. This was a bit unexpected because of the \"bright\" label on the package. I actually prefer a widerrange of frequencies so this was a nice bonus. The highs were clean and bright.Using the Bernard Butler setting on the Line 6 Amp I tried the electric side of the Hybrid.The action of the strings was light and fast and notes could be comfortably bent. The sound produced was very similar to that of the more expensive strings that previously were on the guitar, which leads me to my closing point.Overall, I was very pleased with the performance of these strings and when you consider the fact that they only cost around $3,  D'Addario EXL110's will be put in my \"Best Buy\" category for future purchases., "musical_instruments"
tough to even strech this into a full review...this is a no brainer! great strings, an industry standard at a great price, what's nor to love?!?, "musical_instruments"
I have been a faithful user of D'Addario strings since a well meaning obsession-starter recommended them to me at a local music store.  Compared to other brands of nickel strings that I've used, these ones just feel \"cleaner\" than the others. They have a clearer sound, and seem to hold their tune better than most.If you're looking for acoustic strings, you can't beat the phosphorus bronze for warmth and clarity.  But if you're looking for electrics that are reasonably priced and sound clean, look no further., "musical_instruments"
I've been using the D'Addario strings for about 10 years now... US steel, US made and private labels provider for many other brands of strings.  (in other words many other flashy string package companies are just the middleman between you and the best strings... little known fact in the industry)  Their tone and longevityrivals any other string in the industry.  After 40plus years of playing, D'Addario Rocks., "musical_instruments"
These are good, quality strings that will last on your guitar for many months to come. Probably my second favorite after Ernie Ball., "musical_instruments"
These EXL115 .011 gauge D'Addarios are good strings at a good price.  They sound nice and bright on my Epiphone Sheraton II and particularly twangy on the lower end of the scale, which I like.  I'd rather get these and replace them periodically than try to make any kind of old strings last a long time.  The strings don't break either., "musical_instruments"
Great strings at a great price.  These strings have a nice sound to them and they aren't the flimsy little strings you normally get for you guitar.  Nice sound for a nice price..., "musical_instruments"
I love these strings and the price too since I like to change them every time I do a modification to my guitars. Every couple months I change something making \"Upgrades\". They sound Great and stay in tune well., "musical_instruments"
I usually use 9s, but decided to try these 10s instead. I didn't notice much of a difference at first, but after a while I noticed that it's easier to tune between the G and D string (3rd and 4th strings) because the gauges are closer. Sound is just right for instrumental rock, shredding metal and delivering that Fatal Blow..., "musical_instruments"
As stated, I use the D'Addario 9s and 10s on all my electric guitars except for theGibson LP's and I use Brite wires on those.I like the D'Addario's over the Brite wires because they have color coded balls and thismakes changing out all the strings at once a lot easier.I do not produce a lot of body acid, so strings last a very long time with me, no matterwho the manufacturer is, and I play many guitars in my collection so none of them gets heavyuse.The EXL strings produce great tone, and are great for bending., "musical_instruments"
These DAddario EXL110 strings are light, responsive and make my Gibson guitar sound great.  They work great. Why use anything else?, "musical_instruments"
I use D'addario strings almost exclusively, they make a quality product and at $3 a box shipped to my door when I buy 10 packs is a great deal., "musical_instruments"
I've been playing for 8 years and I own 4 electric guitars.  All of my guitars are strung with D'Addario 10's.  They sound great when they're fresh and in my opinion they stay fresh the longest.  I play at least 15-20 hours per week so I put a decent amount of wear and tear on my strings.  It's really the durability that sets these apart.The Amazon price is terrific.  I like to restring my main guitar a little bit more than once a month and I can buy a year's worth of these for the same price as 1 set of bass strings.  I'd definitely recommend these strings and recommend purchasing through Amazon., "musical_instruments"
As with any Daddario or planet waves product, it's always great quality and has great tone. I've used almost every brand of stings out there, but I always come back to Daddario., "musical_instruments"
If you're into playing blues, these strings have great tone and due to being a light guage, they allow you to bend the strigs easier.  I'm not a working musician and only play for my own enjoyment, but I'd use these anywhere., "musical_instruments"
Love these strings.  Great for bending and awesome sound.  I don't change strings nearly often enough but with a three pack I can rest assure that I always have a back up set just in case., "musical_instruments"
I've been hooked on D'Addarios for quite a while.  The per-unit price on these is great, and I never worry about breaking one of these., "musical_instruments"
D'Addario Strings are not my usual strings, I have always used GHS and Ernie Ball Strings.To my surprise D'Addario Strings are very nice, however after 20+ years of GHS and Ernie Ball Strings it's tough for me to make a full time change over to D'Addario Strings., "musical_instruments"
I like these strings. I have had nothing but problems with Ernie Ball strings, especially the higher ones unravelling at the ball ends and breaking as you are tuning up for the first time after a change. I have also found that the Ernie Balls break easily as well. I have had no problems with these, they sound good, feel good, and they are priced right., "musical_instruments"
D'Addario always comes through for the musician who wants a great product on the cheap. I've used boutique strings for many years, but always come back to these. Great tone, great string life (with a little maintenance) and very reasonably priced. Loved these as a replacement for the Fender Super Bullets that came on my USA Fender Standard Stratocaster., "musical_instruments"
I'm a huge fan of D'Addario strings. They hold their tone & tuning longer than others I've tried, and when you buy the bulk packs you can't go wrong on quality + value., "musical_instruments"
After tons of experimenting, I settled on the EXL116 for D standard and E flat standard. I've tried 10-52 but the top is a little too floppy for D and that makes notes sound out of tune if you don't press the string just right. Also tried 11-56 and while that gives a real solid and full rhythm tone, the attack is too rounded due to the pick taking longer to travel over a wider string. That reduces articulation. So while you get a fuller sound with the 56, you get more dynamics and attack with the 52, and the latter makes metal rhythms sound heavier. You can EQ fullness into a rhythm track, but you can't add in pick attack and greater dynamics.Tension wise, at D standard 11-56 is ideal but 11-52 is doable. Sound wise, 11-52 has been best for my metal recordings and that's why I'm sticking with the EXL116 set from now on. I also replaced the G string with a 20 gauge wound for better sounding power chords. And compared to Ernie Balls, D'addarios start off less bright but maintain their brightness longer, thus a more even and predictable response over time., "musical_instruments"
I use these light guage strings because I have arthritis.  Makes a big difference in how easy it is to play the guitar again.  And if you buy them in a 10 pack, you save a bunch of money!, "musical_instruments"
This was a good purchase.  My son has discovered guitars and music and when he needed strings, Amazon was his go-to place to buy them.  He found exactly what his guitar needed and at a good price.  He's very happy with this purchase., "musical_instruments"
I read some of the reviews and that people almost had to guess what strings were what. However on the bag that it comes with, to prevent corrosion, and on the box itself have a color coded guide saying what string is what color on the nut. The strings themselves are the normal color for strings., "musical_instruments"
Great strings and they seem to hold their sound a long while. I&#8217;m not sure why a few people are putting these strings down; I&#8217;ve used them numerous times without any issues. They last as long and sound as good as any other brands I&#8217;ve played., "musical_instruments"
Great deal on great strings. They sound clear and bright and they last a good while. Quality strings DO sound different, and nearly as importantly, they feel good too., "musical_instruments"
I have an Epiphone Dot and I installed a Bigsby V5 on it.  I could not find a gig bag for semi hollow body guitar so settled on this one due to the price.  And a previous reviewer said his Dot with Bigsby fits.  Well it fits, but just barely.  The guitar fits snugly in the plush lined case.  I have to turn the arm of the Bigsby around, facing down, to close the case.  I think the case probably pushes the arm down a little bit even in this position.  I probably wouldn't store my guitar in this case for long periods cuz I'd worry about tension on the strings.  Otherwise I like it., "musical_instruments"
The shell and the lining of the case are perfect: hard on the outside, and soft on the inside.I opened up the box and my Epiphone Dot slid right in.The only thing that worries me is that the hinges feel a little cheap, and the lock cold be beat with a bic pen.I'm not traveling around with my guitar too much, so that's not a problem for me, but I would worry a bit if I were checking it on an airline.Otherwise, it works perfectly for what I bought it for - protecting it in my mancave / basement from dings and scratches., "musical_instruments"
There seems to be a lot of know it alls when it comes to this case. One reviewer says it's made by Fender. I seriously doubt that and have to wonder on what he bases that on. Show me proof. Someone else seems to think it's made by Epiphone. Sorry to disappoint you but Epiphone doesn't make cases. They accept bids from case manufacturers who can build a case to thier specifications at the lowest cost. I have several Epiphone 335 Dots and a Gibson ES335. I bought Epiphone cases for all of them. I found the Gibson case to be identical except for the color of the lining and the logo on the outside of the case. I couldn't see any sense in paying more money just for the Gibson name. My Gibson fits perfectly in the Epiphone case. Although the cases have the Epiphone logo on the outside, they are all made by TKL. How do I know that you're wondering? They have a TKL tag on the inside of the accessory compartment. That's been a few years ago. The cases you get now could be made by a different company. The case is very heavy and is actually heavier than the guitar. Regardless of who actually makes the case, it has to meet Epiphone's manufacturing standards so it's got to be good. This case will fit The 335 Dot, Casino, Sheraton and the Gibson ES335. Anyone who knows anything about guitars knows that the Epiphone Joe Pass Emperor II has a much thicker body than the 335 Dot. This case was not intended for the Emperor II. It's a great case and will protect your guitar, but it's not designed to be thrown from a rooftop or run over by a car. I just bought two more of these cases for my Harmony Rockets. One is a single cutaway reissue and the other is a vintage double cutaway. Both guitars fit perfectly., "musical_instruments"
Bought this for my Dot. It fits snugly and is adequately padded. The outer material is strong so I feel comfortable carrying and storing my guitar in it. A must if your already paying so much more for the Guitar that will go in it., "musical_instruments"
This Epiphone Hardshell case is a real bargain!  Well built and functional, just the perfect size for your Dot,  Casino, 335 , or in my case a Sheraton II.  Finished in faux leather, a nice scuff resistant vinyl of some sort, much like the old Fender Tolex.  NICE hardware on this case. All the latches are fitted well and are both good looking and rock solid. Hinges too.  The handle isn't going anywhere!  Inside you get a nice soft plush interior, the obligatory hinged compartment for strings and things, and a good solid rattle free fit for your guitar.Top all that off with 2 feet on the end for standing upright,  2 well placed feet on the side and 3 on the bottom. NO matter which way you place the case (other than upside down) both your guitar and case are protected.  You get a total of FIVE good quality latches (one of them locks, key included) and hinges at either end. As I said, the hardware on the case is really good.  For under one hundred dollars this case is an unbelievable bargain.I was immediately struck by how SOLID this case feels.  It is no lightweight either.  I feel totally secure keeping and transporting my Sheraton II in this case and unworried about it breaking apart or popping open, etc.  Mine came almost scuff free out of the box, but there were a few signs that it had been handled a bit before packing. Still, it looks super and , "musical_instruments"
great case for my Epiphone Sheraton II! If you own a dot, sheraton, or a 335, you should buy this case! It comes with a key so you can lock it., "musical_instruments"
As a lot of Epiphone owners have learned, cases designed for the Gibson ES-335 clones won't fit Epiphone guitars, as the Epiphones have a slightly larger headstock. This case, however, fits my Dot Custom like a glove. The padding is perfect, the top is arched to precisely fit the guitar, and the build quality is better than you might expect at this price level., "musical_instruments"
Didn't expect much for the price but this is a top notch case for any of the Epiphone - Gibson  Semi-Hollowbody Guitars - Great Deal to protect your investment!!, "musical_instruments"
I got this for my Epi Sheraton II:PROS:  It fits perfectly; it's \"fur\" lined and has a decent sized internal compartment; it's solid and the hardware is sturdy; it has one locking latch (out of five), but nothing that would stop a real thief; it has two knobs on the bottom that allow the case to stand on end without tipping over, two knobs on the side for when you put it down on its side, and three knobs on the back that allow it to lay down without being completely on the ground; it's relatively thin.CONS:  It's heavy; the handle is positioned oddly and at an angle; it has some \"Made in China\" characteristics.I've had several cases and this is one of the nicest.  On a personal level, I'd prefer it didn't say \"Epiphone\" on the outside.  But since it does it's a good place to hide a $3000 Gibson 335., "musical_instruments"
When my case arrived I feared it was too small to hold my Epiphone Dot. But, this case fits my Dot like a glove. The case is sturdy enough to protect my guitar from knocks and dings while the plush inside pampers the guitar's finish. The accessory compartment is large enough to hold my picks, tuner, and extra strings., "musical_instruments"
Classic design.  I remember these from 35 years ago in high school band.  They haven't changed much, don't fix it if it's not broken., "musical_instruments"
My son uses this for practicing at home with his electric bass (Jazz Band) and his standup bass (Chamber Orchestra). It is solid, yet flexible in height and angle. Assembly was a breeze. This is the classic music stand in schools and is also excellent for home use. Built like a tank. Should last forever and can be passed down to the next generation of musicians in the family., "musical_instruments"
This is a heavier duty and higher quality music stand than most. It will accommodate my big notebooks of fake sheets, which I love. Some people have complained about plastic hinges being fragile, but they are fine if you don't use excessive muscle., "musical_instruments"
It's survived my clumsiness and I can load it with 4 pounds of guitar books without it breaking a sweat., "musical_instruments"
The M48 is well built, sturdy and well balanced enough that I have no concerns about tipping, even when it is loaded with several music books and a folder of sheet music. The tray is wide with an appropriately sized lip, and is moveable up and down with a moderate effort. Once in place it stays there with no slipping. For all of the solid construction it does not feel heavy and it is easy to move around, although it would be a little awkward to transport it in a small car.This is one of those purchases where there are a number of alternatives, and I always have some concern that it will not be what I want when I get it... in this case it is a winner. Delivered when promised in good condition and appropriately packed., "musical_instruments"
This is the one you want.  It's a timeless classic, built like a tank, worth every penny.  An investment in your musical future!, "musical_instruments"
Made in the U.S.A. was a great thing to see. Nothing but Chinese CRAP for sale anymore.(I'm looking at YOU N.A.F.T.A.) Sadly, not as nice as the ones I remember from high school band class.Plastic attachment clutch and EXTREMELY thin gauge metal. Who knows what REAL QUALITY would cost these days?Still, I do feel good knowing that an English speaking, tax paying U.S. citizen got to meet his house payment making these.GOD Bless the U.S.A., "musical_instruments"
tremendous mic!! love the case and shockmount being all inclusive.....got it at great price and its a kick ass addition to my rather wimpy home/portable studio.....love recording my mom and musical friends and they dig singing into a quality mic!!! I run it through an art tube preamp and it can make an unbelieveable hot signal without distortion and so very clear, "musical_instruments"
There is no doubt in my mind that you will be impressed with the quality this microphone has to offer your home studio or voice-over applications. It does well and minimizing the air pressure impact of the room and it humbly presents any voice with great clarity and a bassy tone. NOTE: use a good preamp or a external EQ, "musical_instruments"
I've only been in broadcasting for 3 years professionally and I have to say, after researching condenser microphones for several months, countless reviews and spec research I can honestly say, this mic compares and indeed exceeds many microphones costing hundreds of dollars more.Here's another interesting fact. I thought the &#34;King of all Media&#34;, Howard Stern would have used some gold plated 10 thousand dollar anniversary rig... well I found out he uses a 990 as well. So, think about it, perfect for the amateur, perfect for the professional... and under 100 dollars? Incredible! You WON'T be disappointed on this buy., "musical_instruments"
I'll keep this short and simple, I do alot of radio work, and saw the price of this mic of eBay (I wanted to use Paypal) and got it. 60 bucks for something I'd have easily have paid 100+ for, and with the included shockmount, it's a total steal. This obviously won't match top quality condensers, but for speech atleast, I find it to have a wonderful crisp tone with a warm sound to compliment your voice. It just has that smooth radio sound you hear on stations like NPR, which I just love. It sounds fantastic and with a proper interface, possibly the best condenser I've tested that's under 150 bucks., "musical_instruments"
this is one of the best mics in this price range. It sounds incredible, and at this price it's unbeatable. I only use three mics, and this is my main vocal, drum overhead, and acoustic guitar mic (although I use two mics on the guitar). My other mic's are a SM57, which is incredible and not crazy expensive, and an Audio-Technica Instrument/Vocal mic. I love this mic and would replace if it ever breaks., "musical_instruments"
Again these microphones are made for studio I use it live, again you have to have a good PA System for these to work great. Great microphone if you want to really sound like a real singer, this is the top of the top. Thank you Amazon., "musical_instruments"
$49 for a $199 microphone at Amazon? May not be the best mic out there but for home studios, this one marks the spot. Get it if you're on a budget., "musical_instruments"
I love this product. It came fast, included extra shockmount line, shockmount, an adapter, the mic, instructions, and a very durable and protective case of easy transporting. The sound quality is great with the Art Tube Preamp(use mic cables, not 1/4\" cables for Phantom Power), and I couldn't be happier with it. It even looks impressive. Although, I do have to say that online the product looks silver and shiny, when in reality it is this \"off-silver\" color. Almost a gold, but not quite. It's not bad or anything, just different. And frankly, the thing could be purple for all I care- as long as it produces great sound, that's all that matters. Great product, and extremely affordable. No complaints., "musical_instruments"
The MXL 990 sounds just as every bit as good as some very expensive mikes I have used. Just like with any condenser mike it's a good idea to invest in a decent pop filter if you don't want those annoying popping P's in your recordings. I would recommend this mike to anyone for vocals or miking acoustic guitars in your recording studio or portastudio. Also a great mike for doing voiceovers., "musical_instruments"
It took me a while to figure out how to implement this mic.  But with the right equipment it has turned out to be a nice addition to my recording studio., "musical_instruments"
I own two of these and they are perfect for home studio vocals, and a step above dynamic mics as long as you run this one through a pre (I use aPreSonus Tubepre Single-Channel Vacuum Tube Mic Pre. No matter which pre you get make sure it can supply phantom power because this mic needs it.Also, this model is XLR only. Even if you get an XLR to TRS adapter you will not be able to provide phantom power to it with that arrangement, so make sure that your mixer has a spare XLR input for this mic, and that it will provide phantom power if you skip my recommendation to get a pre amp.There are a few other things you need to know or consider if this is your first condenser mic: use the included shock mount because this mic picks up handling noise. Merely touching it will show up as ambient noise in your mix. A pop filter is essential.This mic is not optimal for live performances because it's delicate and does not lend itself to excess handling. It is perfect in controlled, stationary environments like home studios. Another reason is itd will pick up a lot of nearby stage noise if not placed in a 'sweet spot'.I mentioned that this is perfect for vocals and it is. However, it is not the best solution for micing instruments or amps, especially those in the lower registers. One of the main reasons for this is the low end frequency response is starts at 30Hz. You would be better off with a mic that goes down to 20Hz for instruments and amps.Bottom line: this is a great entry level condenser mic, especially for folks on a budget. As long as you understand its limitations and operating characteristics you should be pleased with it. I have had mine for almost four years and both have held up and and still sound great for vocals., "musical_instruments"
[review updated after more time spent with the mic]Well, there's definitely some detail missing in the mids, but it has a generally pleasing \"very fat\" (aka muddy) tone. Makes a fair snare drum mic. Needs a bit of EQ for almost any practical application. I don't think I'd use it to track the vocals on anything, but it works. You'd be better off with a similarly-priced small-diaphragm condenser and a windscreen., "musical_instruments"
man ya'll yall better quick get this here mic yo cuz it's all good and stuff man. because like when you be spittin some siK leeriX and all like i be going in the paint like weezy and eminem ya feel me.ay yo let's go., "musical_instruments"
I have a Taylor GA4E.  The elixir strings that came with it had nice bass, but were very bright.  I tried some martins, ej16's which I love on my Seagull S6.  However, those strings just didn't have enough bass and too much highs.  I bought these recently and I love them.  They are much better then the original strings.  Very rich bass that really comes out.  The highs are well balanced and still shine through without being too bright.  My one complaint is that the mids sound a bit muddy to me.  Anyway, the best sounding strings with the setup I have.  Now off to buy some different bridge materials.EDIT: 9-22-12I also put these on my Seagull Mini jumbo and wow! Every time I come back to it after several weeks, I forget that I put the 600Ls on it.  Then I pick it up and wonder why it sounds so balanced and nice supporting bass and realize they are John Pearse strings.  Worth every penny., "musical_instruments"
Was very pleased with JP 600L PB acoustic guitar strings. I wipe the strings with a Planet Waves microfiber cloth each time after playing and it seemed like they would last forever. Plus the tone of the bass strings was improved over the D'Addario EJ16 light I had been using that were installed by the factory, so I kept replacing with like kind. 600L is the exact same string gauges.I read a review on Shorline Music (an Amazon affiliate) about the John Pearse 710 NM PB and after trying those I like them even better than the 600L. They keep most of the same bass strings as the 600L (A, D, and G) but add some strings from the medium size: low E (.055 replacing .053) and high E and B each increasing .001, from .012 to .013, and .016 to .017.I had a concern about my ability to bend the B string using little finger only in blues F chord position - no problem.The improvement in tone is in all the right places. Very nice. Yet , "musical_instruments"
Everyone has there opinions. I was told these were great strings by some and others tell me the quality control has slipped after the passing of John. What I can say is the strings go on really brassy bright for a few days. They slowly mellow out and seem to last a long time. Sound really nice on my Taylor 410CE., "musical_instruments"
I bought these strings after they were suggested by a customer at a local shop. I play a cigar box guitar and stay with uncoated strings to get a traditional sound from the piezo pickup. This is my first set and I am impressed. These are not the most flexible strings as another reviewer mentioned, but seem to work well for three string chords and sound good through both a tube and acoustic amp.I would purchase these again for my needs. Previously I have used Ernie Ball Earthwoods which were  more flexible in light form, but great also. It would be a toss up for me between the two, but I do know these sound alot better than the basic Matin SP strings I tried previously., "musical_instruments"
I usually use Martin SP's, but I decided to give these a try. I'm pleased with them, but I would not rank them above the SP's. I did a little recording with them and I have to admit, they sounded a little brittle., "musical_instruments"
This is the best one out there BAR NONE  !  Really, this is a keeper.  Wish it came in different neon colors, as it would be really easy to find when you have broken a string on stage.  That would make this one the BEST., "musical_instruments"
This unit has a wider handle than most of the inexpensive string winders.  I've restrung a dozen guitars in the past week, including two 12-strings, and it is holding up well., "musical_instruments"
Very happy with my new Peg Winder, feels very ergonomic, works well and is nice to use, Thanks for the prompt service and good price .... Cheers !!, "musical_instruments"
I have a few Planet Waves products and I can safely recommend them.  This is no different, it works, I have no issues with the product, if you are looking for a peg winder,  or any accessory, I'd recommend you look at Planet Waves among your research in brands.Please click YES if my review have been helpful to you, it will encourage me to continue writing and updating my reviews, and leave a comment if you have any questions, I will be more than happy to answer if I can be of help., "musical_instruments"
It works for what it is, it just feels a little light when you wind after getting the tension up.  Not a bad product, just don't know how long it will last., "musical_instruments"
Stable and precise pick attack. Excellent choice for the aggressive guitar player. I am buying more gauges too. They last forever., "musical_instruments"
Great picks, good to uses on lessons or situations that you certainly looses it. Very sheep relatives with the quantity., "musical_instruments"
These picks work well and look as pictured. The shade of pink is very close to that in the picture. I would recommend them., "musical_instruments"
There's not much to say about this pick. I like medium picks and this feels comfortable.They wear a bit faster than I would expect, but far rom being a problem. It may just be my style.The 12-pack seems a good balance between cost and quantity., "musical_instruments"
I ordered 5 different kind of picks and these were my favorite picks. They have a very comfortable feel and great sound!, "musical_instruments"
Far too slippery for my fingers when I shredding and the tip wears out way too fast as well., "musical_instruments"
This headstand works like a charm. It's simple, portable, and sturdy. P.s. to the people complaining about it falling over...I have no idea what you're doing with your guitars, but mine is very stable. Plus all headstands are a bit wobbly and I've used just about every brand. For the price, you can't complain., "musical_instruments"
this piece of plastic is just terrible.  you'd be better off with a couple of books and a towel.not recommended!, "musical_instruments"
THis device is ok. It is light weight and folds nicely, but it is not especially stable. Convenient storage is its biggest plus., "musical_instruments"
A big help on the workbench when working on either guitar or bass.  Seems sturdy enough.  I side on safety so I use a soft cloth for extra protection, but this item does what it was designed to and should last a long time., "musical_instruments"
What a great little stand. I love using this thing when it comes time to polish my guitars or to change their strings. I also like the fact it folds up, taking up very little space when its stored away. The rubber pads are plentiful and molded to the plastic, so there's no need to worry about one coming loose and marring the finish of your guitar neck., "musical_instruments"
This gets the job done but because it is lighter you do a bit of &#34;chasing&#34; the guitar around.. All in all gets the job, "musical_instruments"
For those of you who change strings on your guitar or mandolin or just about any other string insterment this is a must have.Holds up your insterment while changing strings-- your insterment doest slide around on you. and it folds up. keep it right in your case. very cool tool to have  Thanks, "musical_instruments"
You know, if you do guitar work, you need a neck stand. Some sheets+stand units cost $50. This was what I needed and it was cheap. So far so good., "musical_instruments"
I picked up one of these at Guitar Center a while back.  At first, it seemed unstable, but then I tried to open it up a little more, and it kind of clicked into the position shown in the picture here.  When it's opened up all the way, it is relatively stable, and is suitable for servicing your own guitar.  As others say, it does fold up nicely, and takes up minimal space in my toolbox.  I wouldn't use this if I made a living servicing guitars, as I don't think it would last long due to the quality of materials (it does feel pretty cheap.)  But it does work well enough for an individual who does work on their guitars once in a while.I imagine one could make something a bit more sturdy for less out of wood and felt.  Over all, I'm happy with the purchase, as it suits my needs., "musical_instruments"
great little tool to assist you while replacing strings, cleaning or tuning, keeps headstock still and then folds up neatly to fit in a drawer, kit or pocket, "musical_instruments"
Works great for changing out the strings on ones guitar.  Compact enough that it's able to be stored in your case if you want or if you have a tech box that you bring with you., "musical_instruments"
It makes restringing way easier it's pretty stable and sturdy. It will work on pretty much any guitar. So far iv used it on my 6,7 electrics and my Taylor acoustic., "musical_instruments"
This is a needed tool when changing strings on guitars especially if you change your stringws often as I do.  I've tried other types including those that I made myself but I much prefer this one.  I find it ight and solid and cradels well the nect of any of my guitars...from Fender, Takamine, Ovations...etc. For the cost it is worth it and can easily take it with you in your guitar case when travelling. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
Sweet little neck stand.  Very light weight.  Folds compact to fit in your guitar's hard case or gig bag.  Padded to protect guitar neck., "musical_instruments"
In the case of you change the guitar strings, or in case you just make a revision setup, this item is very useful, because the guitar will be land and the her body will stay firmly attached., "musical_instruments"
I was expecting something a little bigger. It will do, but next time, I probably will look for something with a little more stability., "musical_instruments"
This was very convenient, easy to use, weighs next to nothing and takes even less space than I had expected. Recommended., "musical_instruments"
I do all my own guitar maintenance, which means that my guitars have to lie on the bench with the neck elevated for me to change strings, etc.  I had been using a roll of paper towels for that purpose, but the cardboard tube inside would flatten and cause the headstock to hit the bench.  So, looking around on Amazon, I found this handy little device.  It's small, works well, and fairly inexpensive.  My only quibble is that it could be a little bit more robust.  Perhaps if it were made of metal covered in soft plastic instead of the all-plastic construction.  But don't get me wrong, it's still pretty strong... just don't put too much weight on it while using it., "musical_instruments"
Go build your own. Build it to your specs and have a solid stand. If not, you can find a lot better head stands. This one was a huge disappointment. Does not do what it says and can get you frustrated quick. Im back with my wood block and am happy., "musical_instruments"
This little geegaw is a stable tripod stand to hold the neck of your guitar while you restring it or perform other work. It folds into a nice small package you can store in the gear compartment of most cases. The rubber pads on the neck end prevent scratches and the feet keep it in place on the table. It may be best to invest in a non slip pad to place under the heel of the guitar body for protection and to prevent it from slipping around as movement can topple the stand if you're not careful. Sure, a suitably sized cardboard box or stack of books will also serve that purpose, but what else would you spend the $10 on?, "musical_instruments"
I'm using these on the mandolin. Perfect for clear loud picking. When I want a more gentle muted tone I use D'Andrea Pro 346.These are very tiny picks, much much smaller than pictured. I have very small hands so they work for me. They are not slippery which helps., "musical_instruments"
I ordered these picks in bulk to use while I was recording/producing. I absolutely love these picks and swear by them. I've been a guitarist for almost 7 years and these were the picks that I landed on years ago and stuck to. I've had years of lessons, licks and picks and these are the absolute endgame for me! Perfect grip for leads and perfect thickness for Rhythms. I'd order again if I had to., "musical_instruments"
I started playing mandolin back in September and bought a lot of different picks to try to find the type that would work best for my playing, and finally decided on the Dunlop Jazz Stubby 3.00mm picks.  Once I determined that it was the best pick for me it was an easy decision to buy a package of them so that I won't ever be without one.  Picks have a habit of disappearing just when you need them most -- buying them in bulk this way means that I'll always have them available and can even share them with others if the opportunity arises., "musical_instruments"
This pick is so good to play electric guitar! It is heavy and small, what gave us attack. Make the sound clean and bright., "musical_instruments"
I always use the 1.00mm for guitar, had to test them with bass strings... they turn out to be great!, "musical_instruments"
These are the thickest picks I've ever used.  However, I am really liking them.  The tone they give seems better to my ears than anything I've tried and my speed picking has improved., "musical_instruments"
I've tried every standard pick - even bone, silver & really expensive ones. These little Dunlop stubby jazz picks are my favorite - and they're cheap! Great on guitar and also *awesome* on mandolin. They are small, which takes getting used to, though.Play with the round side for a fat tone. Play with the pointy end for a little better control with only slightly thinner tone., "musical_instruments"
I bought these thinking they were the normal sized BIG stubby picks, obviously they weren't. They're as sturdy as the BIG ones just a bit too small to be comfortable for me. I still think Amazon or whoever else could have been a bit clearer with the product information, but it's still not too bad., "musical_instruments"
I bought this to tote my POD HD500 around.  It fits snugly, but well.  The accessory pocket can fit the power supply and the plastic Line 6 expression pedal.  The shoulder strap makes me feel important.  it respects my arm's desire for freedom of movement.  My only qualm is that it's Gator brand, and gators remind me Florida.  I'd rather just pretend that Florida didn't exist., "musical_instruments"
I purchased this case for my newLine 6 POD HD 500. It's a well built, solid case for the price. It fits the HD 500 very snugly and has large pocket on the front for cables. I wouldn't drop my POD in this thing, but as a basic light duty carrying case it does the job very well., "musical_instruments"
I bought this specifically for a GT-100. It fits, snuggly, almost like it was designed for it. There is enough room in the front pocket for the power supply, input and output cables and maybe a little more. I was also able to put a 3/4&#34; binder in on top of the GT-100 which sort of protects the screens and knobs a bit more, and provides a place for the stupid lead sheet binder than never fits in my other cases.This bag is a good size as just an accessory bag to carry along with a guitar and a combo amp if you have a couple pedals and cables, or some odds and ends you want to bring along.Pros--------Looks like the same basic quality as my other gator bags-GT-100 Fits like a snug glove (with just a little use it will be perfect)-Front pocket- Reasonable priceCons-------- They cost reduced their logo from a thread stiched logo to a cheap vinyl like silk screen or iron on patch. (unlike product photo) and it doesn't match all my other gator bags. Not a big deal, but worth mention.- Other similar gator bags I own have a wrap around padded handle that velcros the two handles together once the bag is closed. This does not.Overall good product, but would have liked that other padded wrap around handle and the &#34;non cost reduced&#34; logo., "musical_instruments"
Not much I can add to the review that isn't well covered already. It's a nice bag that offers some protection for your equipment. There are some design flaws that I could see giving some people trouble over time. , "musical_instruments"
Mine came flattened in a little box.  I wasn't happy that its form was deformed.  Well in a few days it popped back into shape so I didn't have to ship it back.  A good sign!I am using it for both some music and computer stuff.  The bag is well made considering its price.  You cannot even get a backpack for this price.  I love its depth.  A number of these types of bags are too shallow so the zipper is about to burst once loaded.  This is a solid 4\"+ depth and cozy padding around it for protection.  Be sure to check out all the dimensions though.  Its very long - I was a bit surprised but that was me misreading it.  I think I saw \"micro\" and thought shorter.Not only is this a great music tote but also a decent computer / electronic or other tool tote for equipment that is wider than a brief bag or backpack.  I'm thinking of getting another because of this.The only minus is that I wish the outside pocket was a little larger and maybe had an inside pocket or folder / paper slot.  But these are just wish list items.  Finding padded bags this size is a pain so if you need this your options are limited.  Lucky this is a good option., "musical_instruments"
This bag works perfectly for the Digitech RP 1000 or pedals of the same size. I also use it for an older Digitech pedal and works like a charm. The construction seems to be sturdy and so far I' ve had no problems with the zippers. The side pocket is very convenient to store lines and plugs and the handles are very comfortable. Very good product., "musical_instruments"
A snug fit for the POD HD 500. Knocked one star off because the weight distribution is a little awkward when using the strap on my shoulder., "musical_instruments"
Works great for my acoustic dreadnought.If I had any complaint it would be that there's nothing to prevent the lower part of the guitar from banging against the wall. It would be nice if they had an option for something that could hang down off the hanger - a little cushion - that would go between the wall and the guitar. No reason I can't make something like that on my own, though.Edit - 9/24/2013 - Just got my first classical guitar and realized that the wider neck won't fit into this hanger. Nothing worth complaining about, but just something to note - if you need a hanger for a classical guitar, this isn't it., "musical_instruments"
This is a really nice item and I got two of them.  Unfortunately one of them did not thread properly into the base and I had to force it which has created a little wobble.  That's the problem with mail order. Sometimes on a cheap item its not worth the time and expense to exchange it. Oh well so far its working OK with the my old classical (beater) guitar I have hanging on the faulty one.  The other unit seems to be rock solid. Oh and by the way these hooks are too skinny for a classical guitar., "musical_instruments"
This Guitar Hanger is good looking, well made, and was exactly what we were looking for to hang my son's acoustic guitar on the wall in his room. Our logic was that having it hanging in plain sight would be much more conducive to him practicing over having it hidden in case stuffed in a closet, and so far that seems to be the case.The hanger was easy to install (literally took less than 5 minutes to screw into the wall) and is easy to use (just place guitar in the padded holder by the neck).Highly Recommended!CFH, "musical_instruments"
i bought one, then i bought two more, then i bought two more.these things are well made (in the good ol' US of A), look good, and are a deal.  none of my guitars have fallen off of the wall, which is good, right?, "musical_instruments"
Perfect for hanging displaying your guitars.  Very sturdy, they hold up well to both my Bass or guitar without moving or flexing (both are on the heavy end).  I own 3 now, and will definitely buy more if I expand my collection!, "musical_instruments"
I like to display my guitars while also keeping them safe.  I bought 2 of these and have had them for a year now and they have yet to let me down.  My daughter still gets to them and tries to pull them off but she has yet to succeed.  Very solid constriction. I like that they pivot so if my daughter pulls them to the left or the right, the piece moves with it and returns it back to balance once she is finished.  Excellent design., "musical_instruments"
Works great.  I didn't use the monster size wall board screw and it holds fine with the small furnished screws.  Next time I'm buying the all metal one and daisy chaining them to a board so I don't have to make tons of holes in the wall for my half dozen guitars.  For now I'm hanging one on the wall with this and it's fine.  Wood is nice quality.  I notice the price is almost 2x as much if you walk in the guitar center., "musical_instruments"
Shipped in time. Just what I have expected. looks nice and fits to both acoustic and electric guitars. Easy to screw it on the wall., "musical_instruments"
I bought 2 of these and will order a few more.  They are very nice looking and functional too.  I have been keeping my guitars in floor stands or in their cases but it takes up much needed space and just creates clutter...not that a guitar should EVER be considered clutter.The GREAT thing about these is that your guitar(s) are always &#34;right there&#34; and you can choose whichever one you have a hankering to play at that moment.Just a note of caution though.  Make CERTAIN that you mount the hanger screwed into a stud or on a solid wood surface.  The weight of your guitar will pull it right from sheet rock.  Included are sheet rock plastic backers but personally I would not trust them and nobody wants a hole in their wall.  I would also use longer screws than they provide with the purchase as well.  I'm sure the screws are okay but I wouldn't trust them myself.I would highly recommend these for someone with just one guitar or many.  Well worth the small price paid.  The shipping was incredibly fast too, as always with Amazon., "musical_instruments"
Many reviews cover the pro's of this item, so I'll be short only to add that they are very sturdy (when install properly...suggestion:  find a wall stud and use 3\" screws for heavier instruments).Used in our house to hang 2 acoustic guitars and 2 Strat's.  Haven't had an issue with any in the 4-5 months we've had them up.  On the electrics, we use the section of the bracket between the wall and the hook to hang the coiled guitar cable.The hooks are bendable and can adjust or adapt to virtually any style head and are grippy enough to keep slick finishes from slipping.Wonderful simple product that makes displaying or storing your instruments stress free., "musical_instruments"
The perfect wall mount for an acoustic guitar. My daughter loves it. Instrument looks great on her wall, and it is easier than taking out of a case to practice. Installs in 5 minutes with included drywall anchors and screws (or mount to wall studs)., "musical_instruments"
Wall hangers are good space-saving ideas, but I'm one of those who thinks they can stress necks, depending on the body/neck weight distribution and balance. I made my own hanging bases - just a carved slab of wood, really - to support the instrument from the bottom. The top hanger now just serves as a rest, but depending on the guitar's balance I'd recommend a heavy rubber band or something to stretch across the prongs if there's any tendency for the guitar to tilt forward., "musical_instruments"
This not the first Swing Hanger I have. They are great You will love it. Our Son has four or more of them too., "musical_instruments"
With musical instruments standing about on my office floor, I determined to find a better way to keep them available, and so I decided to hang them on the walls. This hanger was very easy to install. It comes with screws and anchors so that it can be attached to drywall itself, or through drywall and into wall studs. I used the pre-drilled holes as a template to mark my wall and the hanger went in easily. But a word of warning: use a level to align the hanger to a vertical position on your wall. If you don't, your guitar will hang a bit cock-eyed., "musical_instruments"
This hanger is very well padded and the padding can be adjusted to custom fit your guitar.  It holds the guitar perfectly spaced from the wall., "musical_instruments"
I have too many guitars and don't play them all so instead of buying an extra case or stand I figured I could use some wall decoration.  This works perfectly and is easily installed with two screws.  Definitely recommend., "musical_instruments"
Works like the picture shows.  Hangers adjust to required width of head stock.  Wood finish is nice look on the wall., "musical_instruments"
These hangers work great but make sure you purchase some spare screws.  The screws provided easily break when screwing into a stud so I would recommend you buy some good screws before you install.  I have several of these and at least three screws broke as I screwed them into the stud in the wall., "musical_instruments"
Stringed instruments are very difficult to keep accessible and safe at the same time. These hangers are easy to install, just find a stud behind the sheetrock or any wood to install it on and you are in business. The stringed instrument becomes  easily accessible and safe., "musical_instruments"
Some people are not comfortable using the drywall anchors that are included with this hanger. If the drywall anchors are installed correctly you will have no worries about it pulling out of the drywall. I have used these drywall anchors for 10 years now to hang heavy wood blinds which are raised and lowered daily without anchor failure. Concrete block homes exterior walls have no studs to anchor this hanger. The only options are the drywall anchors. They are good to go., "musical_instruments"
I have two of these.  They hold a variety of guitars just fine.Since the blocks are square, make sure you get them aligned with a wall or ceiling so they don't look crooked.  They seem to come from a variety of wood - mine are not a matched set even though I ordered two of the same part.  They have different wood grains., "musical_instruments"
I have 7 guitars in my cramped little bedroom studio and I quickly ran out of space to hold them easily. Floor space is dominated by my desk and drum set and I wanted my guitars to be out of the way and safe so they didn't get tripped over or dinged. Enter the String swing.I have 7 of them and I have hung everything from a Fender bass to a takamine acoustic with no trouble.The Y headstock holder pivots to accommodate asymmetrical headstocks like a Stratocaster. Just slip your headstock into it and the weight of the guitar finds it's own center of gravity.The base plate is an attractive open wood grain and looks like hickory. I didn't use the supplied wall anchors and instead drilled directly into wall studs.These are well worth the cost., "musical_instruments"
I bought this one as a way to save space in my overstuffed room. It looks really good, almost like an ornament. It sturdy and good quality. 5 stars., "musical_instruments"
I installed this in two minutes. I was planning on just using my twist-n-lock drywall anchors I bought at home depot to install some shelving recently but that's what it actually came with. These anchors are great. I used an 11/64 drill bit for the pilot holes. Don't use a bigger bit. It might be tempting to use a 1/4\" drill bit if you're thinking of the push in type drywall anchors. That would be a mistake. These are better and screw in. I used a manual ratchet screwdriver. The anchors go flush with the wall then you screw the wood screws into the center of the screw head and through. I recently installed several shelves in two apartments (a friend saw mine and wanted some too) and these are the anchors I used. Of course a stud is better and also if your drywall is already crumbling that's no good. For a typical well maintained house or apartment though this should be fine even without a stud. I have a Schecter five string bass hanging from it and I'm confident that's not going to pull out from gravity. A heavier screw would still work and add confidence than the one packaged. One such as the screws packaged in actual twist-n-lock anchors. Looks nice. Decent price., "musical_instruments"
This is a lovely wall mount for your guitar. Comes with everything you need (except a drill or a screwdriver of course). It is pretty and very strong. I originally purchased it to hang on drywall (sheetrock) for my 5 year old's mini guitar but once I had it mounted I found that it is strong enough to hold MY ELECTRIC guitar, which is quite heavy and that is amazing to me because usually that kind of weight would pull a mount right out of the sheetrock. This is a good buy., "musical_instruments"
We bought three of these and they are just great. Mounting holes are drilled right, screws pass right through and fit perfectly. Comes with big, beefy drywall anchors and feels just right. Holds the guitar out at a safe distance. Highly recommend this over the other (way cheaper looking) ones that are a few bucks less. Spend the extra few bucks on these and SMILE., "musical_instruments"
This design is a big improvement over string swings' past designs head stock fits snugly in the well made cradle.  quality wood constructtion and the rubber material used feels nice to the touch.  I will buy more if I get another guitar., "musical_instruments"
I have 10 of these hanging on my wall with different types of guitars, banjos, and mandolins.They attach to the wall with 2 screws.  Hardware is included to attach those screws to drywall.  It takes about a 1/4 inch hole in the drywall where a large screw shaped plastic piece is inserted into the drywall and then the regular screws go into the plastic.The piece that touches the guitar has some sort of silicone/rubber which protects the instrument.  The holder can be bent in or out a bit to better fit the instrument that you have.I have moved a couple of times and these can be removed and attached again.Very sturdy, well made product., "musical_instruments"
I have been fortunate to build a small, but decent collection of acoustic and electric guitars in a room dedicated to music. All 15 of my guitars are hanging on the walls and in the 15 years I've been using String Swings I've never had a problem with them. They hold every guitar, regardless of neck shape or style. Since they swivel, my Fender necks are just as secure as my Gibson necks. The depth is adjustable, so they will account for the difference between acoustic guitars and solid body electrics. While I never had a problem with the rubber grip on the hangers marring the finish of my Nitro coated guitars, I didn't want to take a chance, so I use self-adhesive sheets of felt and wrap the posts with felt to further protect the guitar's finish. I try and screw them into studs to support the weight, and where I can't do it, I hang some of my lighter guitars, but the anchors that come with the hangers are strong and secure... although I sprung a couple bucks and bought similar screw-in anchors; but made out of metal - just that added bit of security to make sure nothing happens. I also strongly recommend (as others have done) that you run a humidifier in the room housing your guitars (40-50% humidity is perfect). I recommend the HoneywellHoneywell HCM-6009 QuietCare 9-Gallon Output Console Humidifier with Air Washing Technology, "musical_instruments"
I just finished installing 12 of these and couldn't be any happier with the product.  It is a sturdily built product with EVERYTHING you need for installation.  I didn't think this was possible, but I actually found a product MADE IN THE USA !!!  I will definitely buy more of these as my guitar collection grows.I did NOT have the mis-matching color issue that others commented on - all I did was contact the seller (in my case Brook Mays Music) and ask if it was at all possible for them to closely match these since all 12 are going on the same wall.  They were extrememly responsive, even sending two emails concerning my request (basically saying they would do their best - but no promises).  Well, Brook Mays came through for me & I received (very quickly I might add) 12 of these that matched perfectly !!!  I will definitely go out of my way to use this seller again.Another great experience purchasing items through the Amazon site !!!, "musical_instruments"
This is a very simple product, but one which fulfills its intended purpose of hanging guitars on the wall.  This fits all my guitars from telecaster to classical neck widths.  The swivel mount is key to keeping excessive stress off of the neck., "musical_instruments"
Love these. They're sturdy . Which is very important and was my biggest concern since my guitars are pretty heavy. They look so cool on the wall and everyone compliments and noticed my guitars now. Love this so much. Highly recommended, "musical_instruments"
I had purchased one a while back for my electric and then my acoustic was always leaning against the wall so I had to get another for my acoustic. Super simple to install and very sturdy once installed., "musical_instruments"
Very nice guitar hanger easy to install and it floats away from the wall (the back of the guitar never touches the wall), "musical_instruments"
When placing my guitar in a stand on the floor I always worry that someone (person or dog) will knock it over.  This hanger works great for hanging my guitar out of the way, safe and secure.  Yes, I could put it in the case, but when I'm playing on and off all day long that becomes cumbersome, so this hanger is convenient and secure for my beloved guitar., "musical_instruments"
I bought eleven of these in order to hang a bunch of my guitars and I found them to be extremely simple and quick to install.  The included anchors work perfectly and went in without issue, leaving the String Swing solidly connected to the wall.If you are hanging a lot of guitars, making two rows (one high and one low) seems to be the best option.  I spaced the hangers eighteen inches apart and the guitars I put up look nice and have a good, tight spacing.  I uploaded two pictures of my wall after I had installed nine of the hangers and I couldn't be more pleased with the look... the pictures are uploaded on this product page.  I have put up the other two hangers since I uploaded the pictures, so I will have to do new pictures, but the ones that I put up will give you a good representation of the look you will get with these.The easiest way to hang a lot of these is to use a laser level such as theBlack & Decker BDL100AV All-In-One SureGrip Laser Leveland a long cloth tape measure that you can tack to the wall.  I just went down the wall making dots directly on the line, drilled quick pilot holes and nine of the string swings were installed in about 20 - 30 minutes.  I think that this is the quickest and easiest way to get a professional-looking installation.As far as the performance of the hangers goes, what is there to say?  The included anchors are big enough to keep the wooden backplate securely fastened to the wall and the hanger screws into a metal receptacle in the middle of it.  As long as you make sure that you tighten the hanger properly, you will be in good shape.I DO NOT, however, recommend buying theString Swing Home and Studio Wall Bumper Brown, as they are complete garbage and fall off the wall almost immediately.EDIT: I put the other hangers up now and did NOT drill pilot holes.  The anchors are made in such a way as to be nailed into the wall without using a pilot hole.  Just mark the positions, use a hammer to nail the anchors up to the screw portion, then screw them in.  It took about 1 minute to put a new hanger up, but this was partially due to the fact that I was able to use a level and put it against the bottom of the other hangers to get the line.  At any rate, you do not need to drill pilot holes; just nail and go!, "musical_instruments"
Works Great! Its a good product, Just what i expected. I expect to buy more of these in the future. And for its price its well worth it!!!, "musical_instruments"
Holds ~8-10 picks depending on thickness. I stick it on top of my amp so ive always got a pick close by., "musical_instruments"
I was using the bigger triangle kind before. The one that's more universal. But I only use the tortex pics. So I got this. They fit perfect. And they don't move around so much like with the bigger triangle one., "musical_instruments"
I am just learning the mandolin and bought this as a afterthought and I am glad I did, I am a longtime guitar player and the way you hold a pick for a guitar and for a mandolin are totally different combine this with the twin string setup on the mandolin and how close the twin strings are to each other and I have suddenly developed a case of the clumsys as far as keeping hold of my pick, its bad enough dropping my pick in the middle of a jam session but it would be worse having to go fishing around for it or a replacement, I stuck this on the back of my mandolins head between the strap and the tuners so when I drop my pick I just flick a new one out and continue on., "musical_instruments"
I might have done something wrong...I read in a review that these hold six picks.It held three real well but on the fourth insert the thing just fell apart...I'll just keep using my pockets., "musical_instruments"
This pick holder works for me. It holds a number of picks well and easily discharges when needed. It fits my Jasmine well. Buy it from GO-DPS since they have one of the best customer service and quality products!, "musical_instruments"
this product works just fine..spring loaded...so load the picks up...wish they would hold a couple more...but im happy...i keep in guitar case  and very handy to have...enjoy, "musical_instruments"
This is exactly what I was looking for to go into my case or my pocket. I will not put this on the back of my guitar but you do have the option. Perfect fit for medium picks. Ease of use, and durable. Have purchased another one! Good deal!, "musical_instruments"
This is an OK solution to keeping your picks handy and organized; at least you can have one place where you can find a pick, as opposed to having them scattered all over the house and in every case, but a small baggie will work just as well. Maybe you have to get to one in a hurry on stage? Sometimes (depending on the amount and size of the pick) it's hard to get the pick out of the holder, and if you use something other than the standard shape, forget it.  It has an adhesive backing, so I guess you can stick it on your amp/guitar/wall/small animal, but I'd rather not., "musical_instruments"
Man, this thing would not even hold my normal sized picks! DO NOT BUY - it is a wast of money... ug!, "musical_instruments"
It only holds 5 heavy picks but to be fair there has to be a spring in there so its ok.  The tapered design might be to make picks eject easier?  I never owned one of these so have nothing to compare to.  Except.  I did get those wedgie pick holders and those are definitely the way to go for picks on guitars.  These are good don't get me wrong., "musical_instruments"
I'm rather disappointed with this item as I put only FOUR (4) picks into it when it snapped apart. I use the Dunlop Tortex 1.0 mm picks and perhaps that's where I was at fault - I maybe should left it at three picks.However, my bench vise and some superglue have remedied the situation nicely. Thus beware of how many picks and their gauge BEFORE you push them into this holder.I give it 3 out of 5 stars for reasons stated., "musical_instruments"
Yet another awesome low cost guitar accessories from Jim Dunlop put the picks where you need them literally anywhere you need them stick it to the ceiling  if you got to, "musical_instruments"
Like all of Dunlop products, this worked great.  It's real convenient on those rare occasions when you drop a pick in the middle of a performance.  I'm a Dunlop fan., "musical_instruments"
This Dunlop \"Ergo Pickholder\" is so convenient for storing picks directly on the guitar. This is a great way to always have picks handy, especially if you drop one while playing. Here are my observations:+ Small Size; is fairly unobtrusive when mounted to the guitar+ Easy to Attach; just peel of the paper backing and stick it where needed+ Good Capacity; easily holds 6 picksMy only note of caution is that if you overload this and then fumble pulling out a pick, you are likely to get more then one dispensed in your hand. Try it once or twice and it is easy to avoid.RecommendedCFH, "musical_instruments"
I purchased this pickholder for my son who has a nasty habit of leaving things in places they don't belong.  The holder keeps his picks in a place he is sure to find.  Best purchase I have made., "musical_instruments"
it hold my picks well, but some are to big for it and the tape/foam on the bottom looses the stick quickly. im neutral on this one., "musical_instruments"
Genius concept. It works for me perfectly. I no longer lose or misplace my picks. Easy to to snap the pick out of it and place it back in. It'll depend on  where you decide to place this Pickholder, I placed mine right above the jack plug, "musical_instruments"
I own three of these, and have them attached to the back of my headstocks. Great idea, great concept and great quality. Only problem is that they do not work with the smaller picks that I have recently adopted. Dunlop Jazz III, the Dunlop Max-Grip Jazz IIIs and my Dava Jazz picks just won't stay in there without slipping out.For regular sized picks, it's a perfect product. For smaller sized picks I improvise by using SD card cases -- perfect fit for jazz picks., "musical_instruments"
Does what it says!  I live the rounded edges and more streamlined apperance,  it dosnt jump out and scream look what someone stuck to this fine guiitar,  like some of the brightly colored plastic ones on the market seem to do,  this is obviously higher quality.  Well made,  a nice spring inside its practically invisible but there to slip out a pick on the fly whenever you need one!, "musical_instruments"
I love this little item.  I was reluctant sticking anything on my nice new Fender but I love it.  No more hunting for picks anymore.  When I am through playing a just slide my pick back into the holder and it's always there when I pick up the guitar.Placement is everything though so think it out before you just stick in on your guitar.  I placed mine where I'd never rub against it, between the amp cord inlet and a control knob.  Make sure it isn't in the way of your strumming or any place your body will rub against it.I love this and have one coming for my acoustic too, only it is the wood grain version to match the wood on the guitar.Oh, I use medium picks and fit 7 easily into the holder and wouldn't try to squeeze another on in, but that's why you have a gig bag anyway.  This is a must have item, in my opinion., "musical_instruments"
I use Clayton 1.26mm picks, a heavy pick but certainly not oversized. My picks don't fit!!! If I shove them in, I can't get them out. Also, this thing is huge for the back of the neck., "musical_instruments"
This pick holder is pretty awesome. It's nice to have a place for picks on the guitar. If you're anything like me I always keep a pick in the strings up by the neck of the guitar. NOT ANYMORE! They now sit in this beautiful little pick holder attached to my guitar!!!, "musical_instruments"
It didn't seem like slight difference in shape would make it almost useless. It may work well with Dunlop picks but not for thePlanet Waves 10 Standard Guitar Picks - Duralin Blue ###GT!!! Medium/Heavy, also the thicker the pick, the fewer it will hold. It has sticky back foam tape on it for mounting to a surface like your amp or whatnot. I've found it mostly not useful thus far, maybe it would help more when playing live so I can grab for a pick and know they will be there., "musical_instruments"
This is a very good pickholder by Dunlop and looks much nicer than the regular Dunlop 5000 or 5005 - It does what it should and looks more esthetical than the Dunlop 5000 or 5005 versions. It does not hold more picks than its predecessors 5000 and 5005. It actually holds a couple of picks less. It holds some 4 or maybe 5 picks while the 5005 holds around 7 (if you use 0.60. gauge picks or lower). I did the test just for the heck of it with several picks. Since I use the Planet Waves Chrome Dome stainless steel picks (Joe Satriani), I only need to keep a couple on the holder plus the one I am playing with, so for me it does the job perfectly. I have a nice 2013 Paul Reed Smith Custom 24 with a beautiful and very stylish carved maple top, so I needed the pickholder to look better to better match to it. The adhesive works perfect and will not damage your guitar's top if placed as instructed. Place it gently, no need to press it too hard. Alean the surface very well before placing but do not use carnauba or any polishing material or gel before installing - Just regular guitar top cleaner (I use the PRS cleaner for example). Cheers!, "musical_instruments"
I seriously do is so small and cute and it goes on the back of my guitar and I have great access to it. Fantastic., "musical_instruments"
Very nice, smooth, no sharp edges, not much bigger than the picks it's holding (it holds about 10 of my favorite thin Mel Bay picks) ... the only issue is, the spring clip that pushes the picks to the top, is a little too strong, and was warping my thin picks, but I just put one very stiff pick at the bottom of the pile, and it's fine., "musical_instruments"
I have mi picks available and all in the same place with this pickholder. You can stick it to the guitar. Is light and cheap.Go for it., "musical_instruments"
Does what it is designed to do, it holds about 6 picks.  Small piece of adhesive tape on the back. The supplier refunded some of the postage.  Amazon promised to credit my account $10 (credit never appeared) for the highly inflated shipping costs.  A $2 item cost $17.70 for shipping!  Be careful and read everything before you click to submit the order., "musical_instruments"
As with all Dunlop products this pickholder is fair priced and functional.  It does what it is intended to do, holds my picks!  It actually works well.  The picks go in and come out nicely., "musical_instruments"
Every once in awhile, while browsing through Amazon, I come across something I don't know how I got along without!! And it really works!, "musical_instruments"
In my humble opinion, the pictures make the product look purple.  They're not purple.  At least the ones I was sent.  They were charcoal.I bought them specifically to use with my daughter's purple Washburn guitar, so it's kind of annoying.Other than the color, there's nothing wrong with them., "musical_instruments"
I quess this pic holder may be a pretty good idea but just not something I would use but as I said, It's ok., "musical_instruments"
this item is light in weight and you can stick it on the side of your guitar to hold many different picks, you will make sure to fine you picks the next time you need them, "musical_instruments"
Hi I need this item for travelling and it has work very well. I am pleased I have purchased this little yet great product., "musical_instruments"
Nice, holds picks better then my old one, and best of all... It comes with one free disintegrating pick! It is really awesome, all you have to do is alt-pick in 16th, and watch it dissapear before your very eyes! Lol, great product though., "musical_instruments"
Nice little device.  We'll see how long it lasts (a cheap little plastic thing really) but so far it does the job and holds about 6 or so medium picks easily without issue.  I use it with the medium dunlop picks.  Glad I got it., "musical_instruments"
I hated having to put the pick between strings.  And now that I have a ton of picks, I can convientently put them in this little thing that attaches to the guitar.  Im still weary of putting it on my guitar because it has a matte finish, and I dont want to ruin it.  But the instructions say it should be fine.  I think I might put it on my amplifier instead because having it on the guitar might get in the way as well, still deciding on that.  But for the price you pay for this, it's a no brainer for any musician., "musical_instruments"
Good-sized holder. I placed it between the tuners & it fits like it was made for that spot which is out of the way most of the time. Just enough tension to hold the picks & not too strong to to make it hard for me to remove them. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
This little item saves you the hassle to carry picks everywhere (wallet for example), and lets you securely carry many picks with you. I tought it would include at least a courtesy pair of picks, but it doesn't. I'm not complaining about it, but I think it would be a nice extra.Great buy!, "musical_instruments"
it holds about 6 to 7 picks.  pressure is just right , "musical_instruments"
Very handy to have.  Could peel paper off bottom and stick to guitar (or something) to keep your picks close at hand.  I haven't done that myself as I don't want to mess up the finish of my guitar but could see it being handy. Picks fit snug but slide out easily when needed., "musical_instruments"
It is really the best pick holder i ever had. I can put 6, 7 picks on it. It says very tight on the headstock and its visual is superb, I recommend., "musical_instruments"
It's actually sleek looking and although I didn't have the nerve to actually stick this to my guitar, it's a lot easier to find this in my guitar bag or even in my room than a few stray picks here and there. It holds about 8 medium size picks for me and I'm sure I'll lose a lot less picks because of it! It's almost kind of fun putting my pick in this thing..is that weird to say? Just buy it already!, "musical_instruments"
I have ordered several of these - like 6 or 7.  I love them.  They are great for holding picks & make wonderful gifts., "musical_instruments"
Simple, but elegant in size for placement in a guitar case. This a great device to put my genuine 'Planet Waves' signature picks in. Michael Haller, 'Captain Soul's Sound Circus', "musical_instruments"
I always lose my damn picks, this helps. Hopefully I don't lose this pick holder that would really suck because there is like ten in there!, "musical_instruments"
I can't compare this product to any others because this is the only pick holder I use. I have bought dozens of these over the years and have one on every guitar I own. And every student I've ever had, has one on their guitar as well. They are very strong and the adhesive is outstanding. They stay in place for as long as you want them to and at the same time, they can be easily removed and relocated. After relocation they are just as sturdy in the next location as they were in the prior location. I have had as many as 12 picks stored in one and as few as ONE pick stored in others. No matter how many picks you store, or for how long, the spring action loader never loses its resistance. I highly recommend these. I personally will never even try any others as I am so pleased with this product. If you or a student of yours tend to drop a lot of picks, this is the product for you., "musical_instruments"
Attach one of these to your guitar with the included adhesive strip, and you'll always have a spare pick at the ready., "musical_instruments"
It's just unbelievable how well this device holds picks.  I mean, you just insert your guitar picks in this device and BAM - it holds them!  No further action is necessary! And when you need a pick - you just pull one out, and there it is!What will they think of next?, "musical_instruments"
Nothing too crazy here. It holds your picks and sticks to your guitar. So far so good. Feels pretty durable, I'm sure it will last quite a while., "musical_instruments"
Had no issues in the 2 months. There is a red pick that is supposed to say inside under your 'real' picks, which helps with its looks., "musical_instruments"
I have a black composite acoustic guitar and this little pickholder stays stuck right where the neck meets the body.  People watching me can't really see it, and it's right where I need it, full of picks, if I drop one.  Wonderful little invention.  Buy it, if you don't want to carry a mess of picks in your guitar case or pocket., "musical_instruments"
If you're always dropping picks, losing picks, breaking picks, this is perfect to have. Fits about 5-8 guitar picks or so. Stickies onto your guitar, wherever. There seems to be enough sticky-ness to move it around a few times and still have ti grip like new., "musical_instruments"
My picks fall out way too easy while i'm playing live, "musical_instruments"
Great addition to a guitar pickers bag of tricks. It does hold plenty of picks for a gig or practice. It does not take up much room & it sure feels good to have extra picks close by so that you do not have to scramble to find another one., "musical_instruments"
Love the holder and the picks looke great and nice  and I don't have to look around for my picks when I'm ready to play my guitar, "musical_instruments"
Perfect size and does it's job. had one pick inside as a place holder. Stick tape holds it anywhere you want it. Cheap and easy., "musical_instruments"
It is not expensive, but the item is sort of cheap.  I could have used a baggy to hold my picks., "musical_instruments"
The pick holder work as described. I have not used the adhesive to attach the pick holder to my guitar yet but it stays attached to the head piece by sliding it between strings from the tuning pegs on the head piece. It is only sized for a standard size guitar pick so if you use small picks or large picks it will not hold your pick. It works well for standard guitar picks and will hold 5 or 6 picks if you like different thickness picks you can have a variety of picks that will store on the guitar or other pick instrument., "musical_instruments"
I store my picks in there and I put it by my table. It's a sturdy pick holder and it gets the job done., "musical_instruments"
This is fine as a general stick-on inexpensive pick holder. It doesn't hold very many picks, but it really doesn't have to. I would give this five stars except that I really prefer the Planet Waves LED key chain/pick holder over this. It costs more but has more functional value to me. If all you need is something very simple, and you have a surface you can stick it on, then this is fine., "musical_instruments"
I lose picks constantly. Years ago I resorted to placing them between the srings in the neck of the guitar when Im not playing it. That of course leads to bent picks and still, lost picks. This thing is great. I load it up with alternating  (hard and soft) picks so I can easily swap out between songs. Best $3 I've ever spent., "musical_instruments"
I bought this so I can keep some extra picks handy... now if I can just decide where to adhere it, to my guitar or my music stand?  Or to the desk where I sit and play?  Maybe I should just get one for each spot and each instrument...  Yeah, I think a few of these would be nice., "musical_instruments"
it sticks on forever and holds lots of picks. It does exactly what it says it does. its also very cheap., "musical_instruments"
Designed to accommodate most \"standard\" shaped guitar picks, this Dunlop pick holder is handy little spring loaded device, for storing picks.  You can mix brands and types, but how many picks can fit inside, will vary from around three, to perhaps a dozen.  As a guide, about 10 Dunlop 0.60mm nylon picks will fit, but only 4 Dunlop 1.50mm Delrin picks.  Even thick irregular picks like the Dunlop 3.0 Big Stubby will fit, however the total number will be greatly reduced.Build quality is good, but forcing too many picks inside, could cause the spring to fail, or the seam to split.  A piece of double stick tape, shaped to match the pick holder, is included.  The tape does a barely passable job of hold the device in place.  I stuck mine on the backside of the headstock of my guitar, and while it stays in place, it's pretty wobbly.Color options at this time seem to be limited to black, but if you have DIY skills, you could paint it whatever color you like.  This is a decent buy, below the two dollar level.  I prefer this model over theDunlop 5505 pick holder, because it seems to be sturdier, and I like the more rounded appearance., "musical_instruments"
A couple inches behind my bridge is where it lives and I've never had cause to remove it. At first I thought I'd hate the look of it there, but it's never bothered me one bit. Reaching for pics is never a problem. I just wish there was a size that worked well with jazz III pics. This one works with regular size pics and to fit the jazz II I have to add a regular pic in there first then put a jazz III in it works out so not too much a big deal., "musical_instruments"
it didnt hold as many i as thought(it only holds 8)but that didnt matter,now i finaly have some where to put my picks so i dont lose them.the pick holder also has a sticky thing at the bottom so you can stick it to your guitar or somthing., "musical_instruments"
Dont last but a couple weeks..terrible feed back as the ends near the plugs detirorate quickly. Will never buy again even if only 5 bucks, "musical_instruments"
What can I say?  It's a cable.  It's cheap, and it works as advertised.  Much less expensive than what they try to force on you at the local music shops.  Gold tips, yeah, right!, "musical_instruments"
Nice one, small, soft, cheap cable with comfortable lenght. Nothing else I can say :)Take it for cheap guitars., "musical_instruments"
I've used several different kinds of guitar cables, and I've finally settled on planet waves cables. From patch cables to guitar cables, I simply trust this company. In most cases the difference between guitar cables is the same difference between an iPhone and an Android, there really isn't one - it simply comes down to user prefrence. So in that regard, I prefer planet waves cables. I snagged this cable so I had the one right angle for my pedal board and the other end for my guitar. Highly recommended!, "musical_instruments"
It has what you want in a cable, and not what you don't.  Not insanely priced from having pixie gold dust sprinkled over it, but quiet and supple and uses good quality plugs on both ends.  So there it is; nothing magical, just a guitar cable., "musical_instruments"
these cables are nicely constructed. i bought them for home use only. home recording or just practicing.they seem to work well so far. i wouldnt gig with these on a regular basis, but for home use, with littleabuse, they should last., "musical_instruments"
The Planet Waves Classic Series 10ft Instrument Cable is basic, but works great and is very flexible.  Seems sturdy enough to last a long time., "musical_instruments"
I have many Planet Waves cables.  They all work well, are well constructed and are a good value.  I would highly recommend any Plant Waves Cables., "musical_instruments"
I've purchased many of these cables and I'll be getting more eventually. Cables, even good ones, eventually break. These are quite flexible, seem durable, and are by a brand name. If you need cables, these work great., "musical_instruments"
First of all I liked the fact that it came coiled in a circular coil instead of the bow tie pattern that leaves bends through out the lenght of the cord.  The jacks are sealed in rubber and provide stress relief. It sounds ok for the price., "musical_instruments"
I purchased the Planet Waves 10 Ft Instrument cable for our son to hook up his electric guitar to his amplifier. It works well...no connectivity issues whatsoever. Highly recommend., "musical_instruments"
It's a bit thinner than the average cable.Not as thick as I would like but works well and its kind of nice and slick to put away. Very smooth., "musical_instruments"
I think these are the same as the pricey monster cables and half the price.  I will buy Planet Waves from now on., "musical_instruments"
Absolutely no complaints about these cables.  We use them to power two Fender Squier Strats, and were very happy with the sound quality for our use.  The plugs are sturdy with injection molded guides/covers and provide good strain relief.  For the price there's no worry about solder quality, since any repair would cost you more in time than a new cable.We also use the more expensive metal cover Hosa Cables and see no appreciable difference in sound quality.Great for short connections for mixers or straight to the amp.Specs - 10', 1/4\" mono (tip), "musical_instruments"
I bought these for spares and also use on other amps so not to have to swap back and forth.I like the right angle plug end for guitar input and fits a std. Telecaster input jack great.The flexibility of the cable itself is another thing liked. These do not tangle in use androll up easily for storage. I have more expensive cables but rather use these., "musical_instruments"
I really like this cord, it rolls easy, its long, and its got a great powdery feel to the material. I suggest having multiple of these so length wont be a problem, got 6 of'em myself, all sound great, (Right angle or Straight).Great buy, cant go wrong here., "musical_instruments"
This cable is dirt cheap, but the quality seems to be just fine.  I am using it for my primary rig setup and I can't tell the different between this and some other cables.  Recommended., "musical_instruments"
These cables are just what I hoped they would be. They work well on my electric and my acoustic. Happy guy here Thanks, "musical_instruments"
I've come to the point where anytime I buy a new guitar cable it is a planet waves. They are good quality, decently priced, and I don't have to worry about them shorting out on me. Definite buy., "musical_instruments"
No problems at all with this product.  Works well with the five string bass and amp purchased from Amazon.  I would recommend this product., "musical_instruments"
I prefer this cable over a lot of more expensive cables because it's inexpensive, yet lightweight, flexible, and of more than acceptable quality. The problem with a lot of more expensive cables out there is their greater weight and stiffness, which feels nice at first and feels \"more studio,\" but when you're actually using the cable, it has a tendency to be too heavy and get in the way of things. For instance, Monster instrument cables have a tendency to move my tuner around because of how heavy they are.For just a few bucks more, I prefer Pro Co Excellines, since they have metal ends (and their lifetime warranty is simpler, just call Sweetwater), which feels nicer to me, but I like these just fine., "musical_instruments"
Second one I bought. Lousy build quality and only lasted 3 months. Went through two of these before I learned my lesson. Don't waste your money on this junk. I love Planet Waves stuff normally, but these are junk., "musical_instruments"
I like the Planet Waves instrument cables. The cable material is very bendable and easy to work with. Great so far., "musical_instruments"
WOW,if you need a guitar cable this is it...it's metal on the tips and long and black in the body (like a long snake with shiny ends) no, it works just fine and just long enough for my playing...if you have a guitar and amp you will need this...even without a guitar and an amp it's still fun to have!!!&#60;&#60;&#60; be warned this review may not help you...so go on to the next, if you need too&#62;&#62;&#62;, "musical_instruments"
I plugged in the amp, and I plugged in the bass, and there were no issues with the wire.  This is one of those products you don't want to overly notice, and in that it has done the job is is designed for., "musical_instruments"
I got a couple of these....only buy this cable if there is NO CHANCE that it will be ever used in the real world....after only a month mine has developed a nasty short in the plug....and of course , since this cord is molded/sealed up tight , it can't be repaired.......you could cut off the plug and solder a good 1/4 inch plug on it...but why bother.?....just save your headaches and money and buy a good heavy duty cord....this cord is too flimsy......its junk with a fancy molded plastic ergonomic looking plug  housing...but inside its junk....thrown away money.!!!.......buy a lottery scratch off instead,,,, "musical_instruments"
Simply, these are great cables. They snap right in, carry sound well, and come with a lifetime warranty. The 15' length is just about right, and at about one dollar per foot a good value. Recommended., "musical_instruments"
I haven't used the cable yet, but it looks new and durable. The cable appears to be structurally sound around end connections and seems to be what I expected. Can't wait for the rest of my gear to get here so I can do a sound test. Based on physical condition, I would recommend this product., "musical_instruments"
A simple affordable instrument cable. I prefer cable ends that are formed (not the type which can be unscrewed), as there is less risk of breakage and noise. Cable quality is not high (for professional recorded you'll something better), but very good in general., "musical_instruments"
cable is conducive of good tone but jacks wear out after about one year of use. Still highly recommended for the money,, "musical_instruments"
Great sound quality, meets full expectations. Cable is very flexible and also seems strong and good physical quality. It's worth spending a few extra dollars on a good quality cable rather than to buy other crappy cables., "musical_instruments"
This was bought based on the advice of others. I had a cable with the standard Neutrik/Switchcraft-type ends fail on me, and this cable was supposed to be either strain free or simply designed for long life because of the strain of usage.It worked great for about 4-6 months, and then broke. It happened so quickly (the trad types seem to take longer) that I swore it must have been the output jack on my guitar. After confirming the guitar was okay, I tried a shorter cable, which worked fine.D'Addario does offer lifetime replacement, but it puts you in a bit of a bind - you need a backup cable while you are waiting for a replacement, and you have to pay return shipping of the defective cable out-of-pocket. You also have to get R.A. Taken altogether, this makes it a deal breaker. The extra costs essentially make this cable as expensive as something that has a track record of lasting for years. In my case, I bit the bullet and did what I should have done the first go-round and got a really nice DiMarzio cable.Again, this cable SOUNDS good while it works - capacitance with the longer cables can be an issue. The good news is that IMO high price is not a guarantee of ANY cable sounding good. The replacement DiMarzio is another example of one that was at the top of the list with cable comparisons. I don't get into the mojo or intangible aspects that will typically find someone paying much more for a cable, but I want durability and published capacitance that is within a certain range. This one meets half of those criteria, but it gets expensive because of the potential to fail sooner rather than later. Well, expensive relative to a cable with an initially higher price but longer lifespan.So the replacement that Planet Waves sent me is now the backup, and is still in the original packaging. I figure I'll use it only for short periods while replacing my main cable, so it should last a long time in that situation. If I have a few $ for the shipping and D'Addario is still honoring the lifetime warranty if/when the 2nd one breaks, I may get it replaced. More likely I will just chalk it up to a learning lesson and toss it. Even $4 shipping is a decent percentage of the cost of a more durable cable - IMO it should be set aside to fund its eventual replacement.If this cable would have last 1.5 to 2 years, I'd probably give it 5 stars given the price. And if D'Addario took away the warranty thing, it would probably re-shape the customer's perception on what something at this price should cost, because it's a wear item, plain and simple. IDK how much R&D; it's worth their trouble to put in something at this price point, but that's is what I would shoot for - a realistically acceptable period of trouble-free use w/no warranty as the trade-off. That would NOT make it a deal breaker., "musical_instruments"
Best inexpensive right angle cables out there. I use these in my lesson room at the music store that I teach at. They will last forever if you take care of them., "musical_instruments"
I wanted something inexpensive and well made and decided to go with Planet Waves over the similarly priced Fender cable. I like it because the tip is one piece instead of screw on and the price was just right. When I have to replace this cable I will likely buy this same cable or something else by PW because of all the cables I have owned PW seems to withstand my abuse most effectively., "musical_instruments"
This cable is really good for the price! i have been using creepy cables that makes noises when plugged into the amp but this one keeps it quiet. Would like to purchase another one in the future. Buy it! it's worth it, "musical_instruments"
I've used so many guitar cables over the years that I lost count. It's hard to find a tough, low noise cable for less than ten bucks anywhere, but this one is the best one out there for the price paid. Its made well, with strong plug ends and a thick yet flexable cable covering that I love. I use it for all of my equipment connections, and it simply works with no problems and no noise that I could detect. Try it out, you'll discover the same as me and my band mate's have, that this is the best cable for the money on Amazon!, "musical_instruments"
Not the greatest cord I have ever used, not the worst either. I would prefer Fender Tweed cables over this one if I had to make a recommendation., "musical_instruments"
Once I switched to these cables I never use anything else now. Great connection sounds good and no issues at all., "musical_instruments"
I ordered these as both a spare and to use with my lower end keyboard (a Casio PX-320) so I could leave my expensive Roland RD-300NX in my home studio. Much to my surprise this cable is pro quality. It's as noise free as myMonster Rock 21' Instrument Cable, and I cannot tell the difference between the two cables when I am using this one with either or my keyboards. The remainder of this review is going to compare this cable to the Monster model.I'll give the Monster cable a plus for outer jacket , "musical_instruments"
I own several of these cables in various lengths and am very pleased with the quality and performance of them. I use this particular length cable for patching various pieces of audio gear in a rehearsal space or for plugging into a direct box on stage.The ends are solid when connected and the cable material itself is very 'slinky', i.e. not stiff or difficult to work with like some other cables tend to be.And a lifetime warranty on the cables is a great addition at this price., "musical_instruments"
Its solid. Has great quality. & doesn't short out on you. I had it for a few months now & not a tear anywhere in site Planet Waves printed on the cord \"guaranteed for life\" i think they mean it XD, "musical_instruments"
Good  cable works for me, using it in a rhythmtrak foot switch. Just the right length. May order more as extra's., "musical_instruments"
Solid, reliable and rocks.Works as expected and should last a really really long time. Glad I bought it. Nothing else to say. Thanks., "musical_instruments"
Very good sound and quality.  I am not a professional guitarist, so these cables will do just fine for me., "musical_instruments"
Clear amazing cable VERY UNDERRATED incredibly cheap and amazing sound qual, "musical_instruments"
I haven't measured signal throughput so I can't comment on that.  But where this cable does impress is how easy it is to handle.  This thing simply will not crimp, will not kink up on itself, does not get twisted and has no tension in it.  It's the easiest handling cable I've ever dealt with, a real pleasure when you've got all kinds of wires running all over.  It's like a floppy noodle but light and sturdy, and the jacks are strong and stable with no loose connections.I have a 10-footer with one right-angle connection, and the right angle is a perfect fit for the jack on the bottom end of a Telecaster., "musical_instruments"
The Planet Waves Classic Series Instrument Cable, 5 feet is a very well pro made cable that has always been exactly what I needed., "musical_instruments"
What can one say about a cable?They are intended to transmit electrical impulse with the least amount in interference and this one does a superb job of just that.Why I have been thinking of replacing all of my other cables with additional cables just like this one, only slightly longer or a good deal shorter depending on the intended function., "musical_instruments"
I love the fit and the sound quality. It doesn't come loose or wiggle once in place. I'll get this one again!, "musical_instruments"
A good cable for the money. Could have better stress release, but certainly plenty good enough for normal use and a very good value., "musical_instruments"
I was honestly amazed at how flexible this cord is.  I really like the right angle plug for my amp, it doesn't make the wire 'stick out' like a straight plug would.  Good stuff., "musical_instruments"
Well this cable certainly didn't last long as the title says 8 weeks.  Bought a new Fender Mustang2 v2 amp a week and a half ago.  Last night amp would turn on but wasn't putting out any sound from the guitar. Messed around a bit and it started to work.  Today same thing and it's obvious nothing is going from guitar to amp.  Thought I had a bad jack in my new amp and wasn't very happy.  Got out the old amp and guess what nothing there either.  At least my new amp is working and I only have to replace a $12 cord.Maybe I'm just unlucky and got a bad one and if I bought it at a local store I'd return it.  Not going through the hassles of mailing it back or asking for a refund.  Will just move on to another company's cord., "musical_instruments"
The cable died on me in less than a month. Very disappointed in built quality., "musical_instruments"
It does what I need to get my bass and guitar to the amp. Probablly not much use being only five feet in length for a gig or show but since I am only rocking out in my house it's no big deal., "musical_instruments"
This same chord was almost 30 bucks in a regular store it just had a different name on it, sounds great and you won't trip all over the place while rocking out, so get one today., "musical_instruments"
havent used this one yet.  i got it to run to my pedal board for those stages where the backline is not easily accessible.  seems like a well made cable and i like planet waves products in general, "musical_instruments"
Always high quality for a reasonable price. More durable than the cheap cables you find online and less expensive than the 'boutique' cables.. Great working-man's gear. Not so cheap that you can't rely on them, not so expensive that you can't buy a number of extras., "musical_instruments"
It came in nice packaging.Cable looks great - feels of high quality.So far it still works well.10 ft is nice for home.If you're a performer... longer is required., "musical_instruments"
This is a nice cable. Made from good materials and is attractive. I needed a 10 foot cable and Im glad I didn't buy one from the store., "musical_instruments"
When you're just starting to purchase equipment and are on a budget look into Plant Waves line up of cables and such.They offer good middle of the road accessories. Even high end also. Check them out they carry OK equipment. These mic. cables are working really well for me. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
I was originally was about to purchase a cheaper, thinner cable, but settled on this Planet Waves Classic series XLR cable. I wanted myMXL 2010 Multi-pattern Studio Micto have a quality xlr cable connecting it. I also have my microphone and this cable connected to theYamaha Audiogram 6 audio interfaceand it works flawlessly.* Sturdy cable. IT is thick and flexible at the same time. It curls around my microphone stand well, too.* Good connector heads. At the female end (microphone), there is spring part that locks in the microphone in. NIce added peace of mind.This cable simply feels strong and well made. Phantom power and data transfer has been flawless. I highly recommend this quality XLR cable.Update: 12.19.12Still working great after 5 months. Forgot to mention the nice packaging. It's eco friendly and nicely packaged. It also has a lifetime GUARANTEE. Not a warranty, a guarantee! That speaks volumes on the quality they believe on their product., "musical_instruments"
What can i say?  this is a xlr cable.i just have to stress if you want gear that will last for a while and not have a crappy connection somewhere buy decent cables.This one has quality ends on it and that makes me happy that this investment will last years down the road.So buy a decent quality cable like this one and not the cheapest!, "musical_instruments"
Happy to have Black connectors on an XLR cable that doesn't cost a ton.  I use these for a short run to my mixer from my Line 6 Pod. They work great. Not the greatest mic cable, but for the price they can't be beat., "musical_instruments"
Quiet and durable, "musical_instruments"
The title says it best, it's a decent basic mic cable.  It's nothing special, like a canare or mogami, but does the job in a non-high stress position.  cable is a bit thin (but the supple, quality thin those that have high end mic cables will recognize). it was priced right @ $7.50 usd., "musical_instruments"
These cables are flexible without feeling cheap, and have solid end connectors. And, they produce no electrical noise like my old ones do, which is why I replaced them. I suspect these cables will be a round for a long time to come, which was something important to me when making my purchasing decision. These mics cords have solid construction going for them, without the high dollar cost., "musical_instruments"
Firm picking surface but flexible body so feels a bit more natural than a rigid pick. They are slightly larger than a normal dunlop pick but much the contoured body makes it much easier easy to hold, I can play all night without dropping it., "musical_instruments"
Depending on where you hold it the stiffness changes.  That comes in handy.  They make another version which is less pointy...I like that one a little bit better., "musical_instruments"
Elderly pickers like me fumble conventional picks onto the floor, particularly when the skin is dry during winter. The grip material molded onto these picks goes a long way toward preventing that. The material used for the core gives a slightly softer tone than the Fender mediums I have used for 50 years. I like the graduated feel these picks have, with a slight give in the center, allowing the player to vary the pick attack between strumming and picking single notes., "musical_instruments"
These are good picks,  I've tried all the other gel pick's and plastic pick's,  The gel pick's  come close,But these are great, Because I have Dexterity Problem's, and the plastic/rubber grip Is perfect............I do still have a little Trouble with controlled the pick and droping the pick  but they definitely do help.I def Do recommend these to anyone who was deceased/bad dexterity., "musical_instruments"
These picks seem well made and have a solid feel, but I'm not sure I like the sound of them.  Like so many other guitarists, I go through a lot of picks, searching for what feels and sounds the best for what I do.  I don't this is it for me--at least not on acoustic.  Whatever I didn't like about them got drowned out when I tried electric.  Since I've been playing more acoustic lately, I might or might not buy these again., "musical_instruments"
I used to think a pick was a pick, with the only difference being stiffness. (I should say that I prefer picks of medium stiffness). The only problems I had with \"regular\" picks was: (1) them slipping in my hand (turning around), (2) out of my hand (on the floor), and, of course, (3) breaking. I decided to give the Dava picks a try. I bought a pack of the \"jazz\" picks and a pack of these \"grip tips\". I really thought I'd like the jazz picks better: that they would be easier to grip and more like a regular pick. But, after trying them both, I find these (the grip trips) are now my \"pick of choice\". They fit my grip perfectly, stay put in my hand, and give me maximum control when I play, whether it's lead or rhythm. I have yet to break one. I'm mainly buying another set because I've given a few away for people to try and I want to have plenty readily available. I like to leave picks laying around my house at various optimum locations, so whenever I pick up a guitar to play, I've got one close by (also always keep a spare in my wallet). Bottom line is, for me at least, these picks are tops! Sure I can still use a regular pick when that's all that's available. But why not use the best when I can???Update: Been using these picks for a year since my first review. Still love them. Still have yet to break one (and I can be an aggressive strummer). The only reason I need to buy more: I lose them. I have to admit they are a bit pricey, compared to other picks. But for me, they are still tops. Which is why I'm buying another half dozen., "musical_instruments"
I have tons of picks and these are well made and easy for me to hold in my hand without slipping around too much., "musical_instruments"
I absolutely LOVE these picks. Grips really well in your hand, plays like a dream. I just wish more came in the pack. I would HIGHLY recommend these to anyone if they want some great picks., "musical_instruments"
These look so neat that my brother and I both unknowingly ordered these for each other as gifts last Christmas. Unfortunately they feel too chunky to use and the colored tip grips the strings in an unfortunate way making it difficult to play., "musical_instruments"
Dava picks are one of life's guilty little pleasures. They may seem pricey for picks, but they're still not that expensive. I bought this batch of picks when I realized my Davas from three years back were all gone.I use these to play slide. I also have Fender and Musician's Friend picks, but those are just the standard flat stamped-out pieces of plastic. The Davas offer a much better grip and a greater sense of control. And they just plain feel good to use. The other picks have more of a tendency to slip and slide, but with Dava you get a great grip., "musical_instruments"
I have been playing guitar off/on for about 30 years. I have always used whatever cheap picks I could find laying around or snagged from music shops -- the free ones they give you when you try out a guitar in the shop :) Always Medium gauge, for both acoustic and electric. I decided to try these Dava 1303's because they were cheap and looked cool, wasn't expecting much, I mean, a pick is a pick, right? Wrong. These little guys have a fantastic \"feel\" to them; they seem to get in between the strings so effortlessly for flat picking. It's crazy but that is what I am experiencing. They are maybe a bit on the thin side, but not overly so, I got used to them quick. Plenty stiff enough for enthusiastic strumming or picking. Tone-wise, they produce a nice, crisp, slightly metallic string sound which I rather like. I recorded some with them today and it was perhaps a bit on the loud side with regards to the audible pick attack on the strings on the acoustic (a Breedlove C25). But not bad and I was using a sensitive Rode condenser. Haven't played much with them on my electric yet (customized Fender Stratocaster) but I'm sure they will be fine there as well. I like these picks a LOT and am ordering a dozen more to keep around. Good stuff., "musical_instruments"
This pick is great, highly recommended!  I love the sharp attack of the metal tip but the flexible body means the attack is not overly aggressive and metallickey sounding. I also I prefer the feel of a flexible pick. Grip is very good. This is my new favorite rock pick!, "musical_instruments"
high end pick.  felt comfortable even with its larger size.  took awhile to get used to but really liked it., "musical_instruments"
I collect picks (or plectrums if you're a purist) and I do so for a good reason: I don't use the same pick for the same sort of playing style. I tend to use some picks for jazz; some for blues; some for metal and so on. Not all picks are made the same & some are far better than others.The Dava Master Control Pick (DMCP) is a very nice & useful pick. I've been enjoying it for heavy strumming (or as the metalheads call it, \"chuggin'\"). I like its thin center and the way it, "musical_instruments"
This pick will give you a distinct tone because it's made of metal, not plastic. I'm sure it won't wear out any time soon either. The size is regular.  I just wish it had a sharper point, but I can still pick fast enough with it to play speed metal., "musical_instruments"
I usually use Dunlop big stubby 2.0 picks. I used the Master Control Pick for the first time today, and I just had to order two more, because they're so amazing!! The attack is second to none!! At first the pick felt a bit strange as I'm accustomed to the thicker Dunlop, and I have to admit that initially I was a bit weary of the notably thinner Dava; but in no way has my playing been hindered, if anything it just seems to run along the strings effortlessly, and by far these are the most comfortable picks I've ever used!! What a find!!UPDATE 6/6/14:Still the best pick I've ever played. If you're worried about the metal tip of the pick breaking or weakening the strings, don't worry, they won't (at least not from what I've seen). Also, pinch harmonics are the easiest thing in the world to play with these picks!, "musical_instruments"
This is a heavy duty strap. I use these on my fender guitars to make sure my guitar doesn't fall. It is a very comfy strap and prolly wouldn't break if you had a knife to it. It's the best strap money can buy., "musical_instruments"
This is the kind of guitar strap you are going to have for the rest of your life extremely  thick and durable made of awesome material... buy it, "musical_instruments"
I love dunlop straps because I'm a tall guy and they're long enough for me not to look like an electric-guitar-playing-mariachi., "musical_instruments"
This is just your typical nylon strap (a bit stiff, but durable).  I love the Celtic design enough to use this strap, but ordinarily I prefer higher quality materials than the nylon and plastic construction (with leather ends).  The leather is also a bit stiff, but not so stiff that it's not functional or reliable.  If Dunlop made this in cotton and steel, I'd pay 4x as much for it..., "musical_instruments"
This is a really nice strap.  It's very thick and feels like it's well made and high quality for a non-bank breaking price on a strap.  Looks cool and vintage, I am a fan of many Dunlop products and this one does not disappoint at all., "musical_instruments"
I bought two of these straps from a local store for thirty bucks each about two years ago. They've been the best straps; along with the same straps without the grommets, that I've used. I figured I'd save a bit and get a couple more from Amazon. I got them fast and saved twenty bucks. They do fine with my fairly heavy Fender and St Blues guitars as well as my P bass. They are middle of the road for price and width, but give me no comfort issues at all. My second favorite strap is one just like this except without the grommets. Super tight and easy to lower. Raising it is a different story though. I just save the fast &#34;lower played&#34; songs for last. Those are the best ones anyway. Excellent strap., "musical_instruments"
this guitars strap can work in any guitar, from a really light  guitar as a bird of prey to a  heavy Warlock NT, "musical_instruments"
This is a sweet guitar strap. I have a similar one but it has blue fire on it. These are very durable straps that won't fall off your guitar so you can play confidently. They are on the little bit of the stiff side where it can be kinda uncomfortable at times but it's expected since it's new. My blue fire strap from Dunlop is comfortable now since I've used it for awhile. So it's get better as you use it. Besides it being uncomfortable at first, it's an awesome strap and I would recommend it to anyone that has a guitar :), "musical_instruments"
This is a sturdy strap with a nice pattern and double-leather ends.  The color stands out well on the black background.  Available in various colors., "musical_instruments"
nice sturdy construction for the most part, although I don't like the plastic that connects the fabric to the ends. But for the price, you get what you pay for. I would have much better liked it if they were metal. I put this on my Les Paul and it fit good, but I decided it was not the look I wanted on that guitar so I put it on my BC Rich instead. The BC Rich has both of its strap mount points on the rear of the guitar, so when I adjusted the length to a comfortable position, the adjustment buckle is now on my neck and shoulder rather than on my back. I'll give it a try for a while, but I think that is going to annoy me and will need to find it a new home on one of my other guitars or just keep it around as a spare., "musical_instruments"
as I said on my last Dunlop strap reviewI love the Dunlop Guitar straps not expensive strong and sturdy just a great product I have 4 or 5 of them.when I buy a guitar I buy a Dunlop strap and Strap locks always to protect my investment., "musical_instruments"
Don't let the term &#34;nylon&#34; fool you. This is a really nice, thick strap. Nothing like those $5 cheap straps. A great value and it matches my guitar that has a cool retro 50's pinstripe flame paintjob., "musical_instruments"
Reduces string noise as promised.  Makes slides much easier to accomplish with ease and less noise.  I think they also do reduce some finger soreness as your fingers aren't as irritated from sliding on bare strings.  Makes them feel kinda like elixirs, but sounds a lot better and you still have the naked strings feel.  Also does make the neck a lot smoother.  I will be buying more for all my guitar cases., "musical_instruments"
I was hoping this product would eliminate string \"talking\" and had mixed results.  It helped some but didn't get rid of the noise entirely.  It also makes the strings feel nice as well.  I will continue to use it., "musical_instruments"
I can't remember how many years ago I started using this great stuff.  Like everything else, moderation is the key and having good clean neck and strings is where it all starts, but a quick spray and a wipedown with a lint free cloth does wonders before every time I play!, "musical_instruments"
I've been using this product for many years. It has always worked well for me. I just spray a little on my hand and then rub the neck and strings, and I'm good to go!, "musical_instruments"
I bought a new guitar & got it a day before my fingerease was delivered. My fingers were squeeking & sticking on the strings & back of neck, BAD!!After applying fingerease no more squeeks & much easier to move up & down the fretboard!!This stuff has been around for years.1st time I saw it was 40 years ago.Can't argue with that track record!!If you never used it get a can, you won't regret it!!Joe, "musical_instruments"
I've been using this stuff for about 8 years or so and I really don't play without it it makes chord changes faster and easier and your fingers slide real easy., "musical_instruments"
If you haven't used this stuff, and if you plan to play 'squeak-less' guitar, take the risk. Buy some.  You'll wonder how you ever played without it.  You might even become the next Joe Satriani!, "musical_instruments"
Makes the strings nice and easy to fly over. No buildup, or residue on your fingers either. I like this stuff., "musical_instruments"
Apprehensive in buying let alone using but glad I did. Not an everyday product - but when your strings still have their tone but have lost a bit of their glassy feel . . . start to feel scratchy, this is a quick fix until you're ready to re-string., "musical_instruments"
I've been using this product for years now and it is truly outstanding. It provides a terrific slick feel to the fretboard and makes playing much easier and more enjoyable. Clean, no residue from repeated use, and the glide across the strings is super nice. I use it regularly on my USA Stratocaster maple neck and wouldn't leave home without it., "musical_instruments"
It claims to stop &#34;string talk,&#34; when you rub fingers on wound strings. It doesn't. But it does reduce it somewhat, and it also helps me keep playing even when my fingers get sore from playing too long, or playing a new song over and over.I gather my fretting fingers together and spray a little bit of this stuff right onto my fingertips. Seems to help my callouses without messing them up, and reduces the tenderness under the callouses that comes after a lot of playing., "musical_instruments"
This stuff is great. The other guys are always coming over and grabin a shot or two cause I leave it in the pedal board. Iv'e been using this for years. I like smooth slippery strings for speed and ease. Humidity  not a problem with this stuff. ., "musical_instruments"
I've been using Finger Ease for years and always will on my acoustic and electric guitars. It has multiple uses:-Cleans off residual oils and buildup from your hands, extending the life and tone of your strings-Lubricates strings and neck for faster and smoother playability, though this effect does typically wear off after an hour or so-Works decently well as a polishing agent to rub off finger prints, etc. from the top, sides, and back, will not harm most finishes (as far as I know)I usually just apply it before playing but using it after could definitely be beneficial as well.I did read that the compound is conductive and should be kept off of your pickups to avoid interference. I'm not sure if this is true as I've never noticed any problem when the spray gets on my humbuckers. However, I typically try to keep it off of electronic  components in general just out of common sense.For under ten bucks, the can will last you awhile.  Just order a few at a time and find free shipping, you'll find yourself wanting one in each guitar case all the time., "musical_instruments"
This is a great investment if you are like me and don't want to drill a hole in your guitar to put in a new button. It does make the strap long ,but is suppose to. You will have to adjust your strap from the other side. All in all this is a great product., "musical_instruments"
I read reviews about this being a safer option for an acoustic guitar strap support than the usual tie-device. Working just fine so far, came quickly in the mail., "musical_instruments"
I needed something so I would not have to drill a hole in my guitar to attach my strap...This is nicer than using a shoelace to attach the strap and it is an EASY, QUICK release and is very secure. I am happy with this product and will order some more in the future. Nice, inexpensive and useful solution to a guitar strap problem!, "musical_instruments"
THis snap strap quick release system is a boon for those of us without a send strap button on our ukes sand guitars. Very serviceable, easy to use, sturdy., "musical_instruments"
all my guitars use this quick release clip. its so easy to install and sturdy material, it wont break easily even after many uses! have one now!, "musical_instruments"
I gave it 4 stars because it is well made and it does the job it is designed to do. But I personally do not like how it looks of it when installed. But that is only a personal opinion. You may see it differently. Don't use my opinion on how it looks to influence your purchase. It does what it was made to do. I purchased it to add an extension to a short guitar strap., "musical_instruments"
It does the job it was intended to do. Before using this I just hooked the strap to the buttons and didn't like it. To confined, and with the quick release, it was more comfortable to use the strap. I'm glad I purchased this when I did., "musical_instruments"
I like that I can disconnect my strap quickly and easily. Makes playing more comfortable and if you have more than one guitar you can use the same favorite strap quickly. I buy one of these for each guitar. But I only use my favorite strap., "musical_instruments"
I think I have 3 or 4 of these.  Work very well and looks neater than the shoe string many people use.  Highly recommend.  Get a few just in case, but I am still on my first.  I do switch straps so I guess I have 2 in use - makes it very easy to put guitar on and/or change out straps., "musical_instruments"
Works as advertised.  I was a bit skeptical when the product arrived, but I just set up my acoustic guitar with this product and it does work.  Pretty simple, even if you're \"technically challenged.\"  Easy to use.  Haven't gigged with it yet, but I can imagine that this strap \"isn't going anywhere,\" regarding its functionality.  Not a \"pretty\" product, but good stuff., "musical_instruments"
This saves so much time for getting strap on and off.  Great design.  I love it.  Worth the money and is built well., "musical_instruments"
I have two of these for my acoustics, and when I get another acoustic...I'll be buying another one of these. Nice quick release without having to tie anything. I have one that is over 5 years old and still works like a charm., "musical_instruments"
good if you dont want to have to drill your guitar for a stud mount. its nice and does its job. sometimes gets in the way of the strings or might stop a tone but it ultimately works, "musical_instruments"
This is a nice addition to a guitar that you don't want to drill a hole into for a strap button.  It's a quick release with the buckle.  One end stays on the strap - the other around the head stock of the guitar.  Makes it nice if you have more than one guitar without a strap button- Buy 2., "musical_instruments"
My new guitar had only the back strap connector.You can put out over $20 for a button strap holder but for under 5 bucks I decided on this.Attach short end to strap feed long end under strings on guitar head.You now have a quick release strap holder.Very well made & strong!!Happy I found this before spending way more than I needed to!!Highly recommend this product!!Joe, "musical_instruments"
Using on a Yamaha dreadnought acoustic.  Goes one easy, and feels sturdy.  Thinking about ordering another for an acoustic electric.Update 8-2-12:  ordered another for my Seagull acoustic electric.  Like the first one, works great., "musical_instruments"
Works with any strap. For a quick detach system of so you don't have to drill for a strap button to hold your guitar., "musical_instruments"
I just put it on my Baby Taylor guitar strap.  Nice!  Does the job and does it well.  Comes in a \"guitar shaped\" package that clearly shows how to install it in seconds if you are a newbie.  Glad I got this one.  It is exactly what I was hoping it would be., "musical_instruments"
Came on time. Work great for my needs. Geart for set-ups and take-downs. Does lengthen the strap a bit but works., "musical_instruments"
I love this product.  I t holds your guitar very securely and does lease the guitar at the neck extremely fast, so y don't have to life it over your head.  Well worth the price., "musical_instruments"
The Acoustic Guitar Quick Release System is very interesting.  I ordered this as a filler item for a much larger order, just to give it a try.  So far so good.  Thanks., "musical_instruments"
I bought this for an accousic guitar, then I had to have one for a mandolin, and now I also have one for a square-neck dobro.  Some accoustic guitar manufacturers cases that come with the guitar don't leave much room for a leather strap.  Some case manufacturers have the same problem.  This item fixes the problem of taking the strap off and saves you all the work to untie it, that means a lot when you also have to set up and tear down equipment on a dance job.  Same with the mandolin, if you want a wider strap. The dobro had the issue with the strap didn't have a great connector., "musical_instruments"
Slips right under the guitar strings and does not impede your guitar playing in any way. A very good design., "musical_instruments"
Love the quick release system, I just hook on one end to the guitar and the other to a strap, perfect for use when you are standing and playing.  I can just quick release it when I'm done.Please click YES if my review have been helpful to you, it will encourage me to continue writing and updating my reviews, and leave a comment if you have any questions, I will be more than happy to answer if I can be of help., "musical_instruments"
I was wandering how to make easy do quick release strap from my guitar. I did see this device on amazon.com and I decide to buy and try one. I was pleasantly surprised with this \"Guitar Quick Release System\" is working good with my acoustic guitar. And because of that I did purchase 2 more for my other guitar and for my friend one., "musical_instruments"
I have acoutic guitar that never felt comfortable to me. This little device changed that by allowing me to use just about any standard strap and attaching it to the neck for better balance. And its inexpensive., "musical_instruments"
I'm a gadget lover and this is a good one.  It makes it very easy to attach or detach your guitar strap to/from the headstock of your guitar or ukulele or other stringed instrument., "musical_instruments"
Needed something to allow the strap on the guitar to be removed for ease of operation during playing.  This filled the bill, works on basically any type of guitar.  It just hooks around the neck and ties into the strap, and has a quick release., "musical_instruments"
I've been using these on my acoustic guitars (and straps) for over a decade.  They're sturdy and convenient, and so much more attractive than adding a shoelace to your strap.  The ability to quickly disconnect the strap for storage (or when you don't need the strap hanging from your guitar, e.g., sitting in a chair) works exactly as advertised.  I've purchased several of these and can't say enough good things about the product and company!, "musical_instruments"
This is a handy little contraption.  I'm using on one of my cheaper guitars. It wasn't compatible with the other strap I've been using and I had a difficult time getting it to secure to my strap, but it worked well with the strap on my other guitar.I think it's a good idea and practical for being on the stage and switching instruments quickly., "musical_instruments"
Quick release around the neck strap system. Unbeatable for acoustic, especially since so many acoustics are neck heavy. I would recommend this to anyone. &#8203;, "musical_instruments"
I play with straps whenever I feel like wearing a strap, and this thing is just ridiculously convenient. You can strap on and off within a span of 10 seconds. It holds up very well, also. I've had it for about a year now and have no complaints., "musical_instruments"
Simple enough, right? Works as advertised. A great simple idea that I'm glad someone put into production. For my taste, the loop is too long where it wraps around at the headstock/nut area, so I just tied it up snug. I had been using the Martin leather strap holder where your strap hooks onto a plastic button, and this is far more secure because straps sometimes work their way off of the button on the Martin holder. However, folks with brand new shiny expensive guitars might want to take note: while the nylon lace that wraps around is nice and strong, it is fairly rough and abrasive, and my experience is that it will very definitely wear at the finish of your git in that area. Won't rub the finish off or anything to that degree, but if you're freaky squeaky clean about maintaining cosmetic perfection on your guitar (which I am NOT), you will definitely notice the finish rubbed and dulled and even chipped a bit there at points of contact. I can think of a million simple solutions to that, but that's another story. Overall, great little item., "musical_instruments"
I bought it by mistake cause I don't own nor play the bass but it works for my guitar..fits well!! good quality too!, "musical_instruments"
This is a convenient way to keep your picks close in case you drop one or need to chance to different pick weight.  I don't have a bass, however, it fits great on my acoustical and electric guitar., "musical_instruments"
Good idea. Tends to slip on the strings however. Convenientt to have a pick at the end of the neck., "musical_instruments"
If you're a bass player and use a pick, you need one of these. If you are a bass player and *sometimes* use a pick, you *really* need one of these! I bought one for every bass and a spare.Wedgies work better on bass than guitar, because the strings are thicker and usually parallel. I have a guitar wedgie on my gibson explorer, and it is a bit loose because of the angled headstock spreading the strings--but the bass ones stay put.Really, these things are great., "musical_instruments"
I usually keep pick in my mouth when I don't use them but sometimes I drop them, and at a show you do not have time to bend down and grab it, so this is a nice option to have a spare one, if you use bass picks, get this, it is bigger than the guitar version, much like the picks., "musical_instruments"
After reading some poor reviews for goosenecks of 19&#34; or more, I decided to play it safe with a couple of 13&#34; gooseneck =- this way, if a longer unit is needed, I can just screw 2 together.  This is an excellent piece of hardware, very stiff and sturdy with no droop or sag.  Even when I put 2 together to come over the top of my guitar amp so I could mic it from the front, using an SM 57, and this gooseneck holds the mic absolutely still.Great buy., "musical_instruments"
I purchased 2 of these items to use with my band for the guitarists. I was disapointed when I mounted a Shure sm 58 mic on it and found that the goose neck would not stay erect. These are made far too loose and flexible for most professional mics. They may work on very small and light weight units but for my needs they are totally unuseable. It would have been helpful to include the suggested weight that this goose neck would support in the sales description. I wasted my money. Don't waste yours. Perhaps viagra would be helpful ;-), "musical_instruments"
is an excellent product super strong and works great arrived in excellent condition. This very cool.its strong and hard, "musical_instruments"
I use the gooseneck to position my pop filter over my microphone. It is also sturdy enough to use on my microphone holder to hold my microphone in place., "musical_instruments"
So stiff. Nothing short of a five pound weight will cause this extension to buckle. If you sing and use effects pedals for an instrument, and can't rely on a good boom microphone stand being at every venue, get one of these and throw it in with your gear., "musical_instruments"
I am glad I bought this. It is exactly what was described and it was a good price. Get it., "musical_instruments"
I got this to install it on a podium. It is perfect. The construction is very sturdy, and it always stays in place. Get it, if you need one., "musical_instruments"
We added this as an extension to our clubhouse PA system. It's very nice quality has a range of easily adjustable stops and provided excellent ability for both short and tall speakers, "musical_instruments"
I use this when myOn Stage Microphone 13-inch Gooseneck, Blackare too long for what I want to do. Sometimes - on rare occasions - I have used this to extend the length of the 13\" model.The mic I mainly use this with is aNady DM70 Drum and Instrument Microphone, which is small, relatively light, and works with saxophones as well as drums and cymbals. When I am using that mic for alto and tenor sax, I use anOn Stage MY550 Microphone Extension Attachment Barto clamp to the pole of a regular microphone stand, and attach the gooseneck and DM70 without using a separate mic stand.Because this and its bigger sibling are so versatile I keep a few of each size around, plus a supply of extra extension attachment bars. In some situations they can be a savior during set up.  I will empahsize, though, that anything larger than the DM70 or DM80 (which is slightly larger and heavier), and this may not hold your mic in place., "musical_instruments"
Nice looking gooseneck, threads are clean, fits well.  However, the gooseneck is too flexible and will not hold up a mic (Shure SM58) without collapsing.  Better try another brand, or spend a buck or two more to get a better product., "musical_instruments"
This arrived and when I tried to use it, it turned out that the male threads were some  oddball metric size that does NOT fit any standard adapter.Instead, these theads stripped the fitting on my mike clip, so now I have to go somewhere else and buy a new gooseneck AND a clip.This is such a standard item, that there is no excuse for making it with non-standard threads, and NO excuse at all for advertising it as standard 5/8ths..., "musical_instruments"
There are a ton of phaser options out there - even from MXR themselves - which makes this issue a bit confusing.  I'd owned a Phase 90 back in the 80s and wanted another one.  A few years ago I didn't have the budget to consider the more expensive MXR versions, so I just got this one.I think it sounds fine.  I gigged with it for years without issue.  Yes, there's a slight volume bump, but I think this is really mostly a midrange hump that will alter your tone and give you some distortion, depending on how your amp is set up.  I always use it with a clean tone, and I'm used to it so it's not a big deal.If I were to shop for a phaser today I'd consider some of the other MXR models, as well as versions from other manufacturers which offer a mix knob.  A phaser is a very specific sound, but I love it in small doses.  For my needs this one works., "musical_instruments"
Absolutely Obligatory for any fan of rock n roll jamming with tastes of jazz influenced rock--1970's influences.  I would probably buy the Phase 100 today though, as it has 4 different positions to choose from, I assume including the original set-up as one of them.Well, I need to correct this.  This review was for the OLD models.  The NEW models have FAR too high midrange and the components are no longer easily modified.  I thought I was replacing an old model with the NEW one, but alas the NEW is not worthy of a place in my effects chain!I will probably get an EH Small stone now, though that pedal looks like it may have been changed lately too.  Sadly it appears boutiques are being bought by non-musical business men who care ONLY about the bottom line and NOT enough, if AT ALL about the sound/quality of their products.  The capitalists have become too greedy, and the socialists think they are worthy to tell everyone else how to live.  God help us!, "musical_instruments"
This is a great effect. Awesome engineering as Jim Dunlop's MXR products has always presented. The true bypass feature and the high-end quality materials make it very reliable and dependable. Phasing is very sensitive and delivers as it should. No need for the EVH red logo version (unless you're a super fan or something) - I actually believe this unit will exceed all your expectations. Ships fast. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
I returned this because I wanted the script version instead. Very different sound. Watch YouTube to compare models. This pedal seems older as well., "musical_instruments"
This is a great pedal for price. No it's not the most amazing phase pedal, but it's still quality. I know many pedal geeks who still have it on their board. If you don't use a lot of phaser but need it for a song or 2. Buy it., "musical_instruments"
Simple and compact.No clicking or buzzing.Perfect for old Van Halen solos like in &#34;You Really Got Me.&#34;Plus, you can get a swooshing bright sound you can't get with a Flange and Chorus when backing it down and playing clean.Play some old KISS or some Rob Zombie.$65 bucks is expensive but a true analog phaser isn't available in most amp emulators.&#34;You know your man is working hard... he's worth a deuce!&#34;, "musical_instruments"
I have several MXR pedals. Every one is superb--except for this PHASE 90 (the non-\"script\" version reviewed here). This PHASE 90 is worthless for anyone who wants to use it while playing clean, for it adds a tsunami of irritating distortion, a swoosh of sonic dirt. I did some research and discovered that other people who also hate this pedal's distortion suggest some modifications. (Look up \"MXR Phase 90 Mods,\" and \"Erik's Corner\" will show you how.) I made the \"R28,\" \"C11,\" and \"C12\" modifications. The result: a slightly improved phaser, one that still churned out plenty of distortion. Finally, I tried adjusting the internal trim pot. On no setting could I get rid of ... you guessed it: distortion. I spent literally hours in a futile and frustrating effort to make this pedal sound merely acceptable. No luck. BOTTOM LINE: IF YOU WANT A PHASER THAT DOESN'T ADD SIGNIFICANT DISTORTION, AVOID THIS INCARNATION OF THE PHASE 90., "musical_instruments"
The MXR Phase 90 is a classic stompbox popularized by Eddie Van Halen. At present, I own an MXR Phase 90, a Boss PH-3 Phase Shifter, and a Line 6 MM4 Modulations Modeler (with a few phaser patches), so I can compare these three units.The Phase 90 has a single \"Speed\" control that sets the rate of the phase, so it is simple to use. If there is a single knob, that is a good indicator that the manufacturer feels pretty good about the sound of the unit. In this case, I agree.The MXR Phase 90 is by far the cheapest of these three units. In my opinion, it also gives the best sound within its capabilities, and actually seems to boost the volume slightly. The Boss PH-3 gets a slight volume drop but it is workable, and the Line 6 MM4 has a volume drop that for me is hard to use on a guitar pedalboard because I usually don't leave modulations on for an entire song, but turn them on/off in different sections (unless its a chorus).Of the three, the Phase 90 has the least versatility. You can imitate the Phase 90 sound on both of the other units (the Line 6 MM4 does a slightly better job) and both the PH-3 and MM4 have more sonic possibilities. Also, the Boss PH-3 will give a lot more spacey extremes than the Phase 90 which stays in a \"normal\" range. But again, of the three the MXR Phase 90 sounds the best of the three at what it can do.Bottom Line:(1) A classic pedal at a great price(2) Great sound & slight volume boost(3) Simple to use(4) Limited sonic possibility, \"safe\" or \"normal\" guitar sounds (no crazy extremes)(5) Beautiful bright orange color, you can't miss it(6) Compact size does not eat up pedalboard space, "musical_instruments"
Bought this for a mic that my daughter received and fit well. Product is as described and fits mic perfect. Will buy more in future., "musical_instruments"
Good cheap mic cover, fits ES-57 ok, could be a bit tighter I suppose. Anyway it only needs to keep goobies from getting in my mic!, "musical_instruments"
not much to say about foam.  They do the job well.  You can't go wrong.  I would recomend these to anyone and they are cheap., "musical_instruments"
nice cover for my behringer xm8500. it is fitted snugly and well made. the color is nice and bright. i wanted to have other colors but this is only available in red and black also., "musical_instruments"
Hm. I received this. I opened this. I've used it. I also use it. This product seems to be a pretty good product., "musical_instruments"
Nice to keep your mic nice and fresh. Plus it protects the head and gets rid of most of the noise while taking a breath. Decent value!, "musical_instruments"
I do not have much to say about this. It does what it was designed to do and it looks fine.I found myself actually trying to see if it will rip, for the purposes of this review. Just so I could make some sort of comment about it... You can rip it if you try, but it's not likely to happen during everyday use.It's fairly thick. If that isn't what you want then I would look elsewhere. This should be fine for nearly everyone who doesn't have a very specific reason for a different sort of windscreen., "musical_instruments"
These fit snug on my Shure SM58 Beta A mics. Nice texture and it doesn't affect the sound of my mics.I recommend em!, "musical_instruments"
It works well, hasn't broken down (despite much abuse), and can easily be cleaned. Now if only all windscreen's were this sturdy, I'd be a happy customer., "musical_instruments"
At first I thought this would be a gimmick, but it was cheap so I figured what the hell. Once I had it, however, I realized how invaluable it was. When performing live, I always had to make sure to stand the exact same distance away from the mic of the volume would change based on my distance from the mic. Once I got this little guy though, I just sing right into it and even press my mouth up against it at times. Volume remains constant, white noise is gone and the sound is crystal clear. It also protected my mic in a fall once too. Can find anything better for this cheap., "musical_instruments"
Came in time, worth the price and fits perfect on to my mic. As an advice to every one using a mic whether it is a regular or condenser mic, always use this protection on the mic to avoid the body fluids getting inside grill and on to diaphragm. This is worth the investment for your expensive mic., "musical_instruments"
Fits the Behringer XM8500 perfectly. It actually dampens the sound giving better a more smoother sound and reducing harsh parts of vocals., "musical_instruments"
I bought this to go with my Shure SM58S.  It fits the mic well.  No odor.  Effective at suppressing pops., "musical_instruments"
I bought this to keep the saliva on the mic to a minimum.  Should work just fine.  I also bought the green one., "musical_instruments"
I have been using these simple windscreens for years and they always perform great .. escpecially for the money .. I would recommend this to anyone., "musical_instruments"
Blocks noise perfectly, priced better than the local store. fit very well my mic. Awesome! Great for an amateur, just like me, "musical_instruments"
Hi guys. Really simple little review here. This is a windscreen. It does windscreen things.Pros1. It works2. It fits my microphoneCons1. The package game a little smushed so it's a little misshapen.It's $2, it works. If it's not the highest quality stop complaining. It's $2, what did you expect, kevlar?, "musical_instruments"
Just slipped this windscreen on my mic (a wireless brand) and it barely fit perfectly. Any smaller and it would be going in the trash.The foam is obviously of good quality and it's plenty thick. I'm using it mainly to protect the mic's metal screen, but also to keep others' germs off the mic (seeing as how they tend to put their mouths on it!)., "musical_instruments"
Works well as a pop wind screen for our field operations. When the Z108 Party patrol is out and about the never leave without it., "musical_instruments"
This is a black sponge for smaller mics.  I got mine for use with some Behringer mics.  At first, I didn't think they would fit, but it just took a bit of stretching.  They fit really snug, which is excellent because they won't fall off or slide around on the mic causing noise.  They do what they're supposed to do., "musical_instruments"
Okay,  Color coding is a GREAT idea.Divas will not use the red ball windscreen.Why?Because, from a distance it looks like they have a clown nose.No kidding!  I have had several tell this to me and my sound tech.  So save your dough, buy any color but RED.Diva's!!!!  What can I say?, "musical_instruments"
This does a great job blocking out the wind on a microphone and other unwanted noise. I can literally blow into the microphone and you won't get any &#34;pop&#34; in the microphone, only sound waves., "musical_instruments"
....to have when used outside where there is a lot of wind noise.  I sometimes play in a park or outside around the BBQ.  A must have., "musical_instruments"
the foam ball prevents wind pop and it also doesn't get smelly like some other foam would be. i would highly recommend it., "musical_instruments"
What can you say about a Foam Ball type mic windscreen?  Well it fits the RODE M1 Mic I was using nice and tight. Quality is good, didn't tear apart when you put it on the mic and the recorded sound is just fine., "musical_instruments"
Alot of Zoom H1 users put this over their mics.  The fit is nearly perfect.  For that application this is THE windscreen to get.  Works great., "musical_instruments"
I definately helps cut down &#34;wind whistle&#34; on my mic. can't say anything great about the product but I cant say anything bad. It does what it is suppose to, "musical_instruments"
Works just as it should, love it and a great price to boot, "musical_instruments"
If you have several different people on the same mic you should buy a stock of these. They are well made and do work. I would buy them again., "musical_instruments"
I used these on a Behringer XM8500'sIt fits tight and does not obstruct the tone greatly.I have not tested its wind screen capabilities.I use it to protect my microphones from singer&#8217;s saliva :-)Works great and does not fall off., "musical_instruments"
Bought this cover to go with Behringer mic.  It does what it's designed to do.  It was a little hard getting it onto the head of the mic, but at least that way I know it's not going to be falling off during a performance or a recording session.  Economical way to keep spit out of mic, "musical_instruments"
its a windscreen, this is the first one i have bought but it seems to work how it is supposed to. it could be less dense i think. idk, "musical_instruments"
I use this for my rockband microphones but be careful , if you have cats the hair will get stuck in it. Other than that it really works well in taking away some of the echo from loud speakers while playing rockband., "musical_instruments"
Bought this with a mic and foam cover and stand and it all works perfect. Geat value for the money. My daughters use all of them every week. Will buy more in the future, "musical_instruments"
It's great to have a few extra mic clips on hand and for the price, these are great.  They hold SM58/57 perfectly.  Not cheap or poorly made at all, a great value., "musical_instruments"
it holds a mic just fine. I just wish it had a little more &#34;give&#34; to it. still a great product for the price, "musical_instruments"
Use it with an SM58 Shure mic in a studio type application. Holds up great, Mic does not slip. Upside down, sideways., "musical_instruments"
it does what's it's suppose to do... holds a mic, pretty much what you see is what you get... works very well., "musical_instruments"
This microphone clip becomes loose at the hinge very quickly, and needs to consistently be tightened. Too much of a hassle, really~, "musical_instruments"
A classic mic clip -- simple, inexpensive and durable enough. Keep several spares in your kit; even the expensive ones break., "musical_instruments"
This is obviously a necessary item if you want to attach this to a microphone stand. It holds great and keeps the microphone snug into palce. However, The gap for the cable to fit through should be a bit bigger, as well as the tail-end of the grip; because if you have a certain kind of XLR adapter that is wider than the microphone, you won't be able to take the microphone out of the grip without disconnecting the XLR adapter first., "musical_instruments"
This is a simple, straight forward and worthy replacement mic clip for the standard Shure SM57/58 type mic. Well made, reasonably priced as with most On Stage stuff., "musical_instruments"
These are obviously designed for microphones with the Shure SM-57/58 series form factor. I use mine for the much heavierBlue Microphones enCORE 100 Studio-Grade Dynamic Performance Microphone, and this clip holds it right where I adjust it to.The threads in the base of the clip appear to be precision-machined. Mine effortlessly mate with anOn Stage MSA7040TB Adjustable Microphone Boom, Black, anOn Stage Stands 7701B Tripod Boom Microphone Standand aMusician's Gear Die-Cast Mic Stand Black, which are the only stands with which I've used this clip.Bear in mind that if you are using microphones that are designed with form factors that are different from the Shure SM (and PG and similar), or a different brand that uses that form factor, then this clip will probably not work. Also I cannot vouch for it as a clip for heavy touring, although for local bar gigs it should easily hold up, and at the price you can afford to purchase some spares (actually, you SHOULD do that.)I am personally pleased with mine and do not regret selecting this model. I have five or six on hand, including a few spares, and if I needed more clips, this is the one I would purchase., "musical_instruments"
What can I say it works...I think I could write a book here...not!...just a solid little mic holder. Glad I bought it., "musical_instruments"
These kind of clips can break. But if you're just a little bit careful not to push the microphone in too hard, it should last for a long long time., "musical_instruments"
I bought these mics to fit a shure mic and a GLS mic and it doesn't fit either.  A little too small., "musical_instruments"
I bought these to fit my two microphones - they snuggly hold Shure SM57 and SM58.  However, my two mics came with Shure clips (to my surprise).  These clips are 1/16 in. from front to back.  In comparison, the Shure clips are 1/4 in. to 1/8 in. from front to back.  So, the Shure clips are more sturdily built, but both seem to hold the mics well., "musical_instruments"
Very tight fit which is great for your stationary mic .It hold the mic with no concerns of the mic falling out. Great for back up singers ., "musical_instruments"
Not sure there is much to say about a mic stand clip.Solid plastic. Brass threading. Adjustable pivot screw.I've always been pleased with On Stage products, even down to there cheap $3 clips., "musical_instruments"
Worked perfectly to use my Samson mic with a stand I purchased. Definitely would purchase again, solid quality build. Good purchase!, "musical_instruments"
good deal. quite the steal. if it sounds at all like the pinstripe bass pedal. im sure it will be amazing. and its cool that i got a snare head with the deal. those are pretty crucial to a drumset. :), "musical_instruments"
the Pinstripe heads are AMAZING.  I will buying them for life, they are very durable and sound great.  the emperor X snare head on the other hand is junk.  It makes my snare sound like a high tom almost, hate it., "musical_instruments"
very durable and they sound amazing, i love these drum heads and would recommend them to anyone that needs drumheads, "musical_instruments"
I bought these heads almost a year ago and after countless band practices and gigs, the same heads I bought over a year ago are still sounding great and haven't torn. these heads are amazing and a very good investment. make your kit sound very professional and I just love em to death. definitely recommend these heads to people looking for new heads, "musical_instruments"
These heads are virtually indestructable and produce a great sound. Attack is superb, especially when played hard and loud, and the construction ensures minimal ring and overtone.Be aware that this head pack does not product the best tone and sound for jazz (get Remo Fiberskyns for that kind of sound), but the Pinstripe model that comprises this pack has become the De Facto standard for rock.If you still have the heads that come with your drum kit - and play rock - changing over to this pack will probably make a dramatic improvement in the way your kit sounds, regardless of whether you are playing a budget no-name brand, or Pearl, Mapex, Tama, Ludwig or similar pro quality drums.I also recommend that you get a Rhythm Tech Memo Key (ASIN B0002E2EOE) or Evans Torque tuning key (ASIN B0002D0HZI) to allow you to quickly get your heads in perfect tuning once you have them installed.  Either of these will allow you to get the most out of these (or any other) heads and transform your kit into a finely tuned, professional sounding set of instruments., "musical_instruments"
Good short cable, plugs easy, "musical_instruments"
Bought these and they worked great with my Digitech delay, reverb, chorus and Jaman.  No noticeable noise added to my ears.  They continue to work to this day.  They are built tough enough for moderate use and do the job for cheap.  GOOD VALUE!, "musical_instruments"
These are by far the best value for effects pedal cables.  I find the local music stores won't stock them, forcing you to buy higher quality cables at about $7.00 each.  These cables, so far, have done the job at a fraction of the price.  We will see how well they stand up over the long-term as they are a cheaper cable.  But for the price, they are great.  At 6 per pack, you can even afford to simply replace them as they go bad and still be ahead -- if that even happens., "musical_instruments"
Not much to say about patches...they haven't given me ANY trouble, which is as good as it gets with cables!, "musical_instruments"
These cables are awesome. They do what they are suppose to do and do it well. I personally like that they are smaller in the middle and are easier to fold than regular cable. If you are looking to connect your pedals and dont want to break your wallet look no farther than HOSA 6inch cable!, "musical_instruments"
This was the easiest way to hook up my pedals without having long wires all over the floor to trip on.  It's easy and convenient to use without losing quality and getting feedback loops.  I recommend it to all aspiring musicians., "musical_instruments"
These pedal cables are of superior quality at a reasonable price. Well-designed and reliable, I highly recommend these. Thanks to Amazon for offering this great product., "musical_instruments"
I wish I bought longer cables but these cables are fine. They do what they are supposed to do but I know I can spend a few more dollar dollar bills and get a higher quality cable but the tonal difference wouldn't be anything significant., "musical_instruments"
Works as described.  Solid little wires that allow you to be creative in how you hook up your guitar pedals...may work other applications that require the same type of plug., "musical_instruments"
These are great for connecting effects pedals.  I really don't know how else you would do it in a small space, without making your pedal box look like a plate of spaghetti., "musical_instruments"
I got these because I work as a live sound engineer and they sometimes come in handy used as interconnects between guitar pedals., "musical_instruments"
These cables work well in my jam space, they do seem a little thin if they were to be used heavily in gig'ing but at 1/3 the price, that's fair. Don't get me wrong, these are good cables and for the price I am very happy; I'd buy more for sure. I would probalby uses these for gigging as well if I didn't have heavier duty jumpers available.As the title says, these are a great value and work well., "musical_instruments"
good product great price. as long as you take care of them they seem as though they will last quite a while., "musical_instruments"
This was perfect I am very happy with the  Hosa CFS606 6 Inch Right Angle FX Pedal Cable, 6 Pack!, "musical_instruments"
great price. i would recommend it to anyone needing patch cables for their peddle board. very flexable and pretty good quality, "musical_instruments"
These are a bit short, only complaint.But I should have known that going into a 6\" double right ended cable.Perhaps a straight to straight would be better.Anyway, besides that, they seem to be decent enough quality.I can see a few years of careful use., "musical_instruments"
yes you can tweak it so its less, but cant even use it for recording with or without an amp so much hiss its unusable., "musical_instruments"
I'll keep it short: I owned a Boss EQ pedal in the past and didn't have much luck with it. I tried and tried and tried to hone in the sound I was looking for but the Boss just wouldn't do it for me. Fast forward a few years and I purchase this little baby on a whim.  Man, am I glad I did!  The 6 sliders made it very easy to dial in the exact tone I was looking for.  A small boost of the first two sliders gave my amp more bottom-end than it could ever manage on its own, and a small boost of the last two provided more of a balanced, well-rounded sound.  Love it and wouldn't wanna part with it!The pedal itself is built like a rock.  I imagine nothing shy of nuclear war could dent this thing.  The individual sliders, although not quite as Ford-tough as the rest of the pedal (haha), feel nice and slide easy.  Each slider lights up red when engaged, which not only looks cool but makes it very easy to see on a dimly lit stage.If you're on the fence about an EQ or which EQ brand to buy, I recommend you give this little monster a stomp., "musical_instruments"
This is a great effect. Awesome engineering as Jim Dunlop's MXR products has always presented. The true bypass feature and the high-end quality materials make it very reliable and dependable. EQ is very sensitive and delivers as it should. I actually believe this will exceed all your expectations. Ships fast. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
Bought this on a whim.  It works well when utilized with the amp in direct fashion.  When used with a pedalboard rig, it doesn't add much except for hiss, unfortunately.  Sweet sound with an older Fender amp unit, though.  Does not sound good with updated equipment, Line 6 equipment, Roland units.  I'd say definitely do not get this if you're a tech or gear head.  Get it if you're a simple player with few FX in your arsenal.  It does sound good when just utilized with amp and guitar, amp, wah, and guitar, or amp, wah, guitar, and expression pedal.  Nothing else I've tied it to has seemed to work out, though.  Probably a wasted product with where I'm headed as a technical player, but good for beginners and intermediate levels.  Into King Crimson/Fripp styles?  Don't go for this for modeling., "musical_instruments"
This little box will give it to you. I personally play bass and I have a thing for long effect chains. I count in my little arsenal with fuzz, distorions, auto wah, a compressor, octaver, bass booster and a nice DI Box. The MXR EQ helps me a great deal to \"recuperate\" definition and clarity after this long effect chains that I love. A great little box.So if you are looking for clarity, definition and even a little extra punch for your sound the MXR EQ will do the trick.Cheers!!!, "musical_instruments"
I have been disappointed with the last EQ pedal I owned witch was a Boss GE7, it was very honkey and colored my tone to much, this pedal is much more musical the layout of the essential frequency's is great, plus they are lighted and very ez to see. and of course it is an MXR so it is built like a tank and will last for ever, "musical_instruments"
I have had several MXR pedals through the years ... I have always found their quality to be very good for the price ... in fact, some of their pedals exceed the competitors' products for less than half the price ... (to each his own and certainly there are higher levels of quality out there but just because it is priced more doesn't mean it is that much better)If you need a little tone sweetener, this pedal can deliver ... with flatter EQ's it is fairly noiseless ... but as with all EQ's, if you boost certain frequencies pretty high, you will get some noise ...Simple to use and I particularly like the lighted LEDs for each band ... this feature makes this unit a good choice for the stage ...As with all MXR pedals, it is built solid and road-rugged ...For the price, this is a nice pedal, simple to use and built to last, "musical_instruments"
Highest quality guitar I've ever seen in this price range. It looks, feels, and sounds amazing!! A+ I bought two, "musical_instruments"
I didn't want to spend too much $$ for a guitar that I wasn't sure if I would like it or not. There were a few at the local music store but 3 times the price. They were good quality and if this didn't work out then I would have probably gone that route. To my surprise, this guitar exceeds all my expectations for an acoustic guitar. The only downfall was that the frets were sharp on the one side of the guitar. The local shop only charged me $5 to shave them down. I replaced the strings right away. I'm completely satisfied with this purchase and would recommend it. Definitely worth the price you pay., "musical_instruments"
This was my first acoustic guitar, and I've received some surprised looks about its tone and play-ability -- both from from my luthier (who used to be a tech at Martin) to a couple pro players with 30-40+ years respectively under their belts. It's light, comfortable, well made, has a fast neck, and is just marvelous in every way for a beginner like myself. Wonderfully priced. I was expecting to be disappointed, but didn't want to invest in a new hobby until I was sure I'd stick with it.It's possible that I just lucked out with a good one. After a year of playing my Jasmine, I have no urge to upgrade to anything else. Will confess that I'd like a 12-string, but that's another animal.I am too new and inexperienced with acoustics to be able to really define the sonic quality of this guitar compared to more expensive models (I'm more of an electric guy), but for me in my ignorant state, it's 5 stars without hesitation.I did need to have it set up, however, and the stock strings on mine were in poor condition. Don't recall if I purchased it on Amazon. In any event, a $30-$50 trip to the luthier with new strings, and it felt like a guitar far in excess of $100. It has stayed in tune quite nicely, and I often change tunings (standard, mostly Eb, occasional full step down, Open D, G and others).No fret buzz, and I just love the feel of the neck. I do wish the body was a tad thinner as I have shoulder problems, but I'm sure a thinner body or shallow bowl would sacrifice bass and richness. Nice and light, however, and perfect for carrying on your back.By the way, I have the model with the black pickguard -- the one pictured looks similar in every other way. Quite sure it's the same model., "musical_instruments"
It is taking a chance on ordering a guitar online!I took the chance and got what most of the reviews already shared.Here's my take-PROS:- Cheap! $90 is very inexpensive for a guitar!- Well packaged for shipping- Arrived 1 day early- Fair quality. This is not a top of the line or even middle of the line guitar. It is a cheap guitar that does have some decent craftsmanship, but not stellar.- Good sound! This does have a very good sound- with new strings of course- Size: This is not a full size guitar, but larger than a 3/4. It is a \"concert\" size which I like!- It is a cut-away design without electronics! This combo is very rare!- Fair to good wood materials and furniture- Good design! This guitar sounds good, feels good, looks very good.- Matte finish: this comes with a matte finish, not shiny- I like thatCONS:- Strings- corroded poor quality strings- neck condition: Neck has slight bend, I needed to adjust the truss and file a few frets. There is still a slight dip and bump at the 12th fret causing fret buzz.- frets are not smoothed on ends- neck surface is not sanded well but smooth enoughI like this guitar. It's very inexpensive, needs a little work, sounds very good. I hope this information help you make an informed choice about a guitar purchase., "musical_instruments"
I've played the guitar for a number of years, some of them professionally, and during that time I've owned guitars by Fender, Gibson, Ovation, B.C. Rich, Yamaha and Applause. That said, admittedly, this guitar was purchased with the intention of it being a cheap, expendable guitar that was reasonably playable, that I could take with me when I go camping. While my expectations weren't all that high due to guitar's price, upon reading other reviews and having experienced Takamine's quality, I decided to gave this Jasmine a try.  I'm glad I did - what a nice guitar it turned out to be! Out of the box, the fit and matte finish were impressive. The neck action was nicely set up, the intonation is spot-on and the guitar has a rich sound and tone.  The tuning pegs work smoothly and the guitar stays in tune nicely.  Note that I changed strings from the set provided to a set of extra-light gauge strings just as a personal preference and that the guitar features a black pick guard not shown in some product photos. The Jasmine S34C NEX is truly an impressive guitar for the price., "musical_instruments"
This guitar sounds awesome and stays in tune very well. I am now a fan of Takamine. Their is nothing bad I can say about this guitar and I would take this guitar anywhere. This is my 4th guitar I have bought and is by far my favorite guitar. I have 2 electric guitars and now 2 acoustic, this being the second acoustic. I wanted a cheap guitar I could take anywhere and not have to worry about it being scratched up, except I got the guitar and looks too nice to let get beat up. People are complaining about the guitar not having a glossy finish. It wasn't supposed to be glossy to give it a richer look. If this guitar was glossy it wouldn't be as nice sounds stupid but it is true. You have to see the guitar face to face to understand what I mean. This guitar I would recommend to anyone. I am trying to get my friends to buy one so can all have a acoustic guitar, lol. Thank You!!!!!!, "musical_instruments"
I have played the guitar for nearly 50 years now, and wanted an inexpensive small-body steel-string guitar to keep out for informal practice and noodling. This one fills the bill pretty well. Build quality is quite good (made in Indonesia, not China as I had expected), and the intonation is perfect. The finish has a hard matte surface that will probably wear well. A pick guard is present, but when I removed the plastic shipping protector, the entire guard came up with it. The adhesive residue comes right off, so I will play the guitar without a pickguard. Bracing is light -- the entire guitar is light. The body is a bit larger in the lower bout than I expected, but it sits on the lap more comfortably than a dreadnought.I take issue with some reviewers' suggestions that this would be a good beginner guitar right out of the box. The string spacing at the nut is narrower than it should be for the width of the neck, cramping the fingers. The nut should be replaced with one that spaces the strings across the fingerboard just a little more. The action may be lowered by shaving the bridge saddle very carefully, and just a little at a time. This work will cost as much as the guitar cost if you take it to a luthier, but if you can do it yourself, will improve the playability of the instrument.The strings supplied on the guitar were tinny and cheap, so I replaced them with a set of D'Addario EJ-16 Light Phosphor-Bronze. The improvement in tone was immediate -- this little guitar sounds pretty darn good. All in all, with some careful modification, this is a good guitar for the beginner or casual player, and a very acceptable one for the experienced guitarist who can do a little modification him/herself., "musical_instruments"
As a beginner playing guitar I was looking for something mid range and this is it.  It holds tune and has not failed yet.  Since I am just starting it gets a lot of use with practice.  As I get better I will upgrade.So far the only maintenance has been to tune it and clean the strings and that is normal., "musical_instruments"
I hadn't played guitar in a number of years and decided to get back into it. Having had carpal tunnel surgery a few months ago, and having small hands to begin with, I started researching guitars with narrow necks. The Jasmine by Takamine kept coming up and had really good reviews, so I decided to give it a try, buying the S34C. Firstly, it was delivered promptly as requested, and arrived in pristine condition, with some really nice strings. It has a lovely honey gold finish on the front of the body, which had attracted me to the guitar in the first place. I really appreciate the cutaway. How many high notes will I be hitting on this baby? Who knows, but it looks WAY cool, LOL! The craftsmanship, at least to my unpracticed eyes, looks superb. I wasn't too crazy about the pickguard with all the lettering on it, but finally figured out the lettering was just a sticker that could be easily removed. And the sound...just lovely, with that ringing tonality one would expect from a steel string guitar, but with some lovely mellow tones where needed as well. I am so jazzed about how wonderful this guitar is, I'm taking online video lessons and learning a storm of chords and fingering techniques! Hey, I don't expect to be a Leo Kottke or Martin Simpson anytime soon, but I've got something to shoot for, and we all need a dream! If you're looking for a great guitar at a very reasonable price, look no further. Oh, the reason why I only gave it four stars is cuz the neck really doesn't seem to be all that narrow after all. But, maybe it's just my small kid-like hands. Thumb to little finger, I can barely reach an octave on piano. And there ya go!, "musical_instruments"
I don't own one, but have been playing my sister-in-law's for the last year when visiting. Didn't know much about the guitar, but was quite impressed by the sound and workmanship. Changed the strings, and, other than the action being a little high, it's as good as anything I've played for under $500. I honestly thought it cost around $350, so I was quite surprised seeing it for sale for less than $100. It's definitely a great value.In part because of my experience with this guitar, I purchased a Takamine G Series 12-string last year, (for considerably more money), and it's simply incredible., "musical_instruments"
Bought a Takamine 40 years ago. It was an exceptional guitar for which I paid $125. Adjusted for inflation, that would be $800 when I bought this Jasmine.I got a superb machine for the money. Simply superb.  It's not my old Takamine, but the negative differences are slight, and there are only two of them three days into my acquaintance with this guitar.The first is that the finish is not as good. The sanding between coats was skimped, which means that the finish on the front has some texture; the sides of the guitar are also a bit rough.The second probably flows from the first.  The tone is a touch wooden; it doesn't sing as the old Taka did.Positives: the intonation is true at the twelfth fret, and it is playable (and enjoyable to play) with a slide. After the first tune-up of the strings, it stayed in tune.For its price, this guitar is a superb introduction to playing.A very young child, or a small woman, will find this guitar a bit large and deep for true playing comfort. For everyone else, it should fit pretty comfortably.The intonation is true at the twelfth fret, and it is playable (and enjoyable to play) with a slide. After the first tune-up of the strings, it stayed in tune.Any beginner, and more than a few cost-sensitive intermediate players, will be pleased with this guitar., "musical_instruments"
I bought this as a deployment that was shipped to afghanistan from amazon. I wasn't planning on using this as anything but a practice guitar. The way the military palletizes all of its cargo, I figured there was about a fifty percent chance it would arrive in a flattened box with wooden splinters sticking out of it, but I took the chance anyway. It arrived intact, and ready to play. The strings are a bit cheap, but the guitar itself is well made, and has a really nice rich tone. I was planning on giving it away when I left, but I am shipping it home instead, and it wioll cost me almost the price of the guitar to mail it home, but it is worth it. This one has worked out so well I am taking a chance on a 12 string, soon to arrive in Theater., "musical_instruments"
It's kind of pointless to add yet another review to an item that has already received hundreds of (mostly) positive reviews already. But I can't help it - I like this guitar. Quite simply, this is a really nice guitar. Is it $750 nice? No. But for less than $100, nice doesn't even describe it.My Jasmine arrived well packaged including double boxing.  The outside box had a little damage, but the guitar was well protected inside, so no problem.Since I'd read a few reviews commenting on flaws in the finish, one of the first things I did was check it out thoroughly. Nope, no flaws noticeable to me.  Kind of a satin \"laid back\" finish that feels good and looks nice.  Oh, but I did immediately remove the pick guard.  It just peeled off without damaging the finish underneath and (in my opinion) it looks better without it.Other reviews had complained about a too-low action. But mine seems dead on.  Of course action height is more a personal preference than any hard and fast rule. But even so, there's really no way anyone could characterize mine as too low.Some mentioned rusty strings.  Not on mine. The strings looked fine, and after the usual breaking in period have maintained tune very well.And of course the guitar sounds good.  Again, maybe not $750 good, but at least $250-300 good. And certainly better than I expected it to sound at that price.So, if you want a nice sounding, decent looking, inexpensive guitar - you've found it.  Stop wasting time. Just click the buy it button., "musical_instruments"
I bought my son a thousand dollar Epiphone limited edition electric guitar for his birthday just a few months ago, so when he told me he would like an acoustic guitar for Christmas, I told him an expensive one was not in our budget.We went to the local music store and tried out several models but he kept coming back to this one. The sound was absolutely fabulous, much better than his current acoustic guitar that cost more than twice as much as this one.The store manager told us that for the price this guitar cannot be beat and that he bought one for his son as well. In my opinion, this was as good as other brands costing three times as much. I'm not sure how Takamine is making these quality guitars for so little money, but if you're looking for a starter guitar, or just looking to add another guitar to your collection, this would make an excellent choice.I inspected the guitar we took home and found a few places where the finish was not quite as smooth as the rest of the guitar, , "musical_instruments"
Has a good sound. Stays in tune.  Wish it came in a darker grain of wood.  A little bulky,  My arm goes to sleep sometimes after extended playing,  wish it was a little thiner.  I bought it because I wanted a cutaway and this was a decent price., "musical_instruments"
A value and a half. If you need a beater this is it. It plays great,  great fret job and solid tone. Have recommended to several students. This guitar pays better than some 3 times is value!, "musical_instruments"
I got tired of flying with my guitar everytime I go visit my parents.  Besides the risk to my guitar, there is the cost.  For the price I paid for this guitar, I will be money ahead in two visits to my parents.  I had it shipped to my parents when I bought it, and they are keeping it there for me for my future visits.  It has much better tone than I expected, and very good action.  Stays in tune very well.  I am very happy with my purchase.  Recommending it to my friends who need a second guitar for the beach or the tailgate party., "musical_instruments"
Love , love this guitar.Little bit modify at the bridge will make great guitar.Nicely sound it gave(up on what brand of strings you use).Price also great with budget.Worth every penny.Best recommended for starters, intermediate and pro player.Get it one you will love it., "musical_instruments"
I was thrilled when my guitar arrived and even more so after I tuned it and began to play.My guitar is absolutely beautiful. The finish is flawless. And it's got that new guitar smell...ahhhhhh.It does have a pick guard (that is not shown in the photo on any website or in any catalog) which pleases me. It would be a shame to scratch the surface while strumming with a heavier pick. I read one review on a music vendor's website where the reviewer complained about Takamine and Jasmine printed all over the pick guard. And they were right about that...but I found it very easy to remove all these words by simply peeling off this protective sticker. Dah.The strings are a little heavier than I like but I'll be changing them in a few weeks anyway.The sound and craftsmanship is anything but what you would expect from such an affordable guitar and everything you'd expect to pay more for. It has a rich, full bodied sound.I am now a diehard Takamine fan., "musical_instruments"
As title says:1) High Action2) Inadequate Loudness for pickingI compared this to the Mitchell MD100 and think the Mitchell is very good for it's price.You can compare both at guitar center., "musical_instruments"
well.. First of all, I am a beginner.. I do not know anything about guitar... I saw that some people complain about the corroded strings and buzzing frets... Mine came yesterday and I am afraid that it would have issue, so I brought it to school and let my professor checked for me.. It surprised me because mine does not have any issue at all.. The string does not corroded, but I changed mine anyway. The fret does not have any issue at all.. and the Truss rod adjustment is perfect.. The action is low and the guitar structure is perfect. When my professor starts playing it, he was surprised by the sound it produced. He thought the guitar cost $300 above!!... He also bought one this morning...haha...anyways, I buy it from amazon and the packaging is great!!...My guitar comes in a perfect condition, and I strongly recommended this guitar for anybody!!..., "musical_instruments"
Right out of the box this guitar was flawless. I played it with the strings it came with (to inspect intonation-fret buzz etc. the old strings would work for set-up if needed) and the intonation (harmonics at the 12 fret exactly matched the fretted note at the 12th fret) was dead on. Absolutely no fret buzz even at the 21st fret. I have been playing guitar for 40 years and I have seen my fair share of acoustic guitars in that time. To say this is a beautiful playing and sounding instrument just doesn't do it justice. I have played many expensive acoustic guitars that didn't sound or play as well as this even after set-up. The lows are nice and clear and the highs are clear without sounding \"tinny\" or banjo like. A very well built, great sounding guitar. For the price you can't go wrong. I would recommend this guitar to novices and pros. I was not expecting a guitar of this quality for such a low price. 100% satisfied. Rock on Jasmine!!, "musical_instruments"
A nice little untreated cloth to clean my Taylor guitar.Now if I could only play the guitar as well as this cloth cleans it. ;0), "musical_instruments"
This was one of those \"might as well get one of these too, while I'm at it\" purchases when I was ordering guitar polish. It's a good cloth for polishing, no more to say about it., "musical_instruments"
This cloth works well in cleaning off the dust, fingerprints, oil, and dirt off of my guitar. It is thicker and bigger than the ones used with glasses cleaning so I'm sure it can be used to wipe down other things as well., "musical_instruments"
I use it to clean smudges off of my guitars and to keep the fretboards clean after use. It works well without scratching the delicate surfaces.It is extremely well made and I have thrown it in the washer/dryer and it comes out clean and new looking. I keep it in my guitar case and use it often!, "musical_instruments"
This sure wipes down any guitar to get finger prints and such off.  Remember, I would not use this with any kind of polish, a little pricey, but then again, aren't our toys!, "musical_instruments"
I chose this rating because a fine paper towel seems to work just as well as this microfiber polish cloth., "musical_instruments"
Great cloth for keeping those pesky fingerprints and other smudges off your valuable guitars.  Soft touch, easy care - can't beat it!, "musical_instruments"
Lets be honest, it must be pretty hard to mess up a cleaning cloth. It either cleans or it doesn't. This cleans/polishes all of my guitars great. Just make sure the strings are off so that this doesn't get caught on them. This is a brand I've come to trust., "musical_instruments"
Do NOT use these to polish your guitar. It leaves tons of small fibers all over, and is hard to clean up. A total disaster. These are good for maybe wiping up dog poop, but not cleaning anything., "musical_instruments"
I have a rose-gold plated flute, and wanted something to clean it that would not rub away the plating.  This does the job perfectly.  Wipes off fingerprints & smudges easily, and with a little water cleans up lip stuff that gets stuck on my lip plate.  Is easy on the plating and very gentle.  Washes in the washing machine on handwash with no fabric softener and line dries.  Am very pleased., "musical_instruments"
As some of the other reviews state, you barely need any type of guitar cleaner when using these microfiber cloths. I've found for the best results, use a wax sealant product, and then use this cloth separately and afterward to clean your guitar. The fingerprints and smudges lift off effortlessly., "musical_instruments"
Scratch free, durable, machine washable. I use it dry to wipe down the acoustic guitar strings after each time playing and the tone lasts much, much longer. You place the cloth next to a string, then hook your little finger under and pull up so the cloth surrounds the lower surfaces, sides and top of the string, then pressing it in around the string slide up and down the full length a couple of times, then repeat on the remaining strings. I then slip it under the strings and sort of buff the fingerboard, then wipe down the surface of the guitar and tuning keys. Takes a matter of moments and works great. Then once every week or two, it just goes in with the laundry, comes out perfectly clean again.Polyester microfiber is kind of an unusual fabric. It is fully synthetic and water will bead up on the surface, but it works well for polishing. If I'm using carnuba wax, I use a 100% cotton towel to remove it, but for dry polishing wouldn't be without one for each guitar., "musical_instruments"
It helps to clean the guitar. I have an eletric acoustic guitar and it was a good choice to buy this!, "musical_instruments"
This is my first attempt at buying a polishing cloth for my guitars. I tried this untreated 'MicrofiberPolish Cloth' on my Gibson ES-339 because I had heard good things about it.We'll begin with some stats: the cloth is 11-3/4\" by 11-3/4\" and has an 1/8\" border stitched aroundthe edge. It feels very soft to the touch and it is made in Korea. There is a small warning on theback of the package that states: \"Not designed for cleaning electrical devices.\" You can also washthis untreated polish cloth in mild soap and water, rinse it out and hang it up to dry. Now to thereview.My guitar has an Ebony hard lacquer finish, meaning very glossy and shiny. I have been playing thisguitar for about a year now and it had a lot finger smudges on the body's front and back and BACKof the neck. I was able to get most of the minor finger smudges off. When going after the moreresistant multiple smudges the polish cloth would spread it around and left most of the problem onthe finish.What I discovered about this cloth, even with increased elbow grease, is that it has it's limitations.So, if your guitar is reasonably clean and the smudges are fairly new this cloth is dynamite and takesthem right out. If the body oils have been there for awhile, probably collecting dust, then you willneed some type of cleaning liquid to help you break up the old fuzzy oils on your instrument. Pleaseuse any liquid sparingly when applying it to the surface of your instrument. Do not put a liquid directlyonto the surface of your instrument. You should put the cleaning liquid onto the cleaning cloth firstthen apply it.I decided to use Dunlop's 'Dunlop Formula 65 Guitar Polish & Cleaner' to cut and clean up the tougheroily smudges. I used another soft cotton cloth and it cleaned up very nicely. Since then I have beenable to keep the guitar polished and clean using only the 'Planet Waves Microfiber Polish Cloth'. It doesnot leave scratches or any marks when used without a liquid. I also did not have a problems with thecloth breaking down and leaving lint or pieces of cloth behind.You want to use a another cloth to clean your fretboard and not the same one you use for the finish.The fretboard gets a lot of oily dirt assigned to it through repeated play. I would be fearful that theadditional oils accumulated  on the fret board will get into the Microfiber cloth and transfer to the finishof the guitar.So like a lot of things in life there are limitations to everything. I gave this untreated microfiber cloth4 stars because it does a fine job keeping my guitar clean  and polished with minimal effort. My highexpectations, based upon the blurb, were that this cloth would clean up more ensconced oils and dirtbut it only smeared them around. It was more trouble than it was worth to use the microfiber cloth toclean up the smeared mess.Nonetheless, I like this cloth and recommend it for upkeep purposes and minor dirt or grime. I will bekeeping it in my guitar case just for this particular guitar finish and use each time I am done playing., "musical_instruments"
Compared to Ernie Ball's cloth, it's good enough for wiping down things.  It is soft and non abrasive; EB's cloth has that and also has a clinging element which seemingly cleans and absorbs. Overall good cloth for general use., "musical_instruments"
Great Microfiber Polishing Cloth for a great price!Paid less than half through Amazon.comGreat product that works very well with nitro finishes., "musical_instruments"
Very soft gray microfiber cleaning cloth. Big and wide enough to handle any guitar. Works great for polishing and buffing guitar finish., "musical_instruments"
I tend to have sweaty fingers after playing my guitars.  Therefore, after playing, I always wipe down my strings to extend their life.  I've used other microfiber cloths, but they tend to break easy and leave \"fuzzies\" on the strings, which I then have to remove one by one.  This cloth is fantastic for wiping down your strings after use.  It is very well made and leaves nothing behind after use.  I liked my first one so much, that I am putting in another order., "musical_instruments"
Not very substantial. It began to tear on my guitar strings. I was hoping for something that would hold up to more uses., "musical_instruments"
At first glance this can look like a microfiber cloth.  But these one's really get the guitars shining up really nice.  They are made for glasses and stuff like that and they really polish good., "musical_instruments"
I bought 3 of these to store in various bass cases. I use them after a session or practice along with some guitar cleaner.. Sadly, I could not find any untreated cloths locally so I had these shipped through prime. These cloths are gentle and prevent scratching the finish unlike some of the microfiber types I see here and in stores that tend to leave streaks and in some cases scratches on the guitar., "musical_instruments"
Purchased this after owning a ernie ball polish cloth that was given to me. This cloth cleans up pretty well, but what i noticed after wiping down the strings a few times is that the fibers would hook. I dunno if they weren't meant to wipe the strings with but my ernie ball cloth is A LOT more durable than this cloth. They do the job but i believe that the ernie ball cloth does it better. Like a previous reviewer, i'm a little iffy about putting this cloth in the washer.Update: Putting it in the watcher was fine and idk why but after washing it for the first time it cleans up 1000000x better than before, i like this and my ernie ball cloth :)From 3 to 5 starts!!, "musical_instruments"
This works very good on a silver flute.  It's soft and will go along time before you feel like you have to launder it.  Would purchase again., "musical_instruments"
This is just a simple microfiber cloth that works just like it should. There's nothing else to say but to get it if you need it. The quality doesn't suck so don't worry about. Peace out., "musical_instruments"
I bought this for my son to keep his guitar clean with. He really likes it a lot. It keeps fingerprints wiped off nicely., "musical_instruments"
Polishes well. You could probably buy a microfiber cloth from somewhere else and it would do the same thing, but this one works well., "musical_instruments"
Sorry, but I'm not as smitten with this cloth as some of the other reviewers. It's okay; good size, works pretty well, but sheds when new. And despite claims of being laundry-safe, the edges began to unravel after the first wash. I used with Planet Waves Restore polish and got good results, but probably would not buy again., "musical_instruments"
This polish cloth is cheap and does the job of wiping your guitar down from dust or from use with cleaning products.  It doesn't scratch the guitar and works great!, "musical_instruments"
I feel like this picks dirt off my guitar strings better than the Taylor cloth I also have in the case, "musical_instruments"
The price is fair and it serves its purpose.  I'm pretty happy with this cloth.  I just wish it was bigger so I could have a greater surface area of the cloth to use before washing it.  I haven't had to wash it yet, but it looks like it would hold up., "musical_instruments"
Well it's a cloth and I use it to wipe my guitar.  This is a fairly good size cloth at that., "musical_instruments"
I bought my first one from Amazon over a month ago - and simply fell in love with it.  It cleans/polishes wood, metal (although for strings, I use GHS' Fast Fret), eye-glasses, computer screens, etc with wonderful ability, easily replacing \"casual\" cleaning/polishing fluids.  I even recently bought a 2nd just because.  And yes, the first one has finally gone through the wash after a month of constant use- I knew it was time when it wasn't wiping off the smudges as quickly.  It came out with a slightly nappy texture (to be expected really), but still works as well as ever.  There is a vast amount of different \"polish\" cloth brands out there, but you won't go wrong with this one., "musical_instruments"
I really did not expect much from this rag. I just wanted a good quality lint-free / scratch-free cloth to clean my stringed instruments before and after each use. I was totally surprised that it actually works this good. Removes all the crap on your shiny finish without having to spend time constantly cleaning with guitar cleaner. This will probably help protect your finish over the long run too.You may wonder how you can get excited just over a cheap little cleaning rag. This thing rocks! It picks up every smudge, smear, & print and leaves nothing behind. It's an amazing little cleaning tool, and I WILL replace it if/when it ever wears out. If you are like me, and you want your instruments to look clean & grunge-free onstage, you should check out this little wonder. You can just keep it in your pocket and wipe it once between songs if you want. Doesn't get any easier. Great product!**********************A note about the mixed reviews. I REALLY wish Amazon would separate the 3 different cloths instead of lumping them into one product page. It really isn't fair to the actual good product to have it's rating artificially lowered by bad reviews for a COMPLETELY DIFFERENT ITEM. It also causes confusion to potential buyers because they have to sift through every review to find the ones that apply to the actual product they want. When I go to the product page for the AMAZINGLY GOOD micro-fiber cloth and see horrible reviews about fraying and lint, it makes me sad. I have had both of the other items, and this micro-fiber cloth is NOTHING like the other 2. This item has sewn/seamed edges that will not fray. It NEVER leave lint behind and it removes fingerprints & smudges and leaves only a nice clean instrument behind. No scratches, no lint, no hint it was ever there. My guitar always looks brand new after using this cloth, and I use the thing almost every day.I got on this rant bc I came here to replace mine after giving it away to a friend who fell in love with it. I told him I would just get another. Then I came here and couldn't remember which version I bought, and the negative reviews seemed to be talking about a completely different item (leaves behind lint?? What the crap are they talking about?)...turns out they are talking about a completely different item. I looked up my purchase history and found I had bought the Micro-fiber, then I placed an order for 2 more (1 for me, 1 to give away, again).Putting a single item type on a page and having selectors for size or color is fine of course. Putting an apple and a lemon on the same page (literally) and lumping bad reviews for a horrible product in with great reviews for a wonderful product is just an error that needs to be fixed. At least now if you managed to find this lone clarifying review hidden among the dozens of other mismatched ones, you know what version to buy and which to avoid.Anyway, /End rant., "musical_instruments"
Works as advertised for polishing my guitars. I don't use any other cleaners such as Fender Polish when I use this cloth., "musical_instruments"
We've all had guitar cleaning cloths and most do a good job. When I see the word microfiber I always think of those cloths that stick to your fingers when you are using them uck.This cloth is different it does not have the same feel as most microfiber cloths and it wipes away finger prints and anything else on your guitar body like nothing I've tried before. With no cleaning solutions needed it magically shines the surface without scratching it.This would be great for Any instrument or anything else you want to polish without having to use solutions.Reasonably priced too., "musical_instruments"
I've owned this pedal for about 8 years.  It's g, "musical_instruments"
This pedal is super...tons of verb if you want it.... makes any amps built in verb obsolete after you plug into this.. I highly recommend digi stuff... I have this coupled with other pedals and a Jamman stereo and it is awesome...thanks.... love shopping through Amamzon, "musical_instruments"
Purchased this to replace a Behringer pedal because the Behringer introduced a \"swishing\" sound. This pedal has good choices for reverb types and is relatively noiseless. Good product and got good price here on Amazon., "musical_instruments"
I use this pedal mainly for the &#34;church&#34; setting in ambient volume swells. It has seven different reverbs you can choose from (including reverse). So it will definitely suit your needs for whatever you require reverb for. It is ruggedly built and digital, which some will like and others won't. I like it. That said, I have taken a liking to other digitech pedals as well. They sound good and are affordable., "musical_instruments"
This is a great-sounding reverb pedal. Tons of options and ways to manipulate your sound. I've combined this with a Epiphone Sheraton II (semi-hollow body) and have been able to get some awesome deep, rich sounds (watch out for feedback though). The design is very solid, and the controls are quite easy to use. Honestly, I think it has a lot of reverb settings that I won't use very much, but there's no problem with them being there.I definitely recommend this reverb pedal for fans of Kings of Leon, U2, etc. Or if you're just looking for a pedal to boost your sustain and create deeper tones, this is it. This has definitely enhanced my creativity with a guitar. My only caveat to this review is that I haven't tried out other reverb pedals, but this one definitely suits all my needs., "musical_instruments"
This pedal is OK, it has all you need in a reverb, the controls are simple and the sound is good, there are other much more expensive units, but this pedal can be compared to those expensive units, the sound is digital clear and the features are basic, it is worth to have one to have fun with, I recommend this product, DigiTech quality is top of the line so you dont have to worry about it, in general a very good unit., "musical_instruments"
This pedal is very well constructed but it goes through batteries like CRAZY! You will want to get a power supply if you opt for this unit.I'm not too fond of the sound quality of the reverb either- there are a LOT of better sounding units out there but some folks might find it acceptable.Over all I would not recommend this product., "musical_instruments"
I've had this pedal for a number of years. It provides a wide range of reverb effects, sounds natural and has a killer stereo output. I've haven't heard a pedal that competes with spring reverb, but this pedal keeps up with any simulated reverb pedal I've heard and does an excellent job with amps that lack a spring unit. The effects can go way beyond what a spring unit can do as well. Recommended., "musical_instruments"
I love it and there are a lot of bold type enhancements to my acoustic now.... the chicken picken' is much fun and I am still experimenting. AS with all digitech pedals,  I just seem to love their ease of operation.  the gain on this pedal without feedback is incredible...., "musical_instruments"
The digitech main squeeze is an okay compression pedal. Do I use it? yes. However, I would likely trade it for an MXR or DUNLOP if I had the opportunity. It doesn't sound bad per se' but does have some hiss to it. It also boosts your signal (a noticeable volume increase). While some may like this, I want my compressor to be a little more subtle and just provide some added sustain., "musical_instruments"
As soon as I got this pedal I put it on my board and noticed it had a high end hum. I have a 2 Behringer pedals on my board and a lot of people say they are bad noisy pedals,but my pedal board was silent till I put this pedal on it. I've only had it for a few days, but the cons out way the pros. Maybe I will purchase a noise reducer to help clean it up a bit. Once I get around to playing with it I will write another review., "musical_instruments"
Compression/sustain wise, this unit is decent but I cannot abide the noise ... I tolerated it for a while but wound up pulling it for a cleaner compressor ..., "musical_instruments"
I have stayed clear of using pedals for most of my playing carrier (over 40 years), but after installing a Fernandes FSK-101 Sustainer kit and getting the same results as most other guys: Too much sustain on adjacent strings which makes the whole experience a joke, I decided to go ahead and try this compressor out and am very happy with the results. I play mostly clean (jazz, blues, rock) and this unit gives me at least twice the sustain as I would normally get without any pedals., "musical_instruments"
Good and transparent compressor with low noise operation, very tough construction, although not the best it sounds good to me, it depends on the situation, the sustain is good., "musical_instruments"
In my opinion, this is the best guitar volume pedal available. It is affordable and does exactly what it's supposed to, and does it very, very well I might add. I've tried numerous volume pedals, from Morley to Line 6 to the Dunlop DVP1, and none are as fluid or feel as good as the Ernie Ball Jr.I owned the Dunlop DVP1 for several months, and while it did an okay job of cutting the volume I simply did not like the feel nor the low volume levels. It felt way too bulky under foot and went from about 0 to about 3 when barely applying volume. This is unacceptable when you're trying to clean up your distortion channel or trying to accomplish a slow volume swell. But as soon as I laid the Ernie Ball down and plugged it in I fell in love. Not only does it feel great under your foot and provide precise control, it has a complete volume sweep. Add in some delay and it will give you an organ-type swell. Absolutely perfect!I've heard some people complain about the Ernie Ball Jr being a flimsy pedal but I just don't see this. Of course, it's not a tank like the Dunlop or Morley, but it still feels very solid. It's also lighter than the others mentioned, which is a plus for traveling musicians.I would HIGHLY recommend this pedal. It is one of my favorites on my board and I couldn't imagine playing without it!, "musical_instruments"
Works smoothly, built like a tank and looks good as well. I've tried other passive volume pedals that didn't work...this one works. Worth every penny., "musical_instruments"
If you want to do swells with your instrument, or make notes &#34;cry&#34;, this' will do the trick. Smooth, reliable action and no noise too., "musical_instruments"
I needed a volume pedal of a smaller stature for my pedal case and this one fits the bill...AND...it's heavy duty, accurate and has a real smooth fall off., "musical_instruments"
If you plan to use this pedal as a traditional volume pedal in a Guitar > Volume Pedal > Amp configuration (inserting effects pedals anywhere you like), this is a POORLY engineered pedal.  It can't be \"true bypass\" as long as the signal travels through a potentiometer but they can use pots that are a virtual short when adjusted properly and with the pedal forward.Anyway, the difference between plugging my guitar directly into the amp and placing this pedal in the chain between the amp is immediately noticeable.  The tone becomes duller, the output drops.  I would expect that from an Asian knock-off, not from an A-list gear maker.  I might be over-stating Ernie Ball's reputation, though they make some fine guitars I gotta say, and I've used their strings for many years.If you plan to use this EB-6180 pedal with digital effects you should be fine.  This is because the digital device will take two measurements of pure resistance at either end of the rocker.  The signal processing takes place in the unit, not the pedal.  (Those units have their own tone problems but that's another review.)It does occur to me that any pedal with a buffer (NOT \"true bypass\" in other words) may fix this problem, which is more than likely related to impedance, like a tuner pedal, between the guitar and the volume pedal.  I will need to try that out, but it does not excuse Ernie Ball from their responsibility.  Major FAIL on their part.2 stars is generous because EB fails to honor the simple \"first do no harm\" principle. It harms your tone.  How dumb is that?  The pedal itself is very attractive, appears indestructible, though I have my doubts about their \"string\" mechanism over time.  The rocker feels smooth and the weight gives the pedal stability on the floor.I have no recommendations for a volume pedal.  Because of the feel, and esthetics, I do plan to keep this for the digital device use, but wish it was able to do what it promises, and fails so miserably, to deliver., "musical_instruments"
There is no way any kind of rig is complete without at least one of these.  I have several.  Came in perfect working condition.  Great Buy., "musical_instruments"
I recommend this pedal to anyone considering a volume pedal.  It is super sturdy, transparent and I fully expect to have this for a very long time.  The tuner out is a nice feature, but the serious selling point is the quality.  Go no further for your volume pedal needs., "musical_instruments"
I have a HEAVY Epiphone EB-0 bass and this strap is a life-saver.  Nice, thick and padded and doesnt look too dorky.  The little pocket for the pick is not too practical though because the pick easily falls out and is lost., "musical_instruments"
I've been a gigging musician for almost 20 years, and this is the most well made, most comfortable guitar/bass strap I've ever used.Pros:- Substantial padding where you need it- Perfect stitching- Heavy, stiff leather ends- Soft, fine-woven material - not the coarse nylon you find in most cheap straps- Underside is lined with an even softer material - makes the strap comfortable even without a shirt on- Did I mention it's super comfortable?Cons:- None to speak of.  Seriously.  It's that phenomenal.Perfect whether you're rocking a featherweight Strat or a 16-pound 6-string bass.I use it with a 13-pound 5-string Warwick bass, and it makes it feel like the bass is a part of me.  I hardly notice I'm actually wearing it.Combine this strap with a decent set of strap locks, and it could easily last you 10 years.You will not be sorry with this purchase., "musical_instruments"
Having a neck-heavy Epiphone SG G-400, I really like this strap because it is not only comfortable but also provides enough friction to keep the guitar in place without much effort. Leather straps are good, too, but they tend to slide off the strap button., "musical_instruments"
I bought this for one of my heavier 5-strings as a replacement strap and love it.  I use that particular bass for slap and usually hang that bass higher on me that the others for good slap technique.  This strap adjusts well and the padding is in the right place and comfortable.Good Strap!, "musical_instruments"
The strap is adjustable on both ends, and the front adjustment slider sat right on my shoulder. I cut it off and glued the material back together with Shoe-Goo, and now it's great. Padding and wide material make standing with a heavy bass a whole lot less tiring., "musical_instruments"
I have now purchased 3 of these guitar straps for my main guitars. I absolutely love them! Great quality, very strong, and great variation of length on them. They are also very wide which is very nice on the shoulders. I highly recommend this strap!, "musical_instruments"
Bought one, tried it on a P-bass, loved it.  Returned to Amazon and bought an additional one for a Jazz Bass...love it.  Good product for a good price, very comfortable.  Update:  I just ordered my 3rd one of these, this time for another P-bass I picked up.  The only gripe I can think of (and it's being super picky) is as another review mentioned the strap's padding design doesn't really allow you to have your bass up in the way high position.  If you're a person who hangs your base under your chin you may have a problem with this strap, other than that, this is a killer product for a killer price., "musical_instruments"
I bought this strap to use with an acoustic bass that is rather gargantuan,- A Tacoma 4 string, after a bit of adjustment it worked great. Then I bought an ovation 12 string roundback (very roundback this is a deep dish) I needed a strap to make this bad boy sit where I was, so I grabbed this strap off the bass and gave it a shot. After adjusting it for the difference in size it worked great. Now I'm buying another strap so I will have one on either guitar.(I usually keep a strap on all my guitars if the cases will allow it, sure beats taking them off and putting them on)This strap is very comfortable on an acoustic/electric guitar, probably more so than on a bass as it is supporting less weight. Due to the width of the strap it distributes the weight over a larger area, meaning less pressure on any specific area. This makes it very comfortable.I might change all my guitar straps from 2\" to 3\" now that I've had a taste of comfort.If you aren't comfortable playing, than you are distracted which removes you from the creative moment. This helps keep you in the moment and in the groove and it don't cost a fortune, plus it holds a pick or two.I like my phat strap just fine., "musical_instruments"
I like the 3&#34; wide for my bass. Fits nice and made well. Seems to be secure fit (leather holders are thick)., "musical_instruments"
I got a couple of these to accommodate different strap locks I have on different bass. The fact that it is wide is nice. As others have said you need to slide the padding down, but you can't beat these for the money., "musical_instruments"
Planet Waves makes good stuff.  Take the load off your shoulder from that old Jazz bass, and get a padded 3 inch wide strap. It's long enough to allow my bass to rest at arm's length.  I can adjust it to fit my acoustic guitar, which I hold much higher, and check out the little 'pick-pocket'.  I like these well enough that I have four of them., "musical_instruments"
This bass strap is really comfortable and for a great price. BTW, that's all I have to say, so don't MAKE me type more., "musical_instruments"
This strap was great I was glad to find this well made wide strap. This Bass strap spreads the weight more even and reduces the shoulder and back pain,he loves it. Just the job., "musical_instruments"
It's not fancy, but it's well though out, and you can't beat the value. The edges don't cut your neck, and having adjustments at both ends allows you to adjust it exactly how you want. Like others, I had to unstitch the pick holder pocket in order to provide a greater range of adjustment. The foam position is never a problem as it will slide where you want, and it flexible/thin enough to go through the buckles if needed. Excellent no frills product with good enough cushioning for a bass., "musical_instruments"
I am pleased with the strap and the low price. I bought it for a very large body &#34;F&#34; hole electric guitar., "musical_instruments"
This is a nice leather mandolin strap.  Fits fine on my cheap Rogue A type mandolin.  Amazingly, it is made in Canada, not China!  The leather is very smooth and flexible, not stiff like some cheap straps., "musical_instruments"
serves its purpose; worked better when I added a quick-disconnect attachment; quality finish, comfortable, and enough range to adjust as needed;, "musical_instruments"
I am so happy with this product that after buying the first one, I bought two more for my bouzouki and for my octave mandolin., "musical_instruments"
This is a perfect strap sized just right for mandolin.I would have given it five stars except mine arrived with a paper label glued to the back of the strap, which when peeled off left a sticky spot on the strap where it would press against the mandolin finish., "musical_instruments"
produce is great price and good quality. it is just the right size to hold my mandolin while I play., "musical_instruments"
OK quality and certainly better than a piece of rope.  I found it a bit uncomfortable for sure but for the money it is worthwhile., "musical_instruments"
This strap is not only nice looking and an excellent product.  Well made and sturdy. It would be hard to beat., "musical_instruments"
If you are looking for a 100% leather mandolin strap, consider another strap.  The outside surface of the Planet Waves strap is leather but the inside surface is some kind of man-made material glued to the thin leather part.  I will be ordering the Levys \"Leather Mandolin Strap (Walnut)\"., "musical_instruments"
Not that many good products/accessories for ukuleles.  This one is perfect in size and price.  However, you must be creative when attaching it to the headstock.  Just give it a little thought.  Overall it's fine., "musical_instruments"
Other reviewers have mentioned that the slot that goes over the strap peg is tight. They are correct, but it stays on like a monkey riding a motorcycle. For the bread this is a great strap. Buy one and see what I mean. My uncle played with a couple of old boot laces for a strap back in the day. Treat yourself and leave your laces in your boot..., "musical_instruments"
It was very hard to get the hole in the strap over the button on my mandolin.  At least it won't fall off soon!  I just got another mandolin with no button, and this strap has no way to attach to it., "musical_instruments"
If you need it, good unobtrusive device for front or as a momentary back strap.  Leather or simulated, this was quite adequate for my purposes.  Price was right! Delivery was immediate.  Rolls up to fit in gig bag and no doubt would adequately go into the hard case.  This one is compatible with the finish on my instrument, since it comes in at least two distinct color tones.Planet Waves Mandolin Strap, Brown.  Also comes in Black. There is also an embossed model (Brown) offered at minimumly higher price., "musical_instruments"
This comes with adapters for just about any pedal you would need power for and if you look at the picture, I LOVE the way this mounts to power strip.  You can actually put several (if needed) side by side, unlike most other power adapters that take up as much as 2 spaces.  It is rated to 1700 mA but I try to keep to 1500 or less.I looked at power requirements of all my pedals and combined accordingly., "musical_instruments"
isn't it sad when somebody produces a great product but screws up on the description? The product is great value for money and worth while buying, if for no other reason than save money on overpriced DC power units from the manufacturers of the pedal units. Trouble is that they do not say whether or not the cables come with the unit. They don't!! Dumb of them, as all they needed to say  was you needed to buy them separately, which I later did. Seems like nit picking? Well, it's not as live abroad and these things take a long while to come down to me. Sloppy isn't it?, "musical_instruments"
Used one of these when I forgot mine and loved it so much, I had to get my own.-- Small, takes up only one spot on a power strip or outlet-- Long cord is great!-- Enough juice to power all of my pedals simultaneouslyTotally worth the buy. Do it!, "musical_instruments"
Highly recommend this adapter because it is transformerless and has high current capacity for powering numerous guitar effect pedals. It is highly reliable and introduces no hum nor noise. Also, it is designed so that it will plug into a power strip without covering adjacent receptacles. Thanks to Amazon for offering this great product., "musical_instruments"
It works great for five of my lower power pedal type items, including my Line 6 wireless receivers, Shure wireless receivers, and several other pedals like my Cry Baby, etc., all at once.  However, the transmitter for my Shure wireless in-ear monitor, which requires less power than any of the other two items combined, will not run, even by itself, when powered by the 1 Spot.  Switching power supplies like this can have a mind of their own, and there is probably some little quirk in the Shure transmitter circuit that this power supply doesn't get along with.  For most of my stuff it works great, and eliminates a bunch of extra power supplies and cords., "musical_instruments"
I use this One Spot Adapter with the 5 pedal attachment. Works perfectly! I've seen reviews about this brand being noisy. I suspect this to be happening with the 8 pedal version. Too many for one simple 9 volt source to handle.I've owned it for a couple of months, used it at home 5 days a week and rehearsed at high volumes about a dozen times. Zero hum or buzz from the unit. I should also mention that I do not have any drive/distortion pedals on my board., "musical_instruments"
At the begining I wasn't sure to buy it since there are a lot of reviews out there with negative imputs about this, so I decided to buy it and I started having problems right of the box, I notice this noise coming out of my amp and also a bad performance of my pedals, then I started to play with them and realized that I had too many pedals connected through a daisy chain, so I decided to leave just one connector alone and available and only used 4 with my pedals and surprise!, connected to a power strip it eliminated all the unwanted noise and performance started to work just fine, I also realized that pedals positions (routing signal) has something to do with it, I couldn't figure out what was it but defenetly works just fine once you got it right, so I would recomend to play a little with your set up and make sure to avoid abuse on it, so it work as it is supposed to., "musical_instruments"
This is a great invention.  I have five different guitar effects pedals and a loop station all attached to this.  It really saves on batteries and extension chords.  It is well worth the money., "musical_instruments"
This is the answer to your all your power supply needs. If you own more than 1 pedal (and we all do) You need this. It powers my Wah and all my stomp boxes with 1 plug. It comes with all the different power plug options and a daisy chain for 5 pedals. It has the adapters to power pedals without a place to plug in by attaching the battery snap to the battery place on the pedal then pluging into the daisychain. It also has the pin plugs to attach to the daisychain for pedals that require that kind of plug in. and it has a 10 foot lead wire so you can reach out to your pedals or pedalboard without having to drag a heavy extension cord across the stage to trip on while your playing. you'll save enough money to pay for it in no time, not having to buy batteries. Get it, you'll love it! I, "musical_instruments"
I use this at the house for pedal power or for testing new pedals.I don't use this on my pedal board and don't know if I would recommend it for heavy live use. I suppose having more than one for reliability would be the key here.It does work well and will power many pedals at one time. I do not use it for powering only one pedal though. This device puts out a lot of juice and will be noisy at times through less expensive pedals.I also like the fact that it only takes one spot on a power strip without covering up a neighboring power outlet.Easy to use - it is what it is., "musical_instruments"
I choose this rating cause it is the best Adapter I've found. I like that is doesn't heat up or even get warm although I only use it with my looper. Another plus +++ is the length of the cord is the best cause I don't need to use and extension cord with it. One less thing to set up, carry around and worry about. I Truly recommend this One Spot Adapter to everyone., "musical_instruments"
I didn't do the sound quality test but i have another one of these and it works just fine. I just tested if all the plugs work and they do. If i'll get some sound problems i will write an update but i'm confident that it's going to be ok., "musical_instruments"
This plug works very well.  I like the right angle connectors.  I have a Korg Pitchblack plus that can act as a powersource for other pedals.  It included a multi-plug cable, but not a right angle one.  The connectors kind of stuck out and got in the way on my pedalboard.  This works much better., "musical_instruments"
This original plug fits the purpose perfectly! Quality and precision! The plugs don't take up space (couldn't be smaller) and the wiring is pliable and easy to rout in and out of spaces on your pedalboard. Keep away from the cheap imitations that rob you of space and are hard to work with! Make sure what you receive is a One Spot product in its original packaging (check images)., "musical_instruments"
I've got 5 effects hooked up to this thing. It fits beautifully and powers all of them at once. Have no problems with this. I recommend it!, "musical_instruments"
The One Spot is a great way to supply power to all your stomp boxes without a bulky power supply or a bunch of wall warts.  Get it, you won't be sorry., "musical_instruments"
Arrived on time ... works as intended and maybe more.One day, I was pondering how best to de-clutter my wall receptacles from a glut of power adapters and also my table from a spaghetti of ensuing power cords used to feed various 9V-12V DC equipment on my table or rack. Fortunately, I chanced upon this little gem and in an instant ... my problem was solved. I chose the 12V adapter with the highest rated power output and used that as my primary 12V DC source and this little gem to power all the other equipment on the table or rack. I also bought another similar unit form another source here on Amazon and used that to supply the 9V DC source to power the rest of the units that needed a 9V source. Everything worked fine and I relegated the remaining adapters to storage. Been working without a problem to this day., "musical_instruments"
This is a very handy item to have when you need to connect your guitar effects with power.  Its easy to install and keeps things simple.  No more extra messy cabling.  Glad I got it.  Thanks to Amazon for the quick delivery., "musical_instruments"
Bought this for my guitar pedals and it works great and doesn't cost much.  I just attached it to an existing adapter and voila., "musical_instruments"
High-quality cable for expanding the capability of the One-Spot or Godlyke 9V power adapter. Distance between plugs more than adequate for most pedal boards., "musical_instruments"
Running 3 to 5 pedals on my board, this was a logical choice of power. The single transformer running into the board with the multi-plug was easy to set up and the small profile of the plugs, combined with the thin cables makes for a neat and uncluttered board. There is no lin drop of power and the devices are able to draw the current needed to work at their peak. Further, with the transformer being well away from the board, there is zero AC hum. What's not to like here?, "musical_instruments"
Good quality, wired correctly, can't complain.  If you use the \"One Spot\" power adaptor, you need to have a couple of these laying around.  It's probably not practical, but I wish they made more sizes.  In one configuration, I only need two plugs, in another configuration I need three, and yet another configuration I need five, so I actually bought a few of the fives, and cut them off to the length I need., "musical_instruments"
This helped me a lot building my pedal board, actually think its kinda overpriced, but its really really good.I have 2 of these actually.I recommend this product., "musical_instruments"
What can I say? It does what it should.  5 pedals on a chain runs safely without crazy hiss and hum on my rig. Of course, if you're running a chain of drive/distortion pedals, you're asking for it.Works great for me. Zero complaints., "musical_instruments"
Nice daisy chain, If it's bought along with the 1 spot adapter, just make sure to avoid using all the connectors, since it could overload the adapter and you'll have noise problems and performance issues, if you use 4 analog pedals connected (as I do) there won't be any problem, I had to play around and also realized that some pedals might use little more power on their funtions, so what I do is that I have a 1 spot adapter connected to a power strip with my 3 boss pedals and a Wah, and in the other power strip slot I have another generic adapter connected with my MXR noise clamp so it doesn't interferes with them. I works just fine., "musical_instruments"
Works like a charm. Powers up to five 9V effects, using one power supply. I am using four plugs and it has worked flawlessly. No more dead 9V batteries. Some effects eat 9V batteries like a 6 year old with a cone of cotton candy., "musical_instruments"
I own a one spot but ran out of plugs for all my pedals. This product allowed me to lengthen my cord and provide the added power supply that I needed. No tone loss at all. Great to have an extension rather than having to get another power supply!!!, "musical_instruments"
I bought an extension for it, and so this plug has allowed me to stop using eight batteries. Hard not to like that., "musical_instruments"
If you own more than 1 pedal (and we all do) you need this and the 1 spot adapter. It will save you a lot of money on batteries and aggravation when you battery runs out on stage. It's worth it's weight in gold. and RockIsland Sound sends it out FAST!. You can count on me for future purchases! Thanks Guys!, "musical_instruments"
I used this along with a Dunlop DC adapter and it all fits nicely.  I'm powering a Zoom MS-50G and a Fulltone OCD.  It will pay for itself over a year in saved battery costs., "musical_instruments"
I only have two pedals, but that was one outlet spot too many, and it really makes a difference when you're onstage with only one power strip.  Now I just wish I had an attachment that would let me charge my laptop and iPhone from the same plug as the pedals.  Can't always get what you want., "musical_instruments"
This product works as advertised, but you should beware. These are RIGHT ANGLED, and they WILL NOT fit in a lot of pedals including the CRYBABY WAH.You have been warned!!!, "musical_instruments"
I started by powering 1 stomp box on this chain and it worked, but when I tried to add a second/third stomp box, I couldn't get any guitar sound only a loud buzz. I returned this product I did further testing, I would not recommend it to anyone. With my personal experience in mind, I would advise you to save your money and get a pedalboard power supply. hope this helps, "musical_instruments"
I bought this because I had already bought a \"1 spot\" plug but as i gained pedals, I needed something to power them without buying more adapters and this is greatest way to solve that problem. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
One Spots come with an 8-pedal multi plug. If you only have 4 pedals, or lets say you have 12, powering them with an 8 plug makes it difficult to isolate power and noise levels properly. The left over connectors can cause ground issues if they touch things when they aren't plugged into pedals. Using this smaller multi plug will leave less open spaces, alternatively it can be attached to any link in another multiplug to add more plugs. Very nice quality, just as with all one spot stuff. Great price, great purchase., "musical_instruments"
Completely quite. Connected with no problem. I own two., "musical_instruments"
Good long cable works well with all my pedals, well worth it to get ride of annoying 9 v batteries., "musical_instruments"
If you're buying this and new to effects pedals (like I was), you'll be concerned whether it'll work with the inexpensive pedals you're likely to also be buying, especially since there is a large kit with a number of converters that might scare you into thinking you'll need them. The two most common types of inexpensive pedals are Danelectro and Behringer, and if you're like me they're ll you'll buy for quite a while. The good news is, you do NOT need to buy converters for them. This little beauty will run all your Behringer and Danelectro pedals, off from any of the standard 9V power supplies available (you don't NEED to buy a 1SPOT, I use it with a Behringer but you could certainly put it together with the less-expensive Planet Wave if you're working on an even tighter budget. In short, buy this product, it will save you its cost in 9V batteries within the first two months if you're on low-price pedals., "musical_instruments"
Works. Works as expected and should last a really really long time. Glad I bought it. Nothing else to say. Thanks., "musical_instruments"
...thing is great for multi-pedal use!  This is a must if you have any of the Danelectro/FAB pedals.  As anyone who has one of these pedals knows they eat 9-volts like candy, you purchase the power supply (search for Danelectro DA-1 9.6V AC Adapter) and this cable and you're good to go for up to 5 pedals!  No more battery swaps., "musical_instruments"
Very nice cable. I used this with my Planet Waves 9v adapter. It works very well, all my pedals powered off one adapter is very useful. The Onespot adapter itself would probably be even better as it only takes one place on a power strip etc instead of a chunky old school adapter like the Planet Waves style. Really nice product for the price., "musical_instruments"
This product isn't really one to review but it does what it advertises. I use this in conjugation with a one spot and a boss daisy chain coming from my TU-3 (great tuner by the way). Starting to build my pedal board so I figured better to start off with a 30 dollar power source than to go and spend like two hundred on a T-Rex fuel tank, which I'm planing on in the future. Great adapter for all of your pedals, decent quality, and only ten bucks. Can't beat it!, "musical_instruments"
It's a well build daisy chain DC power cable. It has good lenght between two plugs. You won't have difficulties to plug your pedals., "musical_instruments"
This Multi-plug works great and has enough plugs for 5 pedals. I only needed it for two pedals which are not in a case, so there is some extra plugs hanging on the floor but is better than setting up another wall wart each pedal. If needed in the future I have these extra plugs. I recommend this Multi-Plug to everyone!, "musical_instruments"
great little cable.  now i power all my pedals with one power supply.  makes setting up for gigs much easier, "musical_instruments"
Every guitar I've ever cared about has had this strap on it. I must've bought about 10 of these over my lifetime, and I don't regret it even in the slightest., "musical_instruments"
The DiMarzio strap lock system here is hands down the best strap lock system available.  The Dunlops tend to release if they're bumped, and the Schaller locks can be a bit too bulk for some instruments.  The DiMarzio models are extremely comfortable, easy to install, and very easy to use., "musical_instruments"
I love these straps.  I have them installed on all of my guitars.  After a Dunlop lock failure, I decided to change over.  Our band's drummer and guitarist both used and recommened these straps so I gave them a chance.  They are amazing, much more comfortable then one of those bulky, heavy leather straps and just as strong.  I was worried that the plastic clips wouldn't hold up, but they do.  I feel 100% secure that my guitar will not fall.  They look good as well and they are easily adjustable.  My transmitter pack slid on with ease and I was ready to go.  A lot of bands I have seen on the road use these straps.I didn't rate these straps 5 stars however, because of a few reasons:1- I play heavy guitars, I was concerned about the screws that came with the straps.  For a standard, lightweight guitar they may be fine, but for say a Gibson, or my Agile Intrepid Pro, I wanted more security.  I took a slighty wider and longer screw than provided, covered it and filled the install hole with epoxy, and drilled it in.  It holds incredible, its NOT coming out now for sure.2- I use the black, white, and blue colors.  They discolor very easily.  Through sweat, dirt, and cigarette smoke, they eventually start to look nasty.  I would suggest going with the black for this reason.3- I put my confidence in these straps 100%, but I wouldn't start doing guitar swings with them.  Its just a plastic clip, and anything can fail.  I've seen guys electrical/duct tape the clips for extra support and they've all been able to get away with swinging their guitars around, but personally I choose to play it safe (as I lost my best guitar to a failed straplock during a spin).All DiMarzio products are incredible. If you want something light and comfy that looks sleek and will keep your guitar protected, I highly suggest these straps., "musical_instruments"
Works better than straplocks as it doesnt fail like regular straplocks. I'd use it for lightweight guitars. Using this on a les paul will kill your shoulder. I always suggest this strap to \"kids\" who spin their guitars while on stage. This strap is the industry standard that will save your guitar from damage, "musical_instruments"
Well made product, strong and looks good. I love this strap, try one, you wont be dissapointed. Like always, Dimarzio products, are simply the best., "musical_instruments"
just arrived in good shape. Polish w/ an expansive polishing cloth. Almost size of a dinner napkin which is nice as opposed to much smaller lens cleaning cloths., "musical_instruments"
Better than Dunlop polish. It really holds up well and leaves a really nice shine. Mine didn't come with a polishing cloth like the picture shows though., "musical_instruments"
I bought this set mainly because I wanted a cheap micro-fiber cloth to polish off my guitars.  For the price of just a microfiber cloth, this set throws in a polish.The cloth is just what I wanted. It is soft and I feel good rubbing it on my instrument. I wish there were a little pouch that came with it so you can keep it separate -- mine is right now in a ziploc bag in my basement with my other loose gear.  The polish is just that -- it is works to bring out a shine, but it is not a cleaner.  You also have to be careful about where on your instrument you get the polish; there is a bit of wax in there and it is not string-friendly., "musical_instruments"
The Product Itself Is Good, Shined My Guitar Up Nicely, The Cloth I Received Was A Black Microfiber Cloth With The Ernie Ball Logo, I Must Say That The Cloth Is Very Nice, It's Soft And Lint Free, So The Cloth Alone Was Worth Purchasing This Polish, After The Polish Is Gone I Will Probably Try Another Product, I Need Something That Will Conceal The Fine Scratches On My Guitar Finish, Probably Like A Guitar Wax, But All In All This Product Seems Good For Wiping Down The Guitar After Playing, Keeps The Instrument Nice And Shiny. It Removes Smudges And Fingerprints Quite Nicely, Not A Bad Product, It Arrived Within A Couple Of Days, I Am Satisfied With This Purchase, "musical_instruments"
I recently bought this (May 2011) to use on both my acoustic and electric and it works fine.PROS:  Non-oily, water-like consistency; leaves no residue behind;  slight non-chemical odor that doesn't linger on your guitar; removes smudges, fingerprints, etc. and leaves a nice shine; comes with a large lint- and dust-free, fast-drying cloth (black); less expensive than most other guitar polishes.CONS:  The pump sprays in a very wide area, so be careful to avoid spraying strings, pickups, etc.The polish in the bottle works well and the lint-free cloth works well too.  I can't see spending more for Gibson or Dunlop polish kits when this work just fine., "musical_instruments"
I have limited experience with these types of product, but it does get finger grime off quite well, and does not leave streaks like another guitar-brand name product I also have., "musical_instruments"
The cleaner works as it should and the price is fair but what really did it for me is the cloth. Just feels right for the job.., "musical_instruments"
Although The cloth I got was black and not yellow just pointing that out. It works amazingly for my guitar now its like a mirror. I can see my reflection perfectly clear., "musical_instruments"
Nice cables.  So far I've not had any problems with them, but haven't put them through a lot of use just yet.  Also have the Monster audio cables that work just as well, but cost more!  I'll have to see over time which brand out lasts the other., "musical_instruments"
Have to try them more and with other amps. By now, they work really good and no interference where detected..at least by my ears =/What I like is that they last a lot!! these are the second planet waves cables that I own and the first ones are still in great conditions!!, "musical_instruments"
this cable is perfect! great sound quality and durability. I will not buy any other cable except planet waves! best bang for the buck for any working musician hands down, yes there are cheaper cables ,,but they don't sound as good or last as long, Planet Waves is the way to go, "musical_instruments"
I have many Planet Waves cables. They are all very well made.  I like the molded ends that seem to help prevent shorts. An excellent value. I would highly recommend., "musical_instruments"
I bought this to replace a cord I was using to practice my guitar. My first cheap cord wasn't actually broken, but I didn't want any down time, so I had this just sitting there as a replacement. Fast forward some time, and I just wanted to try it out. Even though my cheap cord was still working fine, I really wanted to just try out the new cord.I really wish I had done that in the first 30 days. This cord did not work right at all. It seems like there is a short in it somewhere. I had to unplug/plug/ maneuver into place. Of course since it is for guitar, it falls almost immediately out of place again. So, I am back to the cheap cord that hasn't failed, unlike this brand new bad cable., "musical_instruments"
Look no further...You will not be let down by the build quality of these cables nor by the sound quality. I have a Monster M ROCK-12 cable. Put up against these, I fail to distinguish the difference in sound. The only difference? Price. These cables are the ONLY cable I will ever use from now on. Go ahead, buy them. You will love them., "musical_instruments"
I love this cable. They last for ever and NEVER cause buzz or noise. These are the only ones I buy now., "musical_instruments"
Probably the best single thing this cable has going for it is the Lifetime Warranty.I have owned Planet Waves cables in the past and twice I have sent them back for replacement...no problems whatsoever.For the price you are paying (about $1 dollar per foot) you get good quality cable, good cores and shielding with heavy duty retention at the jack connector ends.Not the best, but not the worst. Good enough for live stage gigging and probably won't notice much difference if you are recording.I haven't noticed any RF hum or noise when moving about with these cables.They also come with a set of colored bands so you can easily identify which cable goes to where, cable owner, etc.Affordable price and lifetime warranty make this a \"feel good\" purchase.I would recommend these cables and will buy again., "musical_instruments"
As other reviewers have noted, the ends are too short and dont allow the cable to \"click\" into the jack of your guitar or amp. Easily remedied by cutting back the rubber by about 1/8\" then the cable is fine.Other than that I like the cable construction and the large sized ends., "musical_instruments"
You can't beat these beefy thick cords for the price however some do have a flaw, On some pedals and guitars they pop out cause the length of the metal shaft is too short so it doesn't click into the jack. measured the length and they are short by about 1mm or so.I go a razor blade and carefully trimmed some of the rubber insulation and that took care of the problem. Minor but annoying detail when the cord pops out of your guitar!, "musical_instruments"
Super low capacitance- on par with or better than many of the more expensive cables from Mogami, Canare, etc. The connectors are fantastic and they come with Planet Waves' super-handy elastic cord wrap. These are outstanding guitar cables at a VERY good price. I used to only buy cables with serviceable connectors, but with these, I don't see the point. The lifetime exchange warranty also makes the DIY repair thing kind of pointless too (of course Amazon's return policy is still 30 days, so be aware of that- you'd need to mail it back to the MFR or take it to another dealer to exchange - that is if you ever had to)., "musical_instruments"
been using these cables for three months now. I use them with aZoom G1N Guitar Multi Effects Pedaland they sound great. decided to get this one over the cheaper ones because after doing a little online research I found out that these are suppuosed to take abuse and hold their own better over time. they have a good lenght, of course this being taken in consideration what type of venues you'll be playing. so far I've only used them in rehearsal studios but will be using them live for the first time in a couple of halloween gig I've got coming up the end of the month., "musical_instruments"
The Planet Waves instrument cables have a nice heft to them and click firmly into the amp/instrument.I have had no problems with them at all.The attached elastic tie down that comes with these custom cables makes it easy to coil the cables for storage.5 stars., "musical_instruments"
I have to start off by saying this cable does not produce the same sound quality of my Mogami Gold cables.  If you are recording and are going to meticulous about your sound, this might not be the cable for you.HOWEVER, for the price and purpose this a five star cable.  The plastic plug ends relieve stress on the connection, but also feel sturdy and secure.  The gold plating ensures a solid connection.What I like most about this cable is that it's guaranteed for life and I can bring it to a Planet Waves authorized dealer for a replacement... or so their packaging claims.  I have not had to replace mine., "musical_instruments"
These cables are very high quality, they feel hefty and durable.  I wish I'd gotten one longer than 5 feet though since I can only play close to my amp with two five footers.  Oh, well., "musical_instruments"
I've been using this one for about a year now, with no problems. I really like the durability and clear sound quality., "musical_instruments"
First off, I'm a big fan of D'Addario strings and their Planet Waves division.  So when I needed a quality cable with a right angle plug, I got one of theirs.  I don't really know if it's better than other brands or not.  But it does the job and it's well made., "musical_instruments"
I was using the standard version of these, I saw these at Amazon and figured I'd give them a try.These cables are a little more stiff than the standard cables I was using however the ends seem much more well belt.Doesn't make a difference in the sound? I don't know but I am satisfied with this purchase., "musical_instruments"
I read a lot of positive reviews on the 9.5s and after some use, I am kind of disappointed.CONSTRUCTION:They are just like any other strings, just lighter gaugePACKAGING:It arrived well packaged and was in perfect conditionPRICE:At $4.99 new with free 2 day shipping, this is a no brainer.CONCLUSION:I initially liked the feel of these strings, but the more I played the more I realized that it didnt have the tone I was looking for. I am used to 10s and 11s and though they are more difficult to bend with, they sound much fuller. I put these on my latest stratocaster build and have since replaced them with 10s., "musical_instruments"
I actually wasn't aware of this gauge of string until I purchased a guitar from the great George Lynch. The strings felt different than the 9s I use on my Fenders and the 10s I use on my Gibsons. So the next time I saw George, I asked him what strings he put on that guitar and he told me D'Addario 9.5s. I love them on my Mr Scary Guitars Burnt Tiger and that is the only brand/gauge of string that I will ever put on that guitar! I definitely recommend trying out a set., "musical_instruments"
These strings are best suited for Strats if you want to keep those easy to bend leads but have a little bit more tone. They're also quite good on Les Paul style guitars if you like slinky strings. My issue with them is that the B string and the A string are a bit unbalanced with respect to the others. I would prefer if the B string were 0.012 instead of 0.0115 and if the A were 0.032 instead of 0.034. As such, I prefer to buy the strings individually and customize my own set that way. But if you're not too picky, this will suit you very well., "musical_instruments"
this is as light as you want to go on a LP scale length.. about the same tension as 9s on a strat.so, don't want 9s, and 10s too tight then 9.5s it is.. nice strings, "musical_instruments"
guitar string 9.5 between 9 and 10.  Does its job for those who want strings that are easier to bend than 10 and not as noodlely as 9., "musical_instruments"
I bought these D'Addario strings after going back and forth between 9s and 10s and have really come to like these sizes.  They keep a nice, slinky feel and keep a lot of tone through many hours of playing.  I'm really happy with this D'Addario purchase!, "musical_instruments"
Honestly, the strings are great. They sound great and they are (relatively) inexpensive for bass strings. I love them, and they will be what I buy the next time I change out as well. Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
I like the strings. I'll be changing them soon though, because they have a really light sound and I like the smooth low sound. I like that these strings come with a code that allows you to determine whether they are authentic or counterfeit. Will buy these again., "musical_instruments"
My go-to string brand for any stringed instrument. Punchy round-wound tone, but very responsive to the tone controls for a more muted sound where required., "musical_instruments"
I bought a bass from this site, and as much as I love the thing, I'm not an expert.  I popped my E string over-tightening it when I was setting it up.  I replaced the factory strings with these.  I'm told it sounds better now.  I think so as well, but I can't quite quantify it., "musical_instruments"
I usually use the Pro Steels (by D'Addario)  but these sound and fit nicely with my Squire Fender P Bass. Amazon seems to have great prices and it's nice to have them delivered too., "musical_instruments"
These are super strings. They will last and last and last, and give you great sound. Easy to put on and tune., "musical_instruments"
I'm normally an acoustic guitar player but recently acquired my first electric ever.  It was used, and the strings were dismal sounding, so I bought these D'Addario EXLs.  They hold pitch beautifully.  My only complaint has to do with my guitar technique, not the strings.  Having used heavier strings forever on my acoustic guitars, the recommended lighter gauge recommended for the electric don't like my \"heavy-handed\" approach to pressing down the strings.  As a result, the highly bendable lighter strings become sharp up near the nut until I relax and enjoy playing with a very light touch.  It will take some getting used to -- or else I'll simply move to heavier strings and leave the lighter ones to lead guitarists who know what they are doing.  All of that said, the strings are pure joy to play., "musical_instruments"
I've used D'Addario's on so many different Guitar's the only opinion I can honestly give Ya is that They are the best. In the Studio or on Stage, They stay in tune and work very well with any pickup You are using. I put these on My Wife's Bass cause She is still learning and with a Fender Squire it sounds almost as good as a Precision Fender Bass. They stay true to the note so She will get to know what the pitch and note should sound like every time......, "musical_instruments"
I have been trying to find the perfect gauge and this is it.  Tried 40-100 (too light and high) and 50-110 (too deep, not good for popping), but is right in the middle.  Perfect., "musical_instruments"
a solid favorite around my house. fat and deep, snappy when needed. you can definitly pay more, and you may want a more specific tone, but these are a safe bet that always sound good, "musical_instruments"
Best articulate bass string for the money.  I have one of the first versions of the Fender Precision Lyte bass from the 90s.  I have started to use lighter strings to keep the neck from getting fatigued.  They sound great and stay in tune.  Sound like Rotosounds.....think Roger Glover, Geddy Lee, and Chris Squier.  Nice bright and deep sound with fingers or pick.  I am not a slap style player so I can't comment on that.  I set my action fairly high to keep every thing clean as possible. Try them, you'll like them and your bass guitar neck will be happy., "musical_instruments"
...strings I use D'Addario strings on my acoustic and electric guitars as well they are great.  They have a really nice sound and don't cost an arm and a leg..., "musical_instruments"
I keep going back and forth between DR High Beams and these. My teacher really likes the High Beams, but these are half the price, and the tone is just great and, surely a new set of these are going to have more &#34;oomph&#34; than a set of High Beams I keep a little too long because they cost more. . .  Recommended., "musical_instruments"
Through my Ampeg bass amp, the low E string gets distorted when you push the bass control above 7, and the upper 3 strings sound kind of plain., "musical_instruments"
So these are  pretty great strings. Not much to say. The price is really good. About ten dollars a set which is really good., "musical_instruments"
I use these strings on most of my acoustic guitars, except for the smaller Takamine New Yorker and A&L; Ami (I use the D'Addario custom lights).  I have grown a fondness for the Phosphor Bronze strings because of the perfect balance between the warm full sound with strumming and bright tones when picking.  ALso, the brightness is retained longer than other bronze and brass alloys I've tried, such as Martins and Elixirs.  These strings are quite durable and long-lasting.  In the 10 years I've been playing, I've never had these strings break on me (I've broken Martin and Elixir strings in the past).  The color-coded end balls help with the restringing.  I typically get the three-pack so I can restring a trio set of my herd at a time.  I really can't complain about anything.The individual gauges are: .012, .016, .024w, .032w, .042w, .053wHighly recommended., "musical_instruments"
I was an Ernie Ball guy for a long time. But I was getting pissed because the Ernies kept corroding so quickly. So I tried these, and they seem to hold up better. There are coated strings that will last longer, but I don't like spending so much on strings. And of course, they sound excellent too. Stock up!!, "musical_instruments"
They are easier to play on the the medium gauge strings that came with my guitar. I am a beginner so although they still hurt my fingers they were an improvement. They also have a pretty color to them, and the ends of the strings (the ones that go in the holes during installation) are color coded and come with a chart, which makes things easy., "musical_instruments"
I've use these strings for years. I play often and like to change strings often. I can do it without breaking the bank and they hold up well for many practices and gigs. They hold tune very we (at least on my guitar) indoors and out. I'd highly recommend them., "musical_instruments"
My guitar originally came with D'Addrio exp and they sounded good. I replaced them with Elixir nanoweb coated strings and they also sounded good, but the finish was wearing fast. This time I got a 3 pack of EJ16-3d light. The were easy to put on and have held up well other than tarnishing quickly.But the sound is the problem. It's terrible. They sound very muddy. Crisp tone distinction is just not there. I thought light would be the better route, but now I'm not sure. I purchased some others to try. Also, since a purchased a 3 pack. I may just change the strings completely again to see If I just have some dead strings., "musical_instruments"
These were the same strings originally strung on my Godin Seagull, and I absolutely love their sound, feel, and durability. The one reason I actually needed them because my G string broke while I was tuning too fast. The sound is almost identical to what D'Addario describes, these strings have a great, uplifting sound to them, hard to soft strums. Playing feels great with them, nothing out of the ordinary either strumming or the fretboard feel, clean and smooth. When replacing, I ran into no problems, quick and easy. I love the strings and their price, definitely will stick with this brand as well., "musical_instruments"
These strings from D'Addario are a personal favorite of mine. I love the EJ16 light gauge for their size and ease of use. I think the light gauge is a nice size that won't hurt your fingers, or put undue stress on your guitar. Not only that, but they sound great. Not too big or not too small! I have plenty of volume and drive for bluegrass. I love how they color code their strings on the \"ball ends\". To me this makes it much easier when changing strings. You don't have to worry about mixing up your strings. I've also had no problem with the fit; unlike some brands. Give these a try. I think you'll be satisfied., "musical_instruments"
Only issue they break easily. But they last a long time and sound great. Well worth the money. Crisp and fresh tone for a long time., "musical_instruments"
These are the only strings I use on my acoustic/electric. Love the sealed bags to keep the air tight seal. Prefer the Extra lights., "musical_instruments"
I brought this set beasue one of the strings broke on the kid size guitar, and I also wanted to have backup strings.  I haven't tried many different strings.  I have used the strings (D'addario EXP) that came with on my Takamine GS330S, and it's been good for year+. IIf the strings break, I will try this one GS330S as well.  Over all, I think D'addario is great for warm balance tones. After the strings were set and \"stretch\" for few days playing, it stays in tune.  The strings were set for more than 6 months, they still are playable, and the sounds are okay on kid size guitar.  I don't think there will be any problem if the strings are on my GS330S.  I'm happy with the purchase and the quality of the strings., "musical_instruments"
These sound great and last a long time for me.  Plus, they're reasonably priced.  Put 'em in your case and don't be unprepared.  I like squirrels., "musical_instruments"
I play resonator guitars open tuned. These are the only strings that hold up well to the tension of an open &#34;A&#34; tuning. I recently tried multiple other brands and gauges (almost every B string snapped / to C#) only to come back to these... Only wish they came in packs of 10 cause I go through about three sets a month (3 guitars), "musical_instruments"
Strings, they're all I use on my acoustic.  These custom light strings in particular give me the sound I wanted from my guitar., "musical_instruments"
Great guitar string at a reasonable price. I highly recommend these acoustic strings, they are also available in light or heavy guageif you prefer. I like the EJ 17 medium string for my rhythm acoustic guitar., "musical_instruments"
.... I'm going back to what works best for me, Martin SP custom light. While the packaging (sealed) for each set is a good thing and also the individual color coding of each string, I do prefer Martins',, "musical_instruments"
It is fine strings,i couldn't really find difference between martin m140maybe its just me, i expected more than that!its just regular strings, "musical_instruments"
I wasn't expecting much for the price but have to admit I'm very pleased with the tone these strings produce straight out of the package. After several hours of play and 2 tunings, they're spot on and sound sweet as cream butter. Great product and very highly recommend, "musical_instruments"
i have tried the other brands of strings, and this is the other brand i consistently buy! its smooth to use and the sound is superb!, "musical_instruments"
Well made. Enjoyable to play. Stay in tune well. The sound is clear and warm on my Yamaha and my Martin. Right now I am experimenting with different strings so I cant say if they are better than others. I personally like the sound better than the Martin ESs I have tried but that is a personal choice. Let your guitar be the judge., "musical_instruments"
These D'Addario Medium Acoustic Guitar Strings come as individually packaged sets of three, with the necessary six strings in each set. Being new to guitars, we had no idea how often the strings would need to be replaced so this three pack seemed like a good starting point.The strings are good quality, produce accurate tones (according to our auto-tuner), and have held up well.Highly RecommendedCFH, "musical_instruments"
I can now say I have used several others - coated Martins, flat wounds, smooth wounds, EXP, Elixir, etc. These are pretty cheap and sound like a million bucks. Their tone is slightly bright but not as &#34;harpsichord&#34; as the EXP. I am done experimenting. These are the strings for Takamine guitars., "musical_instruments"
I thought it was a good deal when I saw the original price, the discount stated it was $8 off. Instead it was only $2 cheaper than buying at my local music store. Other than the price, the strings work great on my guitar. Sounds amazing. I'll definitely be buying more of these., "musical_instruments"
I prefer the light strings but you have to allow them to stretch a little or you might break on when changing. The lighter the less tension you should use. I love the price and they last me quite a while., "musical_instruments"
This gauge is perfect for my 1970 Gibson J-50. The phospher-bronze alloy wrap brings out hidden tonal \"snap\" in this old, rather heavily-braced guitar. The may be too bright for a lighter instrument, but they really shine on my old guitar., "musical_instruments"
I will keep this short.  The price is unbelievable, it's nice to have three sets in a box and these are the best acoustic strings on the market.  That's only my opinion and everyone has one......so many will disagree.I have an regular acoustic and an acoustic electric and strung both with these strings.  It made each guitar sound like a 3 thousand dollar guitar.  I find that most inexpensive guitars have cheap strings, most can be vastly improved with something as simple as new strings.  I really believe in these strings.  When I find a good thing, I am hooked and I will not use anything BUT these on anything acoustic.  On a guitar, strings are everything.  The tone feel and bend is what's important.  These are very light and VERY easy on the fingers, unlike clunky stock strings on most acoustics.  I guess they think you need big, think strings to produce volume....not so.  Some will disagree saying they break if they're too thin.  I would rather have a shorter life with strings, getting a pure beautiful, rich sound than have a long lasting flat string.  My thick stock strings were killing my fingers.  These are effortless to play and sound so sweet and mellow, just like an acoustic should sound.Again, someone will chime in and bash me for saying this...but I would put my inexpensive Yamaha up against guitars costing 10 times what I paid.  I have no plans of changing brands now I've made the string switch.  Some say thin strings break easily, but you should change strings often anyway.  I can do a string change-over in about 15 minutes on a bad day.  It's worth the effort.  I don't plan on hammering my acoustic anyway.  That's what the Fender is for.  AND it's not that I'm cheap either.  I own 18 guitars, 16 of which are electrics.  3 Gibson Les Paul's, 2 Fender Strats (one American) a couple of Dillions (another great find) and some other nice guitars.My Acoustic is just an inexpensive Yamaha 700 but is a very nice guitar for the money.  But after changing the strings it sounds like an expensive Martin.  It didn't take me long to throw a set of these on my acoustic electric and got the same results.5 stars in my book, more if they'd allow that.  There are no other options unless someone gives me a set that blow me away., "musical_instruments"
Low end made in China dreadnaught acoustic - Bristol - actually sounds somewhat fantastic in terms of low end resonance and sparkling high end.Here's what I've found. The way you string the guitar makes a difference. With practice I've become more proficient.Curve the ball ends for better seating under the bridge plate. Not just a simple bend but kind of bend them over my thumb so they can sort of catch before inserting the bridge pin. Then check with a mirror and flashlight to confirm.I use a locking pattern on the tuning pegs and keep the string quite tight so it loops tightly around the peg.Then I use a microfiber cloth and wipe down each string after each time playing, - use my little finger to hook the cloth under each string and wipe down each length.Try to practice for about an hour daily. The tone as I say is pretty darn good. Played a high end adirondack, rosewood, name brand and was disappointed that it didn't sound that much better to me., "musical_instruments"
Got the 3 pack and oh what a great difference on me, my guitar, and my sound.I'm a 62 YO newby to guitar!! This proves that easy helps. I have a big baby Taylor and when i needed new strings I went to the wrong place, got Martins installed -- wow did they make a (bad)diference to me.  Sounded like a 1950s monoral record and were really very uncomfortable to play. My friend said that he uses D'Addario and that they make ALL the difference in the world!! Tried them and he was right.  I changed my own (on the big Baby) and the color coding made it really simple to put the right string in the right position (instead of switching the E and B string like the dealer did!) MY Taylor recommends Elixr, but the D'Addarios seem to play with a nicer tone on the Taylor and just as important are easier on the fingers!!, "musical_instruments"
These really sound great on my acoustic flat top guitars. D'Addario's are the best and I love the ball end color coding. No guessing or searching for the vernier caliper to make sure the right string is on the right tuner.This coding system is consistent thru all their string sets. Can't beat this., "musical_instruments"
have to reorder soon  great strings for the money. I play guitar with a cou[ple of my buddies and they love them too  sound quaility is great, "musical_instruments"
I tried these strings on my Zager guitar.  the are certainly ok and play fine.  they are nothing far and above the original strings provided thru Zager.  just a little cheaper in cost perhaps.  maybe they will last longer.  I had some problem with my original strings as the high strings started to rust in the case due to the humidity I put in there for the guitar wood (I live in hot and very dry Arizona).  these have not rusted, so far., "musical_instruments"
D'Addario Strings Are Simply The Best!The brightest tone, normal lifespan, fair prices,, and louder than the rest!I have played guitar professionally for over 27 years.These strings are the best all around for tone, clarity, punch and volume.Don't be fooled by strings that may last longer or have coating on them just to sacrifice clear tone.One a side note. I hate their new packaging.They used to wrap them individually in paper sleeves. Then about a decade ago they started winding them individually, but placed them loosely inside a plastic sealed pouch. NOW, they wind up two at a time, and place them inside a plastic pouch. Arrgh!Same great strings and tone, but now you have to unwind them from their &#34;pairs&#34; and lay them out two-at-a-time...kind of aggravating, but NO FRIGGIN' WAY WOULD I EVER USE ANOTHER STRING! - lol!I compared these (and other D'Addario's) to other manufacturers...they were much louder and cleaner.Don't be an idiot. Buy the best all around string and improve your tone immediately., "musical_instruments"
D'Arrario does sell some fine strings.  While these are not my very, very favorites (strictly because I prefer a slightly lighter gauging on light strings), they still do just fine--much better than some other brands I've tried.  I would not hesitate to buy them again.  Good-sounding and playing all-around strings., "musical_instruments"
these strings are great with my acoustics-however, lately i've been using electric strings instead. they work well, sound great, and i believe they really compliment my playing., "musical_instruments"
My favorite strings for 30 years. Have used D'Addario strings since the late 70's. Always a great sound at a great price., "musical_instruments"
far as i can tell, good strings. They do the job and they feel great. Not much to say...I got exactly what I expected., "musical_instruments"
Good strings for the price, nice ring to them.  So far they seem to last and were a bit louder than my last strings although they were flat round and did expect them to be very loud., "musical_instruments"
These are the best strings I've ever put on my guitar, I play a really nice Morgan Monroe Creekside and these strings give it the fullness it deserves. The bright highs, the rich mids, and they bend like crazy when I need them too, "musical_instruments"
I have used all kinds of strings. These are what I use on a regular basis. They work, they sound great, and their longevity is impressive. Most of all, they are cheap., "musical_instruments"
Excellent strings. Beautiful solid tone and no buzzing., "musical_instruments"
This is my favorite string to use on all my acoustic instruments.  The strings last a long time, in my opinion.  They keep their bright look and sound, even when my friend with acid for sweat borrows my guitar.I have always liked D'Addario's packaging.  Instead of each string coming in an individual envelope marked with the gauge, D'Addario color codes the ball end of the string -- so the G is green, the low E is brass (I think - I'm doing this from memory), the high E is silver, and so on. I really like that -- there isn't an explosion of paper at a gig when I have to change a string quickly. It's a learning curve -- once you know the system it's great, but the first few times, it's a bit of a hassle to reference the package to find which color string goes where.D'Addario is my favorite string, hands down, after almost 40 years of playing., "musical_instruments"
I decided to try these mainly due to the fact that I live near the ocean, and thought thermocouple up better. I restrung an electric acoustic with these and it sounds great with or without the amp. I will definitely recommend these., "musical_instruments"
I've been playing for 40+ years.  I've seen dozens of guitars come and go until I found my 1948 Gibson J-45 and I've tried dozens of types of strings.  Some guitars sound best with Phosphor Bronze.  Some sound best with 80/20s.  I still have an all Koa Martin guitar that is *so* bright that it sounds best with the normally tone-killing Elixir Polywebs. Got a guitar-banjo? Try silk-and-steel or silk-and-phosphor. Trust me.  I've been through my John Pearse phase. Pyramids?  Yep. Tried 'em.  I really liked LaBellas.  The problem was that back when I was using them, they would tarnish in the packaging.  I don't know if that's still the case.Anyway, the bottom line is that D'Addario phosphor bronze are my go to string.  They set the baseline for every guitar I've ever owned.  (Note: That's baseline. In some cases, I've decided something else sounded better.)  For many guitars, including my J-45, there's nothing I've found that I've liked better.Also worth noting:  The string that sounds best depends not only on the particular guitar, but also on the type of pick one uses, the type of music one plays, and the way one approaches the instrument.  The string that's best for bluegrass with a hard attack may not be what's best for delicate finger style.Bottom line: Don't follow leaders.  Watch the parkin' meters.  Experiment.  But, D'Addario PBs are a great place to start., "musical_instruments"
Bought these to try them out the medium gauge and brand. Mediums too hard on my thin fingers and will stick to light and extra light gauges. The strings were hard to slide, un-slippery, and changing barr chords made so much squeaks I didn't like. Tone is warm but too mellow for my tastes. G-string snapped 2 days later at the windings with the string wounds pried right off :\\, "musical_instruments"
I've used these strings for longer than I'd care to admit.  String sound is a personal thing.  These work better for me than any others I've tried.  To my ear they have a balanced timbre across the sound spectrum. The five star rating is a reflection of my personal taste. Others may prefer a different sound., "musical_instruments"
I put these strings on every acoustic I own.  They sound great and are priced right!  You can't go wrong with D'Addario strings!, "musical_instruments"
I played with light acoustic strings for a long time.  I tried these and they make for much easier action.Do you lose tone quality that you would get with heavier strings?  ... maybe, but the tone is still much improved going from old light gauge strings to new extra light strings.I'll probably stick with extra light for awhile.  They sound great to me, and I can play longer without getting sore fingers., "musical_instruments"
Great strings, fully recommended. I have been playing guitar for about 30 years, I only use D'Addarios & Dean Markleys. Good sound, long lasting., "musical_instruments"
I'm new to acoustic so I'm not too sure how things go, but from what I have learned from using these pics is that they seem pretty good. A little to thick for my style though. They make a very deep and loud noise. I prefer placing electric strings on acoustic. They sound much better and aren't quite as loud., "musical_instruments"
If you're a musician, there are those things that you gotta have on a regular basis and for guitar, strings are one of those things. I give these 4 stars rather than 5 just because I know there are better strings out there. However, these ones are great. I like the sound they provide and the price is nice., "musical_instruments"
I'll be honest, the reason I got these strings is because of the cheap price. I'm a professional bass player who plays guitar for fun only. These seem fine to me. Good tone and they stay in tune., "musical_instruments"
These strings are both smooth sounding and easy on the fingers.  My acoustic guitars seem to like them too, all except my 12-string. I have not switched form Martin strings on that guitar., "musical_instruments"
Not onlh are these good for the price, but they have become my new fave.  I switch acoustic strings 3-4 times a month on my 2 main guitars.  I gig 1-2 times a month.  These last long, without compromising the tone.  Great price too!  I tried every brand until I got to these.  Not sure why I did not try them earlier :(.  Probably because I was drinking the Elixir Koolaide., "musical_instruments"
I really love the fact that they are color coded so you don't mix your strings up and easy on my fingers. I love the price, they are a very good brand and easy to install. Highly recommend, "musical_instruments"
It's D'addario, you can't go wrongGreat quality and I am looking forward to purchasing more of this brand. Thanks, "musical_instruments"
These are my go-to acoustic strings.  They are a quality string with great sustain and clarity.  I bought Elixir Nanos to compare, and I did like them, but I think you get more clarity when chording or hammering on with these. I'll be sticking with these for the long run., "musical_instruments"
Extra Light gives good action for my small guitar. Not so hard on the fingers. Tone is not bad but not same as 11 or 12 gauge., "musical_instruments"
The strings sound great on my full size acoustic - nice bright, but warm tone, full bodied sound - but not so great on my 3/4 size guitar., "musical_instruments"
D'Addario ALWAYS puts out a nice product.  The E and B strings never have enough coating, but still.  In comparison to others, they do a good job of getting the music out there in a bright and sustained manner., "musical_instruments"
This brand has never disappointed me, regardless of the diameter of the strings. To me they just sound complete. Even the light strings don't sound tinny, which amazed me compared to other big names. They complement my Washburns very well. Though they are not top of the line models, I often get compliments like &#34;you're guitars must be expensive judging from the sound alone&#34;. But it's been a trial & error for me. I found that my Washburns sound better with this brand at least as far as my own ears are concerned., "musical_instruments"
Always buy D'Addario strings for my 7 guitars.  Those strings stay tuned longer and will last me a little longer than others I have tried and believe me when I say that I tried many other types.  They have a great rating from other musicians. ....and the price is very affordable.  Highly recommended by this writer.  It is difficult to discuss taste in guitar strings....it is a bit like discussing our likes in food, musicians, movies....etc.  We all have our likes and dislikes.....For my taste D'Addario EJ16-3D is usually the strings I drift back to whenever I buy strings.  I like their full sound and their lasting tones., "musical_instruments"
good strings, "musical_instruments"
i love these strings.  i had limited experience selecting strings for my acoustic but as soon as i tried these, i really enjoyed them.  after reading reviews realized i actually made a good purchase.  no desire to test other strings.  especially after this bundle/value., "musical_instruments"
Arrived beautifully with plenty of time to forward this on to another guitar enthusiest who rarely changes her strings, tune., "musical_instruments"
I'm going to be honest, I have a cheap guitar. I payed $120 for an Epiphone at my local music store because I just play it recreationally. (Bonfires, sitting around the house, etc..) So I've never really put a nice set of strings on it because I figured strings aren't really going to make THAT much of a sound difference on this guitar, but I was way way way wrong! These strings aren't even that expensive, actually they're only a few more dollars than the usual cheap strings I put on my guitar. Yet, they completely  changed the sound of my guitar and it sounds like I forked over some money for a decent guitar! The strings are high quality and they feel so smooth under my fingertips! I used to play once or twice a week, but I can't help but want to play every single day just to hear these things sing!, "musical_instruments"
DAddario's are my go to strings for my Washburn and Ibanez acoustics.  They sustain well, great tone, tune well, and last for a good while between changes., "musical_instruments"
I gave these strings a try, but I don't care for them that much. I have always used SP;s or Elixir's, and I don't think that will change after trying these., "musical_instruments"
I'm enjoying using this priced-right set of strings. I put these strings on my Martin guitar after receiving my new DVD from customerservice@peghead.nl entitled \"How to Play Fingerstyle Guitar\" by Eltjo Haselhoff, whose preview of this GREAT DVD I found on YouTube. See the preview and look at other Youtube videos of Eltjo - you'll want to order the DVD immediately., "musical_instruments"
I bought these primarily because they are so cheap. The quality is good I would say - not great, but not terrible either. They sound great for a few weeks but then become very dull. They don't last nearly as long as Elixirs, but then again, they are a lot cheaper than Elixirs. I would recommend these for practice - no gigging with these as the sound isn't quite as crisp as I would think a performer would want. For the price though, it's hard to knock on them too much., "musical_instruments"
The small e-string and the g- string both broke on the ball end while tuning.  I haven't broke a string while tuning in 20 years, never ever had one break on the ball end.Luckily I bought the three pack.But I can't recommend this product., "musical_instruments"
Excellent steel guitar strings, each string has a color coded end, each 6-string bag has three bundles of two strings which makes it even easier to figure out which string goes where.  Purchased a 3 set box, and each box was in a seperate sealed bag for freshness.  I went with the mediums.  Try the light if you are a beginner., "musical_instruments"
I really like these strings. Good sound and the feel is good. Not sure there is much difference in tension of lighter strings, however. I only bought one set, not three sets and have not had to change them yet after three months., "musical_instruments"
Anyone who plays a lot know that strings are very much a personal thing.  The tonal qualities, weight, feel, materials and all other qualities / variables combine to make strings your very own personal favorite.  For me these strings bring it all together and are my string of choice for all 12 acoustic electrics I use to play what I consider rock ballads using my strumming-style of play.I love the feel and tone of these strings for my style of play and my equipment set-up.  I do have some issues with these strings, , "musical_instruments"
It has been a while since I put new strings on my acoustic guitar. These went on with no problems. They have a brassy sound to them. Since purchasing them, they still ring nicely., "musical_instruments"
My favorite string from back in the '60s when I had my own guitar shop. Great strings and the best packaging., "musical_instruments"
I had been using 12's on my S35 Takamine and they were over powering the chassis with vibration. The result was poor sound. Switching to these 10's made a huge difference in tone. It took a bit to get used to the lightness but now I will stick with them on this guitar. They are also easy to do bends which I like alot. I have never broke a D'Addario acoustic string., "musical_instruments"
I agree with all the other 5 star reviews, the quality of these strings is excellent.They last with great tone for a reasonable time, and don't break.I just have a helpful hint for those people with little experience in re-stringing an acoustic guitar that has removable bridge pins. Put a crimp or bend in each string about 3/4 of an inch or so from the ball at the end, about 45 degrees from the straight portion of the string, fairly sharp. Just beyond or just on the wound portion that holds the ball on. Then push the ball into the hole and make sure the crimped portion of the string is slid up against the wall of the hole closest to the neck of the guitar, out of the way of the pin. Then slide in the pin and make sure the ball is not resting on the bottom of the pin! The pin should fit tightly into the hole, and the crimp you made in the string keeps the ball on the side of the pin, not below it. Each pin has a groove in it where the string passes into the hole on the side of the pin. After pushing in the pin, you can pull on the string in the direction of the nut, and the ball should be pressing the pin sideways in the hole, keeping it tight. It may be under or on the side of the bridge inside the guitar, but I can't see in there to verify this is so, but I know that the ball is pressing sideways on the pin! Not upward.Hope this helps some novices, I had to learn it this way myself., "musical_instruments"
I have multiple guitars, for different styles.  I use these strings on my Ovation Legend, for acoustic leads.  Good tone, good sustain, and they stay in tune.  I play 2 gigs a week on average, and practice everyday.  These strings get a workout, and I change strings when I start to lose sustain.  That's why I buy the 10 packs, so I always have spare sets on hand., "musical_instruments"
These strings are what I use on all  of my acoustic guitars.  The sound and tone are great, and the price is right.  They shipped quickly and I will order again and again., "musical_instruments"
I have restored an old REX Commander.  Yeah, I know;  never heard of it.  Beautiful old archtop acoustic with real mother of pearl rectangular inlays on the neck.  Frets filed nearly flat after over a half century of playing.  But the resonance of the D'Addario's really bring this old guitar to life with a thick juicy vibrance on the bass side, and bell like clarity on the treble side.  Not to mention how great they look.  The snap and sparkle of the responsiveness of these stings amazes me.  Terrific strings for the price of cheapies., "musical_instruments"
I have not used mine yet but my brother in law says it looks like i got the same strings on my guitar already i trust him he knows more about guiatars than i do, "musical_instruments"
I needed to replace the strings on my acoustic, and chose these D'Addario's based on price and the favorable reviews given them by other users. I'm glad I chose them, as they play easily and have a nice sound. The lighter gauge allows for rapid yet sure fingering, and makes 'bending' notes for a blues effect a cinch. In fact, I occasionally have to remind myself there's no longer any need to press down nearly as hard as I previously had to when playing the heavier-gauge strings my guitar came with. In short, these strings make playing so much more enjoyable, I wish I'd gotten them from the start. But then, without the comparison of playing with the old strings, I might not appreciate playing with these half as much as I do now., "musical_instruments"
Not much to say here. Strings are a very personal thing to a guitar player. You need to try different gauges and brands till you find the ones that work best for you and your style. These are the string of choice for my acoustic and have been for many many years. I replace my strings about once a month with casual play and proper maintenance so why run to the store or pay for shipping 10 times a year. The strings are great, priced great and was on sale which made it even better. There is less waste with the packaging which help the planet just a bit so that's good too., "musical_instruments"
Tried them all. These are the best sounding in my book. They last pretty long for non-coated strings and play nicely, too., "musical_instruments"
D'Addario,what's up? These didn't last long at all.I don't play my Martin very often,(too busy with electrics..) but these were trashed in a month.Guess your using recycled car bumpers for strings now? Never purchase again., "musical_instruments"
I recently acquired a Guild six string that I strung with my usual EJ16 strings, however, it just wasn't playing or sounding as good as I knew it could.  After tweaking the action and restringing with EJ17 Mediums, that Guild has sounds great with plenty of punch & power to spare.Overall, I rely on D'Addario strings for all my instruments. What's not to love about a 300+ year-old, family-owned company that (beginning with the days of catgut) has been responsible for dozens of string making innovations?  Beyond great tone & playability, these suckers are reliable as all get-out. These days if a string breaks, I know right away I need to check the nut & saddle, because these strings don't snap unless something on the instrument caused damage. In fact, I used to snap strings every other performance before I learned to properly hone the string rests on my instrument and use NOTHING but D'Addario strings. I haven't broken a string during a performance in years, and believe me, I ain't being gentle with 'em., "musical_instruments"
D'addario makes a pretty good string, but I'd have to say I prefer the Elixir. The sound is a little brighter, and the strings last longer with Elixir. Don't get me wrong though, I still like these.  If there's a sale, I'll buy some more., "musical_instruments"
it's tri pack with great quality strings on good deal! i purchased 2 of this set and it works great. it sounds balanced (warm and bright). i prefer change strings often so i can't afford to do that with expensive set of strings. this one is affordable and make my guitar sound good! anyone needs string go for it!, "musical_instruments"
I have been using these strings for years and have been happy with them but the last couple of sets have lost the tone completely on strings 4,5,6 within 3 days of installing.  I play professionally and have a lot of experience installing strings, nothing wrong on the guitar.  Hopefully the next set will be better, "musical_instruments"
received in just a few days....to a beginner like me they like like good strings but what do I know.., "musical_instruments"
I usually play classical (nylon string) guitar, but have an Ovation deep-bowl acoustic electric as well and after the original strings wore out, I never have found strings that I really liked (don't ask me why I never thought about contacting Ovation and asking them what they use from the factory.  One of those duh things I didn't even think of until just now).Based on reviews and questions answered here on Amazon, I purchased this triple-set of strings.  Instant gratification.  First, they tuned up quickly and retained their tune on a relatively respectable basis (no new string holds tune perfectly for the first couple of days, but these retained tune fairly well).  The sound is excellent, the playability comfy.  The tone of my Ovation was back.Here are my itemized observations:* First, three sets for $13 (currently).  Cannot beat the value for price.* BRILLIANCE.  What many people call &#34;bright&#34;, brilliance is the opposite of &#34;dull&#34;.  Some strings sound dull right out of the package.  These strings are brilliant, bringing out the full tone and maximum volume from the guitar.* TONE.  The natural tone of the guitar is allowed to shine through, no hint of &#34;tinniness&#34;, &#34;plunk&#34; or &#34;twang&#34;.* MELLOW.  Mellow is difficult to define, but the best definition I've heard is, &#34;Ah, that sounds nice.&#34;  Mellow is a string settling into a guitar and becoming part of the guitar.  It's a pleasantness that doesn't grate on your ears when you pluck a string.  These strings are medium-mellow, just enough to allow one to enjoy the sound without falling asleep.  : )* BALANCE.  At first the E overtoned the b and e.  But as the strings settled that became less pronounced and the strings balanced right out.  The trebles became clearly audible while the E and A provided just the right touch of bass.* COMFORT.  The 12-53mm diameter of these strings is comfortable to the fingers.  Thicker strings are often more difficult to play and can even damage some guitars.  Lighter gauge tends to cut into the fingers unless the guitar has excellent action.  These strings are just right-- especially the 53mm E, which provides the proper amount of bass without overkill or difficulty in strumming.SUMMARY:  These are excellent strings, which doesn't surprise me since I've use D'Addario classical guitar strings for years.  Martin and GHS are both good strings, but somehow D'Addario just shines.Thanks to Amazon enthusiasts who helped me decide to give these a try.  Highly recommended., "musical_instruments"
I love the strings so far, just put them on my Jasmine by Takamine guitar today (2-20-14) and they sound amazing, very bright tone, I will be using D'Addario strings from now on, very pleased with them., "musical_instruments"
I have used D'Addario EJ-16 PB lights for years. I find them hard to beat for quality and sound and will continue to use them on all my guitars., "musical_instruments"
These are great strings. Nice bright tone. The three pack was the best deal when I ordered them. Get some!, "musical_instruments"
These strings I put on my Taylor GA4E.  They had a very nice and balanced mids and highs.  These strings fit very nicely for a acoustic guitarist that is playing with a bassist and supporting instruments.  These strings fill and fit the acoustic spectrum nicely.  Nice mids and ringing highs.  Not a lot of bass.  But very nice balance as I said.  YMMV., "musical_instruments"
I started experimenting on strings, I'll try using bronze strings. I noticed when I was using the phosphor bronze, after a while it started to sound dull. When I switched to bronze it sounded better and lasted longer. I decided I would use bronze strings for my acoustic guitar for most of the time. I would recommend others to try it!, "musical_instruments"
Tried D'Adario EJ36 Extra Light 12-string set on my Eko Ranger XII 12-string acoustic, and the EJ11 Light 6-string set on my Takamine.  No trouble stringing or tuning either set.  With the 0.012-0.53 Light weight strings I tuned a full note lower than normal to ease string tension, and they still sound fine.  Good acoustic, but a rather strong metalic, sound with a nice \"ring\", and notably more metalic than the EJ15 Phosphor Bronze strings.  Sound does deaden over time, as expected, but I especially noticed deadening on the high E and B non-wound strings, losing some of their \"ring\".  (Tried Elixir's for better longevity, but they did not sound as good to me as these D'Adario's.), "musical_instruments"
I bought these strings to replace the strings on my Hofner acoustic. The gauge is pretty good for a deeper tone. I might try a lighter set next time, but these have a good clear tone from low to high, and are fairly comfortable., "musical_instruments"
These and Reds are my favorite acoustic strings. These are a little brighter than Reds and are best for live playing. The strings are well made and I've never had an issue with quality., "musical_instruments"
80/20 strings \"blend\" really well on my cheap Jasmine guitar. They improve the bass and do not emphasize the tinny sound that inexpensive plywood guitars often exhibit. Phosphor Bronze were way too bright on the Jasmine. 80/20 is good choice for a guitar that needs smoothing out. They did nothing to help my over-braced 1970 Gibson J-50, though. Phosphor Bronze strings are required to give that old box some snap., "musical_instruments"
Have been using these for years on my acoustic guitar ... like them and never an issue ...nice bright tone & and last a.good long while., "musical_instruments"
First time I ordered these was in a larger order, and Amazon forgot to put them in the box. Oops! I contacted their customer support people and they overnighted me a replacement set of strings at no extra charge. Thank you, Amazon!I like the tone of D'Addario's 80/20 bronze strings. I've been playing more bluegrass-y guitar lately, so I've switched to mostly using phosphor bronze, but these strings have a great warmth that I really enjoy. I also notice that electronic tuners have a much easier time picking up the notes from the 80/20 strings.Amazon has the best price on these, and they're inexpensive enough that I can afford to change strings whenever I feel like it. I like their tone, and they react well with my skin chemistry so they last a long time., "musical_instruments"
Sound can be subjective and strings are a matter of debate that can go on forever.  Usually I wouldn't notice a significant difference between brands (except for any coated string that all sound like crap to my ears) but when I put D'addarios on my 000 I just couldn't believe the improvement over the Martins.  It took dozens of string changes and gage experiments but now its clear.  These consistently sound the most balanced and responsive... With the crisp clear highs that my guitar lacks when strung with anything else.I'm glad the search is over for awhile and I have a solid sweet baseline to experiment from here!, "musical_instruments"
I love these strings...they sound awesome on my acoustic. However, they do not last long, but that is the price you pay for a good sound. Not strings recommended for beginners, due to the bigger gauge., "musical_instruments"
I bought a case of these.  I can't handle #12 strings and the sound of #10 is terrible.  I prefer #12 strings for finger picking but they hurt my hands.  not the fingers but the hand and wrists, so .01